He should be told: “Do not put it like that.
For if that were so, then contemplation of the body, etc., would also have quadruple and quintuple jhāna. But there is not even the first jhāna in the contemplation of feeling or in the other two.17
So do not misrepresent the Blessed One by adherence to the letter. The Enlightened One’s word is profound and should be taken as it is intended, giving due weight to the teachers.”
And the intention here is this: The Blessed One, it seems, was asked to teach the Dhamma thus: “Venerable sir, it would be good if the Blessed One would teach me the Dhamma in brief, so that, having heard the Blessed One’s Dhamma, I may dwell alone, withdrawn, diligent, ardent and self-exerted” . But the Blessed One had no confidence yet in that bhikkhu, since although he had already heard the Dhamma he had nevertheless gone on living there instead of going to do the ascetic’s duties, and the Blessed One expressed his lack of confidence thus: “So too, some misguided men merely question me, and when the Dhamma is expounded to them, they still fancy that they need not follow me” . However, the bhikkhu had the potentiality for the attainment of Arahantship, and so he advised him again, saying: “Therefore, bhikkhu, you should train thus: ‘My mind shall be steadied, quite steadied internally, and arisen evil unprofitable things shall not obsess my mind and remain.’
You should train thus” .
But what is stated in that advice is basic concentration consisting in mere unification of mind18 internally in the sense of in oneself .
After that he told him about its development by means of loving-kindness in order to show that he should not rest content with just that much but should intensify his basic concentration in this way: “As soon as your mind has become steadied, quite steadied internally, bhikkhu, and arisen evil unprofitable things do not obsess your mind and remain,
You should train thus, bhikkhu” , after which he said further: “As soon as this concentration has been thus developed by you, bhikkhu,19 and frequently practiced, then you should develop this concentration with applied thought and sustained thought … and you should develop it accompanied by equanimity” .
The meaning is this: “Bhikkhu, when this basic concentration has been developed by you by means of loving-kindness, then, instead of resting content with just that much, you should make this basic concentration reach quadruple and quintuple jhāna in other objects by further developing it in the way beginning ‘With applied thought.’ ”
And having spoken thus, pointing out that “you should effect its further development by means of quadruple and quintuple jhāna in other objects, this further development being preceded by the remaining divine abidings of compassion and the rest.” he further said: “As soon as this concentration has been thus developed by you, bhikkhu, and frequently practiced,
Having thus shown how its further development by means of quadruple and quintuple jhāna is preceded by loving-kindness, etc., and having told him, “As soon as this concentration has been developed by you, bhikkhu, and frequently practiced, then you should train thus: ‘I shall dwell contemplating the body as a body,’” etc., he concluded the discourse with Arahantship as its culmination thus: “As soon as this concentration has been developed by you, bhikkhu, completely developed, then wherever you go you will go in comfort, wherever you stand you will stand in comfort, wherever you sit you will sit in comfort, wherever you make your couch you will do so in comfort” .
From that it must be understood that the three beginning with loving-kindness have only triple-quadruple jhāna, and that equanimity has only the single remaining jhāna.
And they are expounded in the same way in the Abhidhamma as well.
The Highest Limit of Each 119. And while they are twofold by way of the triple-quadruple jhāna and the single remaining jhāna, still they should be understood to be distinguishable in each case
by a different efficacy consisting in having “beauty as the highest,” etc. For they are so described in the Haliddavasana Sutta,
But why are they described in this way?
Because each is the respective basic support for each.
For beings are unrepulsive to one who abides in loving- kindness.
Being familiar with the unrepulsive aspect, when he applies his mind to unrepulsive pure colours such as blue-black, his mind enters into them without difficulty.
So loving-kindness is the basic support for the liberation by the beautiful , but not for what is beyond that. That is why it is called “having beauty as the highest.”
One who abides in compassion has come to know thoroughly the danger in materiality, since compassion is aroused in him when he sees the suffering of beings that has as its material sign beating with sticks, and so on.
So, well knowing the danger in materiality, when he removes whichever kasiṇa concept he was contemplating, whether that of the earth kasiṇa or another, and applies his mind to the space that remains , which is the escape from materiality, then his mind enters into that space without difficulty.
So compassion is the basic support for the sphere of boundless space, but not for what is beyond that. That is why it is called “having the base consisting of boundless space as the highest.”
When he abides in gladness, his mind becomes familiar with apprehending consciousness, since gladness is aroused in him when he sees beings’ consciousness arisen in the form of rejoicing over some reason for joy.
Then when he surmounts the sphere of boundless space that he had already attained in due course and applies his mind to the consciousness that had as its object the sign of space, his mind enters into it without difficulty. So gladness is the basic support for the base consisting of boundless consciousness, but not for what is beyond that. That is why it is called “having the sphere of boundless consciousness as the highest.”
When he abides in equanimity, his mind becomes skilled21 in appre- hending what is non-existent, because his mind has been diverted from apprehension of the ultimate sense, namely, pleasure, pain, etc., owing to having no further concern such as “May beings be happy” or “May they be released from pain” or “May they not lose the success they have obtained.”
So equanimity is the basic support for the base consisting of nothingness, but not for what is beyond that. That is why it is called “having the base consisting of nothingness as the highest.”
When he has understood thus that the special efficacy of each resides respectively in “having beauty as the highest,” etc., he should besides understand how they bring to perfection all the good states beginning with giving.
For the Great Beings’ minds retain their balance by giving preference to beings’ welfare, by dislike of beings’ suffering, by desire for the various successes achieved by beings to last, and by impartiality towards all beings. And to all beings they give gifts, which are a source a pleasure, without discriminating thus: “It must be given to this one; it must not be given to this one.”
And in order to avoid doing harm to beings they undertake the precepts of virtue.
They practice renunciation for the purpose of perfecting their virtue.
They cleanse their understanding for the purpose of non-confusion about what is good and bad for beings.
They constantly arouse energy, having beings’ welfare and happiness at heart.
When they have acquired heroic fortitude through supreme energy, they become patient with beings’ many kinds of faults.
They do not deceive when promising “We shall give you this; we shall do this for you.”
They are unshakably resolute upon beings’ welfare and happiness.
Through unshakable loving-kindness they place them first before themselves.
Through equanimity they expect no reward. Having thus fulfilled the ten perfections, these divine abidings then perfect all the good states classed as the ten powers, the four kinds of fearlessness, the six kinds of knowledge not shared by disciples, and the eighteen states of the Enlightened One.22 This is how they bring to perfection all the good states beginning with giving.
in the Treatise on the Development of Concentration
while the others have the respective purposes of warding off cruelty, aversion , and greed or resentment.
“For this is the escape from ill will, friends, that is to say, the mind-deliverance of loving-kindness …
For this is the escape from cruelty, friends, that is to say, the mind-deliverance of compassion …
For this is the escape from boredom, friends, that is to say, the mind-deliverance of gladness …
For this is the escape from greed, friends, that is to say, the mind-deliverance of equanimity” .
for it is not possible to practice compassion and be cruel to breathing things simultaneously.
for it is not possible to look on with equanimity and be inflamed with greed or be resentful15 simultaneously.
When his mind has become malleable and wieldy with respect to that, he can then delimit two dwellings.
and next, on seeing or hearing or judging16 that beings whose welfare has been thus wished for are at the mercy of suffering, they should be practiced as the promotion of the aspect of the removal of suffering—and compassion has the promotion of the aspect of the removal of suffering as its characteristic;
for their scope is measureless beings;
All of them, however, occur with a measureless scope,
and then, on seeing the success of those whose welfare has been wished for and the removal of whose suffering has been wished for, they should be practiced as being glad—and gladness has the act of gladdening as its characteristic;
but after that there is nothing to be done and so they should be practiced as the neutral aspect, in other words, the state of an onlooker—and equanimity has the promotion of the aspect of neutrality as its characteristic;
therefore, since their respective aims are the aspect of welfare, etc., their order should be understood to correspond, with loving- kindness stated first, then compassion, gladness and equanimity.
their order to their aim. Immeasurable
then you should train thus: ‘The mind- deliverance of loving-kindness will be developed by me, frequently practiced, made the vehicle, made the foundation, established, consolidated, and properly undertaken.’
then you should train thus: ‘The mind-deliverance of compassion will be developed by me …’ , etc.
according as it is said: “Bhikkhus, the mind-deliverance of loving-kindness has beauty as the highest, I say …
The mind-deliverance of compassion has the base consisting of boundless space as the highest, I say …
The mind-deliverance of gladness has the base consisting of boundless consciousness as the highest I say …
The mind- deliverance of equanimity has the base consisting of nothingness as the highest, I say” .20
Now his mind has become used to being diverted from apprehension of what is existent in the ultimate sense, and his mind has become skilled in apprehending what is non-existent in the ultimate sense, , and so when he surmounts the base consisting of boundless consciousness attained in due course and applies his mind to the absence, which is non-existent as to individual essence, of consciousness, which is a reality in the ultimate sense, then his mind enters into that without difficulty .
The ninth chapter
called “The Description of the Divine Abidings”
in the Path of Purification composed for the purpose of gladdening good people.
Greed is the near enemy of loving-kindness since it is able to corrupt owing to its similarity, like an enemy masquerading as a friend…
‘Mere unification of the mind’: the kind of concentrating that is undeveloped and just obtained by one in pursuit of development.
That is called ‘basic concentration,’ however, since it is the basic reason for the kinds of more distinguished concentration to be mentioned later in this connection.
For the first unification of the mind is recognized as momentary concentration here as it is in the first of the two successive descriptions: ‘Tireless energy was aroused in me … my mind was concentrated and unified’ followed by ‘Quite secluded from sense desires …’” 
This ‘mere unification of the mind’ is intended as momentary concentration as in the passage beginning, ‘I internally settled, steadied, unified and concentrated my mind’ .
‘Thus developed’: just as a fire started with wood and banked up with cowdung, dust, etc., although it arrives at the state of a ‘cowdung fire,’ etc., is nevertheless called after the original fire that was started with the wood, so too it is the basic concentration that is spoken of here, taking it as banked up with loving- kindness, and so on.
‘In other objects’ means in such objects as the earth kasiṇa.
Because it has no more concern ’: because it has no further act of being concerned by hoping for their pleasure, etc., thus ‘May they be happy.’
The development of loving-kindness, etc., occurring as it does in the form of hope for beings’ pleasure, etc., makes them its object by directing the mind to apprehension of what is existent in the ultimate sense i.e. pleasure, etc.. But development of equanimity, instead of occurring like that, makes beings its object by simply looking on.
But does not the divine abiding of equanimity itself too make beings its object by directing the mind to apprehension of what is existent in the ultimate sense, because of the words, ‘Beings are owners of their deeds. Whose if not theirs is the choice by which they will become happy …?’ 
—Certainly that is so. But that is in the prior stage of development of equanimity. When it has reached its culmination, it makes beings its object by simply looking on. So its occurrence is specially occupied with what is non-existent in the ultimate sense i.e. beings, which are a concept.
And so skill in apprehending the non-existent should be understood as avoidance of bewilderment due to misrepresentation in apprehension of beings, which avoidance of bewilderment has reached absorption.
I beg the opportunity to confess all my trangressions.
I beg the opportunity to confess all my trangressions both serious and slight.
Venerable Sir, I beg the opportunity to confess my trangressions in your presence.
can’t you see your trangressions.
please give me the opportunity for I cannot see them.
you should be restrained henceforth.
henceforth I will be restrained.
I will never do this again.
I beg the opportunity to confess all my trangressions.
I beg the opportunity to confess all my trangressions both serious and slight.
Venerable Sir, I beg the opportunity to confess my trangressions in your presence.
In future, friend, you should be restrained.
It is well indeed, ven. sir. I shall be restrained.
Yes, friend, I see.
Friend, I beg the opportunity to confess my trangressions in your presence.
“Bhikkhus, a bhikkhu should examine things in such a way that while he is examining them, his consciousness is not distracted and scattered externally nor stuck internally, and by not clinging he does not become agitated.
On one occasion the Blessed One was dwelling at Nalanda in Pavarika’s Mango Grove.
Then Asibandhakaputta the headman approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side,
and said to him: “Venerable sir, doesn’t the Blessed One dwell compassionate towards all living beings?”
“Then why is it, venerable sir, that the Blessed One teaches the Dhamma thoroughly to some, yet not so thoroughly to others?”
“Well then, headman, I will question you about this.
Answer as you see fit.
What do you think, headman? Suppose a farmer here had three fields: one excellent, one of middling quality, and one inferior - rough, salty, with bad ground.
What do you think, headman? If that farmer wishes to sow seed, where would he sow it first: in the excellent field, in the field of middling quality, or in the field that was inferior, the one that was rough, salty, with bad ground?”
“If, venerable sir, that farmer wishes to sow seed, he would sow it in the excellent field.
Having sown seed there, he would next sow seed in the field of middling quality.
Having sown seed there, he might or might not sow seed in the field that was inferior, the one that was rough, salty, with bad ground.
For what reason?
Because at least it can be used as fodder for the cattle.”
“Headman, just like the field that is excellent are the bhikkhus and bhikkhunis to me.
I teach them the Dhamma that is good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing; I reveal the holy life that is perfectly complete and pure.
For what reason?
Because they dwell with me as their island, with me as their shelter, with me as their protector, with me as their refuge.
“Then, headman, just like the field of middling quality are the male and female lay followers to me.
To them too I teach the Dhamma that is good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing; I reveal the holy life that is perfectly complete and pure.
For what reason?
Because they dwell with me as their island, with me as their shelter, with me as their protector, with me as their refuge.
“Then, headman, just like that field that is inferior - rough, salty, with bad ground - are the ascetics, brahmins, and wanderers of other sects to me.
Yet to them too I teach the Dhamma that is good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing; I reveal the holy life that is perfectly complete and pure.
For what reason?
Because if they understand even a single sentence, that will lead to their welfare and happiness for a long time.
“Suppose, headman, a man had three waterpots: one without cracks, which does not let water seep through and escape; one without cracks, but which lets water seep through and escape; and one with cracks, which lets water seep through and escape.
What do you think, headman? If that man wants to store water, where would he store it first: in the waterpot that is without cracks, which does not let water seep through and escape; or in the waterpot that is without cracks, but which lets water seep through and escape; or in the waterpot that has cracks, which lets water seep through and escape?”
“If, venerable sir, that man wants to store water, he would Store it in the waterpot that is without cracks, which does not let water seep through and escape. Having stored water there, he would next store it in the waterpot that is without cracks, but which lets water seep through and escape. Having stored it there, he might or might not store it in the waterpot that has cracks, which lets water seep through and escape.
For what reason?
Because it can at least be used for washing dishes.”
“Headman, just like the waterpot that is without cracks, which does not let water seep through and escape, are the bhikkhus and bhikkhunis to me.
I teach them the Dhamma that is good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing; I reveal the holy life that is perfectly complete and pu;e.
For what reason?
Because they dwell with me as their island, with me as their shelter, with me as their protector, with me as their refuge.
“Then, headman, just like the waterpot that is without cracks, but which lets water seep through and escape, are the male and female lay followers to me.
To them too I teach the Dhamma that is good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing; I reveal the holy life that is perfectly complete and pure.
For what reason?
Because they dwell with me as their island, with me as their shelter, with me as their protector, with me as their refuge.
“Then, headman, just like the waterpot that has cracks, which lets water seep through and escape, are the ascetics, brahmins, and wanderers of other sects to me.
Yet to them too I teach the Dhamma that is good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing; I reveal the holy life that is perfectly complete and pure.
For what reason?
Because if they understand even a single sentence, that will lead to their welfare and happiness for a long time.”
When this was said, Asibandhakaputta the headman said to the Blessed One: “Magnificent, venerable sir!… From today let the Blessed One remember me as a lay follower who has gone for refuge for life.”
“Yes, headman, the Tathggata dwells compassionate towards all living beings.”
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Veḷuvana with reference to Elder Moggallāna the Great.
For once upon a time the heretics met together and said to each other, “Brethren, do you know the reason why the gifts and offerings to the monk Gotama have waxed great?”
“No, we do not know; but do you know?”
“Indeed we do know; it has all come about through one Moggallāna the Great.
For Moggallāna the Great goes to heaven and asks the deities what deeds of merit they performed; and then he comes back to earth and says to men, ‘By doing this and that men receive such and such glory.’
Then he goes to Hell and asks also those who have been reborn in Hell what they did; and comes back to earth and says to men, ‘By doing this and that men experience such and such suffering.’
Men listen to what he says, and bring rich gifts and offerings. Now if we succeed in killing him, all these rich gifts and offerings will fall to us.”
“That is a way indeed! ” exclaimed all the heretics. So all the heretics with one accord formed the resolution, “We will kill him by hook or by crook.” Accordingly they roused their own supporters, procured a thousand pieces of money, and formed a plot to kill Moggallāna the Great. Summoning some wandering thieves, they gave them the thousand pieces of money and said to them, “Elder Moggallāna the Great lives at Black Rock. Go there and kill him.”
The money attracted the thieves and they immediately agreed to do as they were asked. “Yes, indeed,” said the thieves; “we will kill the Elder.” So they went and surrounded the Elder’s place of abode.
The Elder, knowing that his place of abode was surrounded, slipped out through the keyhole and escaped.
The thieves, not seeing the Elder that day, came back on the following day, and again surrounded the Elder’s place of abode.
But the Elder knew, and so he broke through the circular peak of the house and soared away into the air.
Thus did the thieves attempt both in the first month and in the second month to catch the Elder, but without success.
But when the third month came, the Elder felt the compelling force of the evil deed he had himself committed in a previous state of existence, and made no attempt to get away.
At last the thieves succeeded in catching the Elder. When they had so done, they tore him limb from limb, and pounded his bones until they were as small as grains of rice.
Then thinking to themselves, “He is dead,” they tossed his bones behind a certain clump of bushes and went their way.
The Elder thought to himself, “I will pay my respects to the Teacher before I pass into Nibbāna.” Accordingly he swathed himself with meditation as with a cloth, made himself rigid, and soaring through the air, he proceeded to the Teacher, paid obeisance to the Teacher, and said to him, “Reverend Sir, I am about to pass into Nibbāna.”
“Yes, Reverend Sir.”
“To Black Rock, Reverend Sir.”
“That will I do, Reverend Sir,” replied Moggallāna. So first paying obeisance to the Teacher, he rose into the air, performed all manner of miracles just as did the Elder Sāriputta on the day when he passed into Nibbāna, preached the Law, paid obeisance to the Teacher, and then went to Black Rock forest and passed into Nibbāna.
Immediately the report spread all over the Land of the Rose-apple, “Thieves have killed the Elder.”
Now as those very thieves were drinking strong drink in a tavern, one of them struck the other on the back and felled him to the ground.
Immediately the second thief reviled the first, saying, “You scoundrel, why did you strike me on the back and fell me to the ground?”
“Why, you vagabond of a thief, you were the first to strike Moggallāna the Great.”
The king caused the thieves to be brought into his presence and asked them, “Was it you that killed the Elder?
” “Yes, your majesty.”
” “The Naked Ascetics, your majesty.”
When he knew that they had been burned to a crisp, he caused their bodies to be plowed with iron plows and thus caused them all to be ground to bits.
The monks began a discussion in the Hall of Truth: “Elder Moggallāna the Great met a death which he did not deserve.”
7 a. Story of the Past: The son who killed his parents The story goes that once upon a time in the distant past a certain youth of station performed with his own hand all of the household duties, such as pounding rice and cooking, and took care of his mother and father to boot.
One day his mother and father said to him, “Son, you are wearing yourself out by performing all of the work both in the house and in the forest. We will fetch you home a certain young woman to be your wife.” The son replied, “Dear mother and father, there is no necessity of your doing anything of the sort. So long as you both shall live I will wait upon you with my own hand.” In spite of the fact that he refused to listen to their suggestion, they repeated their request time and again, and finally brought him home a young woman to be his wife.
For a few days only she waited upon his mother and father. After those few days had passed, she was unable even to bear the sight of them and said to her husband with a great show of indignation, “It is impossible for me to live any longer in the same house with your mother and father.” But he paid no attention to what she said. So one day, when he was out of the house, she took bits of clay and bark and scum of rice-gruel and scattered them here and there about the house. When her husband returned and asked her what it meant, she said, “This is what your blind old parents have done; they go about littering up the entire house; it is impossible for me to live in the same place with them any longer.” Thus did she speak again and again.
The result was that finally even a being so distinguished as he, a being who had fulfilled the Perfections, broke with his mother and father.
“Never mind,” said the husband, “I shall find some way of dealing with them properly.” So when he had given them food, he said to them, “Dear mother and father, in such and such a place {3.69} live kinsfolk of yours who desire you to visit them; let us go thither.” And assisting them to enter a carriage, he set out with them. When he reached the depths of the forest, he said to his father, “Dear father, hold these reins; the oxen know the track so well that they will go without guidance; this is a place where thieves lie in wait for travelers; I am going to descend from the carriage.” And giving the reins into the hands of his father, he descended from the carriage and made his way into the forest. As he did so, he began to make a noise, increasing the volume of the noise until it sounded as if a band of thieves were about to make an attack.
When his mother and father heard the noise, they thought to themselves, “A band of thieves are about to attack us.” Therefore they said to their son, “Son, we are old people; save yourself, and pay no attention to us.”
But even as his mother and father cried out thus, the son, yelling the thieves’ yell, beat them and killed them and threw their bodies into the forest. Having so done, he returned home. End of Story of the Past.
When the Teacher had related the foregoing story of Moggallāna’s misdeed in a previous state of existence, he said, “Monks, by reason of the fact that Moggallāna committed so monstrous a sin, he suffered torment for numberless hundreds of thousands of years in Hell; and thereafter, because the fruit of his evil deed was not yet exhausted, in a hundred successive existences he was beaten and pounded to pieces in like manner and so met death.
Therefore the manner of death which Moggallāna suffered was in exact conformity with his own misdeed in a previous state of existence. Likewise the five hundred heretics who with the five hundred thieves offended against my son who had committed no offense against them, suffered precisely that form of death which they deserved.
For he that offends against the offenseless, incurs misfortune and loss through ten circumstances.” So saying, he joined the connection, and preaching the Law, pronounced the following Stanzas,
Such an one will right quickly come to one of ten states:
Or severe sickness, or loss of mind,
Or death of relatives, or loss of treasures,
Upon dissolution of the body such a simpleton will go to Hell.
“You are about to pass into Nibbāna, Moggallāna?”
“To what region of the earth are you going?”
“Well then, Moggallāna, preach the Law to me before you go,
for hereafter I shall have no such disciple as you to look upon.”
Immediately King Ajātasattu sent out spies to search for the thieves.
“You don’t know whether I struck him or not.”
There was a babel of voices crying out, “’Twas I struck him, ‘Twas I struck him.” Those spies heard what the thieves said, captured all the thieves, and made their report to the king.
“Who, pray, put you up to it?
The king had the five hundred Naked Ascetics caught, placed them, together with the five hundred thieves, waist-deep in pits which he had dug in the palace-court, caused their bodies to be covered over with bundles of straw, and then caused the bundles of straw to be lighted.
At that moment the Teacher approached and asked them, “Monks, what are you saying as you sit here all gathered together? ” When they told him, he said, “Monks, if you regard only this present state of existence, Moggallāna the Great did indeed meet death which he did not deserve. But as a matter of fact, the manner of death he met was in exact conformity with the deed he committed in a previous state of existence.” Thereupon the monks asked the Teacher, “But, Reverend Sir, what was the deed he committed in a previous state of existence? ” In reply the Teacher related his former deed in detail, saying,
Whosoever visits punishment upon those that deserve not punishment, Whosoever offends against those that are without offense,
He will incur cruel suffering, or infirmity or injury of the body,
Or misfortune proceeding from the king, or a heavy accusation,
Or else the fire of lightning will consume his houses;
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Jetavana with reference to Kāla, son of Anāthapiṇḍika.
Tradition has it that Kāla, although the son of so distinguished a father, a treasurer endowed with faith, never showed any desire to visit the Teacher, or to see him when he came to his father’s house, or to hear the Law, or to perform services for the Order.
Moreover, whenever his father said to him, “Dear son, do not do this,” he paid no attention to what he said.
Now his father thought to himself, “If this son of mine adopts such an attitude as this and acts accordingly, the Avīci Hell will be his end. But it would not look well for me if my son went to Hell before my very eyes.
Now there is no living being here in the world who may not be broken by gifts; I will therefore break him with gifts.”
“You will really give me this, dear father?”
“That will I, dear son.”
After his father had repeated his promise three times, Kāla took upon himself the obligations of Fast-day and went to the monastery.
But caring not to listen to the Law, he lay down to sleep in a pleasant place and returned home early in the morning.
Thereupon his father said, “My son has performed the obligations of Fast-day; bring him rice-porridge and other food straightway.” So saying, his father caused food to be brought and given to him.
But Kāla said, “Unless I receive the money, I will not eat.” So saying, he steadfastly refused whatever was brought to him.
His father, who could not endure forcing him to eat, ordered that the money be presented to his son.
The son took the purse of money into his hands and ate the food that was brought to him.
On the following day the treasurer sent him forth, saying to him, “Dear son, I will give you a thousand pieces of money if you will stand before the Teacher, learn a single verse of the Law, and then return to me.”
The Teacher therefore caused him to misunderstand the true meaning of the verse.
Kāla, failing to understand the verse, said to himself, “I will master the following verse.” Therefore, he remained and continued to listen.
(Those who listen to the Law with a firm resolution to learn, listen attentively;
“I will master the following verse,” said Kāla. So he remained and listened and was established in the Fruit of Conversion.
On the following day he accompanied the Congregation of Monks presided over by the Buddha to Sāvatthi.
When the great treasurer saw him, he said to himself, “To-day the demeanor of my son pleases me.”
The great treasurer presented rice-porridge to the Congregation of Monks presided over by the Buddha, and then presented the same to his son.
Kāla sat down in silence, drank the porridge, ate the hard food, and then ate the boiled rice.
When the Teacher had finished his meal, the great treasurer placed the purse containing a thousand pieces of money before his son and said, “Dear son, you will remember that I persuaded you to take upon yourself the obligations of Fast-day and to go to the monastery by promising to give you a thousand pieces of money;
When Kāla saw the thousand pieces of money presented to him in the very presence of the Teacher, he was greatly embarrassed and said, “I care naught for the money.” “Take the money, dear son,” said the father. But the son refused to touch it.
Then his father saluted the Teacher and said, “Reverend Sir, the demeanor of my son to-day pleases me.” “How is that, great treasurer? ” “Day before yesterday I sent him to the monastery, saying to him, ‘I will give you a hundred pieces of money.’
Yesterday he refused to eat because I did not give him the money; but to-day, when I give him the money, he refuses to touch it.”
The Teacher replied, “It is even so, great treasurer. To-day, in attaining the Fruit of Conversion, your son has attained that which surpasses the attainment of a Universal Monarch, the attainment of the World of the Gods, the attainment of the World of Brahmā.” So saying, he pronounced the following Stanza,
In comparison with supremacy over all the worlds, the Fruit of Conversion is of supreme excellence.
So he said to his son, “Dear son, take upon yourself the obligations of Fast-day, go to the monastery, listen to the Law, and then return. If you will do so, I will give you a hundred pieces of money.”
Accordingly Kāla went to the monastery and took his stand before the Teacher. But no sooner had he mastered a single verse than he desired to run away.
and to those who thus listen, the Law gives the Fruit of Conversion and the remaining Fruits.)
Kāla listened to the Law with a firm resolution to learn; but the Teacher, as before, caused him to misunderstand the true meaning.
And straightway the following thought occurred to the son, “I hope my father will not give me the money to-day in the presence of the Teacher. I hope he will conceal the fact that it was for the sake of pieces of money that I took upon myself the obligations of Fast-day.”
here are your thousand pieces of money.”
In comparison with sovereignty over the earth, in comparison with going to heaven,
Now who will expound this in detail? “
Then they considered: “The venerable Maha Kaccana is praised by the Teacher and esteemed by his wise companions in the holy life.
If his consciousness does not follow after the rapture and pleasure born of seclusion, is not tied and shackled by gratification in the rapture and pleasure born of seclusion, is not fettered by the fetter of gratification in the rapture and pleasure born of seclusion, then his mind is called ‘not stuck internally.’
If his consciousness does not follow after the rapture and pleasure born of concentration…then his mind is called ‘not stuck internally.’
If his consciousness does not follow after the equanimity…then his mind is called ‘not stuck internally.’
Having apprehended the sign thus and defined all the other parts of the body by colour, shape, direction, location, and delimitation , he should then define repulsiveness in five ways, that is, by colour, shape, odour, habitat, and location.
Here is the explanation of all the parts given in successive order.
Head Hairs Firstly head hairs are black in their normal colour, the colour of fresh ariṭṭhaka seeds.19
As to shape, they are the shape of long round measuring rods.20
As to location, it is bounded on both sides by the roots of the ears, in front by the forehead, and behind by the nape of the neck.21
Head hairs are not body hairs, and body hairs are not head hairs; being likewise not intermixed with the remaining thirty-one parts, the head hairs are a separate part. This is their delimitation by the dissimilar.
Such is the definition of head hairs as to colour and so on.
 Their definition as to repulsiveness in the five ways, that is, by colour, etc., is as follows.
Head hairs are repulsive in colour
For on seeing the colour of a head hair in a bowl of inviting rice gruel or cooked rice, people are disgusted and say, “This has got hairs in it. Take it away.”
So they are repulsive in colour.
Also when people are eating at night, they are likewise disgusted by the mere sensation of a hair-shaped akka-bark or makaci- bark fibre.
So they are repulsive in shape.
And the odour of head hairs, unless dressed with a smearing of oil, scented with flowers, etc., is most offensive.
And it is still worse when they are put in the fire.
Even if head hairs are not directly repulsive in colour and shape, still their odour is directly repulsive.
Just as a baby’s excrement, as to its colour, is the colour of turmeric and, as to its shape, is the shape of a piece of turmeric root,
But just as pot herbs that grow on village sewage in a filthy place are disgusting to civilized people and unusable, so also head hairs are disgusting since they grow on the sewage of pus, blood, urine, dung, bile, phlegm, and the like. This is the repulsive aspect of the habitat.
And these head hairs grow on the heap of the other thirty-one parts as fungi do on a dung-hill.
And owing to the filthy place they grow in they are quite as unappetizing as vegetables growing on a charnel-ground, on a midden, etc., as lotuses or water lilies growing in drains, and so on. This is the repulsive aspect of their location.
And as in the case of head hairs, so also the repulsiveness of all the parts should be defined in the same five ways by colour, shape, odour, habitat, and location.
All, however, must be defined individually by colour, shape, direction, location, and delimitation, as follows.
Body Hairs 90.Herein, firstly, as to natural colour, body, hairs are not pure black like head hairs but blackish brown.
As to shape, they are the shape of palm roots with the tips bent down.
As to direction, they lie in the two directions.
As to location, except for the locations where the head hairs are established, and for the palms of the hands and soles of the feet, they grow in most of the rest of the inner skin that envelops the body.
As to delimitation, they are bounded below by the surface of their own roots, which are fixed by entering to the extent of a likhā22 into the inner skin that envelops the body, above by space, and all round by each other. There are no two body hairs together. This is the delimitation by the similar.
But their delimitation by the dissimilar is like that for the head hairs.
Nails 91. “Nails” is the name for the twenty nail plates.
They are all white as to colour.
As to shape, they are the shape of fish scales.
As to direction: the toenails are in the lower direction; the fingernails are in the upper direction. So they grow in the two directions.
As to location, they are fixed on the tips of the backs of the fingers and toes.
As to delimitation, they are bounded in the two directions by the flesh of the ends of the fingers and toes, and inside by the flesh of the backs of the fingers and toes, and externally and at the end by space, and all round by each other. There are no two nails together …
Teeth 92.There are thirty-two tooth bones in one whose teeth are complete.
They are white in colour.
As to shape, they are of various shapes;
Likewise in the upper row.
As to direction, they lie in the upper direction.
As to location, they are fixed in the jawbones.
As to delimitation, they are bounded by the surface of their own roots which are fixed in the jawbones; they are bounded above by space, and all round by each other. There are no two teeth together …
Skin  93. The inner skin envelops the whole body.
Outside it is what is called the outer cuticle, which is black, brown or yellow in colour, and when that from the whole of the body is compressed together, it amounts to only as much as a jujube-fruit kernel.
But as to colour, the skin itself is white;
As to shape, it is the shape of the body
in brief.
The meditator who is discerning the skin should first define the inner skin that covers the face, working his knowledge over the face beginning with the upper lip.
Next, the inner skin of the frontal bone.
Next, he should define the inner skin of the head, separating, as it were, the inner skin’s connection with the bone by inserting his knowledge in between the cranium bone and the inner skin of the head, as he might his hand in between the bag and the bowl put in the bag.
Next, the inner skin of the shoulders.
Next, the inner skin of the right arm forwards and backwards;
and then in the same way the inner skin of the left arm.
Next, after defining the inner skin of the back, he should define the inner skin of the right leg forwards and backwards;
Next, the inner skin of the groin, the paunch, the bosom and the neck should be successively defined.
Then, after defining the inner skin of the lower jaw next after that of the neck, he should finish on arriving at the lower lip.
When he discerns it in the gross in this way, it becomes evident to him more subtly too.
As to direction, it lies in both directions.
As to location, it covers the whole body.
As to delimitation, it is bounded below by its fixed surface, and above by space …
Flesh 97.There are nine hundred pieces of flesh.
As to colour, it is all red, like kiṃsuka flowers.
As to shape, the flesh of the calves is the shape of cooked rice in a palm- leaf bag.
The flesh of the thighs is the shape of a rolling pin.23
The flesh between each two ribs is the shape of clay mortar squeezed thin in a flattened opening.
The flesh of the breast is the shape of a lump of clay made into a ball and flung down.
The flesh of the two upper arms is the shape of a large skinned rat and twice the size.
When he discerns it grossly in this way, it becomes evident to him subtly too.
As to direction, it lies in both directions.
As to location, it is plastered over the three hundred and odd bones.
As to delimitation, it is bounded below by its surface, which is fixed on to the collection of bones, and above by the skin, and all round each by each other piece …
Sinews 99.There are nine hundred sinews.
As to colour, all the sinews are white.
As to shape, they have various shapes.
For five of great sinews that bind the body together start out from the upper part of the neck and descend by the front,
And of those that bind the right hand, five descend by the front of the hand
And of those that bind the right foot, five descend by the front and five by the back;
So there are sixty great sinews called “body supporters” which descend from the neck and bind the body together;
But there are others scattered over various parts of the body,
There are others still finer, the shape of creepers. Others still finer are the shape of large lute strings.
Yet others are the shape of coarse thread.
The sinews in the backs of the hands and feet are the shape of a bird’s claw.
The sinews in the head are the shape of children’s head nets.
The sinews in the back are the shape of a wet net spread out in the sun.
The rest of the sinews, following the various limbs, are the shape of a net jacket fitted to the body.
As to direction, they lie in the two directions.
As to location, they are to be found binding the bones of the whole body together.
As to delimitation, they are bounded below by their surface, which is fixed on to the three hundred bones, and above by the portions that are in contact with the flesh and the inner skin, and all round by each other …
Bones 101. Excepting the thirty-two teeth bones, these consist of the remaining sixty- four hand bones, sixty-four foot bones, sixty-four soft bones dependent on the flesh, two heel bones; then in each leg two ankle bones, two shin bones, one knee bone and one thigh bone; then two hip bones, eighteen spine bones, twenty- four rib bones, fourteen breast bones, one heart bone , two collar bones, two shoulder blade bones,24 two upper-arm bones, two pairs of forearm bones, two neck bones, two jaw bones, one nose bone, two eye bones, two ear bones, one frontal bone,
As to shape, they are of various shapes.
Herein, the end bones of the toes are the shape of kataka seeds.
Those next to them in the middle sections are the shape of jackfruit seeds.
The bones of the base sections are the shape of small drums.
The heel bone is the shape of the seed of a single-stone palmyra fruit.
The ankle bones are the shape of two play balls bound together.
The shin bones, in the place where they rest on the ankle bones, are the shape of a sindi shoot without the skin removed.
The small shin bone is the shape of atoy bow stick.
The large one is the shape of a shrivelled snake’s back.
The knee bone is the shape of a lump of froth melted on one side.
Herein, the place where the shin bone rests on it is the shape of a blunt cow’s horn.
The thigh bone is the shape of a badly-pared25 handle for an axe or hatchet.
The place where it fits into the hip bone is the shape of a play ball.
The place in the hip bone where it is set is the shape of a big punnāga fruit with the end cut off.
The buttock bone on the end of them is the shape of an inverted snake’s hood. It is perforated in seven or eight places.
The spine bones are internally the shape of lead-sheet pipes put one on top of the other;
They have two or three rows of projections next to each other like the teeth of a saw.
Of the twenty-four rib bones, the incomplete ones are the shape of incomplete sabres,
The fourteen breast bones are the shape of an old chariot frame.26
The collar bones are the shape of small metal knife handles.
The shoulder- blade bones are the shape of a Sinhalese hoe worn down on one side.
The upper-arm bones are the shape of looking glass handles.
The forearm bones are the shape of a twin palm’s trunks.
The wrist bones are the shape of lead-sheet pipes stuck together.
The bones of the back of the hand are the shape of a bundle of bruised yams.
The seven neck bones are the shape of rings of bamboo stem threaded one after the other on a stick.
The lower jawbone is the shape of a smith’s iron hammer ring-fastening.
The upper one is the shape of a knife for scraping the rind off sugarcanes.
The bones of the eye sockets and nostril sockets are the shape of young palmyra seeds with the kernels removed.
The frontal bone is the shape of an inverted bowl made of a shell.
The bones of the ear-holes are the shape of barbers’ razor boxes.
The bone in the place where a cloth is tied round the head above the frontal bone and the ear holes is the shape of a piece of curled-up toffee flake.27
The sincipital bones are the shape of a dish made of an old gourd held together with stitches.
As to direction, they lie in both directions.
As to location, they are to be found indiscriminately throughout the whole body.
But in particular here, the head bones rest on the neck bones,
As to delimitation, they are bounded inside by the bone marrow, above by the flesh, at the ends and at the roots by each other …
Bone Marrow 109. This is the marrow inside the various bones.
As to colour, it is white.
As to shape, that inside each large bone is the shape of a large cane shoot moistened and inserted into a bamboo tube.
That inside each small bone is the shape of a slender cane shoot moistened and inserted in a section of bamboo twig.
As to direction, it lies in both directions.
As to location, it is set inside the bones.
As to delimitation, it is delimited by the inner surface of the bones …
Kidney 110. This is two pieces of flesh with a single ligature.
As to colour, it is dull red, the colour of pālibhaddaka seeds.
As to shape, it is the shape of a pair of child’s play balls; or it is the shape of a pair of mango fruits attached to a single stalk.
As to direction, it lies in the upper direction.
As to location, it is to be found on either side of the heart flesh, being fastened by a stout sinew that starts out with one root from the base of the neck and divides into two after going a short way.
As to delimitation, the kidney is bounded by what appertains to kidney …
Heart 111. This is the heart flesh.
As to colour, it is the colour of the back of a red-lotus petal.
As to shape, it is the shape of a lotus bud with the outer petals removed and turned upside down;
In those who possess understanding it is a little expanded; in those without understanding it is still only a bud.
Inside it there is a hollow the size of a punnāga seed’s bed where half a pasata measure of blood is kept, with which as their support the mind element and mind-consciousness element occur.
That in one of greedy temperament is red; that in one of hating temperament is black; that in one of deluded temperament is like water that meat has been washed in; that in one of speculative temperament is like lentil soup in colour; that in one of faithful temperament is the colour of yellow kanikāra flowers; that in one of understanding temperament is limpid, clear, unturbid, bright, pure, like a washed gem of pure water, and it seems to shine.
As to direction, it lies in the upper direction.
As to location, it is to be found in the middle between the two breasts, inside the body.
As to delimitation, it is bounded by what appertains to heart …
Liver 114. This is a twin slab of flesh.
As to colour, it is a brownish shade of red, the colour of the not-too-red backs of white water-lily petals.
As to shape, with its single root and twin ends, it is the shape of a koviḷāra leaf.
In sluggish people it is single and large; in those possessed of understanding there are two or three small ones.
As to direction, it lies in the upper direction. As to location, it is to be found on the right side, inside from the two breasts.
As to delimitation, it is bounded by what appertains to liver …
Midriff28 115.This is the covering of the flesh, which is of two kinds, namely, the concealed and the unconcealed.
As to colour, both kinds are white, the colour of dukūla rags.
As to shape, it is the shape of its location.
As to direction, the concealed midriff lies in the upper direction,
the other in both directions.
As to location, the concealed midriff is to be found concealing the heart and kidney; the unconcealed is to be found covering the flesh under the inner skin throughout the whole body.
As to delimitation, it is bounded below by the flesh, above by the inner skin, and all round by what appertains to midriff …
Spleen 116. This is the flesh of the belly’s “tongue.”
As to direction, it lies in the upper direction.
As to location, it is to be found near the upper side of the belly to the left of the heart. When it comes out through a wound a being’s life is terminated.
Lungs 117. The flesh of the lungs is divided up into two or three pieces of flesh.
As to colour, it is red, the colour of not very ripe udumbara fig fruits.
As to shape, it is the shape of an unevenly cut thick slice of cake.
Inside, it is insipid and lacks nutritive essence, like a lump of chewed straw, because it is affected by the heat of the kamma-born fire element that springs up when there is need of something to eat and drink.
As to direction, it lies in the upper direction.
As to location, it is to be found inside the body between the two breasts, hanging above the heart and liver and concealing them.
As to delimitation, it is bounded by what appertains to lungs …
Bowel 118. This is the bowel tube; it is looped29 in twenty-one places, and in a man it is thirty-two hands long, and in a woman, twenty-eight hands.
As to colour, it is white, the colour of lime mixed with sand.
As to shape, it is the shape of a beheaded snake coiled up and put in a trough of blood.
As to direction, it lies in the two directions.
As to location, it is fastened above at the gullet and below to the excrement passage , so it is to be found inside the body between the limits of the gullet and the excrement passage.
As to delimitation, it is bounded by what pertains to bowel …
Entrails  119. This is the fastening in the places where the bowel is coiled.
As to colour, it is white, the colour of dakasītalika30 roots.
As to shape, it is the shape of those roots too.
As to direction, it lies in the two directions.
As to location, it is to be found inside the twenty-one coils of the bowel, like the strings to be found inside rope-rings for wiping the feet on, sewing them together, and it fastens the bowel’s coils together so that they do not slip down in those working with hoes, axes, etc., as the marionette-strings do the marionette’s wooden limbs at the time of the marionette’s being pulled along.
As to delimitation, it is bounded by what appertains to entrails …
Gorge 120. This is what has been eaten, drunk, chewed and tasted, and is present in the stomach.
As to colour, it is the colour of swallowed food.
As to shape, it is the shape of rice loosely tied in a cloth strainer.
As to direction, it is in the upper direction.
As to location, it is in the stomach.
What is called the “stomach” is a part of the bowel-membrane, which is like the swelling of air produced in the middle of a length of wet cloth when it is being twisted and wrung out from the two ends. It is smooth outside. Inside, it is like a balloon of cloth31 soiled by wrapping up meat refuse; or it can be said to be like the inside of the skin of a rotten jack fruit. It is the place where worms dwell seething in tangles: the thirty-two families of worms, such as round worms, boil-producing worms, “palm-splinter” worms, needle-mouthed worms, tape- worms, thread worms, and the rest.32 When there is no food and drink, etc., present, they leap up shrieking and pounce upon the heart’s flesh; and when food and drink, etc., are swallowed, they wait with uplifted mouths and scramble to snatch the first two or three lumps swallowed. It is these worms’ maternity home, privy, hospital and charnel ground.
Just as when it has rained heavily in a time of drought and what has been carried by the water into the cesspit at the gate of an outcaste village—the various kinds of ordure33 such as urine, excrement, bits of hide and bones and sinews, as well as spittle, snot, blood, etc.—gets mixed up with the mud and water already collected there; and after two or three days the families of worms appear, and it ferments, warmed by the energy of the sun’s heat, frothing and bubbling on the top, quite black in colour, and so utterly stinking and loathsome that one can scarcely go near it or look at it, much less smell or taste it, so too, the stomach is where the assortment of food, drink, etc., falls after being pounded up by the tongue and stuck together with spittle and saliva, losing at that moment its virtues of colour, smell, taste, etc., and taking on the appearance of weavers’ paste and dogs’ vomit, then to get soused in the bile and phlegm and wind that have collected there, where it ferments with the energy of the stomach-fire’s heat, seethes with the families of worms, frothing and bubbling on the top, till it turns into utterly stinking nauseating muck,
As to delimitation, it is bounded by the stomach lining and by what appertains to gorge …
Dung 123. This is excrement.
As to colour, it is mostly the colour of eaten food.
As to shape, it is the shape of its location.
As to direction, it is in the lower direction.
As to location, it is to be found in the receptacle for digested food .
The receptacle for digested food is the lowest part at the end of the bowel, between the navel and the root of the spine. It measures eight fingerbreadths in height and resembles a bamboo tube. Just as when rain water falls on a higher level it runs down to fill a lower level and stays there, so too, the receptacle for digested food is where any food, drink, etc., that have fallen into the receptacle for undigested food, have been continuously cooked and simmered by the stomach-fire, and have got as soft as though ground up on a stone, run down to through the cavities of the bowels, and it is pressed down there till it becomes impacted like brown clay pushed into a bamboo joint, and there it stays.
As to delimitation, it is bounded by the receptacle for digested food and by what appertains to dung …
Brain 126. This is the lumps of marrow to be found inside the skull.
As to colour, it is white, the colour of the flesh of a toadstool;
As to shape, it is the shape of its location.
As to direction, it belongs to the upper direction.
As to location, it is to be found inside the skull, like four lumps of dough put together to correspond with the skull’s four sutured sections.
As to delimitation, it is bounded by the skull’s inner surface and by what appertains to brain …
Bile 127. There are two kinds of bile: local bile and free bile.
Herein as to colour, the local bile is the colour of thick madhuka oil;
As to shape, both are the shape of their location.
As to direction, the local bile belongs to the upper direction; the other belongs to both directions.
As to location, the free bile spreads, like a drop of oil on water, all over the body except for the fleshless parts of the head hairs, body hairs, teeth, nails, and the hard dry skin. When it is disturbed, the eyes become yellow and twitch, and there is shivering and itching34 of the body.
The local bile is situated near the flesh of the liver between the heart and the lungs. It is to be found in the bile container , which is like a large kosātakī gourd pip. When it is disturbed, beings go crazy and become demented, they throw off conscience and shame and do the undoable, speak the unspeakable, and think the unthinkable.
As to delimitation, it is bounded by what appertains to bile …
Phlegm 128. The phlegm is inside the body and it measures a bowlful.
As to colour, it is white, the colour of the juice of nāgabalā leaves.
As to shape, it is the shape of its location.
As to direction, it belongs to the upper direction.
As to location, it is to be found on the stomach’s surface.
Just as duckweed and green scum on the surface of water divide when a stick or a potsherd is dropped into the water and then spread together again, so too, at the time of eating and drinking, etc., when the food, drink, etc., fall into the stomach, the phlegm divides and then spreads together again. And if it gets weak the stomach becomes utterly disgusting with a smell of ordure, like a ripe boil or a rotten hen’s egg, and then the belchings and the mouth reek with a stench like rotting ordure rising from the stomach,
so that the man has to be told, “Go away, your breath smells.” But when it grows plentiful it holds the stench of ordure beneath the surface of the stomach, acting like the wooden lid of a privy.
As to delimitation, it is bounded by what appertains to phlegm …
Pus 129. Pus is produced by decaying blood.
As to colour, it is the colour of bleached leaves;
As to direction, it belongs to both directions.
As to location, however, there is no fixed location for pus where it could be found stored up. Wherever blood stagnates and goes bad in some part of the body damaged by wounds with stumps and thorns, by burns with fire, etc., or where boils, carbuncles, etc., appear, it can be found there.
Blood 130.There are two kinds of blood: stored blood and mobile blood.
Herein, as to colour, stored blood is the colour of cooked and thickened lac solution;
As to shape, both are the shape of their locations.
As to direction, the stored blood belongs to the upper direction;
As to location, except for the fleshless parts of the head hairs, body hairs, teeth, nails, and the hard dry skin, the mobile blood permeates the whole of the clung-to 35 body by following the network of veins.
The stored blood fills the lower part of the liver’s site to the extent of a bowlful, and by its splashing little by little over the heart, kidney and lungs, it keeps the kidney, heart, liver and lungs moist.
For it is when it fails to moisten the kidney, heart, etc., that beings become thirsty.
As to delimitation, it is bounded by what appertains to blood …
Sweat 131. This is the water element that trickles from the pores of the body hairs, and so on.
As to colour, it is the colour of clear sesame oil.
As to shape, it is the shape of its location.
As to direction, it belongs to both directions.
As to location, there is no fixed location for sweat where it could always be found like blood.
But if the body is heated by the heat of a fire, by the sun’s heat, by a change of temperature, etc., then it trickles from all the pore openings of the head hairs and body hairs, as water does from a bunch of unevenly cut lily-bud stems and lotus stalks pulled up from the water. So its shape should also be understood to correspond to the pore-openings of the head hairs and body hairs.
Fat 132. This is a thick unguent.
As to colour, it is the colour of sliced turmeric.
As to shape, firstly in the body of a stout man it is the shape of turmeric-coloured dukūla rags placed between the inner skin and the flesh.
In the body of a lean man it is the shape of turmeric-coloured dukūla rags placed in two or three thicknesses on the shank flesh, thigh flesh, back flesh near the spine, and belly-covering flesh.
As to direction, it belongs to both directions.
As to location, it permeates the whole of a stout man’s body; it is to be found on a lean man’s shank flesh, and so on. And though it was described as “unguent” above, still it is neither used as oil on the head nor as oil for the nose, etc., because of its utter disgustingness.
Tears 133. These are the water element that trickles from the eye.
As to colour, they are the colour of clear sesame oil.
As to shape, they are the shape of their location.
As to direction, they belong to the upper direction.
As to location, they are to be found in the eye sockets.
But they are not stored in the eye sockets all the while as the bile is in the bile container.
But when beings feel joy and laugh uproariously, or feel grief and weep and lament, or eat particular kinds of wrong food, or when their eyes are affected by smoke, dust, dirt, etc.,
And the meditator who discerns tears should discern them only as they are to be found filling the eye sockets.
As to delimitation, they are bounded by what appertains to tears …
Grease 134. This is a melted unguent.
As to colour, it is the colour of coconut oil.
Also it can be said to be the colour of oil sprinkled on gruel.
As to shape, it is a film the shape of a drop of unguent spread out over still water at the time of bathing.
As to direction, it belongs to both directions.
As to location, it is to be found mostly on the palms of the hands, backs of the hands, soles of the feet, backs of the feet, tip of the nose, forehead, and points of the shoulders.
And it is not always to be found in the melted state in these locations,
Spittle 135. This is water element mixed with froth inside the mouth.
As to colour, it is white, the colour of the froth.
As to shape, it is the shape of its location,
And it is not always to be found stored there;
It is thin at the tip of the tongue, and thick at the root of the tongue. It is capable, without getting used up, of wetting unhusked rice or husked rice or anything else chewable that is put into the mouth, like the water in a pit scooped out in a river sand bank.
Snot 136. This is impurity that trickles out from the brain.
As to colour, it is the colour of a young palmyra kernel.
As to shape, it is the shape of its location.
As to direction, it belongs to the upper direction.
As to location, it is to be found filling the nostril cavities.
And it is not always to be found stored there; but rather, just as though a man tied up curd in a lotus leaf, which he then pricked with a thorn underneath, and whey oozed out and dripped, so too, when beings weep or suffer a disturbance of elements produced by wrong food or temperature, then the brain inside the head turns into stale phlegm, and it oozes out and comes down by an opening in the palate, and it fills the nostrils and stays there or trickles out.
And the meditator who discerns snot should discern it only as it is to be found filling the nostril cavities.
As to delimitation, it is bounded by what appertains to snot …
Oil of the Joints 137. This is the slimy ordure inside the joints in the body.
As to colour, it is the colour of kaṇikāra gum.
As to shape, it is the shape of its location.
As to direction, it belongs to both directions.
As to location, it is to be found inside the hundred and eighty joints, serving the function of lubricating the bones’ joints.
If it is weak, when a man gets up or sits down, moves forward or backward, bends or stretches, then his bones creak, and he goes about making a noise like the snapping of fingers,
As to delimitation, it is bounded by what appertains to oil of the joints …
Urine 138. This is the urine solution.
As to colour, it is the colour of bean brine.
As to shape, it is the shape of water inside a water pot placed upside down.
As to direction, it belongs to the lower direction.
As to location, it is to be found inside the bladder.
For the bladder sack is called the bladder.
Just as when a porous pot with no mouth is put into a cesspool, then the solution from the cesspool gets into the porous pot with no mouth even though no way of entry is evident, so too, while the urinary secretion from the body enters the bladder its way of entry is not evident. Its way of exit, however, is evident.
And when the bladder is full of urine, beings feel the need to make water.
As to delimitation, it is delimited by the inside of the bladder and by what is similar to urine. This is the delimitation by the similar.
But its delimitation by the dissimilar is like that for the head hairs .
The Arising of Absorption 139. When the meditator has defined the parts beginning with the head hairs in this way by colour, shape, direction, location and delimitation , and he gives his attention in the ways beginning with “following the order, not too quickly” to their repulsiveness in the five aspects of colour, shape, smell, habitat, and location , then at last he surmounts the concept . Then just as when a man with good sight is observing a garland of flowers of thirty- two colours knotted on a single string and all the flowers become evident to him simultaneously, so too, when the meditator observes this body thus, “There are in this body head hairs,” then all these things become evident to him, as it were, simultaneously.
Hence it was said above in the explanation of skill in giving attention: “For when a beginner gives his attention to head hairs, his attention carries on till it arrives at the last part, that is, urine, and stops there” .
If he applies his attention externally as well when all the parts have become evident in this way, then human beings, animals, etc., as they go about are divested of their aspect of beings and appear as just assemblages of parts. And when drink, food, etc., is being swallowed by them, it appears as though it were being put in among the assemblage of parts.
Then, as he gives his attention to them again and again as “Repulsive, repulsive,” employing the process of “successive leaving,” etc. , eventually absorption arises in him.
Herein, the appearance of the head hairs, etc., as to colour, shape, direction, location, and delimitation is the learning sign;
As he cultivates and develops that counterpart sign, absorption arises in him, but only of the first jhāna, in the same way as described under foulness as a meditation subject .
And it arises singly in one to whom only one part has become evident, or who has reached absorption in one part and makes no further effort about another.
But several first jhānas, according to the number of parts, are produced in one to whom several parts have become evident, or who has reached jhāna in one and also makes further effort about another. As in the case of the Elder Mallaka.
The elder, it seems, took the Elder Abhaya, the Dīgha reciter, by the hand,36 and after saying “Friend Abhaya, first learn this matter,” he went on: “The Elder Mallaka is an obtainer of thirty-two jhānas in the thirty-two parts.
If he enters upon one by night and one by day, he goes on entering upon them for over a fortnight; but if he enters upon one each day, he goes on entering upon them for over a month.”
And although this meditation is successful in this way with the first jhāna, it is nevertheless called “mindfulness occupied with the body” because it is successful through the influence of the mindfulness of the colour, shape, and so on.
And the bhikkhu who is devoted to this mindfulness occupied with the body “is a conqueror of boredom and delight, and boredom does not conquer him; he dwells transcending boredom as it arises.
He is a conqueror of fear and dread, and fear and dread do not conquer him; he dwells transcending fear and dread as they arise.
He is one who bears cold and heat … who endures … arisen bodily feelings that are … menacing to life” ;
So let a man, if he is wise, Untiringly devote his days
To mindfulness of body which Rewards him in so many ways.
This is the section dealing with mindfulness occupied with the body in the detailed treatise.
As to delimitation, they are bounded below by the surface of their own roots, which are fixed by entering to the amount of the tip of a rice grain into the inner skin that envelops the head. They are bounded above by space, and all round by each other. There are no two hairs together. This is their delimitation by the similar.
As to direction, they lie in the upper direction.
their location is the wet inner skin that envelops the skull.
as well as in shape, odour, habitat, and location.
so too, even if head hairs are not directly repulsive in colour and shape, still their odour is directly repulsive.
and its fangs are like jasmine buds, and so even if both these are not directly repulsive in colour and shape, still their odour is directly repulsive,
and just as the bloated carcass of a black dog thrown on a rubbish heap, as to its colour, is the colour of a ripe palmyra fruit and,
as to its shape, is the shape of a mandolin-shaped drum left face down,
for firstly in the lower row, the four middle teeth are the shape of pumpkin seeds set in a row in a lump of clay;
that on each side of them has one root and one point and is the shape of a jasmine bud;
each one after that has two roots and two points and is the shape of a wagon prop;
then two each side with three roots and three points,
then two each side four-rooted and four-pointed.
and its whiteness becomes evident when the outer cuticle is destroyed by contact with the flame of a fire or the impact of a blow and so on.
But in detail, the skin of the toes is the shape of silkworms’ cocoons;
the skin of the back of the foot is the shape of shoes with uppers;
the skin of the calf is the shape of a palm leaf wrapping cooked rice;
the skin of the thighs is the shape of a long sack full of paddy;
the skin of the buttocks is the shape of a cloth strainer full of water;
the skin of the back is the shape of hide streched over a plank;
the skin of the belly is the shape of the hide stretched over the body of a lute;
the skin of the chest is more or less square;
the skin of both arms is the shape of the hide stretched over a quiver;
the skin of the backs of the hands is the shape of a razor box, or the shape of a comb case;
the skin of the fingers is the shape of a key box;
the skin of the neck is the shape of a collar for the throat;
the skin of the face is the shape of an insects’ nest full of holes;
the skin of the head is the shape of a bowl bag.
then the inner skin of the left leg in the same way.
The flesh of the buttocks is the shape of the end of an oven.
The flesh of the back is the shape of a slab of palm sugar.
and five more by the back,
and then five by the right
and five by the left.
likewise those that bind the left hand.
and five by the back;
likewise those that bind the left foot.
and they are also called “tendons.”
They are all the shape of yam shoots.
which are finer than the last-named. They are the shape of strings and cords.
one occipital bone, nine sincipital bones. So there are exactly three hundred bones. As to colour, they are all white.
The bones of the back of the foot are the shape of a bunch of bruised yarns.
are the shape of the ring- fastening of a smith’s hammer.
The two hip bones, when fastened together,
externally they are the shape of a string of beads.
and the complete ones are the shape of complete sabres;
all together they are like the outspread wings of a white cock.
The heart bone is the shape of the bowl of a spoon.
As to the fingers, the bones of the base sections are the shape of small drums;
those of the middle sections are the shape of immature jackfruit seeds;
those of the end sections are the shape of kataka seeds.
The occipital bone is the shape of a lopsided coconut with a hole cut in the end.
the neck bones on the spine bones,
the spine bones on the hip bones,
the hip bones on the thigh bones,
the thigh bones on the knee bones,
the knee bones on the shin bones,
the shin bones on the ankle bones,
the ankle bones on the bones of the back of the foot.
it is smooth outside, and inside it is like the interior of a kosātakī .
As to shape, it is seven fingers in size, without attachments, and the shape of a black calf’s tongue.
As to colour, it is blue, the colour of nigguṇḍi flowers.
As to delimitation, it is bounded by what appertains to spleen …
And when the food, drink, etc., fall into it, they get divided into five parts: the worms eat one part, the stomach-fire bums up another part, another part becomes urine, another part becomes excrement, and one part is turned into nourishment and sustains the blood, flesh and so on.
even to hear about which takes away any appetite for food, drink, etc., let alone to see it with the eye of understanding.
it can also be said that it is the colour of turned milk that has not yet become curd.
the free bile is the colour of faded ākulī flowers.
but in a dead body it is the colour of stale thickened gruel.
As to shape, it is the shape of its location.
As to delimitation, it is bounded by what appertains to pus …
mobile blood is the colour of clear lac solution.
the other belongs to both directions.
And the meditator who discerns sweat should only give his attention to it as it is to be found filling the pore-openings of the head hairs and body hairs.
As to delimitation, it is bounded by what appertains to sweat …
As to delimitation, it is bounded below by the flesh, above by the inner skin, and all round by what appertains to fat …
then being originated by the joy, grief, wrong food, or temperature, they fill up the eye sockets or trickle out.
As to delimitation, it is bounded by what appertains to grease …
but when these parts get hot with the heat of a fire, the sun’s heat, upset of temperature or upset of elements, then it spreads here and there in those places like the film from the drop of unguent on the still water at the time of bathing.
As to location, it is to be found on the tongue after it has descended from the cheeks on both sides.
or it can be called “the shape of froth.”
As to direction, it belongs to the upper direction.
but when beings see particular kinds of food, or remember them, or put something hot or bitter or sharp or salty or sour into their mouths, or when their hearts are faint, or nausea arises on some account, then spittle appears and runs down from the cheeks on both sides to settle on the tongue.
As to delimitation, it is bounded by what appertains to spittle …
But if a man has plenty of it, his bones do not creak when he gets up, sits down, etc., and even when he has walked a long distance, his air element does not get upset and his limbs do not pain him.
and when he has walked only one or two leagues’ distance, his air element gets upset and his limbs pain him.
their appearance as repulsive in all aspects is the counterpart sign.
he becomes an obtainer of the four jhānas based on the colour aspect of the head hairs,37 etc.;
and he comes to penetrate the six kinds of direct-knowledge .
“He regards feeling as self…He regards perception as self…He regards formations as self…He regards consciousness as self, or self as possessed of consciousness, or consciousness as in self, or self as in consciousness.
and told the Blessed One
all that had taken place after he had left, adding:
“Then, venerable sir, we went to the venerable Maha Kaccana and asked him about the meaning.
Such is its meaning,
and so you should remember it.”
224,225 9. “Then listen, friends, and attend closely to what I shall say.”
“Yes, friend,” the bhikkhus replied.
The venerable Maha Kaccana said this:
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Savatthl in Jeta’s Grove, Anathapindika’s Park.
There he addressed the bhikkhus thus: “Bhikkhus.”
- “Venerable sir,” they replied.
The Blessed One said this: 2. “Bhikkhus, I shall teach you an exposition of the sixfold base.
Listen and attend closely to what I shall say.”
- “Yes, venerable sir,” the bhikkhus replied.
The Blessed One said this:
“The six internal bases should be understood. The six external bases should be understood. The six classes of consciousness should be understood. The six classes of contact should be understood. The eighteen kinds of mental exploration should be understood. The thirty-six positions of beings should be understood. Therein, by depending on this, abandon that. There are three foundations of mindfulness that the Noble One cultivates, cultivating which the Noble One is a teacher fit to instruct a group. Among the teachers of training it is he that is called the incomparable leader of persons to be tamed. This is the summary of the exposition of the sixfold base.
‘“The six internal bases should be understood.’ So it was said.
And with reference to what was this said?
There are the eye-base, the ear-base, the nose-base, the tongue-base, the body-base, and the mind-base. So it was with reference to this that it was said: ‘The six internal bases should be understood.’
‘“The six external bases should be understood.’ So it was said.
And with reference to what was this said?
There are the form-base, the sound-base, the odour-base, the flavour-base, the tangible-base, and the mind-object-base. So it was with reference to this that it was said: ‘The six external bases should be understood.’
‘“The six classes of consciousness should be understood.’ So it was said.
And with reference to what was this said?
There are eye-consciousness, ear-consciousness, nose-consciousness, tongue-consciousness, body-consciousness, and mind-consciousness. So it was with reference to this that it was said: ‘The six classes of consciousness should be understood.’
“‘The six classes of contact should be understood.’ So it was said.
And with reference to what was this said?
There are eye-contact, ear-contact, nose-contact, tongue-contact, body-contact, and mind-contact. So it was with reference to this that it was said: ‘The six classes of contact should be understood.’
‘“The eighteen kinds of mental exploration should be understood.’ 1235 So it was said.
And with reference to what was this said?
“On seeing a form with the eye, one explores a form productive of joy, one explores a form productive of grief, one explores a form productive of equanimity.1236
On hearing a sound with the ear…On smelling an odour with the nose…On tasting a flavour with the tongue… On touching a tangible with the body…On cognizing a mind-object with the mind, one explores a mind-object productive of joy, one explores a mind-object productive of grief, one explores a mind-object productive of equanimity.
Thus there are six kinds of exploration with joy, six kinds of exploration with grief, and six kinds of exploration with equanimity. So it was with reference to this that it was said: “The eighteen kinds of mental exploration should be understood.’
“‘The thirty-six positions of beings should be understood.’ 1237 So it was said.
And with reference to what was this said?
There are six kinds of joy based on the household life and six kinds of joy based on renunciation.1238 There are six kinds of grief based on the household life and six kinds of grief based on renunciation. There are six kinds of equanimity based on the household life and six kinds of equanimity based on renunciation.
“Herein, what are the six kinds of joy based on the household life?
When one regards as an acquisition the acquisition of forms cognizable by the eye that are wished for, desired, agreeable, gratifying, and associated with worldliness - or when one recalls what was formerly acquired that has passed, ceased, and changed - joy arises.
Such joy as this is called joy based on the household life.
“When one regards as an acquisition the acquisition of sounds cognizable by the ear…the acquisition of odours cognizable by the nose…the acquisition of flavours cognizable by the tongue the acquisition of tangibles cognizable by the body…the acquisition of mind-objects cognizable by the mind that are wished for, desired, agreeable, gratifying, and associated with worldliness -or when one recalls what was formerly acquired that has passed, ceased, and changed - joy arises.
Such joy as this is called joy based on the household life.
These are the six kinds of joy based on the household life.
“Herein, what are the six kinds of joy based on renunciation?
When, by knowing the impermanence, change, fading away, and cessation of forms, one sees as it actually is with proper wisdom that forms both formerly and now are all impermanent, suffering, and subject to change, joy arises.
Such joy as this is called joy based on renunciation.1239
Such joy as this is called joy based on renunciation.
These are the six kinds of joy based on renunciation.
“Herein, what are the six kinds of grief based on the household life?
When one regards as a non-acquisition the non-acquisition of forms cognizable by the eye that are wished for, desired, agreeable, gratifying, and associated with worldliness -or when one recalls what was formerly not acquired that has passed, ceased, and changed - grief arises. Such grief as this is called grief based on the household life. “When one regards as a non-acquisition the non-acquisition of sounds cognizable by the ear…the non-acquisition of odours cognizable by the nose…the non-acquisition of flavours cognizable by the tongue…the non-acquisition of tangibles cognizable by the body…the non-acquisition of mind-objects cognizable by the mind that are wished for, desired, agreeable, gratifying, and associated with worldliness - or when one recalls what was formerly not acquired that has passed, ceased, and changed - grief arises.
“Herein, what are the six kinds of grief based on renunciation?
When, by knowing the impermanence, change, fading away, and cessation of forms, one sees as it actually is with proper wisdom that forms both formerly and now are all impermanent, suffering, and subject to change, one generates a longing for the supreme liberations thus: ‘When shall I enter upon and abide in that base that the noble ones now enter upon and abide in? ‘1240 In one who generates thus a longing for the supreme liberations, grief arises with that longing as condition.
Such grief as this is called grief based on renunciation.
“When, by knowing the impermanence, change, fading away, and cessation of sounds…of odours…of flavours…of tangibles …of mind-objects, one sees as it actually is with proper wisdom that mind-objects both formerly and now are all impermanent, suffering, and subject to change, one generates a longing for the supreme liberations thus: ‘When shall I enter upon and abide in that base that the noble ones now enter upon and abide in? ‘ In one who thus generates a longing for the supreme liberations, grief arises with that longing as condition.
Such grief as this is called grief based on renunciation.
These are the six kinds of grief based on renunciation.
“Herein, what are the six kinds of equanimity based on the household life?
On seeing a form with the eye, equanimity arises in a foolish infatuated ordinary person, in an untaught ordinary person who has not conquered his limitations or conquered the results of action and who is blind to danger.
Such equanimity as this does not transcend the form;
Such equanimity as this does not transcend the mind-object;
These are the six kinds of equanimity based on the household life.
“Herein, what are the six kinds of equanimity based on renunciation?
When, by knowing the impermanence, change, fading away, and cessation of forms, one sees as it actually is with proper wisdom that forms both formerly and now are all impermanent, suffering, and subject to change, equanimity arises.
Such equanimity as this transcends the form;
Such equanimity as this transcends the mind-object;
These are the six kinds of equanimity based on renunciation.
“So it was with reference to this that it was said: ‘The thirty-six positions of beings should be understood.’ 16.
‘“Therein, by depending on this, abandon that.’ So it was said. And with reference to what was this said?
“Here, bhikkhus, by depending and relying on the six kinds of joy based on renunciation, abandon and surmount the six kinds of joy based on the household life.
It is thus they are abandoned; it is thus they are surmounted.
By depending and relying on the six lands of grief based on renunciation, abandon and surmount the six kinds of grief based on the household life.
It is thus they are abandoned; it is thus they are surmounted.
By depending and relying on the six kinds of equanimity based on renunciation, abandon and surmount the six kinds of equanimity based on the household life.
It is thus they are abandoned; it is thus they are surmounted.
“By depending and relying on the six lands of joy based on renunciation, abandon and surmount the six kinds of grief based on renunciation.
It is thus they are abandoned; it is thus they are surmounted.
By depending and relying on the six kinds of equanimity based on renunciation, abandon and surmount the six kinds of joy based on renunciation.
It is thus they are abandoned; it is thus they are surmounted.
“There is, bhikkhus, equanimity that is diversified, based on diversity; and there is equanimity that is unified, based on unity.1243 18.
There is equanimity regarding forms, sounds, odours, flavours, and tangibles. This, bhikkhus, is equanimity that is diversified, based on diversity.
“And what, bhikkhus, is equanimity that is unified, based on unity?
There is equanimity regarding the base of infinite space, the base of infinite consciousness, the base of nothingness, and the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception. This, bhikkhus, is equanimity that is unified, based on unity. 20.
It is thus this is abandoned; it is thus this is surmounted.1244
It is thus this is abandoned; it is thus this is surmounted.
“So it was in reference to this that it was said: ‘Therein, by depending on this, abandon that.’
‘“There are three foundations of mindfulness that the Noble One cultivates, cultivating which the Noble One is a teacher fit to instruct a group.’ 1246 So it was said. And with reference to what was this said?
“Here, bhikkhus, compassionate and seeking their welfare, the Teacher teaches the Dhamma to the disciples out of compassion: ‘This is for your welfare; this is for your happiness.’
His disciples do not want to hear or give ear or exert their minds to understand; they err and turn aside from the Teacher’s Dispensation.
With that the Tathagata is not satisfied and feels no satisfaction; yet he dwells unmoved, mindful, and fully aware.
This, bhikkhus, is called the first foundation of mindfulness that the Noble One cultivates, cultivating which the Noble One is a teacher fit to instruct a group.
“Furthermore, bhikkhus, compassionate and seeking their welfare, the Teacher teaches the Dhamma to the disciples out of compassion: ‘This is for your welfare; this is for your happiness.’
Some of his disciples will not hear or give ear or exert their minds to understand; they err and turn aside from the Teacher’s Dispensation. Some of his disciples will hear and give ear and exert their minds to understand; they do not err and turn aside from the Teacher’s Dispensation.
With that the Tathagata is not satisfied and feels no satisfaction, and he is not dissatisfied and feels no dissatisfaction;
This, bhikkhus, is called the second foundation of mindfulness that the Noble One cultivates, cultivating which the Noble One is a teacher fit to instruct a group.
“Furthermore, bhikkhus, compassionate and seeking their welfare, the Teacher teaches the Dhamma to the disciples out of compassion: ‘This is for your welfare; this is for your happiness.’
His disciples will hear and give ear and exert their minds to understand; they do not err and turn aside from the Teacher’s Dispensation.
With that the Tathagata is satisfied and feels satisfaction; yet he dwells unmoved, mindful, and fully aware.
This, bhikkhus, is called the third foundation of mindfulness that the Noble One cultivates, cultivating which the Noble One is a teacher fit to instruct a group.
“So it was with reference to this that it was said: “There are three foundations of mindfulness that the Noble One cultivates, cultivating which the Noble One is a teacher fit to instruct a group.’
‘“Among the teachers of training it is he that is called the incomparable leader of persons to be tamed.’ 1247 So it was said.
And with reference to what was this said?
“Guided by the elephant tamer, bhikkhus, the elephant to be tamed goes in one direction - east, west, north, or south.
Guided by the horse tamer, bhikkhus, the horse to be tamed goes in one direction - east, west, north, or south.
Guided by the ox tamer, bhikkhus, the ox to be tamed goes in one direction - east, west, north, or south.
“Bhikkhus, guided by the Tathagata, accomplished and fully enlightened, the person to be tamed goes in eight directions.1248
“Possessed of material form, he sees forms: this is the first direction. Not perceiving forms internally, he sees forms externally: this is the second direction. He is resolved only upon the beautiful: this is the third direction. With the complete surmounting of perceptions of form, with the disappearance of perceptions of sensory impact, with non-attention to perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite,’ he enters upon and abides in the base of infinite space: this is the fourth direction. By completely surmounting the base of infinite space, aware that ‘consciousness is infinite,’ he enters upon and abides in the base of infinite consciousness: this is the fifth direction. By completely surmounting the base of infinite consciousness, aware that ‘there is nothing,’ he enters upon and abides in the base of nothingness: this is the sixth direction. By completely surmounting the base of nothingness, he enters upon and abides in the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception: this is the seventh direction. By completely surmounting the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception, he enters upon and abides in the cessation of perception and feelirig: this is the eighth direction.
“Bhikkhus, guided by the Tathagata, accomplished and fully enlightened, the person to be tamed goes in these eight directions.
“So it was with reference to this that it was said: ‘Among the teachers of training it is he that is called the incomparable leader of persons to be tamed.’“
That is what the Blessed One said.
The bhikkhus were satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
“When, by knowing the impermanence, change, fading away, and cessation of sounds…of odours…of flavours…of tangibles… of mind-objects, one sees as it actually is with proper wisdom that mind-objects both formerly and now are all impermanent, suffering, and subject to change, joy arises.
Such grief as this is called grief based on the household life.
These are the six kinds of grief based on the household life.
that is why it is called equanimity based on the household life.1241
“On hearing a sound with the ear…On smelling an odour with the noseOn tasting a flavour with the tongueOn touching a tangible with the bodyOn cognizing a mind-object with the mind, equanimity arises in a foolish infatuated ordinary person, in an untaught ordinary person who has not conquered his limitations or conquered the results of action and who is blind “to danger.
that is why it is called equanimity based on the household life.
that is why it is called equanimity based on renunciation.1242
“When, by knowing the impermanence, change, fading away, and cessation of sounds…of odours…of flavours…of tangibles of mind-objects, one sees as it actually is with proper wisdom that mind-objects both formerly and now are all impermanent, suffering, and subject to change, equanimity arises.
that is why it is called equanimity based on renunciation.
Thus have I heard. On one occasion the Blessed One was dwell­ing am ong the Bhaggas at Sumsumaragira, in the deer park at Bhesakala Grove.
Now on that occasion the Venerable Maha­moggallana was sitting and dozing1546 at Kallavalamuttagama among the Magadhans.
With the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, the Blessed One saw the Venerable Mahamoggallana sitting and dozing.
Then, just as a strong man might extend his drawn-in arm or draw in his extended arm,the Blessed One disappeared from the deer park at Bhesakala Grove, and reappeared before the Venerable Mahamoggallana.
The Blessed One sat down on the seat that was prepared for him
“Are you dozing, Moggallana? Are you dozing, Moggallana?”
“Yes, Bhante.”
“Therefore, Moggallana, you should not attend to or cul­tivate the object that you were attending to when you became drowsy.
By such means, it is possible that your drowsiness will be abandoned.
By such means, it is possible that your drowsiness will be abandoned.
By such means, it is possible that your drowsi­ness will be abandoned…
“But if you cannot abandon your drowsiness in such away, you should pull both ears and rub your limbs with your hands.
By such means, it is possible that your drowsiness will be abandoned.
By such means, it is possible that your drowsiness will be abandoned.
Thus, with a mind that is open and uncovered, you should develop a mind imbued with luminos­ity.
By such means, it is possible that your drowsiness will be abandoned.
“But if you cannot abandon your drowsiness in such away, you should undertake the exercise of walking back and forth, perceiving what is behind you and what is in front, with your sense faculties drawn in and your mind collected.
By such means, it is possible that your drowsiness will be abandoned.
“But if you cannot abandon your drowsiness in such a way, you should lie down on the right side in the lion’s posture, with one foot overlapping the other, mindful and clearly com­prehending, after noting in your mind the idea of rising.
When you awaken, you should get up quickly, thinking: I will not be intent on the pleasure of rest, the pleasure of sloth, the pleasure of sleep.
It is in this way, Moggallana, that you should train yourself.
“Therefore, Moggallana, you should train yourself thus: ‘We will not approach families for alms with a head swollen with pride.
It is in this way, Moggallana, that you should train your­self.
It may be, Moggallana, that a bhikkhu approaches families with a head swollen with pride. Now there are chores to be done in the families,
and for this reason, when a bhikkhu turns up, people may not pay attention to him. In. such a case the bhikkhu might think: ‘Who has turned this family against me? It seems these people have now become indifferent toward me.
In this way, through lack of gain one feels humiliated; when feeling humiliated, one becomes restless; when one is restless, one loses one’s restraint. The mind of one without restraint is far from concentration.
“Therefore, Moggallana, you should train yourself thus: ‘We will not engage in contentious talk.
It is in this way that you should train yourself.
When there is contentious talk, an excess of words can be expected. When there is an excess of words, one becomes restless; when one is restless, one loses one’s restraint. The mind of one without restraint is far from concentration.
“Moggallana, I do not praise bonding with everyone what­soever,
I do not praise bonding with householders and monastics,
“When this was said, the Venerable Mahamoggallana said to the Blessed One: 1549 “Briefly, Bhante, how is a bhikkhu liberated in the extinction of craving, best among devas and humans: one who has reached the ultimate conclusion, won ultimate security from bondage, lived the ultimate spiritual life, and gained the ultimate consummation?”
“Here, Moggallana, a bhikkhu has heard: ‘Nothing is worth holding to.’ When a bhikkhu has heard: ‘Nothing is worth hold­ing to,’
Having fully under­stood all things, whatever feeling he feels— whether pleasant, painful, or neither painful nor pleasant —
As he dwells contemplating impermanence… fading away… cessa­tion … relinquishment in those feelings, he does not cling to anything in the world. Not clinging, he is not agitated. Being unagitated, he personally attains nibbana.
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the spiritual life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more coming back to any state of being.’“
Briefly, Moggallana, it is in this way that a bhikkhu is best among devas and humans: one who has reached the ultimate conclusion, won ultimate security from bondage, lived the ulti­mate spiritual life, and gained the ultimate consummation.”
and said:
“But if you cannot abandon your drowsiness in such away, you should ponder, examine, and mentally inspect the Dhamma as you have heard it and learned it.
“But if you cannot abandon your drowsiness in such a way, you should recite in detail the Dhamma as you have heard it and learned it.
“But if you cannot abandon your drowsiness in such away, you should get up from your, seat, rub your eyes with water, survey all the quarters, and look up at the constellations and stars.
“But if you cannot abandon your drowsiness in such away, you should attend to the perception of light; you should undertake the perception of day thus: ‘As by day, so at night; as at night, so by day.’
nor do I praise bonding with no one at all.
but I do praise bonding with quiet and noiseless lodgings far from the flurry of people, remote from human habitation, and suitable for seclusion.
he directly knows all things. Having directly known all things, he fully understands all things.
he dwells contemplating impermanence in those feelings, contemplating fading away in those feelings, contemplating cessation in those feel­ings, contemplating relinquishment in those feelings.
“And what, bhikkhus, is equanimity that is diversified, based on diversity?
“Here, bhikkhus, by depending and relying on equanimity that is unified, based on unity, abandon and surmount equanimity that is diversified, based on diversity.
“Bhikkhus, by depending and relying on non-identification,1245 abandon and surmount equanimity that is unified, based on unity.
remaining free from both satisfaction and dissatisfaction, he dwells in equanimity, mindful, and fully aware.
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Rajagaha, in the Bamboo Grove, the Squirrels’ Sanctuary.
Now on that occasion the venerable Samiddhi was living in a forest hut.
Then the wanderer Potaliputta, while wandering and walking for exercise, went to the venerable Samiddhi arid exchanged greetings with him.
And: ‘There is that attainment on entering which one does not feel anything at all.’“
“Do not say so, friend Potaliputta, do not say so. Do not misrepresent the Blessed One;
The Blessed One would not speak thus: ‘Bodily action is vain, verbal action is vain, only mental action is real.’
But, friend, there is that attainment on entering which one does not feel anything at all.”
“How long is it since you went forth, friend Samiddhi?”
“Not long, friend:
“There now, what shall we say to the elder bhikkhus when a young bhikkhu thinks the Teacher is to be defended thus?
Friend Samiddhi, having done an intentional action by way of body, speech, or mind, what does one feel?”
“Having done an intentional action by way of body, speech, or mind, one feels suffering, friend Potaliputta.”
Then, neither approving nor disapproving of the venerable Samiddhi’s words, the wanderer Potaliputta rose from his seat and departed.
Soon after the wanderer Potaliputta had left, the venerable Samiddhi went to the venerable Ananda and exchanged greetings with him.
When this courteous and amiable talk was finished, he sat down at one side
After he had spoken, the venerable Ananda told him: “Friend Samiddhi, this conversation should be told to the Blessed One.
Come, let us approach the Blessed One and tell him this.
As the Blessed One explains to us, so we shall bear it in mind.”
- “Yes, friend,” the venerable Samiddhi replied.
Then the venerable Ananda and the venerable Samiddhi went together to the Blessed One, and after paying homage to him, they sat down at one side.
The venerable Ananda reported to the Blessed One the entire conversation between the venerable Samiddhi and the wanderer Potaliputta.
When he had finished, the Blessed One told the venerable Ananda: “Ananda, I do not even recall ever having seen the wanderer Potaliputta, so how could there have been this conversation?
Though the wanderer Potaliputta’s question should have been analysed before being answered, this misguided man answered it one-sidedly.”
When this was said, the venerable Udayin said to the Blessed One: “Venerable sir, perhaps the venerable Samiddhi spoke thus referring to the principle: ‘Whatever is felt is suffering.’“1227
Then the Blessed One addressed the venerable Ananda: “See, Ananda, how this misguided man Udayin interferes.
I knew, Ananda, that this misguided man Udayin would unduly interfere right now.
From the start the wanderer Potaliputta had asked about the three kinds of feeling.
This misguided man Samiddhi would have answered the wanderer Potaliputta rightly if, when asked thus, he would have explained: ‘Friend Potaliputta, having done an intentional action by way of body, speech, or mind whose result is to be felt as pleasant, one feels pleasure. Having done an intentional action by way of body, speech, or mind whose result is to be felt as painful, one feels pain.
Having done an intentional action by way of body, speech, or mind whose result is to be felt as neither-pain-nor-pleasure, one feels neither-pain-nor-pleasure.’
But who are these foolish, thoughtless wanderers of other sects, that they could understand the Tathagata’s great exposition of action?
You should listen, Ananda, to the Tathagata as he expounds the great exposition of action.”
“This is the time, Blessed One, this is the time, Sublime One, for the Blessed One to expound the great exposition of action.
Having heard it from the Blessed One, the bhikkhus will remember it.”
“Then listen, Ananda, and attend closely to what I shall say.”
“Yes, venerable sir,” the venerable Ananda replied.
The Blessed One said this:
What four?
Here some person kills living beings, takes what is not given, misconducts himself in sensual pleasures, speaks falsehood, speaks maliciously, speaks harshly, gossips; he is covetous, has a mind of ill will, and holds wrong view.
On the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in a state of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, even in hell.
“But here some person kills living beings…and holds wrong view.
On the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world.
“Here some person abstains from killing living beings, from taking what is not given, from misconduct in sensual pleasures, from false speech, from malicious speech, from harsh speech, from gossip; he is not covetous, his mind is without ill will, and he holds right view.
On the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world.
“But here some person abstains from killing living beings… and he holds right view.
On the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in a state of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, even in hell.
“Here, Ananda, by means of ardour, endeavour, devotion, diligence, and right attention, some recluse or brahmin attains such concentration of mind that, when his mind is concentrated, with the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, he sees that person here who kills living beings…and holds wrong view, and he sees that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he has reappeared in a state of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, even in hell.
He says thus: ‘Indeed, there are evil actions, there is result of misconduct;
for I saw a person here who killed living beings…and held wrong view, and I see that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he has reappeared in a state of deprivation…even in hell.’
He says thus: ‘On the dissolution of the body, after death, everyone who kills living beings…and holds wrong view reappears in a state of deprivation…even in hell.
Those who know thus know rightly; those who think otherwise are mistaken.’
Thus he obstinately adheres to what he himself has known, seen, and discovered, insisting: ‘Only this is true, anything else is wrong.’
“But here, Ananda, by means of ardour…some recluse or brahmin attains such a concentration of mind that, when his mind is concentrated, with the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, he sees that person here who kills living beings…and holds wrong view, and he sees that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he has reappeared in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world.
He says thus: ‘Indeed, there are no evil actions, there is no result of misconduct;
He says thus: ‘On the dissolution of the body, after death, everyone who kills living beings…and holds wrong view reappears in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world.
Those who know thus know rightly; those who think otherwise are mistaken.’
Thus he obstinately adheres to what he himself has known, seen, and discovered, insisting: ‘Only this is true, anything else is wrong.’
“Here, Ananda, by means of ardour…some recluse or brahmin attains such a concentration of mind that, when his mind is concentrated, with the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, he sees that person here who abstains from killing living beings…and holds right view, and he sees that on the dissolution of tire body, after death, he has reappeared in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world.
He says thus: ‘Indeed, there are good actions, there is result of good conduct;
He says thus: ‘On the dissolution of the body, after death, everyone who abstains from killing living beings…and holds right view reappears in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world.
Those who know thus know rightly; those who think otherwise are mistaken,’
“But here, Ananda, by means of ardour…some recluse or brahmin attains such a concentration of mind that, when his mind is concentrated, with the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, he sees that person here who abstains from killing living beings…and holds right view, and he sees that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in a state of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, even in hell.
He says thus: ‘Indeed, there are no good actions, there is no result of good conduct;
He says thus: ‘On the dissolution of the body, after death, everyone who abstains from killing living beings…and holds right view reappears in a state of deprivation…even in hell.
Those who know thus know rightly; those who think otherwise are mistaken.’
Thus he obstinately adheres to what he himself has known, seen, and discovered, insisting: ‘Only this is true, anything else is wrong.’
“Therein, Ananda,1229 when a recluse or brahmin says: ‘Indeed, there are evil ‘actions, there is result of misconduct,’ I grant him this. When he says: ‘I saw a person here who killed living beings…and held wrong view, and I see that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he has reappeared in a state of deprivation…even in hell,’ I also grant him this. But when he says: ‘On the dissolution of the body, after death, everyone who kills living beings…and holds wrong view reappears in a state of deprivation…even in hell,’ I do not grant him this. And when he says: ‘Those who know thus know rightly; those who think otherwise are mistaken,’ I also do not grant him this. And when he obstinately adheres to what he himself has known, seen, and discovered, insisting: ‘Only this is true, anything else is wrong,’ I also do not grant him this.
Why is that?
Because, Ananda, the Tathagata’s knowledge of the great exposition of action is otherwise.
“Therein, Ananda, when a recluse or brahmin says: ‘Indeed, there are no evil actions, there is no result of misconduct,’ I do not grant him this. When he says: ‘I saw a person here who killed living beings…and held wrong view, and I see that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he has reappeared in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world,’ I grant him this. But when he says: “On the dissolution of the body, after death, everyone who kills living beings…and holds wrong view reappears in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world,’ I do not grant him this. And when he says: ‘Those who know thus know rightly; those who think otherwise are mistaken,’ I also do not grant him this. And when he obstinately adheres to what he himself has known, seen, and discovered, insisting: ‘Only this is true, anything else is wrong,’ I also do not grant him this.
Why is that?
Because, Ananda, the Tathagata’s knowledge of the great exposition of action is otherwise.
“Therein, Ananda, when a recluse or brahmin says: ‘Indeed, there are good actions, there is result of good conduct,’ I grant him this. And when he says: ‘I saw a person here who abstained from killing living beings…and held right view, and I see that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he has reappeared in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world,’ I also grant him this. But when he says: ‘On the dissolution of the body, after death, everyone who abstains from killing living beings…and holds right view reappears in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world,’ I do not grant him this. And when he says: ‘Those who know thus know rightly; those who think otherwise are mistaken,’ I also do not grant him this. And when he obstinately adheres to what he himself has known, seen, and discovered, insisting: ‘Only this is true, anything else is wrong,’ I also do not grant him this.
Why is that?
Because, Ananda, the Tathagata’s knowledge of the great exposition of action is otherwise.
“Therein, Ananda, when a recluse or brahmin says: ‘Indeed, there are no good actions, there is no result of good conduct,’ I do not grant him this. When he says: ‘I saw a person here who abstained from killing living beings…and held right view, and I see that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he has reappeared in a state of deprivation…even in hell,’ I grant him this. But when he says: ‘On the dissolution of the body, after death, everyone who abstains from killing living beings…and holds right view reappears in a state of deprivation…even in hell,’ I do not grant him this. And when he says: ‘Those who know thus know rightly; those who think otherwise are mistaken,’ I also do not grant him this. And when he obstinately adheres to what he himself has known, seen, and discovered, insisting: ‘Only this is true, anything else is wrong,’ I also do not grant him this.
Why is that?
Because, Ananda, the Tathagata’s knowledge of the great exposition of action is otherwise.
“Therein, Ananda,1230 as to the person here who kills living beings…and holds wrong view, and on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappears in a state of deprivation…even in hell: either earlier he did an evil action to be felt as painful, or later he did an evil action to be felt as painful, or at the time of death he acquired and undertook wrong view.1231
And since he has here killed living beings…and held wrong view, he will experience the result of that either here and now, or in his next rebirth, or in some subsequent existence.1232
But since he has here killed living beings…and held wrong view, he will experience the result of that either here and now, or in his next rebirth, or in some subsequent existence.
“Therein, Ananda, as to the person here who abstains from killing living beings…and holds right view, and on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappears in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world: either earlier he did a good action to be felt as pleasant, or later he did a good action to be felt as pleasant, or at the time of death he acquired and undertook right view.
Because of that, on the dissolution of the body, after death, he has reappeared in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world.
And since he has here abstained from killing living beings …and held right view, he will experience the result of that either here and now, or in his next rebirth, or in some subsequent existence.
“Therein, Ananda, as to the person here who abstains from killing living beings…and holds right view, and on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappears in a state of deprivation…even in hell: either earlier he did an evil action to be felt as painful, or later he did an evil action to be felt as painful, or at the time of death he acquired and undertook wrong view.
Because of that, on the dissolution of the body, after death, he has reappeared in a state of deprivation…even in hell.
But since he has here abstained from killing living beings…and held right view, he will experience the result of that either here and now, or in his next rebirth, or in some subsequent existence.
“Thus, Ananda, there is action that is incapable of good result and appears incapable; there is action that is incapable of good result and appears capable; there is action that is capable of good result and appears capable; and there is action that is capable of good result and appears incapable.”1234
That is what the Blessed One said.
The venerable Ananda was satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
When this courteous and amiable talk was finished, he sat down at one side
and said to the venerable Samiddhi: “Friend Samiddhi, I heard and learned this from the recluse Gotama’s own lips: ‘Bodily action is vain, verbal action is vain, only rental action is real.’
it is not good to misrepresent the Blessed One.
three years.”
and reported to the venerable Ananda his entire conversation with the wanderer Potaliputta.
“Ananda,1228 there are four kinds of persons to be found existing in the world.
for I saw a person here who killed living beings…and held wrong view, and I see that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he has reappeared in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world.’
for I saw a person here who abstained from killing living beings…and held right view, and I see that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he has reappeared in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world.’
Thus he obstinately adheres to what he himself has known, seen, and discovered, insisting: ‘Only this is true, anything else is wrong.’
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you a Dhamma exposition on the theme of burning.
Listen to that…
It would be better, bhikkhus, for the eye faculty to be lacerated by a red-hot iron pin burning, blazing, and glowing, than for one to grasp the sign through the features in a form cognizable by the eye.170
For if consciousness should stand tied to gratification in the sign or in the features, and if one should die on that occasion, it is possible that one will go to one of two destinations: hell or the animal realm.
Having seen this danger, I speak thus.
“It would be better, bhikkhus, for the ear faculty to be lacerated by a sharp iron stake burning, blazing, and glowing, than for one to grasp the sign through the features in a sound cognizable by the ear.
For if consciousness should stand tied to gratification in the sign or in the features, and if one should die on that occasion, it is possible that one will go to one of two destinations: hell or the animal realm.
Having seen this danger, I speak thus.
“It would be better, bhikkhus, for the nose faculty to be lacerated by a sharp nail cutter burning, blazing, and glowing, than for one to grasp the sign through the features in an odour cognizable by the nose.
For if consciousness should stand tied to gratification in the sign or in the features, and if one should die on that occasion,
Having seen this danger, I speak thus.
“It would be better, bhikkhus, for the tongue faculty to be lacerated by a sharp razor burning, blazing, and glowing, than for one to grasp the sign through the features in a taste cognizable by the tongue.
For if consciousness should stand tied to gratification in the sign or in the features, and if one should die on that occasion,
Having seen this danger, I speak thus.
“It would be better, bhikkhus, for the body faculty to be lacerated by a sharp spear burning, blazing, and glowing, than for one to grasp the sign through the features in a tactile object cognizable by the body.
For if consciousness should stand tied to gratification in the sign or in the features, and if one should die on that occasion,
Having seen this danger, I speak thus.
“It would be better, bhikkhus, to sleep -
Having seen this danger, I speak thus.171
Let me attend only to this: So the eye is impermanent, forms are impermanent, eye-consciousness is impermanent, eye-contact is impermanent, watever feeling arises with eye-contact as condition - whether pleasant or painful or neither-painful-nor-pleasant - that too is impermanent.
“‘Leave off lacerating the ear faculty with a sharp iron stake burning, blazing, and glowing.
Let me attend only to this: the ear is impermanent, sounds are impermanent, ear-consciousness is impermanent, ear-contact is impermanent, whatever feeling arises with ear-contact as condition … that too is impermanent.
“‘Leave off lacerating the nose faculty with a sharp nail cutter burning, blazing, and glowing.
Let me attend only to this: So the nose is impermanent, odours are impermanent, nose-consciousness is impermanent, nose-contact is impermanent, whatever feeling arises with nose-contact as condition… that too is impermanent.
“‘Leave off lacerating the tongue faculty with a sharp razor burning, blazing, and glowing.
Let me attend only to this: So the tongue is impermanent, tastes are impermanent, tongue-consciousness is impermanent, tongue-contact is impermanent, whatever feeling arises with tongue-contact as condition … that too is impermanent.
“‘Leave off lacerating the body faculty with a sharp spear burning, blazing, and glowing.
Let me attend only to this: So the body is impermanent, tactile objects are impermanent, body-consciousness is impermanent, body-contact is impermanent, whatever feeling arises with body-contact as condition … that too is impermanent.
“‘Leave off sleeping.
Let me attend only to this: So the mind is impermanent, mental phenomena are impermanent, mind-consciousness is impermanent, mind-contact is impermanent, whatever feeling arises with mind-contact as condition … that too is impermanent.’
“Seeing thus, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple experiences revulsion towards the eye, forms, eye-consciousness, eye-contact, and whatever feeling arises with eye-contact as condition- whether pleasant or painful or neither-painful-nor-pleasant… towards the mind, mental phenomena, mind-consciousness, mind-contact, and whatever feeling arises with mind-contact as condition….
Experiencing revulsion, he becomes dispassionate. Through dispassion his mind is liberated. When it is liberated there comes the knowledge: ‘It’s liberated.’
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’
“This, bhikkhus, is the Dhamma exposition on the theme of burning.”
“And what, bhikkhus, is the Dhamma exposition on the theme of burning?
it is possible that one will go to one of two destinations: hell or the animal realm.
it is possible that one will go to one of two destinations: hell or the animal realm.
it is possible that one will go to one of two destinations: hell or the animal realm.
for sleep, I say, is barren for the living, fruitless for the living, insensibility for the living, than to think such thoughts as would induce one who has come under their control to bring about a schism in the Sangha.
“In regard to this, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple reflects thus: ‘Leave off lacerating the eye faculty with a red-hot iron pin burning, blazing, and glowing.
for I saw a person here who abstained from killing living beings…and held right view, and I see that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he has reappeared in a state of deprivation…even in hell.’
Because of that, on the dissolution of the body, after death, he has reappeared in a state of deprivation…even in hell.
“Therein, Ananda, as to the person here who kills living beings…and holds wrong view, and on thef dissolution of the body, after death, reappears in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world: either earlier he did a good action to be felt as pleasant, or later he did a good action to be felt as pleasant, or at the time of death he acquired and undertook right view.1233
Because of that, on the dissolution of the body, after death, he has reappeared in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world.
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Savatthl in Jeta’s Grove, Anathapindika’s Park.
Now on that occasion the venerable Lomasakangiya was living in the Sakyan country at Kapilavatthu in Nigrodha’s Park.1221
Standing at one side, Candana the young deity said to him: “Bhikkhu, do you remember the summary and exposition of ‘One Who Has One Fortunate Attachment’?”
“Friend, I do not remember the summary and exposition of ‘One Who Has One Fortunate Attachment.’
But, friend, do you remember the summary and exposition of ‘One Who Has One Fortunate Attachment’?”
“Bhikkhu, I too do not remember the summary and exposition of ‘One Who Has One Fortunate Attachment.’
But, bhikkhu, do you remember the stanza of ‘One Who Has One Fortunate Attachment’?”
“Friend, I do not remember the stanza of ‘One Who Has One Fortunate Attachment.’
But, friend, do you remember the stanza of ‘One Who Has One Fortunate Attachment’?”
“Bhikkhu, I remember the stanza of ‘One Who Has One Fortunate Attachment.’“
“But, friend, in what way do you remember the stanza of ‘One Who Has One Fortunate Attachment’?”
“Bhikkhu, once the Blessed One was living among the gods of the heaven of the Thirty-three, on the Red Marble Stone at the root of the Paricchattaka tree.1222
There the Blessed One recited the summary and exposition of ‘One Who Has One Fortunate Attachment’ to the gods of the heaven of the Thirty-three:
Instead with insight let him see Each presently arisen state;
Today the effort must be made; Tomorrow Death may come, who knows?
No bargain with Mortality Can keep him and his hordes away.
But one who dwells thus ardently, Relentlessly, by day, by night -
“Bhikkhu, I remember the stanza of ‘One Who Has One Fortunate Attachment’ thus.
Bhikkhu, learn the summary and exposition of ‘One Who Has One Fortunate Attachment.’ Bhikkhu, master the summary and exposition of ‘One Who Has One Fortunate Attachment.’ Bhikkhu, remember the summary and exposition of ‘One Who Has One Fortunate Attachment.’
Bhikkhu, the summary and exposition of ‘One Who Has One Fortunate Attachment’ is beneficial, it belongs to the fundamentals of the holy life.”
That is what was said by Candana the young deity,
Then, when the night was over, the venerable Lomasakangiya set his resting place in order, and taking his bowl and outer robe, set out to wander by stages to Savatthi.
He at length arrived at Savatthi, and went to the Blessed One in Jeta’s Grove, Anathapindika’s Park. After paying homage to him, he sat down at one side,
“Bhikkhu, do you know that young deity?”
“No, venerable sir.”
“Bhikkhu, that young deity is named Candana.
He heeds the Dhamma, gives it attention, engages it with all his mind, hears it with eager ears.
So, bhikkhu, listen and attend closely to what I shall say.”
“Yes, venerable sir,” the venerable Lomasakangiya replied to the Blessed One.
The Blessed One said this: 7-14.
That is what the Blessed One said.
The Venerable Lomasakangiya was satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
Then, when the night was well advanced, Candana, a young deity of beautiful appearance who illuminated the whole of Nigrodha’s Park, approached the venerable Lomasakangiya.
“Bhikkhus, wanderers of other sects may ask you: ‘Friends,there are these three things.
What three?
Greed, hatred, and delusion. These are the three.
What, friends, is the distinction,the disparity, the difference between them?’
If you are asked this, how would you answer?”
“Bhante, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One, guidedby the Blessed One, take recourse in the Blessed One.
It would be good if the Blessed One would clear up the meaning of this statement.
“Then listen, bhikkhus, and attend closely. I will speak.”
“Yes, Bhante,” those bhikkhus replied.
The Blessed One said this:
“Bhikkhus, if wanderers of other sects should ask you such a question, you should answer them as follows: ‘Lust, friends, is slightly blameworthy but slow to fade away; hatred is very blameworthy but quick to fade away; delusion is very blameworthy and slow to fade away’
’ You should answer: ‘An attractive object.
For one who attends carelessly to an attractive object, unarisen lust arises and arisen lust increases and expands.
This, friends, is the reason unarisen lust arises and arisen lust increases and expands’
You should answer: ‘A repulsive object.
For one who attends carelessly to a repulsive object, unarisen hatred arises and arisen hatred increases and expands.
This, friends, is the reason unarisen hatred arises and arisen hatred increases and expands’
You should answer: ‘Careless attention.
For one who attends carelessly, unarisen delusion arises and arisen delusion increases and expands.
This, friends, is the reason unarisen delusion arises and arisen delusion increases and expands’
You should answer: ‘An unattractive object.
For one who attends carefully to an unattractive object, unarisen lust does not arise and arisen lust is abandoned.
This, friends, is the reason unarisen lust does not arise and arisen lust is abandoned’
‘You should answer: ‘The liberation of the mind by loving-kindness.
For one who attends carefully to the liberation of the mind by loving-kindness - unarisen hatred does not arise and arisen hatred is abandoned.
This, friends, is the reason unarisen hatred does not arise and arisen hatred is abandoned.’
“Suppose they ask: ‘But what, friends, is the reason unarisen delusion does not arise and arisen delusion is abandoned?
’ You should answer: ‘Careful attention.
For one who attends carefully, unarisen delusion does not arise and arisen delusion is abandoned.
This, friends, is the reason unarisen delusion does not arise and arisen delusion is abandoned.”
Having heard it from him, the bhikkhus will retain it in mind.”
“Suppose they ask: ‘But, friends, what is the reason unarisen lust arises and arisen lust increases and expands?
“Suppose they ask: ‘But what, friends, is the reason unarisen hatred arises and arisen hatred increases and expands?’
“Suppose they ask: ‘But what, friends, is the reason unarisen delusion arises and arisen delusion increases and expands?’
“Suppose they ask: ‘But what, friends, is the reason unarisen lust does not arise and arisen lust is abandoned?’
“Suppose they ask: ‘But what, friends, is the reason unarisen hatred does not arise and arisen hatred is abandoned?
On one occasion the Venerable Sariputta and the Venerable Mahakotthita were dwelling at Baranasi in the Deer Park at Isipatana.
Then, in the evening, the Venerable Mahakotthita emerged from seclusion, approached the Venerable Sariputta, exchanged greetings, and said to him: “Friend Sariputta, what are the things that a virtuous bhikkhu should carefully attend to?”
“Friend Kotthita, a virtuous bhikkhu should carefully attend to the five aggregates subject to clinging as impermanent, as suffering, as a disease, as a tumour, as a dart, as misery, as an affliction, as alien, as disintegrating, as empty, as nonself.225
The form aggregate subject to clinging, the feeling aggregate subject to clinging, the perception aggregate subject to clinging, the volitional formations aggregate subject to clinging, the consciousness aggregate subject to clinging.
A virtuous bhikkhu should carefully attend to these five aggregates subject to clinging as impermanent … as nonself.
When, friend, a virtuous bhikkhu carefully attends thus to these five aggregates subject to clinging, it is possible that he may realize the fruit of stream-entry.”
“But, friend Sariputta, what are the things that a bhikkhu who is a sti-eam-enterer should carefully attend to?”
“Friend Kotthita, a bhikkhu who is a stream-enterer should carefully attend to these five aggregates subject to clinging as impermanent … as nonself.
When, friend, a bhikkhu who is a stream-enterer carefully attends thus to these five aggregates subject to clinging, it is possible that he may realize the fruit of once-retuming.”
“But, friend Sdriputta, what are the things that a bhikkhu who is a once-returner should carefully attend to?”
“Friend Kotthita, a bhikkhu who is a once-returner should carefully attend to these five aggregates subject to clinging as impermanent … as nonself.
When, friend, a bhikkhu who is a once-returner carefully attends thus to these five aggregates sub- ject to clinging, it is possible that he may realize the fruit of non-returning.”
“But, friend Sariputta, what are the things that a bhikkhu who is a nonreturner should carefully attend to?”
“Friend Kotthita, a bhikkhu who is a nonreturner should carefully attend to these five aggregates subject to clinging as impermanent … as nonself.
When, friend, a bhikkhu who is a non-returner carefully attends thus to these five aggregates subject to clinging, it is possible that he may realiie the fruit of arahantship.”
“But, friend Sariputta, what are the things that a bhikkhu who is an arahant should carefully attend to?”
“Friend Kotthita, a bhikkhu who is an arahant should carefully attend to these five aggregates subject to clinging as impermanent, as suffering, as a disease, as a tumour, as a dart, as misery, as an affliction, as alien, as disintegrating, as empty, as nonself.
For the arahant, friend, there is nothing further that has to be done and no repetition of what he has already done.”226 However, when these things are developed and cultivated, they lead to a pleasant dwelling in this very life and to mindfulness and clear comprehension.”
What five?
‘Let not a person revive the past Or on the future build his hopes;
For the past has been left behind And the future has not been reached.
Let him know that and be sure of it, Invincibly, unshakeably.
It is he, the Peaceful Sage has said, Who has one fortunate attachment.’
who thereupon vanished at once.
and said: “It would be good, venerable sir, if the Blessed One would teach me the summary and exposition of ‘One Who Has One Fortunate Attachment.’“
Who has one fortunate attachment.”
told the Blessed One all that had occurred,
“Let not a person revive the past… 
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Rajagaha in the Park of the Hot Springs.
Then, when it was near dawn, the venerable Samiddhi went to the hot springs to bathe his limbs.
After bathing he came up out of the water and stood dressed in one robe, drying his limbs.
Then, when the night was well advanced, a certain deity of beautiful appearance who illuminated the whole of the Hot Springs, approached the venerable Samiddhi.
Standing at one side, the deity said to him: 2. “Bhikkhu, do you remember the summary and exposition of ‘One Who Has One Fortunate Attachment’?”
“Friend, I do not remember the summary and exposition of ‘One Who Has One Fortunate Attachment,’
“Bhikkhu, I too do not remember the summary and exposition of ‘One Who Has One Fortunate Attachment.’
But, bhikkhu, do you remember the stanza of ‘One Who Has One Fortunate Attachment’?”
“Friend, I do not remember the stanza of ‘One Who Has One Fortunate Attachment.’
But, friend, do you remember the stanza of ‘One Who Has One Fortunate Attachment’?”
“Bhikkhu, I too do not remember the stanza of ‘One Who Has One Fortunate Attachment.’
But, bhikkhu, learn the summary and exposition of ‘One Who Has One Fortunate Attachment.’ Bhikkhu, master the summary and exposition of ‘One Who Has One Fortunate Attachment.’ Bhikkhu, remember the summary and exposition of ‘One Who Has One Fortunate Attachment.’
Bhikkhu, the summary and exposition of ‘One Who Has One Fortunate Attachment’ is beneficial, it belongs to the fundamentals of the holy life.”
That is what was said by the deity, who thereupon vanished at once.
Then, when the night was over, the venerable Samiddhi went to the Blessed One. After paying homage to him, he sat down at one side,
“Then, bhikkhu, listen and attend closely to what I shall say.”
- “Yes, venerable sir,” the venerable Samiddhi replied.
The Blessed One said:
Instead with insight let him see Each presently arisen state;
Today the effort must be made; Tomorrow Death may come, who knows?
No bargain with Mortality Can keep him and his hordes away.
But one who dwells thus ardently, Relentlessly, by day, by night -
That is what the Blessed One said. Having said this, the Sublime One rose from his seat and went into his dwelling.
Then, soon after the Blessed One had gone, the bhikkhus considered:1219 “Now, friends, the Blessed One has risen from his seat and gone into his dwelling after giving a summary in brief without expounding the detailed meaning.
Then they considered: “The venerable Maha Kaccana is praised by the Teacher and esteemed by his wise companions in the holy life. He is capable of expounding the detailed meaning.
Suppose we went to him and asked him the meaning of this.”
Then the bhikkhus went to the venerable Maha Kaccana and exchanged greetings with him.
When this courteous and amiable talk was finished, they sat down to one side
The venerable Maha Kaccana replied: “Friends, it is as though a man needing heartwood, seeking heartwood, wandering in search of heartwood, thought that heartwood should be sought for among the branches and leaves of a great tree standing possessed of heartwood, after he had passed over the root and the trunk. And so it is with you, venerable sirs, that you think that I should be asked about the meaning of this, after you passed the Blessed One by when you were face to face with the Teacher.
For knowing, the Blessed One knows; seeing, he sees; he is vision, he is knowledge, he is the Dhamma, he is the holy one; he is the sayer, the proclaimer, the elucidator of meaning, the giver of the Deathless, the lord of the Dhamma, the Tathagata.
That was the time when you should have asked the Blessed One the meaning. As he told you, so you should have remembered it.”
“Surely, friend Kaccana, knowing, the Blessed One knows; seeing, he sees; he is vision…the Tathagata.
That was the time when we should have asked the Blessed One the meaning. As he told us, so we should have remembered it.
Yet the venerable Maha Kaccana is praised by the Teacher and esteemed by his wise companions in the holy life. The venerable Maha Kaccana is capable of expounding the detailed meaning of this summary given in brief by the Blessed One without expounding the detailed meaning.
Let the venerable Maha Kaccana expound it without finding it troublesome.”
“Then listen, friends, and attend closely to what I shall say.”
- “Yes, friend,” the bhikkhus replied.
The venerable Maha Kaccana said this:
‘Let not a person revive the past…
I understand the detailed meaning of it to be as follows.
“How, friends, does one revive the past?
Thinking, ‘My eye was thus in the past and forms were thus,’ one’s consciousness becomes bound up with desire and lust for that. Because one’s consciousness is bound up with desire and lust, one delights in that. When one delights in that, one revives the past.
Thinking, ‘My ear was thus in the past and sounds were thus…My nose and odours…My tongue and flavours…My body and tangibles…My mind was thus in the past and mind-objects were thus,’ one’s consciousness becomes bound up with desire and lust for that. Because one’s consciousness is bound up with desire and lust, one delights in that. When one delights in that, one revives the past. That is how one revives the past.
“How does one not revive the past?
Thinking, ‘My eye was thus in the past and forms were thus,’ one’s consciousness does not become bound up with desire and lust for that. Because one’s consciousness is not bound up with desire and lust, one does not delight in that. When one does not delight in that, one does not revive the past.
“Thinking, ‘My ear was thus in the past and sounds were thus…My nose and odours…My tongue and flavours…My body and tangibles…My mind was thus in the past and mind-objects were thus,’ one’s consciousness does not become bound up with desire and lust for that. Because one’s consciousness is not bound up with desire and lust, one does not delight in that. When one does not delight in that, one does not revive the past. That is how one does not revive the past.
“How, friends, does one build up hope upon the future?
Thinking, ‘My eye may be thus in the future and forms may be thus,’ one sets one’s heart on obtaining what has not yet been obtained. Because one sets one’s heart thus, one delights in that. When one delights in that, one builds up hope upon the future.
“Thinking, ‘My ear may be thus in the future and sounds may be thus…My nose and odours…My tongue and flavours…My body and tangibles…My mind may be thus in the future and mind-objects may be thus,’ one sets one’s heart on obtaining what has not yet been obtained. Because one sets one’s heart thus, one delights in that. When one delights in that, one builds up hope upon the future. That is how one builds up hope upon the future.
“How, friends, does one not build up hope upon the future?
Thinking, ‘My eye may be thus in the future and forms may be thus,’ one does not set one’s heart on obtaining what has not yet been obtained. Because one does not set one’s heart thus, one does not delight in that. When one does not delight in that, one does not build up hope upon the future.
“Thinking, ‘My ear may be thus in the future and sounds may be thus…My nose and odours…My tongue and flavours…My body and tangibles…My mind may be thus in the future and mind-objects may be thus,’ one does not set one’s heart on obtaining what has not yet been obtained. Because one does not set one’s heart thus, one does not delight in that. When one does not delight in that, one does not build up hope upon the future. That is how one does not build up hope upon the future.
“How is one vanquished in regard to presently arisen states?
In regard to the eye and forms that are presently arisen,
one’s consciousness is bound up with desire and lust for that which is presently arisen. Because one’s consciousness is bound up with desire and lust, one delights in that..When one delights in that, one is vanquished in regard to presently arisen states.
“In regard to the ear and sounds that are presently arisen…the nose and odours…the tongue and flavours…the body and tangibles… the mind and mind-objects that are presently arisen,
one’s consciousness is bound up with desire and lust for that which is presently arisen. Because one’s consciousness is bound up with desire and lust, one delights in that. When one delights in that, one is vanquished in regard to presently arisen states. That is how one is vanquished in regard to presently arisen states.
“How is one invincible in regard to presently arisen states?
In regard to the eye and forms that are presently arisen,
one’s consciousness is not bound up with desire and lust for that which is presently arisen. Because one’s consciousness is not bound up with desire and lust, one does not delight in that. When one does not delight in that, one is invincible in regard to presently arisen states. “In regard to the ear and sounds that are presently arisen…
the nose and odours…the tongue and flavours…the body and tangibles…the mind and mind-objects that are presently arisen,
one’s consciousness is not bound up with desire and lust for that which is presently arisen. Because one’s consciousness is not bound up with desire and lust, one does not delight in that. When one does not delight in that, one is invincible in regard to presently arisen states. That is how one is invincible in regard to presently arisen states.
“Friends, when the Blessed One rose from his seat and went into his dwelling after giving a summary in brief without expounding the detailed meaning, that is:
Now, friends, if you wish, go to the Blessed One and ask him about the meaning of this. As the Blessed One explains it to you, so you should remember it.”
Then the bhikkhus, having delighted and rejoiced in the venerable Maha Kaccana’s words, rose from their seats and went to the Blessed One.
After paying homage to him, they sat down at one side and told the Blessed One all that had taken place after he had left,
“Maha Kaccana is wise, bhikkhus, Maha Kaccana has great wisdom.
If you had asked me the meaning of this, I would have explained it to you in the same way that Maha Kaccana has explained it.
Such is its meaning,
That is what the Blessed One said.
The bhikkhus were satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
Then the wanderer Channa approached the Venerable Ananda and exchanged greetings with him.
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side
“ We do, friend.”
“But what is the danger that you have seen on account of which you prescribe the abandoning of lust, hatred, and delusion?”
“One excited by lust, friend, overcome by lust, with mind obsessed by it, intends for his own affliction, for the affliction of others, and for the affliction of both, and he experiences mental suffering and dejection. But when lust is abandoned, he does not intend for his own affliction, for the affliction of others, or for the affliction of both, and he does not experience mental suffering and dejection.”
One excited by lust, overcome by lust, with mind obsessed by it, engages in misconduct by body, speech, and mind. But when lust is abandoned, one does not engage in misconduct by body, speech, and mind.
One excited by lust, overcome by lust, with mind obsessed by it, does not understand as it really is his own good, the good of others, and the good of both. But when lust is abandoned, one understands as it really is one’s own good, the good of others, and the good of both.
Lust leads to blindness, loss of vision, and lack of knowledge; it is obstructive to wisdom , aligned with distress, and does not lead to nibbana.
“One full of hate, overcome by hatred… “One deluded, overcome by delusion, with mind obsessed by it, intends for his own affliction, for the affliction of others, and for the affliction of both, and he experiences mental suffering and dejection. But when delusion is abandoned, he does not intend for his own affliction, for the affliction of others, or for the affliction of both, and he does not experience mental suffering and dejection.
“One deluded, overcome by delusion, with mind obsessedby it, engages in misconduct by body, speech, and mind. But when delusion is abandoned, he does not engage in miscon­duct by body, speech, and mind.
One deluded, overcome by delusion, with mind obsessed by it, does not understand as it really is his own good, the good of others, and the good ofboth. But when delusion is abandoned, one understands as it really is one’s own good, the good of others, and the good of both.
Delusion leads to blindness, loss of vision, and lack of knowledge; it is obstructive to wisdom, aligned with distress, and does not lead to nibbana.
“Having seen these dangers in lust,
“But is there a path, friend, is there a way to the abandoning of lust, hatred, and delusion? “.
“There, is a path, friend, there is a way to the abandoning oflust, hatred, and delusion”
“It is just this noble eightfold path, that is, right view … right concentration.
This is the path, the way to the abandoning of lust, hatred, and delusion.”
“Excellent, friend, is the path, excellent the way to the abandoning of lust, hatred, and delusion.
It is enough, friend Ananda, to be heedful.”
and said to the Venerable Ananda:“Friend Ananda, do you prescribe the abandoning of lust, hatred, and delusion?
hatred,
and delusion, we prescribe their abandoning.”
“But what is the path, what is the way to the abandoning oflust, hatred, and delusion?”
what is it that you speak of as “I am”? “’
When you speak of this “I am,” friend Khemaka,
Do you speak of form as “I am,” or do you speak of “I am” apart from form? Do you speak of feeling … of perception … of volitional formations … of consciousness as “I am,” or do you speak of “I am” apart from consciousness?
what is it that you speak of as ‘I am’?”
Or alternatively, those that yet seek to be as long as they do not reach any posture other than that in which they were born,
while after that they are called those that are.
At Savatthi.” Bhikkhus, there are these four kinds of nutriment for the maintenance of beings that have already come to be and for the assistance of those about to come to be.
What four?
The nutriment edible food, gross or subtle; second, contact; third, mental volition; fourth, consciousness.
These are the four kinds of nutriment for the maintenance of beings that have already come to be and for the assistance of those about to come to be.
“And how, bhikkhus, should the nutriment edible food be seen?
Suppose a couple, husband and wife, had taken limited provisions and were travelling through a desert.
They have with them their only son, dear and beloved.
Then, in the middle of the desert, their limited provisions would be used up and exhausted,
The husband and wife would think ‘Our limited provisions have been used up and exhausted,
while the rest of this desert remains to be crossed.
Let us kill our only son, dear and beloved, and prepare dried and spiced meat. By eating our son’s flesh we can cross the rest of this desert. Let not all three of us perish!
’ “Then, bhikkhus, the husband and wife would kill their only son, dear and beloved, prepare dried and roasted meat, and by eating their son’s flesh they would cross the rest of the desert.
While they are eating their son’s flesh, they would beat their breasts and cry: ‘Where are you, our only son? Where are you, our only son?
’ “What do you think, bhikkhus? Would they eat that food for amusement or for enjoyment or for the sake of physical beauty and attractiveness?
“ “No, venerable sir.”
“Wouldn’t they eat that food only for the sake of crossing the desert?
“ “Yes, venerable sir.”
“It is in such a way, bhikkhus, that I say the nutriment edible food should be seen.161
Suppose there is a flayed cow. If she stands exposed to a wall,
the creatures dwelling in the wall would nibble at her.
If she stands exposed to a tree, the creatures dwelling in the tree would nibble at her.
If she stands exposed to water, the creatures dwelling in the water would nibble at her.
If she stands exposed to the open air, the creatures dwelling in the open air would nibble at her.
Whatever that flayed cow stands exposed to, the creatures dwelling there would nibble at her.
“It is in such a way, bhikkhus, that I say the nutriment contact should be seen.164
When the three kinds of feeling are fully understood, I say, there is nothing further that a noble disciple needs to do.165
Suppose there is a charcoal pit deeper than a man’s height, filled with glowing coals without flame or smoke.
A man would come along wanting to live, not wanting to die, desiring happiness and averse to suffering.
Then two strong men would grab him by both arms and drag him towards the charcoal pit.
The man’s volition would be to get far away, his longing would be to get far away, his wish would be to get far away from the charcoal pit.
For what reason?
Because he knows: ‘I will fall into ths charcoal pit and on that account I will meet death or deadly suffering.’
“It is in such a way, bhikkhus, that I say the nutriment mental volition should be seen.166
When the three kinds of craving are fully understood, I say, there is nothing further that a noble disciple needs to do.167
Suppose they were to arrest a bandit, a criminal, and bring him before the king, saying: ‘Sire, this man is a bandit, a criminal. Impose on him whatever punishment you wish.’
The king says to them: ‘Go, men, in the morning strike this man with a hundred spears.’
In the morning they strike him with a hundred spears.
Then at noon the king asks: ‘Men, how’s that man?’
- ‘Still alive, sire.’
- ‘Then go, and at noon strike him with a hundred spears.’
At noon they strike him with a hundred spears.
Then in the evening the king asks: ‘Men, how’s that man?’
- ‘Still alive, sire.’
- ‘Then go, and in the evening strike him with a hundred spears.’
In the evening they strike him with a hundred spears.
“What do you think, bhikkhus? Would that man, being struck with three hundred spears, experience pain and displeasure on that account?
“ “Venerable sir, even if he were struck with one spear he would experience pain and displeasure on that account, not to speak of three hundred spears.”
“It is in such a way, bhikkhus, that I say the nutriment consciousness should be seen.168
When the nutriment consciousness is fully understood, name-and-form is fully understood. When name-and-form is fully understood, I say, there is nothing further that a noble disciple needs to do.” 169
while the rest of the desert remains to be crossed.
When the nutriment edible food is fully understood, lust for the five cords of sensual pleasure is fully understood.162
When lust for the five cords of sensual pleasure is fully understood, there is no fetter bound by which a noble disciple might come back again to this world.163
“And how, bhikkhus, should the nutriment contact be seen?
When the nutriment contact is fully understood, the three kinds of feeling are fully understood.
“And how, bhikkhus, should the nutriment mental volition be seen?
When the nutriment mental volition is fuIly understood, the three kinds of craving are fully understood.
“And how, bhikkhus, should the nutriment consciousness be seen?
The dart of sorrow wounds the heart
Thus have I heard. On one occasion the Blessed One was dwelling at Savatthi in Jeta’s Grove, Anathapindika’s Park.
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus thus: “Bhikkhus!”
“Venerable sir!” those bhikkhus replied.
The Blessed One said this:
“Bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu is making a thorough investigation, in what way should he thoroughly investigate for the utterly complete destruction of suffering?”134
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One, guided by the Blessed One, take recourse in the Blessed One.
It would be good if the Blessed One would clear up the meaning of this statement.
Having heard it from him, the bhikkhus will remember it.”
“Then listen and attend closely, bhikkhus, I will speak.”
“Yes, venerable sir,” the bhikkhus replied.
The Blessed One said this:
“Here, bhikkhus, when he makes a thorough investigation, a bhikkhu thoroughly investigates thus: ‘The many diverse kinds of suffering that arise in the world headed by aging-and-death: what is the source of this suffering, what is its origin, from what is it born and produced?
When what exists does aging-and-death come to be? When what does not exist does aging-and-death not come to be? ‘
“As he thoroughly investigates he understands thus: ‘The many diverse kinds of suffering that arise in the world headed by aging-and-death: this suffering has birth as its source, birth as its origin; it is born and produced from birth.
When there is birth, aging-and-death comes to be; when there is no birth, aging-and-death does not come to be.’
“He understands aging-and-death, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading on that is in conformity with its cessation.135 He practises that way and conducts himself accordingly. This is called a bhikkhu who is practising for the utterly complete destruction of suffering, for the cessation of aging-and-death.
“Then, investigating further, he thoroughly investigates thus: ‘What is the source of this birth, what is its origin, from what is it born and produced?…
What is the source of this existence?… this clinging? … this craving? … this feeling? … this contact? … these six sense bases?… this name-and-form?… this consciousness?… What is the source of these volitional formations, what is their origin, from what are they born and produced? When what exists do volitional formations come to be? When what does not exist do volitional formations not come to be?
’ “As he thoroughly investigates he understands thus: ‘Volitional formations have ignorance as their source, ignorance as their origin; they are born and produced from ignorance. When there is ignorance, volitional formations come to be; when there is no ignorance, volitional formations do not come to be.’
“He understands volitional formations, their origin, their cessation, and the way leading on that is in conformity with their cessation. He practises that way and conducts himself accordingly. This is called a bhikkhu who is practising for the utterly complete destruction of suffering, for the cessation of volitional formations.
“Bhikkhus, if a person immersed in ignorance generates a meritorious volitional formation, consciousness fares on to the meritorious;
But when a bhikkhu has abandoned ignorance and aroused true knowledge, then, with the fading away of ignorance and the arising of true knowledge, he does not generate a meritorious volitional formation, or a demeritorious volitional formation, or an imperturbable volitional formation.
Since he does not generate or fashion volitional formations, he does not cling to anything in the world. Not clinging, he is not agitated.137 Not being agitated, he personally attains Nibbana.
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’
“If he feels a pleasant feeling,l38 he understands: ‘It is impermanent’; he understands: ‘It is not held to’; he understands: ‘It is not delighted in.’
If he feels a painful feeling, he understands: ‘1t is impermanent’; he understands: ‘It is not held to’; he understands: ‘It is not delighted in.’
If he feels a neither-painful-nor- pleasant feeling, he understands: ‘It is impermanent’; he understands: ‘It is not held to’; he understands: ‘It is not delighted in.’
“If he feels a pleasant feeling, he feels it detached;
“When he feels a feeling terminating with the body, he understands: ‘I feel a feeling terminating with the body.’ When he feels a feeling terminating with life, he understands: ‘I feel a feehg terminating with life.’139
He understands: ‘With the breakup of the body, following the exhaustion of life, all that is felt, not being delighted in, will become cool right here; mere bodily remains will be left.’
“Suppose, bhikkhus, a man would remove a hot clay pot from a potter’s kiln and set it on smooth ground:
So too, when he feels a feeling terminating with the body … terminating with life….
He understands: ‘With the breakup of the body, following the exhaustion of life, all that is felt, not being delighted in, will become cool right here; mere bodily remains will be left.’141
“What do you think, bhikkhus, can a bhikkhu whose taints are destroyed generate a meritorious volitional formation, or a demeritorious volitional formation, or an imperturbable volitional formation?”
“NO, venerable sir.”
“When there are utterly no volitional formations, with the cessation of volitional formations, would consciousness be discemed?
“No, venerable sir.”
“When there is utterly no consciousness, with the cessation of consciousness, would name-and-form be discerned? “
“No, venerable sir.”
“When there is utterly no name-and-form…
no six sense bases … …
no contact …
no feeling …
no craving …
no existence…
no birth, with the cessation of birth, would aging-and-death be discerned?”
“No, venerable sir.”
“Good, good, bhikkhus! It is exactly so and not otherwise!
Place faith in me about this, bhikkhus, resolve on this. Be free from perplexity and doubt about this.
Just this is the end of suffering.” 143
if he generates a demeritorious volitional formation, consciousness fares on to the demeritorious;
if he generates an imperturbable volitional formation, consciousness fares on to the imperturbable.136
if he feels a painful feeling, he feels it detached;
if he feels a neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling, he feels it detached.
its heat would be dissipated right there and potsherds would be left.
no clinging …
Then the brahmin JanussonI approached the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him.
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and
give gifts and perform the memorial rites for the dead2169 with the thought: ‘Let our gift be of benefit to our departed relatives and family members. Let our departed relatives and family members partake of our gift.”
Can our gift, Master Gotama, actually be of benefit to our departed relatives and family members? Can our departed relatives and family members actually partake of our gift?”
“On a right occasion, brahmin, it can be of benefit, not on a wrong occasion.”
“But, Master Gotama, what is a right occasion and what is a wrong occasion?”
“Here, brahmin, someone destroys life, takes what is not given, engages in sexual misconduct, speaks falsehood, speaks divisively, speaks harshly, indulges in idle chatter; he is full of longing, has a mind of ill will, and holds wrong view.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in hell.2170
This is a wrong occasion, when the gift is not of benefit to one living there.”
Someone else destroys life … and holds wrong view.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in the animal realm.
He sustains himself and subsists there on the food of animals.
This, too, is a wrong occasion, when the gift is not of benefit to one living there.”
Still another abstains from the destruction of life, from taking what is not given, from sexual misconduct, from false speech, from divisive speech, from harsh speech, from idle chatter; he is without longing, of good will, and holds right view.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in companionship with human beings.
He sustains himself and subsists there on the food of human beings.
This, too, is a wrong occasion, when the gift is not of benefit to one living there.”
Still another abstains from the destruction of life… and holds right view.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in companionship with the devas.
He sustains himself and subsists there on the food of devas.
This, too, is a wrong occasion, when the gift is not of benefit to one living there.”
Still another destroys life … and holds wrong view.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in the sphere of afflicted spirits.
He sustains himself and subsists there on the food of afflicted spirits, or else he sustains himself there on what his friends, companions, relatives, or family members in this world offer to him.
This is a right occasion, when the gift is of benefit to one living there.”
“But, Master Gotama, who partakes of the gift if that deceased relative or family member has not been reborn in that place?”
“Other departed relatives or family members who have been reborn2171 in that place partake of the gift.”
“But, Master Gotama, who partakes of the gift if neither that deceased relative or family member nor any others have been reborn in that place?”
“Over this long stretch of time in samsara, brahmin, it is impossible and inconceivable for that place to be devoid of one’s departed relatives and family members.
Further, for the donor too it is not fruitless.”
“Does Master Gotama posit the value of giving even on the wrong occasion?”2172
“Brahmin, I posit the value of giving even on the wrong occasion.”
Here, brahmin, someone destroys life, takes what is not given, engages in sexual misconduct, speaks falsehood, speaks divisively, speaks harshly, indulges in idle chatter; he is full of longing, has a mind of ill will, and holds wrong view. He gives an ascetic or a brahmin food and drink; clothing and a vehicle; garlands, scents, and unguents; bedding, dwellings, and light­ing.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in companionship with elephants.
There he gains food and drink, garlands and various ornaments.”
Since he here destroyed life … and held wrong view, with the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in companion­ship with elephants.
But since he gave an ascetic or a brahmin food and drink … he there gains food and drink, garlands and various ornaments.,
“Someone else destroys life… and holds wrong view.
He gives an ascetic or a brahmin food and drink… and lighting.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in com­panionship with horses … cattle… dogs.
There he gains food and drink, garlands and various ornaments.
“Since he here destroyed life…… and held wrong view, with the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in companionship with horses … cattle … dogs.
But since he gave an ascetic or a brahmin food and drink … he there gains food and drink, garlands and various ornaments.”
Still another abstains from the destruction of life, from taking what is not given, from sexual misconduct, from false speech, from divisive speech, from harsh speech, from idle chat­ter; he is without longing, of good will, and holds right view.
He gives an ascetic or a brahmin food and drink; clothing and a vehicle; garlands, scents, and unguents; bedding, dwellings,and lighting.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in companionship with human beings.
There he gains the five objects of human sensual pleasure.”
Since he here abstained from the destruction of life … and held right view, with the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in companionship with human beings.
And since he gave an ascetic or a brahmin food and drink … he there gains the five objects of human sensual pleasure.”
Still another abstains from the destruction of life… and holds right view.
He gives an ascetic or a brahmin food and drink… and lighting.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in companionship with the devas.
There he gains the five objects of celestial sensual pleasure.
“Since he here abstained from the destruction of life … and held right view, with the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in companionship with the devas.
And since he gave an ascetic or a brahmin food and drink… he there gains the five objects of celestial sensual pleasure.
That is why I said:“Further, for the donor too it is not fruitless.”
“It’s astounding and amazing, Master Gotama,
that there is reason to give gifts and perform the memorial rites for the dead, since for the donor too it is not fruitless.”
“So it is, brahmin! So it is, brahmin! For the donor too it is not fruitless.”
“Excellent, Master Gotama! … Let Master Gotama accept meas a lay follower who from today has gone for refuge for life.”
said to the Blessed One:
“Master Gotama, we brahmins
He sus­tains himself and subsists there on the food of the hell-beings.
This is called right effort.
He generates desire for the maintenance of arisen wholesome states, for their nondecay, increase, expansion, and fulfilment by development; he makes an effort, arouses energy, applies his mind, and strives.
He generates desire for the arising of unarisen wholesome states. . . .
he makes an effort, arouses energy, applies his mind, and strives. He generates desire for the abandoning of arisen evil unwholesome states. . . .
At Savatthi. “Bhikkhus, it is by way of elements that beings come together and unite.
Those of an inferior disposition come together and unite with those of an inferior disposition; those of a good disposition come together and unite with those of a good disposition.242
In the future, too, by way of elements, beings will come together and unite…
Those of an inferior disposition come together and unite with those of an inferior disposition; those of a good disposition come together and unite with those of a good disposition.”
Now too, at present, by way of elements, beings come together and unite.
In the past, by way of elements, beings came together and united ….
“Bhikkhus, there are these seven things that are gratifying and advantageous to an enemy that come upon an angry man or woman.
What seven?
“Here, bhikkhus, an enemy wishes for an enemy: ‘May he be ugly!’
For what reason?
An enemy does not delight in the beauty of an enemy.
When an angry person is overcome and oppressed by anger, though he may be well bathed, well anointed, with trimmed hair and beard, dressed in white clothes, still, he is ugly.
This is the first thing gratifying and advantageous to an enemy that comes upon an angry man or woman.
For what reason?
An enemy does not delight when an enemy sleeps well.
When an angry person is overcome and oppressed by anger, though he m ay sleep on a couch spread with rugs, blankets, and covers, with an excellent covering of antelope hide, with a canopy and red bolsters at both ends, still,he sleeps badly.
This is the second thing gratifying and advanta­geous to an enemy that comes upon an angry man or woman.
For what reason?
An enemy does not delight in the suc­cess of an enemy.
When an angry person is overcome and oppressed by anger, if he gets what is harmful, he thinks: ‘I have gotten what is beneficial’ and if he gets what is beneficial, he thinks: ‘I have gotten what is harmful.’
When, overcome by anger, he gets these things that are diametrically opposed, they lead to his harm and suffering for a long time.
This is the third thing gratifying and advantageous to an enemy that comes upon an angry man or woman.
“Again, an enemy wishes for an enemy ‘May he not be wealthy!’
For what reason?
An enemy does not delight in the wealth of an enemy.
When an angry person is overcome and oppressed by anger, kings appropriate for the royal treasury any wealth he has acquired by energetic striving, amassed by the strength of his arms, earned by the sweat of his brow, righ­teous wealth righteously gained.
This is the fourth thing gratify­ing and advantageous to an enemy that comes upon an angry man or woman.
For what reason?
An enemy does not delight in the fame of an enemy.
When an angry person is overcome and oppressed by anger, he loses whatever fame he had acquired through heedfulness.
This is the; fifth thing gratifying and advantageous to an enemy that, comes upon an angry man or woman.
For what reason?
An enemy does not delight in an enemy having friends.
When an angry person is overcome and oppressed by anger, his friends and companions, relatives and family members, avoid him from afar.
This is the sixth thing gratifying and advantageous to an enemy that comes upon an angry man or woman.
“Again, an enemy wishes for an enemy: ‘With the breakupof the body, after death, may he be reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the lower world, in hell!’
For what rea­son?
An enemy does not delight in an enemy’s, going to a good destination.
When an angry person is overcome and oppressed by anger, he engages in misconduct by body, speech, and mind.
As a consequence, still overcome by anger, with the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the lower world, in hell.
This is the sev­enth thing gratifying and advantageous to an enemy that comes upon an angry man or woman.”
These are the seven things gratifying and advantageous to an enemy that come upon an angry man or woman.”
The angry person is ugly; he also sleeps badly;
overcome by anger, having slain by body and speech,1562
His relatives, friends, and loved ones avoid the angry person.
Anger is a cause of harm; anger stirs up mental turmoil.
People do not recognize the peril that has arisen from within.
The angry person doesn’t know the good; the angry person doesn’t see the Dhamma.
There is just blindness and dense gloom when anger overcomes a person.
When an angry person causes damage, whether easily or with difficulty,
He shows recalcitrance as a fire does a smoky crest.
When his anger spreads outward, people become angry on his account.1563
the deeds that produce torment, remote from those that are righteous
I will tell you about. Listen to them as they are,1564
An angry person slays his father; an angry person slays his own mother;
his mother, the one by whom he was nurtured and who showed him this world.
Those beings, like oneself, each hold their self most dear;
Some kill themselves with a sword; some who are distraught swallow poison;
Deeds that involve destroying growth1567 and deeds that cause their own death
Thus death’s snare hidden in the heart has taken the form of anger.
One should cut it off by self-control, wisdom , energy, and right view.
The wise person should eradicate this one unwholesome quality.1568
Free from anger, their misery gone,free from delusion,1569 no longer avid,
“Again, an enemy wishes for an enemy: ‘May he sleep badly!’
“Again, an enemy wishes for an enemy: ‘May he not suc­ceed!’
“Again, an enemy wishes for an enemy: ‘May he not be famous!’
“Again, an enemy, wishes for an enemy: ‘May he have no friends!’
having gained some benefit,he takes it to be harmful.1561
the angry person, incurs the loss of wealth.
Maddened by anger he acquires a bad reputation.
later, when the anger has vanished, he is tormented as if burnt by fire.
He has no shame or fear of wrong, his speech is not respectful;
one overcome by anger has no island of safety at all.
an angry person slays a brahmin;1565 an angry person slays a worldling.
the good woman who gave him life, The angry worldling slays.
yet those who are angry kill themselves in various ways1566 when they are distraught about diverse matters.
some hang themselves with a rope; some jump into a mountain gorge.
when doing such deeds they do not know that defeat is born of anger.
In such a way one should train in the Dhamma: do not yield to recalcitrance.
tamed, having abandoned anger,the taintless ones attain nibbana.1570
At Savatthi.
“Bhikkhus, when the perception of impermanence is developed and cultivated, it eliminates all sensual lust, it eliminates all lust for existence, it eliminates all ignorance, it uproots all conceit ‘I am.’215
“Just as, bhikkhus, in the autumn a ploughman ploughing with a great ploughshare cuts through all the rootlets as he ploughs, so too, when the perception of impermanence is developed and cultivated, it eliminates all sensual lust … it uproots all conceit ‘I am.’
“Just as, bhikkhus, a rush-cutter would cut down a rush, grab it by the top, and shake it down and shake it out and thump it about, so too, when the perception of impermanence is developed and cultivated, it eliminates all sensual lust… it uproots all conceit ‘I am.’
“Just as, bhikkhus, when the stalk of a bunch of mangoes has been cut, all the mangoes attached to the stalk follow along with it, so too, when the perception of impermanence is developed … it uproots all conceit ‘I am.’
“Just as, bhikkhus, all the rafters of a house with a peaked roof lead to the roof peak, slope towards the roof peak, and converge upon the roof peak, and the roof peak is declared to be their chief, so too, when the perception of impermanence is developed… it uproots all conceit ‘I am.’216
“Just as, bhikkhus, among fragrant roots, black orris is declared to be their chief, so too, when the perception of impermanence is developed… it uproots all conceit ‘I am.’
“Just as, bhikkhus, among fragrant heartwoods, red sandalwood is declared to be their chief, so too, when the perception of impermanence is developed… it uproots all conceit ‘I am.’
“Just as, bhikkhus, among fragrant flowers, jasmine is declared to be their chief, so too, when the perception of impermanence is developed… it uproots all conceit ‘I am.’
“Just as, bhikkhus, all petty princes are the vassals of a wheel-turning monarch, and the wheel-turning monarch is declared to be their chief, so too, when the perception of impermanence is developed… it uproots all conceit ‘I am.’
“Just as, bhikkhus, the radiance of all the stars does not amount to a sixteenth part of the radiance of the moon, and the radiance of the moon is declared to be their chief, so too, when the perception of impermanence is developed… it uproots all conceit ‘I am.’
“Just as, bhikkhus, in the autumn, when the sky is clear and cloudless, the sun, ascending in the sky, dispels all darkness from space as it shines and beams and radiates, so too, when the perception of impermanence is developed and cultivated, it eliminates all sensual lust, it eliminates all lust for existence, it eliminates all ignorance, it uproots all conceit ‘I am.’
“And how, bhikkhus, is the perception of impermanence developed and cultivated so that it eliminates all sensual lust, eliminates all lust for existence, eliminates all ignorance, and uproots all conceit ‘I am’?
‘Such is form, such its origin, such its passing away; such is feeling … such is perception… such are volitional formations … such is consciousness, such its origin, such its passing away’: that is how the perception of impemanence is developed and cultivated so that it eliminates all sensual lust, eliminates all lust for existence, eliminates all ignorance, and uproots all conceit ‘I am.” ‘
Thus have I heard. On one occasion the Blessed One was dwelling among the Sakyans where there was a town of the Sakyans named Devadaha.
Then a number of westward-bound bhikkhus approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side,
and said to him:“Venerable sir, we wish to go to the western province in order to take up residence there.”
“Have you taken leave of Sgriputta, bhikkhus?”
“No, venerable sir.”
“Then take leave of Sariputta, bhikkhus.
Sariputta is wise, he is one who helps his brothers in the holy life.”10
“Yes, venerable sir,” those bhikkhus replied.
Now on that occasion the Venerable Sariputta was sitting not far from the Blessed One in a cassia bush11.
Then those bhikkhus, having delighted and rejoiced in the Blessed One’s statement, rose from their seats and paid homage to the Blessed One. Then, keeping him on their right, they approached the Venerable Sariputta. They exchanged greetings with the Venerable Sariputta
and, when they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, they sat down to one side
and said to him: “Friend Sariputta, we wish to go to the western province in order to take up residence there.
“Friends, there are wise khattiyas, wise brahmins, wise householders, and wise ascetics who question a bhikkhu when he has gone abroad12 -
for wise people, friends, are inquisitive: ‘What does your teacher say, what does he teach?’ I hope that you venerable ones have learned the teachings well, grasped them well, attended to them well, reflected on them well, and penetrated them well with wisdom, so that when you answer you will state what has been said by the Blessed One and will not misrepresent him with what is contrary to fact; so that you will explain in accordance with the Dhamma, and no reasonable consequence of your assertion would give ground for criticism.”13
“We would come from far away, friend, to learn the meaning of this statement from the Venerable Sgriputta.
It would be good indeed if the Venerable Sariputta would clear up the meaning of this statement.”
“Then listen and attend closely, friends, I will speak.”
“Yes, friend,” those bhikkhus replied.
The Venerable Sariputta said this:
’ Being asked thus, friends, you should answer: ‘Our teacher, friends, teaches the removal of desire and lust.’
‘When you have answered thus, friends, there may be wise khattiyas … wise ascetics who will question you further -
Being asked thus, friends, you should answer: ‘Our teacher, friends, teaches the removal of desire and lust for form, the removal of desire and lust for feeling … perception … volitional formations… consciousness.’
“When you have answered thus, friends, there may be wise khattiyas … wise ascetics who will question you further -
for wise people, friends, are inquisitive: ‘Having seen what danger does your teacher teach the removal of desire and lust for form, the removal of desire and lust for feeling… perception… volitional formations … consciousness?’
Being asked thus, friends, you should answer thus: ‘If, friends, one is not devoid of lust, desire, affection, thirst, passion, and craving in regard to form,14 then with the change and alteration of form there arise in one sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair.
If, friends, one is not devoid of lust, desire, affection, thirst, passion, and craving in regard to feeling… perception… volitional formations…
Having seen this danger, our teacher teaches the removal of desire and lust for form, the removal of desire and lust for feeling… perception… volitional formations… consciousness.’
“When you have answered thus, friends, there may be wise khattiyas … wise ascetics who will question you further -
for wise people, friends, are inquisitive: ‘Having seen what benefit does your teacher teach the removal of desire and lust for form, the removal of desire and lust for feeling…perception… volitional formations … consciousness?’
Being asked thus, friends, you should answer thus: ‘If, friends, one is devoid of lust, desire, affection, thirst, passion, and craving in regard to form, then with the change and alteration of form s~rrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair do not arise in one.
If one is devoid of lust, desire, affection, thirst, passion, and craving in regard to feeling… perception… volitional formations…
consciousness, then with the change and alteration of consciousness sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair do not arise in one.
Having seen this benefit, our teacher teaches the removal of desire and lust for form, the removal of desire and lust for feeling … perception… volitional formations… consciousness.’
“If, friends,15 one who enters and dwells amidst unwholesome states could dwell happily in this very life, without vexation, despair, and fever, and if, with the breakup of the body, after death, he could expect a good destination, then the Blessed One would not praise the abandoning of unwholesome states.
But because one who enters and dwells amidst unwholesome states dwells in suffering in this very life, with vexation, despair, and fever, and because he can expect a bad destination with the breakup of the body, after death, the Blessed One praises the abandoning of unwholesome states.
“If, friends, one who enters and dwells amidst wholesome states would dwell in suffering in this very life, with vexation, despair, and fever, and if, with the breakup of the body, after death, he could expect a bad destination, then the Blessed One would not praise the acquisition of wholesome states.
But because one who enters and dwells amidst wholesome states dwells happily in this very life, without vexation, despair, and fever, and because he can expect a good destination with the breakup of the body, after death, the Blessed One praises the acquisition of wholesome states.”
This is what the Venerable Sariputta said.
Elated, those bhikkhus delighted in the Venerable Sariputta’s statement.
We have taken leave of the Teacher.”
“There are, friends, wise khattiyas, wise brahmins, wise householders, and wise ascetics who question a bhikkhu when he has gone abroad
- for wise people, friends, are inquisitive: ‘What does your teacher say, what does he teach?
for wise people, friends, are inquisitive: ‘In regard to what does your teacher teach the removal of desire and lust?’
consciousness, then with the change and alteration of consciousness there arise in one sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five faculties.
What five?
The pleasure faculty… the equanimity faculty.
“Here, bhikkhus, while a bhikkhu is dwelling diligent, ardent, and resolute, there arises in him the pain faculty.
He understands thus: ‘There has arisen in me this pain faculty. That has a basis, a source, a causal formation, a condition.215
It is impossible for that Pain faculty to arise without a basis, without a source, without a causal formation, without a condition.’
He understands the pain faculty; he understands the origin of the pain faculty; he understands the cessation of the pain faculty; and he understands where the arisen pain faculty ceases without remainder.
“And where does the arisen pain faculty cease without remainder?216
Here, bhikkhus, secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the first jhiina, which is accompanied by thought and examhation, with rapture and happiness born of seclusion. And it is here that the arisen pain faculty ceases without remainder.217
“This, bhikkhus, is called a bhikkhu who has understood the cessation of the pain faculty. He directs his mind accordingly.
“Here, bhikkhus, while a bhikkhu is dwelling diligent, ardent, and resolute, there arises in him the displeasure faculty.214
He understands thus: ‘There has arisen in me this displeasure faculty. That has a basis, a source, a causal formation, a condition.
It is impossible for that displeasure faculty to arise without a basis, without a source, without a causal formation, without a condition.’
He understands the displeasure faculty; he understands the origin of the displeasure faculty; he understands the cessation of the displeasure faculty; and he understands where the arisen displeasure faculty ceases without remainder.
“And where does the arisen displeasure faculty cease without remainder?
With the subsiding of thought and examination, a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the second jhana, which has internal confidence and unification of mind, is without thought and examination, and has rapture and happiness born of concentration. And it is here that the arisen displeasure faculty ceases without remainder.219
“This, bhikkhus, is called a bhikkhi who has understood the cessation of the displeasure faculty. He directs his mind accordingly.
“Here, bhikkhus, while a bhikkhu is dwelling diligent, ardent, and resolute, there arises in him the pleasure faculty.
He understands thus: ‘There has arisen in me this pleasure faculty. That has a basis, a source, a causal formation, a condition.
It is impossible for that pleasure faculty to arise without a basis, without a source, without a causal formation, without a condition.’
He understands the pleasure faculty; he understands the origin of the pleasure faculty; he understands the cessation of the pleasure 1 faculty; and he understands where the arisen pleasure faculty ceases without remainder.
“And where does the arisen pleasure faculty cease without reminder?
With the fading away as well of rapture, a bhikkhu dwells equanimous and, mindful and clearly comprehending, experiences happiness with the body; he enters and dwells in the third jhana of which the noble ones declare: ‘He is equanimous, mindful, one who dwells happily.’ And it is here that the arisen pleasure faculty ceases without remainder.220
“This, bhikkhus, is called a bhikkhu who has understood the cessation of the pleasure faculty. He directs his mind accordingly.
“Here, bhikkhus, while a bhikkhu is dwelling diligent, ardent, and resolute, there arises in him the joy faculty.
He understands thus: ‘There has arisen in me this joy faculty. That has a basis, a source, a causal formation, a condition.
It is impossible for that joy faculty to arise without a basis, without a source, without a causal formation, without a condition.’
He understands the joy faculty; he understands the origin of the joy faculty; he understands the cessation of the joy faculty; and he understands where the arisen joy faculty ceases without remainder.
“And where does the arisen joy faculty cease without remainder?
With the abandoning of pleasure and pain, and with the previous passing away of joy and displeasure, a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the fourth jhana, which is neither painful nor pleasant and includes the purification of mindfulness by equanimity. And it is here that the arisen joy faculty ceases without remainder.’
“This, bhikkhus, is called a bhikkhu who has understood the cessation of the joy faculty. He directs his mind accordingly.
“Here, bhikkhus, while a bhikkhu is dwelling diligent, ardent, and resolute, there arises in him the equanimity faculty.
He understands thus: ‘There has arisen in me this equanimity facultyThat has a basis, a source, a causal formation, a condition.
It is impossible for that equanimity faculty to arise without a basis, without a source, without a causal formation, without a condition.’
He understands the equanimity faculty; he understands the origin of the equanimity faculty; he understands the cessation of the equanimity faculty; and he understands where the ansen equanimity faculty ceases without remainder.
“And where does the arisen equanimity faculty cease without remainder?
Here, bhikkhus, having completely transcended the base of neither-perception-nor-nonperception, a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the cessation of perception and feeling. And it is here that the arisen equanimity faculty ceases without remainder.
“This, bhikkhus, is called a bhikkhu who has understood the cessation of the equanimity faculty. He directs his mind accordingly.
“Bhikkhus, consciousness comes to be in dependence on a dyad.
And how, bhikkhus, does consciousness come to be in dependence on a dyad?
In dependence on the eye and forms there arises eye-consciousness.
The eye is impermanent, changing, becoming otherwise;
Thus this dyad is moving and tottering66 impermanent, changing, becoming otherwise.
“Eye-consciousness is impermanent, changing, becoming otherwise.
The cause and condition for the arising of eye-consciousness is also impermanent, changing, becoming otherwise.
When, bhikkhus, eye-consciousness has arisen in dependence on a condition that is impermanent, how could it be permanent?
“The meeting, the encounter, the concurrence of these three things is called eye-contact.
Eye-contact too is impermanent, changing, becoming otherwise.
The cause and condition for the arising of eye-contact is also impermanent, changing, becoming otherwise.
When, bhikkhus, eye-contact has arisen in dependence on a condition that is impermanent, how could it be permanent?
“Contacted, bhikkhus, one feels, contacted one intends, contacted one perceives.67
“In dependence on the ear and sounds there arises earconsciousness……
In dependence on the mind and mental phenomena there arises mind-consciousness.
The mind is impermanent, changing, becoming otherwise;
Thus this dyad is moving and tottering, impermanent, changing, becoming otherwise.
Mind-consciousness is impermanent, changing, becoming otherwise.
The cause and condition for the arising of mind-consciousness is also impermanent, changing, becoming otherwise.
When, bhikkhus, mind-consciousness has arisen in dependence on a condition that is impermanent, how could it be permanent?
“The meeting, the encounter, the concurrence of these three things is called mind-contact.
Mind-contact too is impermanent, changing, becoming otherwise.
The cause and condition for the arising of mind-contact is also impermanent, changing, becoming otherwise.
When, bhikkhus, mind-contact has arisen in dependence on a condition that is impermanent, how could it be permanent?
“Contacted, bhikkhus, one feels, contacted one intends, contacted one perceives.
Thus these things too are moving and tottering, impermanent, changing, becoming otherwise.
“It is in such a way, bhikkhus, that consciousness comes to be in dependence on a dyad.”
forms are impermanent, changing, becoming otherwise.
Thus these things too are moving and tottering, impermanent, changing, becoming otherwise.
mental phenomena are impermanent, changing, becoming otherwise.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five themes that should often be reflected upon by a woman or a man, by a householder or one gone forth.1058
A woman or a man, a householder or one gone forth, should often reflect thus: ‘I am subject to old age; I am not exempt from old age’
A woman or a man, a householder or one gone forth, should often reflect thus: ‘I am subject to death; I am not exempt from death’
“For the sake of what benefit should a woman or a man, a householder or one gone forth, often reflect thus: ‘I am sub­ject to old age; I am not exempt from old age’?
In their youth beings are intoxicated with their youth, and when they are intoxicated with their youth they engage in misconduct by body, speech, and mind.
But when one often reflects upon this theme, the intoxication with youth is either completely abandoned or diminished.
It is for the sake of this benefit that a woman or a man, a householder or one gone forth, should often reflect thus: ‘I am subject to old age; I am not exempt from old age’
“And for the sake of what benefit should a woman or a man, a householder or one gone forth, often reflect thus: ‘I am subject to illness; I am not exempt from illness’?
In a state of health beings are intoxicated with their health, and when they are intoxicated with their health they engage in misconduct by body, speech, and mind.
But when one often reflects upon this theme, the intoxication with health is either completely abandoned or diminished.
It is for the sake of this benefit that a woman or a man, a householder or one gone forth, should often reflect thus: am subject to illness; I am not exempt from illness.’
“And for the sake of what benefit should a woman or a man, a householder or one gone forth, often reflect thus: ‘I am subject to death; I am not exempt from death’?
During their lives beings are intoxicated with life, and when they are intoxi­cated with life they engage in misconduct by body, speech,and mind.
But when one often reflects upon this theme, the intoxication with life is either completely abandoned or dimin­ished.
It is for the sake of this benefit that a woman or a man, a householder or one gone forth, should often reflect thus: ‘I am subject to death; I am not exempt from death.’
“And for the sake of what benefit should a woman or am an, a householder or one gone forth, often reflect thus: ‘I must be parted and separated from everyone and everything dear and agreeable to me’?
Beings have desire and lust in regard to those people and things that are dear and agreeable, and excited by this lust, they engage in misconduct by body, speech, and mind.
But when one often reflects upon this theme the desire and lust in regard to everyone and everything dear and agree­able is either completely abandoned or diminished.
It is for the sake of this benefit that a woman or a man, a householder or one gone forth, should often reflect thus: ‘I must be parted and separated from everyone and everything dear and agreeable to me.’
“And for the sake of what benefit should a woman or a man, a householder or one gone forth, often reflect thus: ‘I am the owner of my kamma, the heir of my kamma; I have kamma as my origin, kamma as my relative, kamma as my resort; I will be the heir of whatever kamma, good or bad, that I do’?
People engage in misconduct by body, speech, and mind.
But when one often reflects upon this theme, such misconduct is either completely abandoned or diminished.
It is for the sake of this benefit that a woman or a man, a householder or one gone forth, should often reflect thus: I am the owner of my kamma, the heir of my kamma; I have kamma as my origin, kamma as my relative, kamma as my resort; I will be the heir of whatever kamma, good or bad, that I do’
“This noble disciple reflects thus: I am not the only one who is subject to old age, not exempt from old age. All beings that come and go, that pass away and undergo rebirth, are subject to old age; none are exempt from old age’
As he often reflects on this theme, the path is generated.
He pursues this path, develops it, and cultivates it.
As he does so, the fet­ters are entirely abandoned and the underlying tendencies are uprooted.1060..
“This noble disciple reflects thus: I am not the only one who is subject to illness, not exempt from illness. All beings that come and go, that pass away and undergo rebirth, are subject to illness; none are exempt from illness’
He pursues this path, devel­ops it, and cultivates it.
As he does so, the fetters are entirely abandoned and the underlying tendencies are uprooted.
“This noble disciple reflects thus: I am not the only one who is subject to death, not exempt from death. All beings that come and go, that pass away and undergo rebirth, are subject to death; none are exempt from death’
He pursues this path, devel­ops it, and cultivates it.
As he does so, the fetters are entirely abandoned and the underlying tendencies are uprooted.
“This noble disciple reflects thus: T am not the only one who must be parted and separated from everyone and everyithing dear and agreeable. All beings that come and go, that pass away and undergo rebirth, must be parted and separated from everyone and everything dear and agreeable’
He pursues this path, develops it, and cultivates it.
As he does so, the fetters are entirely abandoned and the underlying tendencies are uprooted.
As he often reflects on this theme, the path is generated.
He pursues this path, devel­ops it, and cultivates it.
As he does so, the fetters are entirely abandoned and the underlying tendencies are uprooted.
“subject to illness,1061 old age, and death
“If I were to become disgusted with beings who have such a nature,
“While I was dwelling thus,having known the state without acquisitions,
Now I am incapable of indulging in sensual pleasures.
‘Relying on the spiritual life,never will I turn back.”
What five?
A woman or a man, a householder or one gone forth, should often reflect thus: ‘I am subject to illness; I am not exempt from illness.’
A woman or a man, a householder or one gone forth, should often reflect thus: ‘I must be parted and separated from every one and everything dear and agreeable to me’
‘I am the owner of my kamma, the heir of my kamma; I have kamma as my origin, kamma as my relative, kamma as my resort;
I will be the heir of whatever kamma, good or bad,that I do.’ A woman or a man, a householder or one gone forth, should often reflect thus .
As he often reflects on this theme, the path is generated.
As he often reflects on this theme, the path is generated.
As he often reflects on this theme, the path is generated.
“This noble disciple reflects thus: I am not the only one who is the owner of one’s kamma, the heir of one’s kamma; who has kamma as one’s origin, kamma as one’s relative, kamma as one’s resort; who will be the heir of whatever kamma, good or bad, that one does. All beings that come and go, that pass away and undergo rebirth, are owners of their kamma, heirs of their kamma; all have kamma as their origin, kamma as their relative, kamma as their resort; all will be heirs of whatever kamma, good or bad, that they do’
Worldlings are disgusted by other people who exist in accordance with their nature.
that would not,be proper for me since I too have the same nature.
“Zeal then arose in me as I clearly saw nibbana.
intoxication with health, with youth, and with life—
I overcame all intoxications— having seen security in renunciation.1062
“Bhikkhus, there are these four inversions of perception, inver­sions of mind, and inversions of view.729
The inversion of perception, mind, and view that takes the imper­manent to be permanent; the inversion of perception, mind, and view that takes what is suffering to be pleasurable;730 the inversion of perception, mind, and view that takes what is non-self to be self; the inversion of perception, mind, and view that takes what is unattractive to be attractive.
These are the four inversions of perception, mind, and view.”
There are, bhikkhus, these four non-inversions of percep­tion, non-inversions of mind, and non-inversions of view.
What four?
The non-inversion of perception, mind, and view that takes the impermanent to be impermanent; the non-inversion of perception, mind, and view that takes what is suffering to be suffering; the non-inversion of perception, mind, and view that takes w hat is non-self to be non-self; the non-inversion of perception, mind, and view that takes what is unattractive to be unattractive.
These are the four non-inversions of perception,mind, and view.”
Perceiving permanence in the impermanent,perceiving pleasure in what is suffering,
Such people are bound by the yoke of Mara,and do not reach security from bondage.
Beings continue in samsara, going to birth and death.
But when the Buddhas arise in the world, sending forth a brilliant light,
They have seen the impermanent as impermanent and what is suffering as suffering.
They have seen what is non-self as non-self and the unattractive as unattractive.
By the acquisition of right view, they have overcome all suffering.
What four?
perceiving a self in what is non-self, and perceiving attractiveness in what is unattractive,
beings resort to wrong views,731 their minds deranged, their perception twisted.
Having heard it, wise people have regained their sanity.
they reveal this Dhamma that leads to the stilling of suffering,
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at SavatthI in Jeta’s Grove, Anathapindika’s Park.
Now on that occasion the venerable Ananda was instructing, urging, rousing, and encouraging the bhikkhus with talk on the Dhamma in the assembly hall. He was reciting the summary and exposition of “One Who Has One Fortunate Attachment.”
Then, in the evening, the Blessed One rose from meditation and went to the assembly hall.
He sat down on a seat made ready and asked the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus, who has been instructing, urging, rousing, and encouraging the bhikkhus with talk on the Dhamma in the assembly hall? Who has been reciting the summary and exposition of ‘One Who has One Fortunate Attachment’?”
“It was the venerable Ananda, venerable sir.”
Then the Blessed One asked the venerable Ananda: “Ananda, how were you instructing, urging, rousing, and encouraging the bhikkhus with talk on the Dhamma, and reciting the summary and exposition of ‘One Who Has One Fortunate Attachment’?”
“I was doing so thus, venerable sir: ‘Let not a person revive the past… 
“I was instructing, urging, rousing, and encouraging the bhikkhus with talk on the Dhamma thus, and reciting the summary and exposition of ‘One Who Has One Fortunate Attachment’ thus.”
“Good, good, Ananda!
It is good that you were instructing, urging, rousing, and encouraging the bhikkhus with talk on the Dhamma thus, and reciting the summary and exposition of ‘One Who Has One Fortunate Attachment’ thus: 12-19.
That is what the Blessed One said.
The venerable Ananda was satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
THUS HAVE I HEARD.1209 On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Savatthl in Jeta’s Grove, Anathapindika’s Park.
There he addressed the bhikkhus thus: “Bhikkhus.”
- “Venerable sir,” they replied.
The Blessed One said this: 2. “Bhikkhus, I shall teach you the summary and exposition of ‘One Who Has One Fortunate Attachment.’1210
Listen and attend closely to what I shall say.”
- “Yes, venerable sir,” the bhikkhus replied.
The Blessed One said this:
“Let not a person revive the past Or on the future build his hopes;1211
For the past has been left behind And the future has not been reached.
Instead with insight let him see Each presently arisen state;1212
Let him know that and be sure of it, Invincibly, unshakeably.1213
Today the effort must be made; Tomorrow Death may come, who knows?
No bargain with Mortality Can keep him and his hordes away,
But one who dwells thus ardently, Relentlessly, by day, by night -
Thinking, ‘I had such material form in the past,’ one finds delight in that.1215 Thinking, ‘I had such feeling in the past,’…’I had such percep-tion in the past,’…’I had such formations in the past,’…’I had such consciousness in the past’ one finds delight in that. That is how one revives the past.
Thinking, ‘I had such material form in the past,’ one does not find delight in that.1216 Thinking, ‘I had such feeling in the past’…! had such perception in the past’…! had such formations in the past,’…! had such consciousness in the past’ one does not find delight in that. That is how one does not revive the past.
“And how, bhikkhus, does one build up hope upon the future?
Thinking, ‘I may have such material form in the future’ one finds delight in that. Thinking, ‘I may have such feeling in the future,’…’I may have such perception in the future’…! may have such formations in the future’…’I may have such consciousness in the future,’ one finds delight in that. That is how one builds up hope upon the future.
“And how, bhikkhus, does one not build up hope upon the future?
Thinking, ‘I may have such material form in the future’ one does not find delight in that. Thinking, ‘I may have such feeling in the future,’…’I may have such perception in the future,’…! may have such formations in the future’…! may have such consciousness in the future’ one does not find delight in that. That is how one does not build up hope upon the future.
“And how, bhikkhus, is one vanquished in regard to presently arisen states?
Here, bhikkhus, an untaught ordinary person, who has no regard for noble ones and is unskilled and undisciplined in fheir Dhamma, who has no regard for true men and is unskilled and undisciplined in their Dhamma, regards material form as self, or self as possessed of material form, or material form as in self, or self as in material form. He regards feeling as self…perception as self…formations as self …consciousness as self, or self as possessed of consciousness, or consciousness as in self, or self as in consciousness. That is how one is vanquished in regard to presently arisen states.
“And how, bhikkhus, is one invincible in regard to presently arisen states?
Here, bhikkhus, a well-taught noble disciple, who has regard for noble ones and is skilled and disciplined in their Dhamma, who has regard for true men and is skilled and disciplined in their Dhamma, does not regard material form as self’ or self as possessed of material form, or material form as in self’ or self as in material form. He does not regard feeling as self…perception as self…formations as self…consciousness as self, or self as possessed of consciousness, or consciousness as in self, or self as in consciousness. That is how one is invincible in regard to presently arisen states.
“Let not a person revive the past…
“So it was with reference to this that it was said: ‘Bhikkhus, I shall teach you the summary and exposition of “One Who Has One Fortunate Attachment”
The bhikkhus were satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Savatthi in Jeta’s Grove, Anathapindika’s Park.
There he addressed the bhikkhus thus: “Bhikkhus.”
- “Venerable sir,” they replied.
The Blessed One said this:
“Bhikkhus, suppose there were two houses with doors and a man with good sight standing there between them saw people going in and coming out and passing to and fro. So too, with the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, I see beings passing away and reappearing, inferior and superior, fair and ugly, fortunate and unfortunate. I understand how beings pass on according to their actions thus: ‘These worthy beings who were well-conducted in body, speech, and mind, not revilers of noble ones, right in their views, giving effect to right views in their actions, on the dissolution of the body, after death, have reappeared in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world.
Or these Worthy beings who were well-conducted in body, speech, and mind, not revilers of noble ones, right in their views, giving effect to right views in their actions, on the dissolution of the body, after death, have reappeared among human beings.
But these worthy beings who were ill-conducted in body, speech, and mind, revilers of noble ones, wrong in their views, giving effect to wrong views in their actions, on the dissolution of the body, after death, have reappeared in the realm of ghosts.
Or these worthy beings who were ill-conducted… on the dissolution of the body, after death, have reappeared in the animal world.
Or these worthy beings who were ill-conducted… on the dissolution of the body, after death, have reappeared in a state of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, even in hell.’
“Now the wardens of hell seize such a being by the arms and present him to King Yama,1206 saying: ‘Sire, this man has ill-treated his mother, ill-treated his father, ill-treated recluses, ill-treated brahmins; he has had no respect for the elders of his clan.
Let the king order his punishment.’
“Then King Yama presses and questions and cross-questions him about the first divine messenger: ‘Good man, did you not see the first divine messenger to appear in the world?” 1207
He says: ‘I did not, venerable sir.’
Then King Yama says: ‘Good man, have you never seen in the world a young tender infant lying prone, fouled in his own excrement and urine?”
He says: ‘I have, venerable sir.’
“Then King Yama says: ‘Good man, did it never occur to you - an intelligent and mature man - “I too am subject to birth, I am not exempt from birth:
He says: ‘I was unable, venerable sir, I was negligent.’
Then King Yama says: ‘Good man, through negligence you have failed to do good by body, speech, and mind.
Certainly they will deal with you according to your negligence.
But this evil action of yours was not done by your mother or your father, or by your brother or your sister, or by your friends and companions, or by your kinsmen and relatives, or by recluses and brahmins, or by gods: this evil action was done by you yourself, and you yourself will experience its result.’
“Then, after pressing and questioning and cross-questioning him about the first divine messenger, King Yama presses and questions and cross-questions him about the second divine messenger: ‘Good man, did you not see the second divine messenger to appear in the world?”
He says: ‘I did not, venerable sir’.
Then King Yama says: ‘Good man, have you never seen in the world a man - or a woman - at eighty, ninety, or a hundred years, aged, as crooked as a roof bracket, doubled up, supported by a walking stick, tottering, frail, youth gone, teeth broken, grey-haired, scanty-haired, bald, wrinkled, with limbs all blotchy?”
He says: ‘I have, venerable sir.’
“Then King Yama says: ‘Good man, did it never occur to you - an intelligent and mature man - “I too am subject to ageing, I am not exempt from ageing:
He says: ‘I was unable, venerable sir, I was negligent.’
Then King Yama says: ‘Good man, through negligence you have failed to do good by body, speech, and mind.
Certainly they will deal with you according to your negligence.
But this evil action of yours was not done by your mother…or by gods: this evil action was done by you yourself, and you yourself will experience its result.’
“Then, after pressing and questioning and cross-questioning him about the second divine messenger, King Yama presses and questions and cross-questions him about the third divine messenger: ‘Good man, did you not see the third divine messenger to appear in the world?”
He says: ‘I did not, venerable sir.’
Then King Yama says: ‘Good man, have you never seen in the world a man - or a woman - afflicted, suffering, and gravely ill, lying fouled in his own excrement and urine, lifted up by some and set down by others?”
He says: ‘I have, venerable sir.’
“Then King Yama says: ‘Good man, did it never occur to you - an intelligent and mature man - “I too am subject to sickness, I am not exempt from sickness:
He says: ‘I was unable, venerable sir, I was negligent.’
Then King Yama says: ‘Good man, through negligence you have failed to do good by body, speech, and mind.
Certainly they will deal with you according to your negligence.
But this evil action of yours was not done by your mother…or by gods: this evil action was done by you yourself, and you yourself will experience its result.’
“Then, after pressing and questioning and cross-questioning him about the third divine messenger, King Yama presses and questions and cross-questions him about the fourth divine messenger: ‘Good man, did you not see the fourth divine messenger to appear in the world?”
He says: ‘I did not, venerable sir.’
Then King Yama says: ‘Good man, have you never seen in the world, when a robber culprit is caught, kings having many kinds of tortures inflicted on him: having him flogged with whips……and having his head cut off with a sword?”
He says: ‘I have, venerable sir.’
“Then King Yama says: ‘Good man, did it never occur to you - an intelligent and mature man - “Those who do evil actions have such tortures of various kinds inflicted on them here and now; so what in the hereafter?
Surely I had better do good by body, speech, and mind”?”
He says: ‘I was unable, venerable sir, I was negligent.’
Then King Yama says: ‘Good man, through negligence you have failed to do good by body, speech, and mind.
Certainly they will deal with you according to your negligence.
But this evil action of yours was not done by your mother…or by gods: this evil action was done by you yourself, and you yourself will experience its result.’
“Then, after pressing and questioning and cross-questioning him about the fourth divine messenger, King Yama presses and questions and cross-questions him about the fifth divine messenger: ‘Good man, did you not see the fifth divine messenger to appear in the world?”
He says: ‘I did not, venerable sir.’
Then Bang Yama says: ‘Good man, have you never seen in the world a man - or a woman - one-day dead, two-days dead, three-days dead, bloated, livid, and oozing with matter?”
He says: ‘I have, venerable sir.’
“Then King Yama says: ‘Good man, did it never occur to you - an intelligent and mature man - “I too am subject to death, I am not exempt from death:
He says: ‘I was unable, venerable sir, I was negligent.’
Then King Yama says: ‘Good man, through negligence you have failed to do good by body, speech, and mind.
Certainly they will deal with you according to your negligence.
But this evil action of yours was not done by your mother…or by gods: this evil action was done by you yourself, and you yourself will experience its result.’
“Then, after pressing and questioning and cross-questioning him about the fifth divine messenger, King Yama is silent.
“Now the wardens of hell torture him with the five-fold transfixing.1208 They drive a red-hot iron stake through one hand, they drive a red-hot iron stake through the other hand, they drive a red-hot iron stake through one foot, they drive a red-hot iron stake through the other foot, they drive a red-hot iron stake through his belly.
There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings. Yet he does not die so long as that evil action has not exhausted its result.
“Next the wardens of hell throw him down and pare him with axes. There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings. Yet he does not die so long as that evil action has not exhausted its result. 12. “Next the wardens of hell set him with his feet up and his head down and pare him with adzes. There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings. Yet he does not die so long as that evil action has not exhausted its result. 13. “Next the wardens of hell harness him to a chariot and drive him back and forth across burning ground, blazing and glowing. There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings. Yet he does not die so long as that evil action has not exhausted its result. 14. “Next the wardens of hell make him climb up and down a great mound of burning coals, blazing and glowing. There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings. Yet he does not die so long as that evil action has not exhausted its result. 15. “Next the wardens of hell take him feet up and head down and plunge him into a red-hot metal cauldron, burning, blazing, and glowing.
He is cooked there in a swirl of froth.
And as he is being cooked there in a swirl of froth, he is swept now up, now down, and now across.
There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings. Yet he does not die so long as that evil action has not exhausted its result.
“Next the wardens of hell throw him into the Great Hell.
Now as to that Great Hell, bhikkhus:
Its floor as well is made of iron And heated till it glows with fire.
The range is a full hundred leagues Which it covers ail-pervasively.
“Now the flames that surge out from the Great Hell’s eastern wall dash against its western wall. The flames that surge out from its western wall dash against its eastern wall. The flames that surge out from its northern wall dash against its southern wall. The flames that surge out from its southern wall dash against its northern wall. The flames that dash out from the bottom dash against the top. And the flames that surge out from the top dash against the bottom.
There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings. Yet he does not die so long as that evil action has not exhausted its result.
“Some time or other, bhikkhus, at the end of a long period, there comes an occasion when the Great Hell’s eastern door is opened.
He rims towards it, treading quickly.
As he does so, his outer skin burns, his inner skin burns, his flesh burns, his sinews burn, his bones turn to smoke; and it is the same when his foot is uplifted.
When at long last he reaches the door, then it is shut.
There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings. Yet he does not die so long as that evil action has not exhausted its result.
“Some time or other, at the end of a long period, there comes an occasion when the Great Hell’s western door is opened… when its northern door is opened…when its southern door is opened.
He runs towards it, treading quickly…
There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings. Yet he does not die so long as that evil action has not exhausted its result.
“Some time or other, bhikkhus, at the end of a long period, there comes an occasion when the Great Hell’s eastern door is opened.
He rims towards it, treading quickly.
As he does so, his outer skin burns, his inner skin burns, his flesh burns, his sinews burn, his bones turn to smoke; and it is the same when his foot is uplifted.
He comes out by that door.
“Immediately next to the Great Hell is the vast Hell of Excrement.
He falls into that.
In that Hell of Excrement needle-mouthed creatures bore through his outer skin and bore through his inner skin and bore through his flesh arid bore through his sinews and bore through his bones and devour his marrow.
There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings. Yet he does not die so long as that evil action has not exhausted its result.
“Immediately next to the Hell of Excrement is the vast Hell of Hot Embers.
He falls into that.
There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings. Yet he does not die so long as that evil action has not exhausted its result.
“Immediately next to the Hell of Hot Embers is the vast Wood of Simbali Trees, a league high, bristling with thorns sixteen finger-breadths long, burning, blazing, and glowing.
They make him climb up and down those trees.
There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings. Yet he does not die so long as that evil action has not exhausted its result.
“Immediately next to the Wood of Simbali Trees is a vast Wood of Sword-leaf Trees.
He goes into that.
The leaves, stirred by the wind, cut off his hands and cut off his feet and cut off his hands and feet; they cut off his ears and cut off his nose and cut off his ears and nose.
There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings. Yet he does not die so long as that evil action has not exhausted its result.
“Immediately next to the Wood of Sword-leaf Trees is a great river of caustic water.
He falls into that.
There he is swept upstream and he is swept downstream and he is swept upstream and downstream.
There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings. Yet he does not die so long as that evil action has not exhausted its result.
“Next the wardens of hell pull him out with a hook, and setting him on the ground, they ask him: ‘Good man, what do you want?”
He says: ‘I am hungry, venerable sirs.’
Then the wardens of hell prise open his mouth with red-hot iron tongs, burning, blazing, and glowing, and they throw into his mouth a red-hot metal ball, burning, blazing, and glowing.
It burns his lips, it burns his mouth, it burns his throat, it burns his stomach, and it passes out below carrying with it his large and small intestines.
There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings. Yet he does not die so long as that evil action has not exhausted its result.
“Next the wardens of hell ask him: ‘Good man, what do you want?”
He says: ‘I am thirsty, venerable sirs.’
Then the wardens of hell prise open his mouth with red-hot iron tongs, burning, blazing, and glowing, and they pour into his mouth molten copper, burning, blazing, and glowing.
It burns his lips, it burns his mouth, it burns his throat, it burns his stomach, and it passes out below carrying with it his large and small intestines.
There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings. Yet he does not die so long as that evil action has not exhausted its result.
“Then the wardens of hell throw him back again into the Great Hell.
“It has happened that King Yama thought: ‘Those in the world who do evil unwholesome actions indeed have all these many kinds of tortures inflicted on them.
Oh, that I might attain the human state,
that a Tathagata, accomplished and fully enlightened, might appear in the world,
“Bhikkhus, I tell you this not as something I heard from another recluse or brahmin. I tell you this as something that I have actually known, seen, and discovered by myself.”
That is what the Blessed One said.
When the Sublime One had said that, the Teacher said further:
But when by the divine messengers Good people here in this life are warned,
Clinging they look upon with fear For it produces birth and death;
They dwell in bliss for they are safe And reach Nibbana here and now.
They are beyond all fear and hate; They have escaped all suffering.”
then he is satisfied with it.
he understands thus: ‘This painful feeling born of ear-contact has arisen in me.
That is dependent, not independent.
Dependent on what?
Dependent on contact.’
Then he sees that contact is impermanent, that feeling is impermanent, that perception is impermanent, that formations are impermanent, and that consciousness is impermanent.
And his mind, having made an element its objective support, enters into that new objective support and acquires confidence, steadiness, and resolution.
“Now, if others attack that bhikkhu in ways that are unwished for, undesired, and disagreeable, by contact with fists, clods, sticks, or knives,
he understands thus: ‘This body is of such a nature that contact with fists, clods, sticks, and knives assail it.
Вut this has been said by the Blessed One in his “advice on the simile of the saw”: “Bhikkhus, even if bandits were to sever you savagely limb by limb with a two-handled saw,
he who gave rise to a mind of hate towards them would not be carrying out my teaching.”
So tireless energy shall be aroused in me and unremitting mindfulness established, my body shall be tranquil and untroubled, my mind concentrated and unified.
And now let contact with fists, clods, sticks, and knives assail this body;
for this teaching of the Buddhas is being practised by me.’
“When that bhikkhu thus recollects the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Sangha, if equanimity supported by the wholesome does not become established in him,
then he arouses a sense of urgency thus: ‘It is a loss for me, it is no gain for me, it is bad for me, it is no good for me,
that when I thus recollect the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Sangha, equanimity supported by the wholesome does not become established in me.’
Just as when a daughter-in-law sees her father-in-law, she arouses a sense of urgency to please him, so too, when that bhikkhu thus recollects the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Sangha, if equanimity supported by the wholesome does not become established in him,
But if, when he recollects the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Sangha, equanimity supported by the wholesome becomes established in him, then he is satisfied with it.
then he arouses a sense of urgency: ‘It is a loss for me, it is no gain for me, it is bad for me, it is no good for me,
that when I thus recollect the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Sangha, equanimity supported by the wholesome does not become established in me.’
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Jetavana with reference to Elder Attadattha.
For when the Teacher was about to pass into Nibbāna, he said to his disciples, “Monks, four months hence I shall pass into Nibbāna.” Thereupon seven hundred monks who had not yet attained the Fruit of Conversion were deeply moved, and never leaving the Teacher’s side, whispered to each other, “Brethren, what are we to do?”
But Elder Attadattha thought to himself, “The Teacher says that four months hence he is to pass into Nibbāna. Now I have not yet freed myself from the power of the evil passions. Therefore so long as the Teacher yet remains alive, I will strive with all my might for the attainment of Arahatship.”
Accordingly Elder Attadattha went no more with the monks.
Now the monks said to him, “Brother, why is it that you thus avoid our company and no more talk with us?” And conducting Elder Attadattha to the Teacher, they laid the matter before him, saying, “Reverend Sir, this Elder does thus and so.”
The Teacher asked Elder Attadattha, “Why do you act thus?” The Elder replied, “Reverend Sir, you have said that four months hence you are to pass into Nibbāna; and I have determined that so long as you yet remain alive, I will strive with all my might for the attainment of Arahatship.”
The Teacher applauded him for his wise decision and said to the monks, “Monks, whosoever sincerely loves me should be like Elder Attadattha.
For truly they honor me not who honor me with perfumes and garlands. They only honor me who fulfill the higher and the lower Law;
therefore others also should follow the example of Elder Attadattha.” So saying, he pronounced the following Stanza,
Let a man not neglect his own good for the good of another, however important
A man should learn what is good for himself and apply himself thereto with diligence.
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Jetavana with reference to the lay disciple Culla Kāla.
For on a certain day, just as in the story of Mahā Kāla, tunnel thieves were pursued by the owners of the stolen property. Now early in the morning the lay disciple Culla Kāla, who had spent the night at the monastery listening to the Law, came out of the monastery and set out on the road to Sāvatthi. The thieves threw down the stolen property in front of that lay disciple and continued their flight.
When the men pursuing the thieves saw the lay disciple, they cried out, “There is the man who played thief last night, acting as though he had been listening to the Law. Catch him!” So saying, they seized the lay disciple and beat him.
Now some courtezans, on their way to the bathing-place on the river, saw the lay disciple and said to his captors, “Sirs, go your way; this man did nothing of the sort.” So saying, they obtained his release.
Thereupon the lay disciple went to the monastery and told the monks what had happened, saying, “Reverend Sirs, I should have been killed by some men, had not some courtezans saved my life.”
The monks repeated the story to the Tathāgata.
The Teacher listened to the story and said, “Monks, the lay disciple Culla Kāla’s life was indeed saved, both through the intercession of courtezans and because he was himself guiltless.
For living beings here in the world, by reason of the evil deeds which they themselves commit, of themselves suffer in hell and in the other states of suffering.
By self alone is evil done, by self alone does one suffer.
By self alone is evil left undone, by self alone does one obtain Salvation.
Salvation and Perdition depend upon self; no man can save another.
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Jetavana with reference to the mother of Elder Kumāra Kassapa.
The story goes that she was the daughter of a treasurer in the city of Rājagaha. From the time she reached the age of reason, she sought permission to become a nun,
but although she asked her mother and father again and again, she failed to obtain from them permission to enter the Order. On reaching marriageable age, she married, went to live in her husband’s household, and amid the cares of the household life proved a devoted wife.
Now in no long time she conceived a child in her womb.
But she knew not that she was pregnant. Winning the favor of her husband, she asked to enter the Order and obtained his permission to do so.
So, not knowing that she was pregnant, he conducted her with great pomp to the community of nuns, and obtained for her admission to the Order at the hands of the nuns belonging to the faction of Devadatta.
After a time the nuns observed that she was pregnant. Said they, “What does this mean?” She replied, “Noble sisters, I know not what this may mean, but this I know for certain, that my chastity is unimpaired.”
So the nuns conducted her to Devadatta, and said to him, “This nun retired from the world through faith. We know not when she conceived this child. What, therefore, shall we do?”
Devadatta thought only, “Let not reproach be cast upon the nuns who receive instruction from me.” Therefore he said, “Expel her from the Order.”
When the young nun heard those words of Devadatta, she said, “Noble sisters, do not ruin me. But I did not retire from the world at the instance of Devadatta. Come, conduct me to the Teacher at Jetavana.”
Accordingly they took her with them, went to Jetavana, and laid the matter before the Teacher.
Now, although the Teacher knew that she had conceived the child when she was living in the world, yet, for the purpose of disproving the false accusation, he summoned King Pasenadi Kosala, Mahā Anāthapiṇḍika, Culla Anāthapiṇḍika, Visākhā the female lay disciple, and other great personages, giving the following orders to the Elder Upāli, “Go clear this young woman of the charge against her in the midst of the Fourfold Assembly.”
The Elder caused Visākhā to be summoned before the king and put the case in her hands.
Visākhā caused a curtain to be drawn about the young woman, and within the curtain made an examination of her hands, feet, navel, belly, and extremities. Then she computed the months and days, and perceiving that the young woman had conceived the child when she was living in the world, informed the Elder of that fact.
Thereupon the Elder proclaimed her innocence in the midst of the Fourfold Assembly.
After a time she brought forth a son, strong and mighty, for whom she had prayed at the feet of the Buddha Padumuttara.
Now one day, as the king was passing near the community of nuns, he heard the cry of a child. “What is that?” he asked. “Your majesty,” they replied,“a certain nun has given birth to a child; that is the sound of his voice. So the king took the boy to his own house and committed him to the care of his daughters.
On the day appointed for the naming of the child, they gave him the name Kassapa. But because he had been brought up in princely state all the people called him Prince Kassapa, Kumāra Kassapa
One day on the playground he struck some boys. They cried out, “We have been struck by that Motherless-Fatherless.” Kassapa immediately ran to the king and said to him, “Your majesty, they say I have neither mother nor father; tell me who my mother is.” The king pointed to his daughters and said, “There are your mothers.” But the boy replied, “I have not so many mothers as that; by right I should have only one mother; tell me who she is.”
The king thought to himself, “It is impossible to deceive this boy.” So he said to him, “Dear boy, your mother is a nun, and I brought you here from the nuns’ convent.”
No more than this was needed to arouse deep emotion in the heart of the boy. He immediately said, “Dear friend, obtain for me admission to the Order.”
“Very well, dear boy,” replied the king. So with great pomp he conducted the boy to the Teacher and had him admitted to the Order.
After he had made his full profession he became known as Elder Kumāra Kassapa.
Receiving a Subject of Meditation from the Teacher, he retired to the forest. But although he strove and struggled with might and main, he was unable to develop Specific Attainment. So, thinking to himself, “I will obtain a Subject of Meditation from the Teacher better suited to my needs,” he returned to the Teacher and took up his residence in Andha Grove.
Now a monk who, in the time of the Buddha Kassapa, had performed his meditations alone and had attained the Fruit of the Third Path, and had been reborn in the World of Brahmā returned from the World of Brahmā, and asked Kumāra Kassapa fifteen questions, but sent him away with the words: “None other than the Teacher can resolve these questions. Go to the Teacher and get their solution.”
Kumāra Kassapa did so, and at the end of the answers to the questions attained Arahatship.
Now for twelve years following Kassapa’s retirement from the world, tears streamed from the eyes of the nun his mother.
With face wet with the tears she shed because of the suffering caused her by separation from her son, she went on her rounds for alms. One day she saw her son the Elder in the street. Crying out, “My son! my son!” she ran to meet him, and falling at his feet, rolled on the ground.
Milk streamed from her breasts, and her robe was wet, as she rose from the ground and took the Elder in her arms.
The Elder thought to himself, “If she receives kindly words from me, it will mean her undoing;
therefore I will speak harshly to her.”
So he said to her, “What are you about? Can you not away with human affection?”
Thought the mother, “How like a brigand he talks!” And she said to him, “Dear son, what say you?” But he only repeated again the same harsh words. Thereupon she thought, “Ah, because of him I have not been able to restrain my tears for twelve years! But he has hardened his heart towards me; why should I have anything to do with him any more?” And then and there, uprooting affection for her son, on that very day she attained Arahatship.
Some time afterwards the monks began a discussion in the Hall of Truth: “Devadatta all but destroyed Kumāra Kassapa, endowed with the faculties requisite for Conversion, and the nun his mother;but the Teacher became their refuge. Oh, how great is the compassion of the Buddhas for the world!”
At that moment the Teacher approached and asked them, “Monks, what subject are you discussing now, as you sit here all gathered together?” When they told him, he said, “Monks, this is not the first time I have been their refuge and defense. I was their refuge in a previous state of existence also.” So saying, he related the Nigrodha Jātaka in detail:
Follow only the Banyan deer; abide not with the Branch.
Better death with the Banyan deer than life with the Branch.
Then said the Teacher, identifying the characters in the Jātaka, “At that time the Branch deer was Devadatta, and the herd of the Branch deer was the retinue of Devadatta; the doe that reached her turn was the nun; her fawn was Kumāra Kassapa; and the Banyan deer, the king of the deer, who offered his life for the doe with young, was I myself.” And praising the nun for uprooting affection for her son and for establishing herself as a refuge for herself, he said, “Monks, inasmuch as the goal of heaven or the goal of the Paths which one man has earned for himself cannot become the property of another, therefore self is the refuge of self. How can one man be the refuge of another?” So saying, he pronounced the following Stanza,
For by his own well-tamed self A man gains for himself a refuge which is hard to gain.
For self is the refuge of self. Indeed, how can one man be the refuge of another?
It is he, the Peaceful Sage has said,1214 Who has one fortunate attachment.
“How, bhikkhus, does one revive the past?
“And how, bhikkhus, does one not revive the past?
At Savatthi.
“Bhikkhus, form is impermanent.
The cause and condition for the arising of form is also impermanent.
As form has originated from what is impermanent, how could it be permanent?
“Feeling is impermanent….
Perception is impermanent…. Volitional formations are impermanent….
Consciousness is impermanent.
The cause and condition for the arising of consciousness is also impermanent.
As consciousness has originated from what is impermanent, how could it be permanent?
“Seeing thus… He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.” ‘
At Sgvatthi.
Then a certain bhikkhu … Sitting to one side, that bhikkhu said to the Blessed One: “Venerable sir, is there any form that is permanent, stable, eternal, not subject to change, and that will remain the same just like eternity itself?
Is there, venerable sir, any feeling…
any perception…any volitional formations…
“Bhikkhu, there is no form that is permanent, stable, eternal, not subject to change, and that will remain the same just like eternity itself.
There is no feeling… no perception… no volitional formations… no consciousness that is permanent, stable, eternal, not subject to change, and that will remain the same just like eternity itself.”
Then the Blessed One took up a little lump of cowdung in his hand and said to that bhikkhu: “Bhikkhu, there is not even this much individual existence that is permanent, stable, eternal, not subject to change, and that will remain the same just like eternity itself.
If there was this much individual existence that was permanent, stable, eternal, not subject to change, this living of the holy life for the complete destruction of suffering could not be discerned.198
“In the past, bhikkhu, I was a head-anointed khattiya king.199
I had 84,000 palaces, the chief of which was the palace named Dhamma.
I had 84,000 halls with peaked roofs, the chief of which was the hall named the Great Array.
I had 84,000 couches made of ivory, of heartwood, of gold and silver, decked with long- haired coverlets, embroidered with flowers, with choice spreads made of antelope hides, with red awnings overhead and red cushions at both ends.
“I had 84,000 bull elephants with golden ornaments and golden banners, covered with nets of golden thread, the chief of which was the royal bull elephant named Uposatha.200
I had 84,000 chariots with golden ornaments and golden banners, covered with nets of golden thread, the chief of which was the chariot named Vejayanta.
“I had 84,000 jewels, the chief of which was the jewel-gem.
I had 84,000 women, the chief of whom was Queen Subhadda.
I had 84,000 vassals of the khattiya caste, the chief of whom was the commander-gem.
I had 84,000 cows with tethers of fine jute and milk pails of bronze.
I had 84,000 kotis of garments made of fine linen, of fine silk, of fine wool, of fine cotton.
I had 84,000 plates on which my meals were served both in the morning and in the evening.
“Of those 84,000 cities,201 bhikkhu, there was only one city in which I resided at that time: the capital Kusavati.
Of those 84,000 palaces, there was only one palace in which I resided at that time: the palace named Dhamma.
Of those 84,000 halls with peaked roof, there was only one hall with peaked roof in which I resided at that time: the hall named the Great Array.
Of those 84,000 couches, there was only one couch that I used at that time, one made either of ivory or of heartwood or of gold or of silver.
“Of those 84,000 elephants, there was only one elephant that I rode at that time, the royal bull elephant named Uposatha.
Of those 84,000 steeds, there was only one steed that I rode at thal time, the royal steed named Valahaka.
Of those 84,000 chariots, there was only one chariot that I rode in at that time, the charioi named Vejayanta.
“Of those 84,000 women, there was only one woman who waited on me at that time, either a khattiya maiden or a velamika maiden.202
Of those 84,000 plates, there was only one plate from which I ate at most a measure of rice with a suitable curry.
“Thus, bhikkhu, all those formations have passed, ceased, changed.
So impermanent are formations, bhikkhu,
so unstable,
any consciousness that is permanent, stable, eternal, not subject to change, and that will remain the same just like eternity itself?”
But because there is not even this much individual existence that is permanent, stable, eternal, not subject to change, this living of the holy life for the complete destruction of suffering is discerned.
I had 84,000 cities, the chief of which was the capital Kusavati.
I had 84,000 steeds with golden ornaments and golden banners, covered with nets of golden thread, the chief of which was the royal steed named Valghaka.
Of those 84,000 kotis of garments, there was only one pair of garments that I wore at that time, one made either of fine linen or of fine silk or of fine wool or of fine cotton.
It is enough, bhikkhu, to feel revulsion towards all formations, enough to become dispassionate towards them, enough to be liberated from them.”
so unreliable.
Who has one fortunate attachment.
That is what the Blessed One said.
Who has one fortunate attachment.’
“Let not a person revive the past… 
Who has one fortunate attachment.”
Thus have I heard.660 On one occasion the Blessed One was dwelling at Saketa, at Kalaka’s Park.661
“Venerable sir! “ those bhikkhus replied.
The Blessed One said this:
“Bhikkhus, in this world with its devas, Mara, and Brahma, among this population with its ascetics and brahmins, its devas and humans, whatever is seen, heard, sensed, cognized, reached, sought after, examined by the mind.— that I know.
“Bhikkhus..in this world with its devas, Mara, and Brahma, among this population with its ascetics and brahmins, its devas and humans, whatever is seen, heard, sensed, cognized, reached, sought after, examined by the mind— that I have directly known.
It has been known by the Tathagata,662 but the Tathagata did not become subservient to it.663
“Bhikkhus, if I were to say, ‘In this world with its devas … whatever is seen, heard, sensed, cognized, reached, sought after, examined by the mind— that I both know and do not know’ that too would be just the same.664
“So, having seen what can be seen, the Tathagata does not misconceive the seen, does not misconceive the unseen, does not misconceive what can be seen, does not misconceive one who sees.666 Having heard what can be heard, he does not misconceive the heard, does not misconceive the unheard, does not misconceive what can be heard, does not misconceive one who hears. Having sensed what can be sensed, he does not misconceive the sensed, does not misconceive the unsensed, does not misconceive what can be sensed, does not misconceive one who senses. Having cognized what can be cognized, he does not misconceive the cognized, does not misconceive the uncognized, does not misconceive what can be cognized, does not misconceive one who cognizes.”
Thus, bhikkhus, being ever stable among things seen, heard,sensed, and cognized, the Tathagata is a stable one.667
heard, or sensed,clung to
Since they have already seen this dart669
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus!”
“Bhikkhus, if I were to say, ‘In this world with its devas … whatever is seen, heard, sensed, cognized, reached, sought after, examined by the mind— that I do not know’ that would be a falsehood on my part.
“Bhikkhus, if I were to say’ ‘In this world with its devas …whatever is seen, heard, sensed, cognized, reached, sought after, examined by the mind - that I neither know nor do not know’ that would be a fault on my part.665
the Tathagatas cling to nothing.
saying “I know, I see, it is just so”
to which people cling and adhere,
Amid those who are self-constrained, the Stable One
would not posit as categorically true or false anything seen
and considered truth by others.668
And, I say, there is no stable one more excellent or sublime than that stable one.”
On one occasion the Blessed One was dwelling at Savatthi in Jeta’s Grove, Anathapindika’s Park.
Now on that occasion, after their meal, on returning from their alms round, a number of bhikkhus had assembled in the assembly hall and were sitting together engaging in various kinds of pointless talk, that is: talk about kings, thieves, and ministers of state; talk about armies,perils, and wars; talk about food, drink, garments, and beds;talk about garlands and scents; talk about relatives, vehicles,villages, towns, cities, and countries; talk about women and talk about heroes; street talk and talk by the well; talk about the departed; miscellaneous talk; speculation about the world and the sea; talk about becoming this or that.
Then, in the evening, the Blessed One emerged from seclu­sion and went to the assembly hall, where he sat down on the prepared seat.
The Blessed One then addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus, what discussion were you engaged in just now as you were sitting together here? What was the conversation that was underway?
“‘Here, Bhante, after our meal, on returning from our alms round, we assembled in the assembly hall and were sitting together engaging in various kinds of pointless talk, that is:talk about kings, thieves, and ministers of state … talk about becoming this or that.”
“Bhikkhus, it is not suitable for you, clansmen who have gone forth from the household life into homelessness out of faith, to engage in various kinds of pointless talk, that is: talk about kings, thieves, and ministers of state… talk about becom­ing this or that.”
There are, bhikkhus, these ten topics of discussion.
What ten?
Talk on fewness of desires, on contentment, on solitude,on not being bound up with others, on arousing energy, on virtuous behavior, on concentration, on wisdom, on liberation,on knowledge and vision of liberation. These are the ten topics of discussion.”
If, bhikkhus, you engage in discussion on any of these ten topics, your splendor might surpass even the splendor of the sun and moon, as powerful and mighty as they are, how much more then that of the wanderers of other sects! “
Thus have I heard. On one occasion the Blessed One was dwelling at Savatthi in Jeta’s Grove, Anathapindika’s Park…. “Bhikkhus, the uninstructed worldling153 might experience revulsion towards this body composed of the four great elements; he might become dispassionate towards it and be liberated from it.
For what reason? Because growth and decline is seen in this body composed of the four great elements, it is seen being taken up and laid aside.
Therefore the uninstructed worldling might experience revulsion towards this body composed of the four great elements; he might become dispassionate towards it and be liberated from it.
“But, bhikkhus, as to that which is called ‘mind’ and ‘mentality’ and ‘consciousness’- the uninstructed worldling is unable to experience revulsion towards it, unable to become dispassionate towards it and be liberated from it.
For what reason?
Because for a long time this has been held to by him, appropriated, and grasped thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self.’155
Therefore the uninstructed worldling is unable to experience revulsion towards it, unable to become dispassionate towards it and be liberated from it.
“It would be better, bhikkhus, for the uninstructed worldling to take as self this body composed of the four great elements rather than the mind.
For what reason?
Because this body composed of the four great elements is seen standing for one year, for two years, for three, four, five, or ten years, for twenty, thirty, forty, or fifty years, for a hundred years, or even longer.156
Just as a monkey roaming through a forest grabs hold of one branch, lets that go and grabs another, then lets that go and grabs still another, so too that which is called ‘mind’ and ‘mentality’ and ‘consciousness’ arises as one thing and ceases as another by day and by night.157
“Therein, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple attends closely and carefully to dependent origination itself thus:158 ‘When this exists, that comes to be; with the arising of this, that arises. When this does not exist, that does not come to be; with the cessation of this, that ceases. That is, with ignorance as condition, volitional formations come to be; with volitional formations as condition, consciousness…. Such is the origin of this whole mass of suffering.
But with the remainderless fading away and cessation of ignorance comes cessation of volitional formations; with the cessation of volitional formations, cessation of consciousness…. Such is the cessation of this whole mass of suffering.
“Seeing thus, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple experiences revulsion towards form, revulsion towards feeling, revulsion towards perception, revulsion towards volitional formations, revulsion towards consciousness. Experiencing revulsion, he becomes dispassionate. Through dispassion his mind is liberated. When it is liberated there comes the knowledge: ‘It’s liberated.’
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.” ‘
But that which is called ‘mind’ and ‘mentality’ and ‘consciousness’ arises as one thing and ceases as another by day and by night.
Then, in the evening, the Venerable Bhtimija emerged from seclusion and approached the Venerable Sariputta.75 He exchanged greetings with the Venerable Sariputta
some ascetics and brahmins, proponents of kamma, maintain that pleasure and pain are created both by oneself and by another;
Now, friend Sariputta, what does the Blessed One say about this? What does he teach? How should we answer if we are to state what has been said by the Blessed One and not misrepresent him with what is contrary to fact? And how should we explain in accordance with the Dhamma so that no reasonable consequence of our assertion would give ground for criticism?”
“Friend, the Blessed One has said that pleasure and pain are dependently arisen.
Dependent on what?
Dependent on contact.
If one were to speak thus one would be stating what has been said by the Blessed One and would not misrepresent him with what is contrary to fact; one would explain in accordance with the Dhamma, and no reasonable consequence of one’s assertion would give ground for criticism.
“Therein, friend, in the case of those ascetics and brahmins, proponents of kamma, who maintain that pleasure and pain are created by oneself,
“Therein, friends, in the case of those ascetics and brahmins, proponents of kamma, who maintain that pleasure and pain are created by oneself,
 The Venerable handa heard this conversation between the Venerable Sariputta and the Venerable Bhumija.
He then approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side,
and reported to the Blessed One the entire conversation between the Venerable Sariputta and the Venerable Bhumija.
The Blessed One said: “Good, good, Ananda! Anyone answering rightly would answer just as Sariputta has done.
I have said, ananda, that pleasure and pain are dependently arisen.
Dependent on what?
Dependent on contact.
If one were to speak thus one would be stating what has been said by me and would not misrepresent me with what is contrary to fact; one would explain in accordance with the Dhamma, and no reasonable consequence of one’s assertion would give ground for criticism.
“Therein, ananda, in the case of those ascetics and brahmins, proponents of kamma, who maintain that pleasure and pain are created by oneself …
and those who maintain that pleasure and pain have arisen fortuitously… in each case that is conditioned by contact.
“Therein, ananda, in the case of those ascetics and brahmins, proponents of kamma, who maintain that pleasure and pain are created by oneself …
and those who maintain that pleasure and pain have arisen fortuitously… in each case it is impossible that they will experience anything without contact.
 “Ananda, when there is the body, because of bodily volition pleasure and pain arise internally;
Either deliberately, handa, one generates that bodily volitional formation conditioned by which pleasure and pain arise internally;
Either deliberately, Ananda, one generates that verbal volitional formation conditioned by which pleasure and pain arise internally; or undeliberately one generates that verbal volitional formation conditioned by which pleasure and pain arise internally.
“Either on one’s own initiative, handa, one generates that mental volitional formation79 conditioned by which pleasure and pain arise internally;
Either deliberately, handa, one generates that mental volitional formation conditioned by which pleasure and pain arise internally; or undeliberately one generates that mental volitional formation conditioned by which pleasure and pain arise internally.
“Ignorance is comprised within these states.80
But with the remainderless fading away and cessation of ignorance that body does not exist conditioned by which that pleasure and pain arise internally;
At Savatthi.
and, when they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side
and said to him:
“Friend Sariputta, some ascetics and brahmins, proponents of kamma, maintain that pleasure and pain are created by oneself;
some ascetics and brahmins, proponents of kamma, maintain that pleasure and pain are created by another;
some ascetics and brahmins, proponents of kamma, maintain that pleasure and pain have arisen fortuitously, being created neither by oneself nor by another.76
and those who maintain that pleasure and pain are created by another, and those who maintain that pleasure and pain are created both by oneself and by another, and those who maintain that pleasure and pain have arisen fortuitously, being created neither by oneself nor by another - in each case that is conditioned by contact.
and those who maintain that pleasure and pain are created by another, and those who maintain that pleasure and pain are created both by oneself and by another, and those who maintain that pleasure and pain have arisen fortuitously, being created neither by oneself nor by another - in each case it is impossible that they will experience anything without contact.”
when there is speech, because of verbal volition pleasure and pain arise internally;
when there is the mind, because of mental volition pleasure and pain arise internally - and with ignorance as condition.7
“Either on one’s own initiative, Ananda, one generates that bodily volitional formation conditioned by which pleasure and pain arise internally;
or prompted by others one generates that bodily volitional formation conditioned by which pleasure and pain arise internally.
or undeliberately one generates that bodily volitional formation conditioned by which pleasure and pain arise internally.78
“Either on one’s own initiative, handa, one generates that verbal volitional formation conditioned by which pleasure and pain arise internally;
or prompted by others one generates that verbal volitional formation conditioned by which pleasure and pain arise internally.
or prompted by others one generates that mental volitional formation conditioned by which pleasure and pain arise internally.
that speech does not exist conditioned by which that pleasure and pain arise internally;
that mind does not exist conditioned by which that pleasure and pain arise internally.81
That field does not exist, that site does not exist, that base does not exist, that foundation does not exist conditioned by wluch that pleasure and pain arise internally.”82
On one occasion the Venerable Sariputta was dwelling at Savatthi in Jeta’s Grove, Anathapindika’s Park.
Now on that occasion the following pernicious view had arisen in a bhikkhu named Yamaka: “As I understand the Dhamma taught by the Blessed One, a bhikkhu whose taints are destroyed is annihilated and perishes with the breakup of the body and does not exist after death.”151
A number of bhikkhus heard that such a pernicious view had arisen in the bhikkhu Yamaka.
Then they approached the Venerable Yamaka and exchanged greetings with him,
“Is it true, friend Yamaka, that such a pernicious view as this has arisen in you: ‘As I understand the Dhamma taught by the Blessed One, a bhikkhu whose taints are destroyed is annihilated and perishes with the breakup of the body and does not exist after death’?”
“Exactly so, friends.As I understand the Dhamma taught by the Blessed One, a bhikkhu whose taints are destroyed is annihilated and perishes with the breakup of the body and does not exist after death.”
“Friend Yamaka, do not speak thus. Do not misrepresent the Blessed One.
It is not good to misrepresent the Blessed One.
The Blessed One would not speak thus: ‘A bhikkhu whose taints are destroyed is annihilated and perishes with the breakup of the body and does not exist after death.”
Yet, although he was admonished by the bhikkhus in this way, the Venerable Yamaka still obstinately grasped that pernicious view, adhered to it, and declared: “As I understand the Dhamma taught by the Blessed One, a bhikkhu whose taints are destroyed is annihilated and perishes with the breakup of the body and does not exist after death.”
Since those bhikkhus were unable to detach the Venerable Yamaka from that pernicious view, they rose from their seats, approached the Venerable Sariputta, and told him all that had occurred, adding:
The Venerable Sariputta consented by silence.
Then, in the evening, the Venerable Sariputta emerged from seclusion. He approached the Venerable Yamaka and exchanged greetings with him, after which he sat down to one side and said to him:
“Is it true, friend Yamaka, that such a pernicious view as this has arisen in you: ‘As I understand the Dhamma taught by the Blessed One, a bhikkhu whose taints are destroyed is annihilated and perishes with the breakup of the body and does not exist after death’?”
“Exactly so, friend.”
“What do you think, friend Yamaka, is form permanent or impermanent?”
- “Therefore… Seeing thus. ,. He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’152
“What do you think, friend Yamaka, do you regard form as the Tathagata?”
- “No, friend.” - “Do you regard feeling…
perception … volitional formations … consciousness as the Tathagata?”
- “No, friend.”
“What do you think, friend Yamaka, do you regard the Tathagata as in form?”
- “No, friend.”
- “Do you regard the Tathagata as apart from form?”
- “No, friend.”
- “Do you regard the Tathagata as in feeling? As apart from feeling? As in perception? As apart from perception? As in volitional formations? As apart from volitional formations? As in consciousness?
“What do you think, friend Yamaka, do you regard form, feeling, perception, volitional formations, and consciousness taken together as the Tathagata?”
- “No, friend.”
“What do you think, friend Yamaka, do you regard the Tathagata as one who is without form, without feeling, without perception, without volitional formations, without consciousness?”
- “NO, friend.” 153
“But, friend, when the Tathagata is not apprehended by you as real and actual here in this very life;154 is it fitting for you to declare: ‘As I understand the Dhamma taught by the Blessed One, a bhikkhu whose taints are destroyed is annihilated and perishes with the breakup of the body and does not exist after death?”
“Formerly, friend Sariputta, when I was ignorant, I did hold that pernicious view, but now that I have heard this Dhamma teaching of the Venerable Sariputta I have abandoned that pernicious view and have made the breakthrough to the Dhamma.”155
“If, friend Yamaka, they were to ask you: ‘Friend Yamaka, when a bhikkhu is an arahant, one whose taints are destroyed, what happens to him with the breakup of the body, after death?’
-being asked thus, what would you answer?”
“If they were to ask me this, friend,
I would answer thus: ‘Friends, form is impermanent;
Feeling … Perception…Volitional formations…
Consciousness is impermanent; what is impermanent is suffering; what is suffering has ceased and passed away.’
Being asked thus, friend, I would answer in such a way.”156
“Good, good, friend Yamaka!
Now, friend Yamaka, I will make up a simile for you in order to convey this same meaning even more clearly.
Suppose, friend Yamaka, there was a householder or a householder’s son, a rich man, with much wealth and property, protected by a bodyguard.
Then some man would appear who wanted to ruin him, to harm him, to endanger him, to take his life.
It would occur to that man: ‘This householder or householder’s son is a rich man, with much wealth and property, protected by a bodyguard. It won’t be easy to take his life by force.
Let me get close to him and then take his life.’
“Then he would approach that householder or householder’s son and say to him: ‘I would serve you, sir.’
Then the householder or householder’s son would appoint him as a servant.
The man would serve him, rising up before him, retiring after him, doing whatever he wants, agreeable in his conduct, endearing in his speech.
The householder or householder’s son would consider him a friend,157 a bosom friend, and he would place trust in him.
But when the man becomes aware that the householder or householder’s son has placed trust in him, then, finding him alone, he would take his life with a sharp knife.
“What do you think, friend Yamaka, when that man had approached that householder or householder’s son and said to him: ‘I would serve you, sir,’ wasn’t he a murderer even then,
And when the man was serving him, rising up before him, retiring after him, doing whatever he wants, agreeable in his conduct, endearing in his speech, wasn’t he a murderer then too,
And when the man came upon him while he was alone and took his life with a sharp knife, wasn’t he a murderer then too,
“Yes, friend.”
“So too, friend Yamaka,158 the uninstructed worldling, who is not a seer of the noble ones and is unskilled and undisciplined in their Dhamma, who is not a seer of superior persons and is unskilled and undisciplined in their Dhamma, regards form as self, or self as possessing form, or form as in self, or self as in form.
“He regards feeling as self … perception as self… volitional formations as self … consciousness as self, or self as possessing consciousness, or consciousness as in self, or self as in consciousness.
“He does not understand as it really is impermanent form as ‘impermanent form’…
impermanent feeling as ‘impermanent feeling’…
impermanent perception as ‘impermanent perception’…
impermanent volitional formations as ‘impermanent volitional formations’…
impermanent consciousness as ‘impermanent consciousness.’
“He does not understand as it really is painful form as ‘painful form’…
painful feeling as ‘painful feeling’… painful perception as ‘painful perception’ … painful volitional formations as ‘painful volitional formations’… painful consciousness as ‘painful consciousness.’
“He does not understand as it really is selfless form as ‘selfless form’…
selfless feeling as ‘selfless feeling’… selfless perception as ‘selfless perception’… selfless volitional formations as ‘selfless volitional formations’… selfless consciousness as ‘selfless consciousness.’
“He does not understand as it really is conditioned form as ‘conditioned form’…
conditioned feeling as ‘conditioned feeling’… conditioned perception as ‘conditioned perception’… conditioned volitional formations as ‘conditioned volitional formations’… conditioned consciousness as ‘conditioned consciousness.’
“He does not understand as it really is murderous form as ‘murderous form’ …
murderous feeling as ‘murderous feeling’… murderous perception as ‘murderous perception’… murderous volitional formations as ‘murderous volitional formations’…
“He becomes engaged with form, clings to it, and takes a stand upon it as ‘my self.’
He becomes engaged with feeling … with perception… with volitional formations… with consciousness, clings to it, and takes a stand upon it as ‘my self.’
These same five aggregates of clinging, to which he becomes engaged and to which he clings, lead to his harm and suffering for a long time.
“But, friend, the instructed noble disciple, who is a seer of the noble ones… does not regard form as self, or self as possessing form, or form as in self, or self as in form.
“He does not regard feeling as self… perception as self… volitional formations as self… consciousness as self, or self as possessing consciousness, or consciousness as in self, or self as in consciousness.
“He understands as it really is impermanent form as ‘impermanent form’…
impermanent consciousness as ‘impermanent consciousness.’
painful consciousness as ‘painful consciousness.’
“He understands as it really is selfless form as ‘selfless form’…
selfless consciousness as ‘selfless consciousness.’
“He understands as it really is conditioned form as ‘conditioned form’…
conditioned consciousness as ‘conditioned consciousness.’
“He understands as it really is murderous form as ‘murderous form’…
murderous consciousness as ‘murderous consciousness.’
“He does not become engaged with form, cling to it, and take a stand upon it as ‘my self.’
He does not become engaged with feeling… with perception… with volitional formations… with consciousness, cling to it, and take a stand upon it as ‘my self.’
These same five aggregates of clinging, to which he does not become engaged and to which he does not cling, lead to his welfare and happiness for a long time.”
“So it is, friend Sariputta, for those venerable ones who have such compassionate and benevolent brothers in the holy life to admonish and instruct them.
And now that I have heard this Dhamma teaching of the Venerable Sariputta, my mind is liberated from the taints by nonclinging.” 161 This is what the Venerable Sariputta said. Elated, the Venerable Yamaka delighted in the Venerable Sariputta’s statement.
after which they sat down to one side
and said to him:
“It would be good if the Venerable Sariputta would approach the bhikkhu Yamaka out of compassion for him.”
- “Impermanent, friend.”…
- “No, friend.”
AS apart from consciousness?”
what is impermanent is suffering; what is suffering has ceased and passed away.
though the other did not recognize him as ‘my murderer’?
though the other did not recognize him as ‘my murderer’?
though the other did not recognize him as ‘my murderer’?”
murderous consciousness as ‘murderous consciousness.’
“He understands as it really is painful form as ‘painful form’…
At Ssvatthi.
“Bhikkhus, those ascetics and brahmins who recollect their manifold past abodes all recollect the five aggregates subject to clinging or a certain one among them.108
“When recollecting thus, bhikkhus: ‘I had such form in the past,’ it is just form that one recollects.
When recollecting: ‘I had such a feeling in the past,’ it is just feeling that one recollects.
When recollecting: ‘I had such a perception in the past,’ it is just perception that one recollects. When recollecting: ‘I had such volitional formations in the past,’ it is just volitional formations that one recollects. When recollecting: ‘I had such consciousness in the past,’ it is just consciousness that one recollects.
“And why, bhikkhus, do you call it form?
‘It is deformed,’ bhikkhus, therefore it is called form.”
Deformed by what?
Deformed by cold, deformed by heat, deformed by hunger, deformed by thirst, deformed by contact with flies, mosquitoes, wind, sun, and serpents.
‘It is deformed,’ bhikkhus, therefore it is called form.
“And why, bhikkhus, do you call it feeling?
‘It feels,’ bhikkhus, therefore it is called feeling.111
It feels pleasure, it feels pain, it feels neither-pain-nor-pleasure.
‘It feels,’ bhikkhus, therefore it is called feeling.
“And why, bhikkhus, do you call it perception?
‘It perceives,’ bhikkhus, therefore it is called perception.
And what does it perceive?
It perceives blue, it perceives yellow, it perceives red, it perceives white.
‘It perceives,’ bhikkhus, therefore it is called perception.
“And why, bhikkhus, do you call them volitional formations?
‘They construct the conditioned,’ bhikkhus, therefore they are called volitional formations.”2
And what is the conditioned that they construct?
They construct conditioned form as form;”3 they construct conditioned feeling as feeling; they construct conditioned perception as perception; they construct conditioned volitional formations as volitional formations; they construct conditioned consciousness as consciousness.
‘They construct the conditioned,’ bhikkhus, therefore they are called volitional formations.
“And why, bhikkhus, do you call it consciousness?
‘It cognizes,’ bhikkhus, therefore it is called consciousness.
And what does it cognize?
It cognizes sour, it cognizes bitter, it cognizes pungent, it cognizes sweet, it cognizes sharp, it cognizes mild, it cognizes salty, it cognizes bland.
‘It cognizes,’ bhikkhus, therefore it is called consciousness.
“Therein, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple reflects thus: ‘I am now being devoured by form.115
In the past too I was devoured by form in the very same way that I am now being devoured by present form.
If I were to seek delight in future form, then in the future too I shall be devoured by form in the same way that I am now being devoured by present form.’
Having reflected thus, he becomes indifferent towards past form, he does not seek delight in future form, and he is practising for revulsion towards present form, for its fading away and cessation.
“He reflects thus: ‘I am now being devoured by feeling.’…
‘I am now being devoured by perception.’…’I am now being devoured by volitional formations.’…
I am now being devoured by consciousness.
In the past too I was devoured by consciousness in the very same way that I am now being devoured by present consciousness.
If I were to seek delight in future consciousness, then in the future too I shall be devoured by consciousness in the very same way that I am now being devoured by present consciousness.’
Having reflected thus, he becomes indifferent towards past consciousness, he does not seek delight in future consciousness, and he is practising for revulsion towards present consciousness, for its fading away and cessation.
“What do you think, bhikkhus, is form permanent or impermanent?…
Is feeling… perception … volitional formations… consciousness permanent or impermanent?”116
- “Impermanent, venerable sir.”
- “Is what is impermanent sufferring or happiness?”
- “Suffering, venerable sir.’
- “Is what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change fit to be regarded thus: “This is mine, this I am, this is my self’?”
- “No, venerable sir.”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, any kind of form whatsoever …
Any kind of feeling whatsoever … Any kind of perception whatsoever …Any kind of volitional formations whatsoever … any kind of consciousness whatsoever, whether past, future, or present, internal or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near, all consciousness should be seen as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
“This is called, bhikkhus, a noble disciple who dismantles and does not build up; who abandons and does not cling; who scatters and does not amass; who extinguishes and does not kindle.117
He dismantles form and does not build it up. He dismantles feeling… perception… volitional formations… consciousness and does not build it up.
“And what is it that he abandons and does not cling to?
He abandons form and does not cling to it. He abandons feeling… perception… volitional formations ., consciousness and does not cling to it.
“And what is it that he scatters and does not amass?
He scatters form and does not amass it. He scatters feeling… perception… volitional formations … consciousness and does not amass it.
“And what is it that he extinguishes and does not kindle?
He extinguishes form and does not kindle it. He extinguishes feeling… perception… volitional formations… consciousness and does not kindle it.
“Seeing thus, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple experiences revulsion towards form, revulsion towards feeling, revulsion towards perception, revulsion towards volitional formations, revulsion towards consciousness.
Experiencing revulsion, he becomes dispassionate. Through dispassion his mind is liberated.
When it is liberated there comes the knowledge: ‘It’s liberated.’
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’
“This is called, bhikkhus, a noble disciple who neither builds up nor dismantles, but who abides having dismantled; who neither abandons nor clings, but who abides having abandoned; who neither scatters nor amasses, but who abides having scattered; who neither extinguishes nor kindles, but who abides having extinguished.118
He neither builds up nor dismantles form, but abides having dismantled it. He neither builds up nor dismantles feeling… perception… volitional formations … consciousness, but abides having dismantled it.
“And what is it that he neither abandons nor clings to, but abides having abandoned?
He neither abandons nor clings to form, but abides having abandoned it. He neither abandons nor clings to feeling … perception … volitional formations… consciousness, but abides having abandoned it.
“And what is it that he neither scatters nor amasses, but abides having scattered?
He neither scatters nor amasses form, but abides having scattered it. He neither scatters nor amasses feeling…… volitional formations… consciousness, but abides having scattered it.
“And what is it that he neither extinguishes nor kindles, but e abides having extinguished?
He neither extinguishes nor kindles form, but abides having extinguished it. He neither extinguishes nor kindles feeling… perception… volitional formations… consciousness, but abides having extinguished it.
“When, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu is thus liberated in mind, the devas together with Indra, Brahma, and Pajapati pay homage to him from afar:
“‘Homage to you, o thoroughbred man! Homage to you, o highest among men!
We ourselves do not directly know Dependent upon what you meditate.” ‘119
What five?
And what does it feel?
“And what is it that he dismantles and does not build up?
“And what is it, bhikkhus, that he neither builds up nor dismantles, but abides having dismantled?
- “Impermanent, venerable sir.”
- “Is what is impermanent sufferring or happiness?”
- “Suffering, venerable sir.’
- “Is what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change fit to be regarded thus: “This is mine, this I am, this is my self’?”
- “No, venerable sir.”
On one occasion the Blessed One was dwelling at Kosambi in Ghosita’s Park.
Then, in the morning, the Blessed One dressed and, taking bowl and robe, entered Kosambi for alms. When he had walked for alms in Kosambi and had returned from the alms round, after his meal he set his lodging in order himself, took his bowl and robe, and without informing his personal attendants, without taking leave of the Bhikkhu Sangha, he set out on tour alone, without a companion.128 Then, not long after the Blessed One had departed, a certain bhikkhu approached the Venerable Ananda and told him: “Friend Ananda, the Blessed One has set his lodging in order himself, taken his bowl and robe, and without informing his personal attendants, without taking leave of the Bhikkhu Sangha, he has set out on tour alone, without a companion.”
“Friend, whenever the Blessed One sets out like that he wishes to dwell alone. On such an occasion the Blessed One should not be followed by anyone.”
Then the Blessed One, wandering by stages, arrived at Parileyyaka.
There at Parileyyaka the Blessed One dwelt at the foot of an auspicious sal tree.129
Then the Venerable handa together with those bhikkhu: approached the Blessed One at Parileyyaka, at the foot of the auspicious sal tree. Having approached, they paid homage to the Blessed One and sat down to one side.
The Blessed One there instructed, exhorted, inspired, and gladdened those bhikkhus with a Dhamma talk.
NOW on that occasion a reflection arose in the mind of a certain bhikkhu thus: “How should one know, how should one see, for the immediate destruction of the taints to occur?”131
The Blessed One, having known with his own mind the reflection in that bhikkhu’s mind, addressed the bhikkhus thus: “Bhikkhus, this Dhamma has been taught by me discriminately.132 The four establishments of mindfulness have been taught by me discriminately. The four right strivings … The four bases for spiritual power… The five spiritual faculties… The five powers… The seven factors of enlightenment… The Noble Eightfold Path has been taught by me discriminately.
Bhikkhus, in regard to the Dhamma that has been thus taught by me discriminately, a reflection arose in the mind of a certain bhikkhu thus: ‘How should one know, how should one see, for the immediate destruction of the taints to occur?’
“And how, bhikkhus, should one know, how should one see, for the immediate destruction of the taints to occur?
Here, bhikkhus, the uninstructed worldling, who is not a seer of the noble ones and is unskilled and undisciplined in their Dhamma, who is not a seer of superior persons and is unskilled and undisciplined in their Dhamma, regards form as self.
That regarding, bhikkhus, is a formation.133
When the uninstructed worldling is contacted by a feeling born of ignorance-contact, craving arises: thence that formation is born.
“Thus, bhikkhus, that formation is impermanent, conditioned, dependently arisen;
When one knows and sees thus, bhikkhus, the immediate destruction of the taints occurs.
“He may not regard form as self, but he regards self as possessing form.
That regarding is a formation… …
When one knows and sees thus, bhikkhus, the immediate destruction of the taints occurs.
“He may not regard form as self or self as possessing form, but he regards form as in self.
“He may not regard form as self or self as possessing form or form as in self, but he regards self as in form.
That regarding is a formation….
“He may not regard form as self … or self as in form, but he regards feeling as self… perception as self… volitional formations as self… consciousness as self… self as in consciousness.
That regarding is a formation….
“He may not regard form as self … … or self as in consciousness, but he holds such a view as this: ‘That which is the self is the world; having passed away, that I shall be permanent, stable, eternal, not subject to change.’134
That eternalist view is a formation….
When one knows and sees thus, bhikkhus, the immediate destruction of the taints occurs.
“He may not regard form as self… or hold such an eternalist view,
That annihilationist view is a formation….
“He may not regard form as self… or hold such an annihilationist view, but he is perplexed, doubtful, indecisive in regard to the true Dhamma.
That perplexity, doubtfulness, indecisiveness in regard to the true Dhamma is a formation.
That formation - what is its source, what is its origin, from what is it born and produced?
When the uninstructed worldling is contacted by a feeling born of ignorance-contact, craving arises: thence that formation is born.136
When one knows and sees thus, bhikkhus, the immediate destruction of the taints occurs.”137
When he had walked for alms in Kosambi and had returned from the alms round, after his meal he set his lodging in order himself, took his bowl and robe, and without informing his personal attendants, without taking leave of the Bhikkhu Sangha, he set out on tour alone, without a companion.128
Then, not long after the Blessed One had departed, a certain bhikkhu approached the Venerable Ananda and told him: “Friend Ananda, the Blessed One has set his lodging in order himself, taken his bowl and robe, and without informing his personal attendants, without taking leave of the Bhikkhu Sangha, he has set out on tour alone, without a companion.”
Then a number of bhikkhus approached the Venerable Ananda and exchanged greetings with him.130
and said to the Venerable handa: “Friend Ananda, it has been a long time since we heard a Dhamma talk in the presence of the Blessed One. We should like to hear such a talk, friend handa.”
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, they sat down to one side
That formation - what is its source, what is its origin, from what is it born and produced?
that craving is impermanent, conditioned, dependently arisen;
that feeling is impermanent, conditioned, dependently arisen;
that contact is impermanent, conditioned, dependently arisen;
that ignorance is impermanent, conditioned, dependently arisen.
That regarding is a formation….
When one knows and sees thus, bhikkhus, the immediate destruction of the taints occurs.
but he holds such a view as this: ‘I might not be, and it might not be for me; I will not be, and it will not be for me.’135
that ignorance is impermanent, conditioned, dependently arisen.
that contact is impermanent, conditioned, dependently arisen;
that feeling is impermanent, conditioned, dependently arisen;
that craving is impermanent, conditioned, dependently arisen;
“So that formation, bhikkhus, is impermanent, conditioned, dependently arisen;
On one occasion the Blessed One was dwelling at Savatthi in Jeta’s Grove, Ansthapinika’s Park.
Now on that occasion the bhikkhuni Khema,373 while wandering on tour among the Kosalans, had taken up residence in Toranavatthu between Savatthi and Saketa.
Then King Pasenadi of Kosala, while travelling from Saketa to Savatthi, took up residence for one night in Toranavatthu between Saketa and Savatthi.
Then King Pasenadi of Kosala addressed a man thus: “Go, good man, and find out whether there is any ascetic or brahmin in Toranavatthu whom I could visit today.”
“Yes, sire,” the man replied, but though he traversed the whole of Toranavatthu he did not see any ascetic or brahmin there whom King Pasenadi could visit.
The man did see, however, the bhikkhuni Khema resident in Toranavatthu,
Let your majesty visit her.”
Then King Pasenadi of Kosala approached the bhikkhuni Khema, paid homage to her, sat down to one side,
and said to her: How is it, revered lady, does the Tathagata exist after death?”374
“Great king, the Blessed One has not declared this: ‘The Tathagata exists after death.’“
“Then, revered lady, does the Tathagata not exist after death?”
“Great king, the Blessed One has not declared this either: ‘The Tathagata does not exist after death.”
How is it then, revered lady, does the Tathagata both exist and not exist after death?”
“Great king, the Blessed One has not declared this: ‘The TathSgata both exists and does not exist after death.’“
“Then, revered lady, does the Tathagata neither exist nor not exist after death?”
“Great king, the Blessed One has not declared this either: ‘The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.’“
“How is this, revered lady? When asked, ‘How is it, revered lady, does the Tathagata exist after death?
’ … And when asked, I ‘Then, revered lady, does the Tathagata neither exist nor not exist after death? ‘-in each case you say: ‘Great king, the Blessed One has not declared this.’
What now, revered lady, is the cause and reason why this has not been declared by the Blessed One?”
“Well then, great king, I will question you about this same matter.
Answer as you see fit.
What do you think, great king? Do you have an accountant or calculator or mathematician who can count the grains of sand in the river Ganges thus: ‘There are so many grains of sand,’ or ‘There are so many hundreds of grains of sand,’ or ‘There are so many thousands of grains of sand,’ or ‘There are so many hundreds of thousands of grains of sand’?”
“No, revered lady.”
“Then, great king, do you have an accountant or calculator or I mathematician who can count the water in the great ocean thus: ‘There are so many gallons of water,’ or ‘There are so many hundreds of gallons of water,’ or ‘There are so many thousands of gallons of water,’ or ‘There are so many hundreds of thousands of gallons of water’?”
“No, revered lady.
For what reason?
Because the great ocean is deep, immeasurable, hard to fathom.”
“So too,375 great king, that form by which one describing the Tathagata might describe him has been abandoned by the Tathagata, cut off at the root, made like a palm stump, obliterated so that it is no more subject to future arising.
The Tathagata, great king, is liberated from reckoning in terms of form; he is deep, immeasurable, hard to fathom like the great ocean.376
The Tathagata exists after death’ does not apply; ‘the Tathagata does not exist after death’ does not apply; ‘the Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death’ does not apply; ‘the Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death’ does not apply.
“That feeling by which one describing the Tathagata might describe him …
That perception by which one describing the Tathagata might describe him… Those volitional formations by which one describing the Tathagata might describe him …
The Tathagata, great king, is liberated from reckoning in terms of consciousness; he is deep, immeasurable, hard to fathom like the great ocean.
‘The Tathagata exists after death’ does not apply; ‘the TathSgata does not exist after death’ does not apply; ‘the Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death’ does not apply; ‘the Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death’ does not apply.”
Then King Pasenadi of Kosala, having delighted and rejoiced in the bhikkhuni Khema’s statement, rose from his seat, paid homage to her, and departed, keeping her on his right.
Then, on a later occasion, King Pasenadi of Kosala approached the Blessed One. Having approached, he paid homage to the Blessed One, sat down to one side,
and said to him: “How is it, venerable sir, does the Tathagata exist after death? “ “Great king, I have not declared this: ‘The Tathagata exists after death.”
’ “Great king, I have not declared this either: ‘The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.”
’ “How is this, venerable sir? When asked, ‘How is it, venerable sir, does the Tathagata exist after death?’ …
And when asked, ‘Then, venerable sir, does the Tathagata neither exist nor not exist after death? ‘-in each case you say: ‘Great king, I have not declared this.’
What now, venerable sir, is the cause and reason why this has not been declared by the Blessed One? “
Well then, great king, I will question you about this same matter.
Answer as you see fit.
What do you think, great king? Do you have an accountant or calculator or mathematician…
… The Tathagata, great king, is liberated from reckoning in terms of consciousness: he is deep, immeasurable, hard to fathom like the great ocean.
‘The Tathagata exists after death’ does not apply; ‘the Tathagata does not exist after death’ does not apply; ‘the Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death’ does not apply; ‘the Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death’ does not apply.”
“It is wonderful, venerable sir! It is amazing, venerable sir!
How the meaning and the phrasing of both teacher and disciple coincide and agree with each other and do not diverge, that is, in regard to the chief matter.377
The revered lady explained this matter to me in exactly the same terms and phrases that the Blessed One used.
It is wonderful, venerable sir! It is amazing, venerable sir!
How the meaning and the phrasing of both teacher and disciple coincide and agree with each other and do not diverge, that is, in regard to the chief matter.
Now, venerable sir, we must go.
We are busy and have much to do.”
“Then, great king, you may go at your own convenience.”
Then King Pasenadi of Kosala, having delighted and rejoiced in the Blessed One’s statement, rose from his seat, paid homage to him, and departed, keeping him on his right.
But, sire, there is the bhikkhuni named Khema, a disciple of the Blessed One, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One.
Now a good report concerning this revered lady has spread about thus: ‘She is wise, competent, intelligent, learned, a splendid speaker, ingenious.’
so he approached King Pasenadi and said to him:
“Sire, there is no ascetic or brahmin in Toranavatthu whom your majesty could visit.
That consciousness by which one describing the Tathagata might describe him has been abandoned by the Tathagata, cut off at the root, made like a palm stump, obliterated so that it is no more subject to future arising.
On one occasion, venerable sir, I approached the bhikkhuni Khema and asked her about this matter.
On one occasion the Venerable Anuruddha was dwelling at Savatthi in the Blind Men’s Grove, sick, afflicted, gravely ill.
Then a number of bhikkhus approached the Venerable Anuruddha and said to him:
“It is, friends, because I dwell with a mind well established in the four establishments of mindfulness that the arisen bodily feelings do not persist obsessing my mind.
What four?
Here, friend, I dwell contemplating the body in the body… feelings in clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world. “It is, friends, because I dwell with a mind well established these four establishments of mindfulness that the arisen bodily painful feelings do not persist obsessing my mind.”
“In what dwelling does the Venerable Anuruddha usually dwell so that the arisen bodily painful feelings do not persist obsessing his mind?”
“Bhikkhus, suppose there were a man with a life span of a hundred years, who could live a hundred years.
Someone would to him: ‘Come, good man, in the morning they will strike you with a hundred spears; at noon they will strike you with a hundred spears; in the evening they will strike you with a hundred spears.396
“It is fitting, bhikkhus, for a clansman intent on his good to accept the offer.
For what reason?
Because this samsara is without discoverable beginning; a first point cannot be discemed of blows by spears, blows by swords, blows by axes.
And even though this may be so, bhikkhus,
I do not say that the breakthrough to the Four Noble Truths is accompanied by suffering or displeasure. Rather, the breakthrough to the Four Noble Truths is accompanied only by happiness and joy.
What four?
The noble truth of suffering … the noble truth of the way leading to the cessation of suffering.
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’ … An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.” ‘
And you, good man, being struck day after day by three hundred spears will have a life span of a hundred years, will live a hundred years; and then, after a hundred years have passed, you will make the breakthrough to the Four Noble Truths, to which you had not broken through earlier.’
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
And on that occasion Bāhiya of the Bark-cloth was living in Suppāraka by the seashore. He was worshipped, revered, honored, venerated, and given homage–a recipient of robes, alms food, lodgings, & medicinal requisites for the sick.
Then, when he was alone in seclusion, this line of thinking appeared to his awareness: “Now, of those who in this world are arahants or have entered the path of arahantship, am I one? ”
Then a devatā who had once been a blood relative of Bāhiya of the Bark-cloth–compassionate, desiring his welfare, knowing with her own awareness the line of thinking that had arisen in his awareness–went to him and on arrival said to him, “You, Bāhiya, are neither an arahant nor have you entered the path of arahantship.
You don’t even have the practice whereby you would become an arahant or enter the path of arahantship.”
“Then who, in this world with its devas, are arahants or have entered the path to arahantship? ”
“Bāhiya, there is a city in the northern country named Sāvatthī.
There the Blessed One–an arahant, rightly self-awakened–is living now.
He truly is an arahant and teaches the Dhamma leading to arahantship.”
Then Bāhiya, deeply chastened by the devatā, left Suppāraka right then and,
Now on that occasion, a large number of monks were doing walking meditation in the open air.
He went to them and, on arrival, said, “Where, venerable sirs, is the Blessed One–the arahant, rightly self-awakened–now staying?
We want to see that Blessed One–the arahant, rightly self-awakened.”
“The Blessed One has gone into town for alms.”
Then Bāhiya, hurriedly leaving Jeta’s Grove and entering Sāvatthī, saw the Blessed One going for alms in Sāvatthī–serene & inspiring serene confidence, calming, his senses at peace, his mind at peace, having attained the utmost tranquility & poise, tamed, guarded, his senses restrained, a Great One .
Seeing him, he approached the Blessed One and, on reaching him, threw himself down, with his head at the Blessed One’s feet, and said, “Teach me the Dhamma, O Blessed One! Teach me the Dhamma, O One-Well-Gone, that will be for my long-term welfare & bliss.”
When this was said, the Blessed One said to him, “This is not the time, Bāhiya. We have entered the town for alms.”
A second time, Bāhiya said to the Blessed One, “But it is hard to know for sure what dangers there may be for the Blessed One’s life, or what dangers there may be for mine.
Teach me the Dhamma, O Blessed One! Teach me the Dhamma, O One-Well-Gone, that will be for my long-term welfare & bliss.”
A second time, the Blessed One said to him, “This is not the time, Bāhiya. We have entered the town for alms.”
A third time, Bāhiya said to the Blessed One, “But it is hard to know for sure what dangers there may be for the Blessed One’s life, or what dangers there may be for mine.
Teach me the Dhamma, O Blessed One! Teach me the Dhamma, O One-Well-Gone, that will be for my long-term welfare & bliss.”
“Then, Bāhiya, you should train yourself thus: In reference to the seen, there will be only the seen. In reference to the heard, only the heard. In reference to the sensed, only the sensed. In reference to the cognized, only the cognized.
That is how you should train yourself.
When for you there will be only the seen in reference to the seen, only the heard in reference to the heard, only the sensed in reference to the sensed, only the cognized in reference to the cognized, then, Bāhiya, there is no you in connection with that. When there is no you in connection with that, there is no you there. When there is no you there, you are neither here nor yonder nor between the two.
This, just this, is the end of stress.”2
Through hearing this brief explanation of the Dhamma from the Blessed One, the mind of Bāhiya of the Bark-cloth right then and there was released from effluents through lack of clinging/sustenance.
Having exhorted Bāhiya of the Bark-cloth with this brief explanation of the Dhamma, the Blessed One left.
Now, not long after the Blessed One’s departure, Bāhiya was attacked & killed by a cow with a young calf.
Then the Blessed One, having gone for alms in Sāvatthī, after the meal, returning from his alms round with a large number of monks, saw that Bāhiya had died. On seeing him, he said to the monks, “Take Bāhiya’s body, monks, and, placing it on a litter and carrying it away, cremate it and build him a memorial.
Your companion in the holy life has died.”
Responding, “As you say, lord,” to the Blessed One, the monks–placing Bāhiya’s body on a litter, carrying it away, cremating it, and building him a memorial–went to the Blessed One. On arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As they were sitting there, they said to him, “Bāhiya’s body has been cremated, lord, and his memorial has been built.
What is his destination? What is his future state? ”
“Monks, Bāhiya of the Bark-cloth was wise. He practiced the Dhamma in accordance with the Dhamma and did not pester me with issues related to the Dhamma.
Bāhiya of the Bark-cloth, monks, is totally unbound.”
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
Where water, earth, fire, & wind have no footing:
There the stars don’t shine, the sun isn’t visible.
There the moon doesn’t appear.
There darkness is not found. And when a sage, a brahman through sagacity,
has realized this for himself, then from form & formless, from bliss & pain, he is freed.
in the space of one night,1 went all the way to where the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at the Eastern Monastery, the palace of Migāra’s mother.
And on that occasion the Blessed One, having emerged from his seclusion in the late afternoon, was sitting outside the doorway of the porch.
Then King Pasenadi Kosala went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
Now on that occasion seven coiled-hair ascetics, seven Jain ascetics, seven cloth-less ascetics, seven one-cloth ascetics, & seven wanderers–their nails, armpit-hair, & body-hair grown long, carrying containers on poles over their shoulders–walked past, not far from the Blessed One.
King Pasenadi Kosala saw the seven coiled-hair ascetics, seven Jain ascetics, seven cloth-less ascetics, seven one-cloth ascetics, & seven wanderers–their nails, armpit-hair, & body-hair grown long, carrying containers on poles over their shoulders–walking past, not far from the Blessed One.
On seeing them, he got up from his seat, arranged his upper robe over one shoulder, knelt down with his right knee on the ground, paid homage to the seven coiled-hair ascetics, seven Jain ascetics, seven cloth-less ascetics, seven one-cloth ascetics, & seven wanderers with his hands palm-to-palm in front his heart, and announced his name three times: “I am the king, venerable sirs, Pasenadi Kosala. I am the king, venerable sirs, Pasenadi Kosala. I am the king, venerable sirs, Pasenadi Kosala.”
Then not long after the seven coiled-hair ascetics, seven Jain ascetics, seven cloth-less ascetics, seven one-cloth ascetics, & seven wanderers had passed, King Pasenadi Kosala went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One, “Of those in the world who are arahants or on the path to arahantship, are these among them? ”
“Great king, as a layman enjoying sensual pleasures; living confined with children; using Kāsī fabrics & sandalwood; wearing garlands, scents, & creams; handling gold & silver, it’s hard for you to know whether these are arahants or on the path to arahantship.
“It’s through living together that a person’s virtue may be known,
and then only after a long period, not a short period; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; by one who is discerning, not by one who is not discerning.
“It’s through adversity that a person’s endurance may be known,
“It’s through discussion that a person’s discernment may be known,
“Amazing, lord! Astounding!
–how well that was put by the Blessed One! ‘Great king, as a layman enjoying sensual pleasures; living confined with children; using Kāsī fabrics & sandalwood; wearing garlands, scents, & creams; handling gold & silver, it’s hard for you to know whether these are arahants or on the path to arahantship.
“‘It’s through living together that a person’s virtue may be known…“‘It’s through discussion that a person’s discernment may be known,
“These men, lord, are my spies, my scouts, returning after going out through the countryside.
They go out first, and then I go.
Now, when they have scrubbed off the dirt & mud, are well-bathed & well-perfumed, have trimmed their hair and beards, and have put on white clothes, they will go about endowed and provided with the five strings of sensuality.”
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
One should not make an effort everywhere, should not be another’s hireling,
should not live dependent on another, should not go about as a trader in the Dhamma.1
and then only after a long period, not a short period; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; by one who is discerning, not by one who is not discerning.
“It’s through trading with a person that his purity may be known,
and then only after a long period, not a short period; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; by one who is discerning, not by one who is not discerning.
and then only after a long period, not a short period; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; by one who is discerning, not by one who is not discerning.”
and then only after a long period, not a short period; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; by one who is discerning, not by one who is not discerning.’
“When, resolved upon striving,I had gone to the Nerañjarā River,
“Namucī approached me,speaking compassionate words:
‘You are thin, pale;you’re on the verge of death.
“‘A thousand parts belong to death,one fraction of your life remains.
Live, sir, life is better! While living, make merits!
“‘While you are living the spiritual life and performing the fire sacrifice,
abundant merit is stored up.Why devote yourself to striving?
“‘Hard to travel is the path for striving,hard to practice, hard to achieve.’
”Speaking these verses, Māra stoodin the presence of the Buddha.
When Māra had spoken in such a way, the Blessed One said this to him:
“Kinsman of the heedless, Evil One,you have come here with a purpose.
“I do not have any need even for the slightest merit.124
It is fitting for Māra to speak to those who have need of merits.
“I have faith and energy too,and wisdom exists in me.
When I am so resolute,why do you ask me to live?
“This wind might dry up even the streams of the rivers,
so why, when I am resolute, should it not dry up my blood?
“When the blood is drying up,the bile and phlegm dry up.
When my muscles are wasting away,my mind becomes even more serene,
“While I am dwelling in such a way I have experienced extreme pain,
yet my mind does not turn to sensual pleasures: behold the purity of the being!
“Sensual pleasures are your first army;the second is called discontent.
Hunger and thirst are the third;the fourth is called craving.
“The fifth is dullness and drowsiness;the sixth is called cowardice.
Doubt is your seventh;your eighth, denigration and pride.
“Gain, praise, and honor,and wrongly obtained fame is ninth;
the tenth is when one extols oneselfand looks down at others.
“This is your army, Namucī, the squadron of the Dark One.
A weakling does not conquer it,but having conquered it, one gains bliss.
“I wear muñja grass;wretched would life be to me.125
It’s better that I die in battle than live on defeated.
“Some ascetics and brahmins,engulfed here, are no longer seen.
They do not know the path by which the disciplined ones travel.
“Having seen the bannered army all around,and Māra with his vehicle ready,
I will go out to meet him in battle:may he not dislodge me from my place!
“Though the world with its devas cannot overcome that army of yours,
I will destroy126 it with wisdom,like a fresh clay bowl with a stone.
“Having gained mastery over my intention,and with mindfulness well established,
I will wander from realm to realm,guiding many disciples.
“Heedful and resolute,those practitioners of my teaching,
“For seven years I followed the Blessed One, trailing him step by step,
but I have not found an opening in the Enlightened One, who is mindful.
“There was a crow that circled around a stone that looked like a lump of fat:
‘Perhaps we’ll find something tender here;perhaps there may be something tasty.’
“But finding nothing tasty there,the crow departed from that place.
So much was he stricken with sorrow that his lute fell from his armpit.
Thereupon that saddened spirit disappeared right on the spot.
as I was meditating very strenuously to attain security from bondage,
and my mindfulness and wisdom and concentration become more firm.
against your wishes, will go to the state where one does not sorrow.”
Just like the crow that attacked the stone,we leave Gotama disappointed.”
surely I had better do good by body, speech, and mind”?
surely I had better do good by body, speech, and mind”?
surely I had better do good by body, speech, and mind”?”
surely I had better do good by body, speech, and mind”?”
It has four corners and is built With four doors, one set in each side,
Walled up with iron all around And shut in with an iron roof.
When at long last he reaches the door, then it is shut.
that I might wait on that Blessed One,
that the Blessed One might teach me the Dhamma,
and that I might come to understand that Blessed One’s Dhamma!
“Though warned by the divine messengers, Full many are the negligent,
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Jetavana with reference to the nun Uttarā.
The story goes that this nun continued her alms-pilgrimages until she was a hundred and twenty years old. One day as she was returning from her alms-pilgrimage with food in her bowl, she met a certain monk in the street. She asked permission of him to give him the food in her bowl, and he consented to accept it. So she gave him all she had, and then she had none.
On the second day and again on the third day she met the same monk in the same place, gave him all the food she had, and then had none left for herself. Now on the fourth day, as she was going her round, she met the Teacher in a certain place which was much crowded. She stepped back, and as she did so, the skirt of her robe slipped down and she trod on it. Unable to keep her feet, she tumbled and fell down.
The Teacher came up to her and said, “Sister, your body is worn out with old age; at a time not far distant it will suffer dissolution.” So saying, he pronounced the following Stanza,
This body is worn out, this nest of disease, this fragile body;
This mass of corruption dissolves; for life ends in death.
And people may sorrow long indeed Once gone down to the lower world.
They do not dwell in ignorance But practise well the noble Dhamma.
And by not clinging they are freed In the destruction of birth and death.
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Savatthl in Jeta’s Grove, Anathapindika’s Park.
There he addressed the bhikkhus thus: “Bhikkhus.”
-“Venerable sir,” they replied.
The Blessed One said this:
What three?
Here a fool is one who thinks bad thoughts, speaks bad words, and does bad deeds.
If a fool were not so, how would the wise know him thus: ‘This person is a fool, an untrue man’?
But because a fool is one who thinks bad thoughts, speaks bad words, and does bad deeds, the wise know him thus: ‘This person is a fool, an untrue man.’
“A fool feels pain and grief here and now in three ways.
If a fool is seated in an assembly or along a street or in a square and people there are discussing certain pertinent and relevant matters,
then, if the fool is one who kills living beings, takes what is not given, misconducts himself in sensual pleasures, speaks falsehood, and indulges in wine, liquor, and intoxicants, which are the basis of negligence, he thinks: ‘These people are discussing certain pertinent and relevant matters; these things are found in me, and I am seen engaging in those things.’
“Again, when a robber culprit is caught, a fool sees kings having many kinds of torture inflicted on him:1198 having him flogged with whips, beaten with canes, beaten with clubs; having his hands cut off, his feet cut off, his hands and feet cut off; his ears cut off, his nose cut off, his ears and nose cut off; having him subjected to the ‘porridge pot,’ to the ‘polished-shell shave,’ to the ‘Rahu’s mouth,’ to the ‘fiery wreath,’ to the ‘flaming hand,’ to the ‘blades of grass,’ to the ‘bark dress,’ to the ‘antelope,’ to the ‘meat hooks,’ to the ‘coins,’ to the ‘lye pickling,’ to the ‘pivoting pin,’ to the ‘rolled-up palliasse’; and having him splashed with boiling oil, and having him thrown to be devoured by dogs, and having him impaled alive on stakes, and having his head cut off with a sword.
Then the fool thinks thus: ‘Because of such evil actions as those, when a robber culprit is caught, kings have many kinds of tortures inflicted on him: they have him flogged with whips…
This is the second kind of pain and grief that a fool feels here and now.
“Again, when a fool is on his chair or on his bed or resting on the ground, then the evil actions that he did in the past - his bodily, verbal, and mental misconduct - cover him, overspread him, and envelop him.
Just as the shadow of a great mountain peak in the evening covers, overspreads, and envelops the earth, so too, when a fool is on his chair or on his bed or resting on the ground, then the evil actions that he did in the past - his bodily, verbal, and mental misconduct - cover him, overspread him, and envelop him.
Then the fool thinks: ‘I have not done what is good, I have not done what is wholesome, I have not made myself a shelter from anguish. I have done what is evil, I have done what is cruel, I have done what is wicked.
When I pass away, I shall go to the destination of those who have not done what is good…who have done what is wicked.’
He sorrows, grieves, and laments, he weeps beating his breast and becomes distraught.
This is the third kind of pain and grief that a fool feels here and now.
6, “A fool who has given himself over to misconduct of body, speech, and mind, on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappears in a state of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, even in hell.
“Were it rightly speaking to be said of anything: ‘That is utterly unwished for, utterly undesired, utterly disagreeable,’
When this was said, a bhikkhu asked the Blessed One: “But, venerable sir, can a simile be given?”
“It can, bhikkhu,” the Blessed One said.1199
“Bhikkhus, suppose men caught a robber culprit and presented him to the king, saying: ‘Sire, here is a robber culprit. Order what punishment you will for him’.
Then the king said: ‘Go and strike this man in the morning with a hundred spears.’
And they struck him in the morning with a hundred spears.
Then at noon the king asked: ‘How is that man?”
- ‘Sire, he is still alive.’
Then the king said: ‘Go and strike that man at noon with a hundred spears.’
And they struck him at noon with a hundred spears.
Then in the evening the king asked: ‘How is that man?”
- ‘Sire, he is still alive.’
Then the king said: ‘Go and strike that man in the evening with a hundred spears.’
And they struck him in the evening with a hundred spears.
What do you think, bhikkhus? Would that man experience pain and grief because of being struck with the three hundred spears?”
“Venerable sir, that man would experience pain and grief because of being struck with even one spear, let alone three hundred.”
Then, taking a small stone the size of his hand, the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus thus: “What do you think, bhikkhus? Which is the greater, this small stone that I have taken, the size of my hand, or Himalaya, the king of mountains?”
“Venerable sir, the small stone that the Blessed One has taken, the size of his hand, does not count beside Himalaya, the king of mountains; it is not even a fraction, there is no comparison.”
“So too, bhikkhus, the pain and grief that the man would experience because of being struck with the three hundred spears does not count beside the suffering of hell; it is not even a fraction, there is no comparison.
“Now the wardens of hell torture him with the fivefold transfixing. They drive a red-hot iron stake through one hand, they drive a red-hot iron stake through the other hand, they drive a red-hot iron stake through one foot, they drive a red-hot iron stake through the other foot, they drive a red-hot iron stake through his belly.
There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings. Yet he does not die so long as that evil action has not exhausted its result.
“Next the wardens of hell throw him down and pare him with axes.
There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings. Yet he does not die so long as that evil action has not exhausted its result.
“Next the wardens of hell set him with his feet up and his head down and pare him with adzes.
There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings. Yet he does not die so long as that evil action has not exhausted its result.
“Next the wardens of hell harness him to a chariot and drive him back and forth across burning ground, blazing, and glowing.
There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings. Yet he does not die so long as that evil action has not exhausted its result.
“Next the wardens of hell make him climb up and down a great mound of burning coals, blazing, and glowing.
There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings. Yet he does not die so long as that evil action has not exhausted its result.
“Next the wardens of hell take him feet up and head down and plunge him into a red-hot metal cauldron, burning, blazing, and glowing.
He is cooked there in a swirl of froth.
And as he is being cooked there in a swirl of froth, he is swept now up, now down, and now across.
There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings. Yet he does not die so long as that evil action has not exhausted its result.
“Next the wardens of hell throw him into the Great Hell.
Now as to that Great Hell, bhikkhus:
Its floor as well is made of iron And heated till it glows with fire.
The range is a full hundred leagues Which it covers all-pervasively.
“Bhikkhus, I could tell you in many ways about hell.1200 So much so that it is hard to find a simile for the suffering in hell.
“Bhikkhus, there are animals that feed on grass.
They eat by cropping fresh or dried grass with their teeth.
And what animals feed on grass?
Elephants, horses, cattle, donkeys, goats, and deer, and any other such animals.
A fool who formerly delighted in tastes here and did evil actions here, on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappears in the company of animals that feed on grass.
“There are animals that feed on dung.
They smell dung from a distance and run to it, thinking: ‘We can eat, we can eat!”
Just as brahmins run to the smell of a sacrifice, thinking: ‘We can eat, we can eat!” so too these animals that feed on dung smell dung from a distance and run to it, thinking: ‘We can eat, we can eat!”
And what animals feed on dung?
Fowls, pigs, dogs, and jackals, and any other such animals.
A fool who formerly delighted in tastes here and did evil actions here, on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappears in the company of animals that feed on dung.
“There are animals that are born, age, and die in darkness.
And what animals are born, age, and die in darkness?
Moths, maggots, and earthworms, and any other such animals.
A fool who formerly delighted in tastes here and did evil actions here, on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappears in the company of animals that are born, age, and die in darkness.
“There are animals that are born, age, and die in water.
And what animals are born, age, and die in water?
Fish, turtles, and crocodiles, and any other such animals.
A fool who formerly delighted in tastes here and did evil actions here, on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappears in the company of animals that are born, age, and die in water.
“There are animals that are born, age, and die in filth.
And what animals are born, age, and die in filth?
Those animals that are born, age, and die in a rotten fish or in a rotten corpse or in rotten dough or in a cesspit or in a sewer. A fool who formerly delighted in tastes here and did evil actions here, on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappears in the company of animals that are born, age, and die in filth.
“Bhikkhus, I could tell you in many ways about the animal kingdom, so much so that it is hard to find a simile for the suffering in the animal kingdom.
“Suppose a man threw into the sea a yoke with one hole in it,
and the east wind carried it to the west, and the west wind carried it to the east, and the north wind carried it to the south, and the south wind carried it to the north.
Suppose there were a blind turtle that came up once at the end of each century.
What do you think, bhikkhus? Would that blind turtle put his neck into that yoke with one hole in it? “ “He might, venerable sir, sometime or other at the end of a long period.”
“Bhikkhus, the blind turtle would take less time to put his neck into that yoke with a single hole in it than a fool, once gone to perdition, would take to regain the human state, I say.
Why is that?
Because there is no practising of the Dhamma there, no practising of what is righteous, no doing of what is wholesome, no performance of merit.
There mutual devouring prevails, and the slaughter of the weak.
“If, sometime or other, at the end of a long period, that fool comes back to the human state, it is into a low family that he is reborn - into a family of outcasts or hunters or bamboo-workers or cartwrights or scavengers -
yet an unlucky throw such as that is negligible;
This is the complete perfection of the fool’s grade.1201
What three?
Here a wise man is one who thinks good thoughts, speaks good words, and does good deeds.
If a wise man were not so, how would the wise know him thus: ‘This person is a wise man, a true man’?
But because a wise man is one who thinks good thoughts, speaks good words, and does good deeds, the wise know him thus: ‘This person is a wise man, a true man.’
“A wise man feels pleasure and joy here and now in three ways.
If a wise man is seated in an assembly or along a street or in a square and people there are discussing certain pertinent and relevant matters,
This is the first kind of pleasure and joy that a wise man feels here and now.
“Again, when a robber culprit is caught, a wise man sees kings having many kinds of torture inflicted on him…
…Then the wise man thinks thus: ‘Because of such evil actions as those, when a robber culprit is caught, kings have many kinds of tortures inflicted on him. Those things are not found in me, and I am not seen engaging in those things.’
This is the second land of pleasure and joy that a wise man feels here and now.
“Again, when a wise man is on his chair or on his bed or resting on the ground, then the good actions that he did in the past - his good bodily, verbal, and mental conduct - cover him, overspread him, and envelop him. Just as the shadow of a great mountain peak in the evening covers, overspreads, and envelops the earth, so too, when a wise man is on his chair or on his bed or resting on the ground, then the good actions that he did in the past - his good bodily, verbal, and mental conduct -cover him, overspread him, and envelop him.
Then the wise man thinks: ‘I have not done what is evil, I have not done what is cruel, I have not done what is wicked. I have done what is good, I have done what is wholesome, I have made myself a shelter from anguish.
When I pass away, I shall go to the destination of those who have not done what is evil…who have made themselves a shelter from anguish.’
He does not sorrow, grieve, and lament, he does not weep beating his breast and become distraught.
This is the third kind of pleasure and joy that a wise man feels here and now.
“A wise man who has given himself over to good conduct of body, speech, and mind, on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappears in a happy destination, even in heaven.
“It can, bhikkhu,” the Blessed One said.
“Bhikkhus, suppose that a Wheel-turning Monarch1203 possessed the seven treasures and the four kinds of success, and because of that experienced pleasure and joy.
“What are the seven treasures?
Here, when a head-anointed noble king has bathed his head on the Uposatha day of the fifteenth1204 and has ascended to the upper palace chamber for the Uposatha, there appears to him the divine wheel-treasure with its thousand spokes, its tire, and its nave, complete in every aspect.
On seeing it, the head-anointed noble king thinks thus: ‘Now it has been heard by me that when a head-anointed noble king has bathed his head on the Uposatha day of the fifteenth and has ascended to the upper palace chamber for the Uposatha, and there appears to him the divine wheel-treasure with its thousand spokes, its tire, and its nave, complete in every aspect, then that king becomes a Wheel-turning Monarch.
Am I then a Wheel-turning Monarch?”
“Then the head-anointed noble king rises from his seat, and taking a water vessel in his left hand, he sprinkles the wheel-treasure with his right hand, saying: ‘Turn forward, good wheel-treasure; triumph, good wheel-treasure!”
Then the wheel-treasure turns forward rolling in the eastern direction
Now in whatever region the wheel-treasure pauses, there the Wheel-turning Monarch takes up his abode with his four-constituent army.
And opposing kings in the eastern direction come to the Wheel-turning Monarch and speak thus: ‘Come, great king;
welcome, great king;
The Wheel-turning Monarch speaks thus: ‘You should not kill living beings; you should not take what has not been given; you should not misconduct yourselves in sensual pleasures; you should not speak falsehood; you should not drink intoxicants; you should eat what you are accustomed to eat.’
And the opposing kings in the eastern direction submit to the Wheel-turning Monarch.
“Then the wheel-treasure plunges into the eastern ocean and emerges again. And then it turns forward rolling in the southern direction…And the opposing kings in the southern direction submit to the Wheel-turning Monarch. Then the wheel-treasure plunges into the southern ocean and emerges again. And then it turns forward rolling in the western direction… And the opposing kings in the western direction submit to the Wheel-turning Monarch. Then the wheel-treasure plunges into the western ocean and emerges again. And then it turns forward rolling in the northern direction…
“Now when the wheel-treasure has triumphed over the earth to the ocean’s edge, it returns to the royal capital and remains as if fixed on its axle at the gate of the Wheel-turning Monarch’s inner palace, as an adornment to the gate of his inner palace.
Such is the wheel-treasure that appears to a Wheel-turning Monarch.
“Again, the elephant-treasure appears to the Wheel-turning Monarch, all white, with sevenfold stance, with supernormal power, flying through the air, the king of elephants named ‘Uposatha.’
On seeing him, the Wheel-turning Monarch’s mind has confidence in him thus: ‘It would be wonderful to ride the elephant, if he would undergo taming!”
Then the elephant-treasure undergoes taming just like a fine thoroughbred elephant well tamed for a long time.
And it so happens that the Wheel-turning Monarch, when testing the elephant-treasure, mounts him in the morning, and after traversing the whole earth to the edge of the ocean, he returns to the royal capital to take his morning meal.
Such is the elephant-treasure that appears to a Wheel-turning Monarch.
“Again, the horse-treasure appears to the Wheel-turning Monarch, all white, with raven-black head, with mane like muhja grass, with supernormal power, flying through the air, the king of horses named ‘Valahaka’ ‘Thundercloud’.
On seeing him, the Wheel-turning Monarch’s mind has confidence in him thus: ‘It would be wonderful to ride the horse, if he would undergo taming!”
Then the horse-treasure undergoes taming just like a fine thoroughbred horse well tamed for a long time.
And it so happens that the Wheel-turning Monarch, when testing the horse-treasure, mounts him in the morning, and after traversing the whole earth to the edge of the ocean, he returns to the royal capital to take his morning meal.
Such is the horse-treasure that appears to a Wheel-turning Monarch.
“Again, the jewel-treasure appears to the Wheel-turning Monarch.
The jewel is fine beryl of purest water, eight-faceted, and well cut.
Now the radiance of the jewel-treasure spreads around for a whole league.
And it so happens that when the Wheel-turning Monarch is testing the jewel-treasure, he draws up his four-constituent army in array, and mounting the jewel on top of his banner, he sets forth in the darkness and gloom of the night.
Then all the inhabitants of the villages nearby begin their work by its light, thinking that it is day.
Such is the jewel-treasure that appears to a Wheel-turning Monarch.
“Again, the woman-treasure appears to the Wheel-turning Monarch,
beautiful, comely and graceful, possessing the supreme beauty of complexion, neither too tall nor too short, neither too slim nor too stout, neither too dark nor too fair, surpassing human beauty without reaching divine beauty.
The touch of the woman-treasure is such that it is like a tuft of kapok or a tuft of cotton-wool.
When it is cool, her limbs are warm; when it is warm, her limbs are cool.
She rises before the Wheel-turning Monarch and retires after him. She is eager to serve, agreeable in conduct, and sweet in speech.
Since she is never unfaithful to the Wheel-turning Monarch even in thought, how could she be so in body?
Such is the woman-treasure that appears to a Wheel-turning Monarch.
“Again, the steward-treasure appears to the Wheel-turning Monarch.
The divine eye born of past action is manifested in him whereby he sees hidden stores of treasure both with owners and ownerless.
He approaches the Wheel-turning Monarch and says: ‘Sire, you remain at ease.
I shall take care of your monetary affairs.’
And it so happens that when the Wheel-turning Monarch is testing the steward-treasure, he boards a boat, and putting out into the river Ganges, in midstream he tells the steward-treasure: ‘I need gold and bullion, steward.’
- ‘Then, sire, let the boat be steered towards one bank.’
- ‘Steward, it is actually here that I need gold and bullion.’
Then the steward-treasure plunges both hands into the water and draws up a pot full of gold and bullion, and he tells the Wheel-turning Monarch: ‘Is this enough, sire?
Is enough done,
- “This is enough, steward,
Such is the steward-treasure that appears to a Wheel-turning Monarch.
“Again, the counsellor-treasure appears to the Wheel-turning Monarch, wise, shrewd, and sagacious, capable of getting the Wheel-turning Monarch to promote that which is worthy of being promoted, to dismiss that which should be dis-missed, and to establish that which should be established.
He approaches the Wheel-turning Monarch and says: ‘Sire, you remain at ease.
I shall govern.’
Such is the counsellor-treasure that appears to a Wheel-turning Monarch.
“These are the seven treasures that a Wheel-turning Monarch possesses.
“What are the four kinds of success?
Here a Wheel-turning Monarch is handsome, comely, and graceful, possessing the supreme beauty of complexion, and he surpasses other human beings in that respect.
This is the first kind of success that a Wheel-turning Monarch possesses.
“Again, a Wheel-turning Monarch lives long and endures long, and he surpasses other human beings in that respect.
This is the second kind of success that a Wheel-turning Monarch possesses.
“Again, a Wheel-turning Monarch is free from illness and affliction, possessing a good digestion that is neither too cool nor too warm, and he surpasses other human beings in that respect.
This is the third kind of success that a Wheel-turning Monarch possesses.
“Again, a Wheel-turning Monarch is dear and agreeable to brahmins and householders.
Just as a father is dear and agreeable to his children, so too a Wheel-turning Monarch is dear and agreeable to brahmins and householders.
Brahmins and house-holders, too, are dear and agreeable to a Wheel-turning Monarch.
Just as children are dear and agreeable to a father, so too brahmins and householders are dear and agreeable to a Wheel-turning Monarch.
Once a Wheel-turning Monarch was driving in a pleasure park with his four-constituent army.
Then brahmins and householders went to him and spoke thus: ‘Sire, drive slowly that we may see you longer.’
And so he told his charioteer: ‘Charioteer, drive slowly that I may see the brahmins and householders longer.’
This is the fourth kind of success that a Wheel-turning Monarch possesses.
“These are the four kinds of success that a Wheel-turning Monarch possesses.
“What do you think, bhikkhus? Would a Wheel-turning Monarch experience pleasure and joy because of possessing these seven treasures and these four kinds of success?”
“Venerable sir, a Wheel-turning Monarch would experience pleasure and joy because of possessing even one treasure, let alone seven treasures and four kinds of success.”
Then, taking a small stone the size of his hand, the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus thus: “What do you think, bhikkhus? Which is the greater, this small stone that I have taken, the size of my hand, or Himalaya, the king of mountains?”
“Venerable sir, the small stone that the Blessed One has taken, the size of his hand, does not count beside Himalaya, the king of mountains; it is not even a fraction, there is no comparison.”
“So too, bhikkhus, the pleasure and joy that a Wheel-turning Monarch would experience because of possessing the seven treasures and the four kinds of success does not count beside the happiness of heaven; it is not even a fraction, there is no comparison.
“If, some time or other, at the end of a long period, the wise man comes back to the human state, it is into a high family that he is reborn - into a family of well-to-do nobles, or well-to-do brahmins, or well-to-do householders - one that is rich,-of great wealth, of great possessions, with abundant gold and silver, with abundant assets and means, and with abundant money and grain.
He is handsome, comely and graceful, possessing the supreme beauty of complexion. He obtains food and drink, clothes, vehicles, garlands, scents and unguents, bed, lodging, and light.
He conducts himself well in body, speech, and mind,
“Bhikkhus, suppose a gambler at the very first lucky throw won a great fortune, yet a lucky throw such as that is negligible;
That is what the Blessed One said.
The bhikkhus were satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
“Bhikkhus, there are these three characteristics of a fool, signs of a fool, attributes of a fool.
This is the first kind of pain and grief that a fool feels here and now.
it is of hell that, rightly speaking, this should be said, so much so that it is hard to find a simile for the suffering in hell.”
It has four corners and is built With four doors, one set in each side,
Walled up with iron and all around And shut in with an iron roof.
one that is poor with little to eat and drink, surviving with difficulty, where he scarcely finds food and clothing;
and he is ugly, unsightly, and misshapen, sickly, blind, cripple-handed, lame, or paralysed; he gets no food, drink, clothes, vehicles, garlands, scents and unguents, bed, lodging, and light;
Bound together by bones and sinews,plastered with skin and flesh,
with snot and saliva,with sweat and fat,
Further, from its nine openings impurity flows constantly:
Then its hollow head is filled with the brain.
Led on by ignorance, the fool conceives it as beautiful.
And when it is lying dead, bloated and discolored,
Dogs then devour it,as do jackals, wolves, and worms;
Having heard the Word of the Buddha, a bhikkhu possessing wisdom here
internally and externally one should expunge desire for the body.
That bhikkhu possessing wisdom here who has expunged desire and lust
This two-footed body, impure and foul-smelling, is cherished,
One who, because of such a body, would think to exalt himself
or who would disparage others—what is this due to but lack of vision?
When one is walking or standing,sitting or lying down,
when one bends and stretches—this is the motion of the body.
covered by the epidermis, the body is not seen as it really is—
as filled with intestines, filled with the stomach,with the liver and bladder,
the heart, lungs, kidneys, and spleen;
with blood and oil of the joints,with bile and grease.
snot from the nostrils; and from the mouth one sometimes vomits
bile and vomits phlegm; sweat and dirt flow from the body.
muck from the eyes,wax from the ears,
crows and vultures devour it,and whatever other beings there are.
fully understands it,because he sees it as it really is:
“As this, so that;as that, so this”:
has attained the deathless, peace,the imperishable state of nibbāna.
though filled with various kinds of filth and oozing here and there.
cast off in a charnel ground, the relatives are unconcerned with it.
he misconducts himself in body, speech, arid mind, and having done that,
on the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in a state of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, even in hell.
it is a far more unlucky throw when a fool who misconducts himself in body, speech, and mind, on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappears in a state of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, even in hell.
“Bhikkhus, there are these three characteristics of a wise man, signs of a wise man, attributes of a wise man.
then, if the wise man is one who abstains from killing living beings, from taking what is not given, from misconduct in sensual pleasures, from false speech, from wine, liquor, and intoxicants, which are the basis of negligence, he thinks: ‘These people are discussing certain pertinent and relevant matters; those things are not found in me, and I am not seen engaging in them.’1202
“Were it rightly speaking to be said of anything: ‘That is utterly wished for, utterly desired, utterly agreeable,’ it is of heaven that, rightly speaking, this should be said,
so much so that it is hard to find a simile for the happiness of heaven.”
When this was said, a bhikkhu asked the Blessed One: “But, venerable sir, can a simile be given?”
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Jetavana with reference to three religious.
The story goes that in a certain household at Sāvatthi there was an only son, who was the darling and delight of his mother and father.
One day some monks were invited to take a meal at the house, and when they had finished, they recited the words of thanksgiving. As the youth listened to the words of the Law, he was seized with a desire to become a monk, and straightway asked leave of his mother and father.
They refused to permit him to do so.
Thereupon the following thought occurred to him, “When my mother and father are not looking, I will leave the house and become a monk.”
Now whenever the father left the house, he committed the son to the care of his mother, saying, “Pray keep him safe and sound;”and whenever the mother left the house, she committed the son to the care of the father.
One day, after the father had left the house, the mother said to herself, “I will indeed keep my son safe and sound.” So she braced one foot against one of the door-posts and the other foot against the other door-post, and sitting thus on the ground, began to spin her thread.
The youth thought to himself, “I will outwit her and escape.” So he said to his mother, “Dear mother, just remove your foot a little; I wish to attend to nature’s needs.” She drew back her foot and he went out. He went to the monastery as fast as he could, and approaching the monks, said, “Receive me into the Order, Reverend Sirs.” The monks complied with his request and admitted him to the Order.
When his father returned to the house, he asked the mother, “Where is my son?”
“Husband, he was here but a moment ago.”
“Where can my son be?” thought the father, looking about. Seeing him nowhere, he came to the conclusion, “He must have gone to the monastery.” So the father went to the monastery, and seeing his son garbed in the robes of a monk, wept and lamented and said, “Dear son, why do you destroy me?” But after a moment he thought to himself, “Now that my son has become a monk, why should I live the life of a layman any longer?” So of his own accord, he also asked the monks to receive him into the Order, and then and there retired from the world and became a monk.
The mother of the youth thought to herself, “Why are my son and my husband tarrying so long?” Looking all about, she suddenly thought, “Undoubtedly they have gone to the monastery and become monks.” So she went to the monastery and seeing both her son and her husband wearing the robes of monks, thought to herself, “Since both my son and my husband have become monks, what further use have I for the house-life?” And of her own accord, she went to the community of nuns and retired from the world.
But even after mother and father and son had retired from the world and adopted the religious life, they were unable to remain apart; whether in the monastery or in the convent of the nuns, they would sit down by themselves and spend the day chatting together.
The monks and nuns were repelled by their conduct,
and one day the monks told the Teacher what was going on.
The Teacher sent for them and asked them, “Is the report true that you are doing this and that?” They replied in the affirmative. Then said the Teacher, “Why do you do so?
This is not the proper way for monks and nuns to conduct themselves.”
“But, Reverend Sir, it is impossible for us to live apart.”
“From the time of retirement from the world, such conduct is highly improper;
it is painful both to be deprived of the sight of those who are dear, and to be obliged to look upon that which is not dear;
or this reason, whether persons or material things be involved, one should take no account either of what is dear or of what is not dear.” So saying, the Teacher pronounced the following Stanza
He who abandons himself to the distractions of this world, He who fails to apply himself to his religious duties,
He who abandons the real purpose of life, he who grasps at what is dear to him, Such a man will come to envy him who applies himself to his religious duties.
It is painful, both to be deprived of the sight of those who are dear, and to be obliged to look upon those who are not dear.
Never abide in the company of those who are dear or of those who are not dear;
Therefore hold nothing dear; for the loss of what is dear is an evil.
Fetters exist not for those to whom naught is either dear or not dear.
and the Wheel-turning Monarch follows it with his four-constituent army.
command, great king;
advise, great king.’
And the opposing kings in the northern direction submit to the Wheel-turning Monarch.
From her body the scent of sandalwood comes forth, and from her mouth the scent of lotuses.
enough offered?”
enough is done,
enough offered.’
and having done so, on the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world.
it is a far more lucky throw when a wise man who conducts himself well in body, speech, and mind, on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappears in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world.1205
This is the complete perfection of the wise man’s grade.”
and have his head cut off with a sword. Those things are found in me, and I am seen engaging in those things.’
But, friend, do you remember the summary and exposition of ‘One Who Has One Fortunate Attachment’?”
On one occasion the Blessed One was dwelling among the Sakyans at Kapilavatthu in the Banyan Tree Park.
Then Mahanama the Sakyan approached the Blessed One, paid hom­age to him, sat down to one side,
and said to him:“In what way, Bhante, is one a lay follower?
“‘When, Mahanama, one has gone for refuge to the Bud­dha, the Dhamma, and the Sahgha, in that way one is a lay follower.
‘“In what way, Bhante, is a lay follower virtuous?
“‘When, Mahanama, a lay follower abstains from the destruction of life, from taking what is not given, from sexual misconduct, from false speech, and from liquor, wine, and intoxicants, the basis for heedlessness, in that way a lay fol­lower is virtuous.”
“In what way, Bhante, is a lay follower practicing for his own welfare but not for the welfare of others?
“ “When, Mahanama, a lay follower is himself accom­plished in faith but does not encourage others to accomplish faith; when he is himself accomplished in virtuous behav­ior but does not encourage others to accomplish virtuous behavior; when he is himself accomplished in generosity but does not encourage others to accomplish generosity; when he himself wants to see bhikkhus but does not encour­age others to see bhikkhus; when he himself wants to hear the good Dhamma but does not encourage others to hear the good Dhamma; when he himself retains in mind the teach­ings he has heard but does not encourage others to retain the teachings in mind; when he himself examines the meaning of the teachings that have been retained in mind but does not encourage others to examine their meaning; when he him­self has understood the meaning and the Dhamma and prac­tices in accordance with the Dhamma, but does not encourage others to do so:
“In what way, Bhante, is a lay follower practicing for his own welfare and for the welfare of others?
‘ “When, Mahanama, a lay follower is himself accomplished in faith and also encourages others to accomplish faith; when he is himself accomplished in virtuous behavior and also encour­ages others to accomplish virtuous behavior; when he is himself accomplished in generosity and also encourages others to accomplish generosity; when he himself wants to see bhik­khus and also encourages others to see bhikkhus; when he himself wants, to hear the good Dhamma and also encourages others to hear the good Dhamma; when he himself retains in mind the teachings he has heard and also encourages others to retain the teachings in mind; when he himself examines the meaning of the teachings that have been retained in mind and also encourages others to examine their meaning; whenhe himself understands the meaning and the Dhamma and then practices in accordance with the Dhamma, and also encourages others to practice in accordance with the Dhamma:
it is in this way, Mahanama, that a lay follower is practicing for his own welfare but not for the welfare of others.
it is in this way, Mahanama, that a lay follower is practicing for his own welfare and also for the welfare of others.”
Then the householder Anathapindika, accompanied by five hundred lay followers, approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
The Blessed One then addressed the Venerable Sariputta: “You should know, Sariputta, that any white-robed householder whose actions are restrained by five training rules and who gains at will, without trouble or difficulty, four pleasant visible dwellings that pertain to the higher mind, might, if he so wished, declare of himself: I am finished with hell, the animal realm, and the sphere of afflicted spirits; I am finished with the plane of misery, the bad destination, the lower world; I am a stream-enterer, no longer subject to rebirth in the lower world, fixed in destiny, heading for enlightenment.”
“What are the five training rules by which his actions are restrained?
Here, Sariputta, a noble disciple abstains from the destruction of life, from taking what is not given, from sexual misconduct, from false speech, and from liquor, wine, and intoxicants, the basis for heedlessness.
His actions are restrained by these five training rules.”
What are the four pleasant visible dwellings that pertain to the higher mind, which he gains at will, without trouble or difficulty?
“Here, the noble disciple possesses unwavering confidence in the Buddha thus: The Blessed One is an arahant, perfectly enlightened, accomplished in true knowledge and conduct, for­tunate, knower of the world, unsurpassed trainer of persons to be tamed, teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.
This is the first pleasant visible dwell­ing that pertains to the higher mind, which he has achieved for the purification of the impure mind, for the cleansing of the unclean mind.
“Again, the noble disciple possesses unwavering confi­dence in the Dhamma thus: The Dhamma is well expounded by the Blessed One, directly visible, immediate, inviting one to come and see, applicable, to be personally experienced by the wise.”
This is the second pleasant visible dwelling that pertains to the higher mind, which he has achieved for the purification of the impure mind, for the cleansing of the unclean mind.
This is the third pleasant visible dwelling that pertains to the higher mind, which he has achieved for the purification of the impure mind, for the cleansing of the unclean mind.
These are the four pleasant visible dwellings that pertain to the higher mind, which he gains at will, without trouble or difficulty.”
You should know, Sariputta, that any white-robed house­holder whose actions are restrained by these five training rules and who gains at will, without trouble or difficulty, these four pleasant visible dwellings that pertain to the higher mind, might, if he so wished, declare of himself: I am finished with hell, the animal realm, and the sphere of afflicted spirits; I am finished with the plane of misery, the bad destination, the lower world; I am a stream-enterer, no longer subject to rebirth in the lower world, fixed in destiny, heading for enlightenment.”
Having seen the peril in the hells,one should avoid evil deeds;
having undertaken the noble Dhamma, the wise one should avoid them.
To the utmost of one’s ability, one should not injure living beings;
One should recollect the Buddha and ponder on the Dhamma.
One should develop, a benevolent mind, which leads to the world of the devas.
When things to be given are available,for one needing and wanting merit1176
I will describe the holy ones, Sariputta, listen to me.1177
They yoke the burden just to him;they are not concerned about his color.
So too, among human beings it is in any kind of birth—
one who has abandoned birth and death,consummate in the spiritual life,
Fools devoid of understanding, dull-witted, unlearned,
Those, however, who attend on the holy ones, on the wise ones esteemed as sagely,
Advancing in successive steps, those wise ones attain nibbana.
“Again, the noble disciple possesses unwavering confi­dence in the Sangha thus: ‘The Sangha of the Blessed One’s disciples is practicing the good way, practicing the straightway, practicing the true way, practicing the proper way; that is, the four pairs of persons, the eight types of individual — this Sangha of the Blessed One’s disciples is worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of reverential saluta­tion, the unsurpassed field of merit for the world.”
“Again, the noble disciple possesses the virtuous behav­ior loved by the noble ones, unbroken, flawless, unblemished, unblotched, freeing, praised by the wise, ungrasped, leading to concentration.
This is the fourth pleasant visible dwelling that pertains to the higher mind, which he has achieved for the purification of the impure mind, for the cleansing of the unclean mind.”
one should not knowingly speak falsely; one should not take what is not given.
One should be content with one’s own wives1174 and should refrain from the wives of others.1175
A person should not drink wine and liquor, which cause mental confusion.
an offering becomes vast if first given to the holy ones.
whether black, white, red, or golden,
mottled, uniform, or pigeon-colored,
Among cattle of any sort the tamed bull is born,
the one that can bear the load, possessing strength, advancing with good speed.
among khattiyas, brahmins, vessas,suddas, candalas, or scavengers—
among people of any sort that the tamed person of good manners is born:
one firm in Dhamma, virtuous in conduct, truthful in speech, endowed with moral shame;
with the burden dropped, detached,who has done his task, free of taints;
who has gone beyond all things of the world and by non-clinging has reached nibbana:
an offering is truly vast when planted in that spotless field.
do not attend on the holy ones but give their gifts to those outside.
and those whose faith in the Fortunate One is deeply rooted and well established,
go to the world of the devas or are born here in a good family.
told the Blessed One all that had occurred, and said:
“It would be good, venerable sir, if the Blessed One would teach me the summary and exposition of ‘One Who Has One Fortunate Attachment.’“
“Let not a person revive the past Or on the future build his hopes;
For the past has been left behind And the future has not been reached.
Let him know that and be sure of it, Invincibly, unshakeably.
It is he, the Peaceful Sage has said, Who has one fortunate attachment.”
Now who will expound this in detail?”
and they told him what had taken place, adding: “Let the venerable Maha Kaccana expound it to us.”
I will tell of the going forth,how the One with Vision went forth,
“This home life is confinement,a basis for dust;
Having gone forth, he avoided evil deeds with his body.
The Buddha went to Rājagaha,the city Giribbaja of the Magadhans.
While standing in his palace, Bimbisāra caught sight of him.
“With downcast eyes, mindful,it seems he is not from a low family.
Let the king’s messengers run out. Find out where the bhikkhu will go.”
Walking on alms without skipping houses,his sense doors guarded,
Having walked on alms round,the muni departed from the city.
Having seen that he had entered his dwelling, the messengers then123 approached;
“Great king, this bhikkhu lives on the eastern side of Paṇḍava.
Having gone along the ground for vehicles,the khattiya descended from his vehicle;
having approached on foot,he arrived and entered.
Having sat down, the king greeted him and then made polite conversation.
“ while shining at the head of an army, accompanied by a troop of bull elephants.
“I am by clan an Ādicca, by birth I am a Sakyan.
“Having seen the danger in sensual pleasures,having seen renunciation as security,
“Sirs, look at him, handsome, stately, pure;
The messengers sent by the king followed closely behind him,thinking:
Having heard the messenger’s report,the khattiya set out in a fine vehicle.
“You are young, a lad, a youth in the prime of life,
“There is, O king, a country straight ahead,on the slope of the Himalayas,
how, while investigating, he approved of the going forth.
the going forth is like122 an open space”:having seen this, he went forth.
Having abandoned verbal misconduct,he purified his livelihood.
Adorned with the excellent marks,he walked for alms in the city.
Having seen him endowed with the marks,he uttered this statement:
endowed with good conduct,he looks a mere yoke’s length ahead.
“Where will the bhikkhu go? Where is his dwelling place?”
well restrained, clearly comprehending, ever mindful, he quickly filled up his bowl.
He ascended Mount Paṇḍava:“His dwelling place must be here!”
but one messenger returned and informed the king:
He sits in a mountain cavern like a tiger, a bull, or a lion.”
Hurriedly, he departed in the direction of Paṇḍava Mountain.
When the courtesies were finished, he then uttered this statement:
endowed with beauty and stature, like a well-born khattiya.
I will give you wealth—enjoy it. Being asked, tell me your birth.”
abounding in wealth and energy,ruled by one native to the Kosalans.
I have gone forth from that family, O king, not longing for sensual pleasures.
I will go for the purpose of striving:it is here that my mind delights.”
“Friends, when the Blessed One rose from his seat and went into his dwelling after giving a summary in brief without expounding the detailed meaning, that is:
Who has one fortunate attachment.
‘Let not a person revive the past…
Who has one fortunate attachment,’
I understand the detailed meaning of this summary to be thus.
and so you should remember it.”
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Kosambi in Ghosita’s Park.
Now on that occasion the bhikkhus at Kosambi had taken to quarrelling and brawling and were deep in disputes, stabbing each other with verbal daggers.1186
It would be good, venerable sir, if the Blessed One would go to those bhikkhus out of compassion.”
The Blessed One consented in silence.
Then the Blessed One went to those bhikkhus and said to them: “Enough, bhikkhus, let there be no quarrelling, brawling, wrangling, or dispute.”
When this was said, a certain bhikkhu said to the Blessed One: “Wait, venerable sir!
Let the Blessed One, the Lord of the Dhamma, live at ease devoted to a pleasant abiding here and now. We are the ones who will be responsible for this quarrelling, brawling, wrangling, and dispute.”
For a second time…
For a third time that bhikkhu said to the Blessed One: “Wait, venerable sir! …We are the ones who will be responsible for this quarrelling, brawling, wrangling, and dispute.”
Then, when it was morning, the Blessed One dressed, and taking his bowl and outer robe, entered Kosambi for alms.
“When many voices shout at once None considers himself a fool;
They have forgotten thoughtful speech, They talk obsessed by words alone.
Uncurbed their mouths, they bawl at will; None knows what leads him so to act.
‘He abused me, he struck me,1187 He defeated me, he robbed me’ -
For in this world hatred is never Allayed by further acts of hate.
It is allayed by non-hatred: That is the fixed and ageless law.
Those others do not recognise That here we should restrain ourselves.
But those wise ones who realise this At once end all their enmity.
Breakers of bones and murderers, Those who steal cattle, horses, wealth,
If one can find a worthy friend,
But if one finds no worthy friend,
Better it is to walk alone, There is no companionship with fools.
Walk alone and do no evil,
Then, having uttered these stanzas while standing, the Blessed One went to the village of Balakalonakara.
On that occasion the venerable Bhagu was living at the village of Balakalonakara.
When the venerable Bhagu saw the Blessed One coming in the distance,
The Blessed One sat down on the seat
The venerable Bhagu paid homage to the Blessed One and sat down at one side,
“I am keeping well, Blessed One, I am comfortable, and I am not having any trouble getting almsfood.”
Then the Blessed One instructed, urged, roused, and encouraged the venerable Bhagu with talk on the Dhamma, after which he rose from his seat and went to the Eastern Bamboo Park.
Now on that occasion the venerable Anuruddha, the venerable Nandiya and the venerable Kimbila were living at the Eastern Bamboo Park.1188
There are three clansmen here seeking their own good.
Do not disturb them.”
The venerable Anuruddha heard the park keeper speaking to the Blessed One
It is our Teacher, the Blessed One, who has come.”
Then the venerable Anuruddha went to the venerable Nandiya and the venerable Kimbila and said: “Come out, venerable sirs, come out! Our Teacher, the Blessed One, has come.”
Then all three went to meet the Blessed One. One took his bowl and outer robe, one prepared a seat, and one set out water for washing the feet.
The Blessed One sat down on the seat made ready
Then those three venerable ones paid homage to the Blessed One and sat down at one side,
and the Blessed One said to them: “I hope you are all keeping well, Anuruddha, I hope you are comfortable, I hope you are not having any trouble getting almsfood.”
“We are keeping well, Blessed One, we are comfortable, and we are not having any trouble getting almsfood.”
“I hope, Anuruddha, that you are all living in concord, with mutual appreciation, without disputing, blending like milk and water, viewing each other with kindly eyes.”
“Surely, venerable sir, we are living in concord, with mutual appreciation, without disputing, blending like milk and water, viewing each other with kindly eyes.”
“But, Anuruddha, how do you live thus?”
“Venerable sir, as to that, I think thus: ‘It is a gain for me, it is a great gain for me that I am living with such companions in the holy life.’
I maintain bodily acts of loving-kindness towards these venerable ones both openly and privately; I maintain verbal acts of loving-kindness towards them both openly and privately; I maintain mental acts of loving-kindness towards them both openly and privately.
I consider: ‘Why should I not set aside what I wish to do and do what these venerable ones wish to do?”
Then I set aside what I wish to do and do what these venerable ones wish to do.
We are different in body, venerable sir, but one in mind.”
The venerable Nandiya and the venerable Kimbila each spoke likewise, adding:
“Good, good, Anuruddha.
I hope that you all abide diligent, ardent, and resolute.”
“Surely, venerable sir, we abide diligent, ardent, and resolute.”
“But, Anuruddha, how do you abide thus?”
“Venerable sir, as to that, whichever of us returns first from the village with almsfood prepares the seats, sets out the water for drinking and for washing, and puts the refuse bucket in its place.
Whichever of us returns last eats any food left over, if he wishes; otherwise he throws it away where there is no greenery or drops it into water where there is no life. He puts away the seats and the water for drinking and for washing. He puts away the refuse bucket after washing it, and he sweeps out the refectory.
Whoever notices that the pots of water for drinking, washing, or the latrine are low or empty takes care of them.
If they are too heavy for him, he calls someone else by a signal of the hand and they move it by joining hands, but because of this we do not break out into speech.
But every five days we sit together all night discussing the Dhamma.
That is how we abide diligent, ardent, and resolute.”
“Good, good, Anuruddha.
But while you abide thus diligent, ardent, and resolute, have you attained any superhuman states, a distinction in knowledge and vision worthy of the noble ones, a comfortable abiding?”
“Venerable sir, as we abide here diligent, ardent, and resolute, we perceive both light and a vision of forms.1189
“You should discover the cause for that,1190 Anuruddha.
Before my enlightenment, while I was still only an unenlightened Bodhisatta, I too perceived both light and a vision of forms.
I thought: ‘What is the cause and condition why the light and the vision of forms have disappeared?”
Then I considered thus: ‘Doubt arose in me, and because of the doubt my concentration fell away;
I shall so act that doubt will not arise in me again.’
“As, Anuruddha, I was abiding diligent, ardent, and resolute, I perceived both light and a vision of forms.
I thought: ‘What is the cause and condition why the light and the vision of forms have disappeared?”
Then I considered thus: ‘Inattention arose in me, and because of inattention my concentration fell away;
I shall so act that neither doubt nor inattention will arise in me again.’
“As, Anuruddha, I was abiding diligent…I considered thus: ‘Sloth and torpor arose in me, and because of sloth and torpor my concentration fell away;
I shall so act that neither doubt nor inattention nor sloth and torpor will arise in me again.’
“As, Anuruddha, I was abiding diligent… considered thus: ‘Fear arose in me, and because of fear my concentration fell away;
Suppose a man set out on a journey and murderers leaped out on both sides of him; then fear would arise in him because of that. So too, fear arose in me…
I considered thus: ‘I shall so act that neither doubt nor inattention nor sloth and torpor nor fear will arise in me again.’
“As, Anuruddha, I was abiding diligent…I considered thus: ‘Elation arose in me, and because of elation my concentration fell away;
Suppose a man seeking one entrance to a hidden treasure came all at once upon five entrances to a hidden treasure;1191 then elation would arise in him because of that. So too, elation arose in me…
I considered thus: ‘I shall so act that neither doubt nor inattention…nor fear nor elation will arise in me again.’
“As, Anuruddha, I was abiding diligent…I considered thus: ‘Inertia arose in me, and because of inertia my concentration fell away;
I shall so act that neither doubt nor inattention…nor elation nor inertia will arise in me again.’
“As, Anuruddha, I was abiding diligent…I considered thus: ‘Excess of energy arose in me, and because of excess of energy my concentration fell away;
Suppose a man were to grip a quail tightly with both hands; it would die then and there. So too, an excess of energy arose in me…
I considered thus: ‘I shall so act that neither doubt nor inattention…nor inertia nor excess of energy will arise in me again.’
“As, Anuruddha, I was abiding diligent…I considered thus: ‘Deficiency of energy arose in me, and because of deficiency of energy my concentration fell away;
Suppose a man were to grip a quail loosely; it would fly out of his hands. So too, a deficiency of energy arose in me…
I considered thus: ‘I shall so act that neither doubt nor inattention…nor excess of energy nor deficiency of energy will arise in me again.’
“As, Anuruddha, I was abiding diligent…I considered thus: ‘Longing arose in me, and because of that longing my concentration fell away;
I shall so act that neither doubt nor inattention…nor deficiency of energy nor longing will arise in me again.’
“As, Anuruddha, I was abiding diligent…I considered thus: ‘Perception of diversity arose in me,1192 and because of perception of diversity my concentration fell away;
I shall so act that neither doubt nor inattention…nor longing nor perception of diversity will arise in me again.’
“As, Anuruddha, I was abiding diligent…
I shall so act that neither doubt nor inattention…nor perception of diversity nor excessive meditation upon forms will arise in me again.’
“When, Anuruddha, I understood that doubt is an imperfection of the mind and had abandoned doubt, an imperfection of the mind; when I understood that inattention is an imperfection of the mind and had abandoned inattention… abandoned sloth and torpor…abandoned fear…abandoned elation… abandoned inertia…abandoned excess of energy…abandoned deficiency of energy…abandoned longing…abandoned perception of diversity…abandoned excessive meditation upon forms, an imperfection of the mind;
Let me now develop Concentration in three ways.’1195
“Thereupon, Anuruddha, I developed concentration with applied thought and sustained thought; I developed concentration without applied thought but with sustained thought only; I developed concentration without applied thought and without sustained thought; I developed concentration with rapture; I developed concentration without rapture; I developed concentration accompanied by enjoyment; I developed concentration accompanied by equanimity.1196
That is what the Blessed One said.
The venerable Anuruddha was satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
“Bhikkhus, suppose a gambler at the very first unlucky throw loses his child and his wife and all his property and furthermore goes into bondage himself,
The venerable Maha Kaccana expounded the meaning to us with these terms, statements, and phrases.”
adding: “Then, venerable sir, we went to the venerable Maha Kaccana and asked him about the meaning.
Then a certain bhikkhu went to the Blessed One, and after paying homage to him, he stood at one side
and said: “Venerable sir, the bhikkhus here at Kosambi have taken to quarrelling and brawling and are deep in disputes, stabbing each other with verbal daggers.
For a third time the Blessed One said: “Enough, bhikkhus, let there be no quarrelling, brawling, wrangling, or dispute.”
When he had wandered for alms in Kosambi and had returned from his almsround, after his meal he set his resting place in order, took his bowl and outer robe, and while still standing uttered these stanzas:
Though the Sangha is being split None thinks himself to be at fault.
By what track can you trace that trackless Buddha of limitless range?
By what track can you trace that trackless Buddha of limitless range?
“Eye-disease” should be understood as disease of the physical basis of sight,
for sensitivity when produced is not subject to disease.
“Produced by change of climate” is a disease arisen through change from a very hot to a very cold climate;
“By unaccustomed activity:” produced by bodily behaviour, such as standing, sitting, burden-carrying, etc., that is different from one’s normal habit.
“By violence:” produced by other’s violence, by torture, etc.
Not even a god, an angel, Mara or Brahma
can turn into defeat the victory
In those who harbour thoughts like these Hatred will never be allayed.
Those who pillage the entire realm -When even these can act together
Why can you not do so too?
Then overcome all threats of danger
A virtuous, steadfast companion,
And walk with him content and mindful.
No virtuous, steadfast companion,
Then as a king leaves his conquered realm,
Walk like a tusker in the woods alone.
At ease like a tusker in the woods.”
he prepared a seat and set out water for washing the feet.
made ready and washed his feet.
and the Blessed One said to him: “I hope you are keeping well, bhikkhu, I hope you are comfortable, I hope you are not having any trouble getting almsfood.”
The park keeper saw the Blessed One coming in the distance
and told him: “Do not enter this park, recluse.
and told him: “Friend park keeper, do not keep the Blessed One out.
and washed his feet.
“That is how, venerable sir, we are living in concord, with mutual appreciation, without disputing, blending like milk and water, viewing each other with kindly eyes.”
Soon afterwards the light and the vision of forms disappear, but we have not discovered the cause for that.”
Soon afterwards the light and the vision of forms disappeared.
when my concentration fell away, the light and the vision of forms disappeared.
Soon afterward the light and the vision of forms disappeared.
when my concentration fell away, the light and the vision of forms disappeared.
when my concentration fell away, the light and the vision of forms disappeared.
when my concentration fell away, the light and the vision of forms disappeared.’
the light and the vision of forms disappeared.
when my concentration fell away, the light and the vision of forms disappeared.’
the light and the vision of forms disappeared.
when my concentration fell away, the light and the vision of forms disappeared.
when my concentration fell away, the light and the vision of forms disappeared.’
the light and the vision of forms disappeared.
when my concentration fell away, the light and the vision of forms disappeared.’
the light and the vision of forms disappeared.
when my concentration fell away, the light and the vision of forms disappeared.
when my concentration fell away, the light and the vision of forms disappeared.
when my concentration fell away, the light and the vision of forms disappeared.
“When, bhikkhus, King Yama has questioned, interrogated,and cross-examined him about the third divine m essenger, he falls silent.
Then the wardens of hell torture him with the fivefold transfixing.
They drive a red-hot iron stake through one hand
and another red-hot iron stake through the other hand;
they drive a red-hot iron stake through one foot
and an other red-hot iron stake through the other foot;
they drive a red-hot iron stake through the middle of his chest.
There he feels pain­ful, racking, piercing feelings,382 yet he does not die so long as that bad kamma is not exhausted.
“Next the wardens of hell throw him down and pare him with axes.
There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings, yet he does not die so long as that bad kamma is not exhausted.
Next the wardens of hell turn him upside down and pare him with adzes. Next the wardens of hell harness him to a chariot and drive him back and forth across ground that is burning, blaz­ing, and glowing… .Next the wardens of hell make him climb up and down a great mound of coals that are burning, blazing,and glowing…. Next the wardens of hell turn him upside down and plunge him into a red-hot copper cauldron that is burning, blazing, and glowing. He is cooked there in a swirl of foam.
And as he is being cooked there in a swirl of foam, he is swept now up, now down, and now across.
There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings, yet he does not die so long as that bad kamma is not exhausted.
“Next the wardens of hell throw him into the great hell.
Now, bhikkhus, as to that great hell:
“It has four corners and four doors and is divided into separate compartments;
it is surrounded by iron ramparts and shut in with an iron roof.
“Its floor as well is made of iron and heated till it glows with fire.
The range is a full hundred yojanas which it ever covers pervasively.
“Once, bhikkhus, in the past King Yama thought: ‘Those in the world who do evil deeds are punished with such diverse tor­tures.
Oh, that I might attain the human state! That a Tathagata, Arahant, Perfectly Enlightened One might arise in the world! That I might attend upon that Blessed One!
That the Blessed One might teach me the Dhamma, and that I might come to understand his Dhamma!’“
Bhikkhus, I am not repeating something that I heard from another ascetic or brahmin, but rather I am speaking about a matter that I have actually known, seen, and understood myself.
Having overcome all enmity and peril,they have transcended all suffering.
those happy ones have attained security;383 they have reached nibbana in this very life.
are liberated by non-clinging in the extinction of birth and death:
who, having seen the peril in clinging as the origin of birth and death,
never become heedless in regard to the noble Dhamma;
But those good people here who,when warned by the divine messengers,
sorrow for a long time, having fared on to a lower realm.
“Though warned by the divine messengers, those people who remain heedless
then I thought: ‘I have abandoned those imperfections of the mind.
“When, Anuruddha, I had developed concentration with applied thought and sustained thought…when I had developed concentration accompanied by equanimity,
the knowledge and vision arose in me: ‘My deliverance is unshakeable;
this is my last birth; now there is no renewal of being.’“
I considered thus: ‘Excessive meditation upon forms arose in me,1193 and because of excessive meditation upon forms my concentration fell away;
“When, Anuruddha, I understood that doubt is an imperfection of the mind,1194 I abandoned doubt, an imperfection of the mind. When I understood that inattention…sloth and torpor… fear… elation… inertia… excess of energy…deficiency of energy…longing…perception of diversity…excessive meditation upon forms is an imperfection of the mind, I abandoned excessive meditation upon forms, an imperfection of the mind.
“As, Anuruddha, I was abiding diligent, ardent, and resolute, I perceived light but I did not see forms; I saw forms but I did not perceive light, even for a whole night or a whole day or a whole day and night.
I thought: ‘What is the cause and condition for this? ‘
“As, Anuruddha, I was abiding diligent, ardent, and resolute, I perceived limited light and saw limited forms; I perceived immeasurable light and saw immeasurable forms, even for a whole night or a whole day or a whole day and night.
I thought: ‘What is the cause and condition for this? ‘
Then I considered thus: ‘On the occasion when concentration is limited, my vision is limited,
and with limited vision I perceive limited light and limited forms.
But on the occasion when concentration is immeasurable, my vision is immeasurable, and with immeasurable vision I perceive immeasurable light and see immeasurable forms,
even for a whole night or a whole day or a whole day and night.’
Then I considered thus: ‘On the occasion when I do not attend to the sign of forms but attend to the sign of light, I then perceive light but do not see forms.
On the occasion when I do not attend to the sign of light but attend to the sign of forms, I then see forms but do not perceive light, even for a whole night or a whole day or a whole day and night.’
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Savatthi in Jeta’s Grove, Anathapindika’s Park.
Then the carpenter Pancakanga addressed a certain man thus: “Come, good man, go to the venerable Anuruddha, pay homage in my name with your head at his feet, and say: ‘Venerable sir, the carpenter Pancakanga pays homage with his head at the venerable Anuruddha’s feet and says: “Venerable sir, let the venerable Anuruddha with three others consent to accept tomorrow’s meal from the carpenter Pancakanga; and let the venerable Anuruddha arrive punctually as the carpenter Pancakanga is very busy and has much work to do for the king.’“
“Yes, sir,” that man replied, and he went to the venerable Anuruddha. After paying homage to the venerable Anuruddha, he sat down at one side
The venerable Anuruddha consented in silence.
Then, when the night had ended, it being morning, the venerable Anuruddha dressed, and taking his bowl and outer robe, he went to the carpenter Pancakanga’s house and sat down on a seat made ready.
Then, with his own hands, the carpenter Pancakanga served and satisfied the venerable Anuruddha with the various kinds of good food.
Then, when the venerable Anuruddha had eaten and had withdrawn his hand from his bowl, the carpenter Pancakanga took a low seat, sat down at one side,
Venerable sir, the immeasurable deliverance of mind and the exalted deliverance of mind1180 are these states different in meaning and different in name, or are they one in meaning and different only in name?”
“Explain it as you see it, householder.
Afterwards it will be cleared up for you.”
“Venerable sir, I think thus: the immeasurable deliverance of mind and the exalted deliverance of mind - these states are one in meaning and different only in name.”
“Householder, the immeasurable deliverance of mind and the exalted deliverance of mind - these states are different in meaning and different in name.
And it should be understood as follows how these states are different in meaning and different in name.
“What, householder, is the immeasurable deliverance of mind?
Here a bhikkhu abides pervading one quarter with a mind imbued with loving-kindness, likewise the second, likewise the third, likewise the fourth; so above, below, around, and everywhere, and to all as to himself, he abides pervading the all-encompassing world with a mind imbued with loving-kindness, abundant, exalted, immeasurable, without hostility and without ill will.
He abides pervading one quarter with a mind imbued with compassion…He abides pervading one quarter with a mind imbued with appreciative joy…He abides pervading one quarter with a mind imbued with equanimity…abundant, exalted, immeasurable, without hostility and without ill will.
This is called the immeasurable deliverance of mind.
“And what, householder, is the exalted deliverance of mind?
Here a bhikkhu abides resolved upon an area the size of the root of one tree, pervading it as exalted:
Here a bhikkhu abides resolved upon an area the size of one village, pervading it as exalted……
It is in this way, householder, that it can be understood how these states are different in meaning and different in name.
“There are, householder, these four kinds of reappearance in a future state of being.1182
Here someone abides resolved upon and pervading limited radiance’;
Here someone abides resolved upon and pervading ‘immeasurable radiance’;
Here someone abides resolved upon and pervading ‘defiled radiance’;
Here someone abides resolved upon and pervading ‘pure radiance’;
These are the four kinds of reappearance in a future state of being.1183
“There is an occasion, householder, when those deities assemble in one place. When they have assembled in one place, a difference in their colour can be discerned but no difference in their radiance.
Just as, if a man were to bring several oil-lamps into a house,
“There is an occasion, householder, when those deities disperse from there. When they have dispersed, a difference in their colours can be discerned and also a difference in their radiance.
Just as, if the man were to remove those several oil-lamps from that house,
“It does not occur to those deities: ‘This life of ours is permanent, everlasting, and eternal; yet wherever those deities settle down, there they find delight.
Just as, when flies are being carried along on a carrying-pole or on a basket, it does not occur to them: ‘This life of ours is permanent, everlasting, or eternal; yet wherever those flies settle down, there they find delight; so too, it does not occur to those deities…yet wherever they settle down, there they find delight.”
When this was said, the venerable Abhiya Kaccana said to the venerable Anuruddha: “Good, venerable Anuruddha,
yet I have something further to ask:
“By reason of the factor responsible for rebirth, friend Kaccana, some are deities of Limited Radiance, some deities of Immeasurable Radiance.”
“Venerable Anuruddha, what is the cause and reason why among those deities that have reappeared in a single order of gods, some are deities of Limited Radiance, some deities of Immeasurable Radiance?”
“As to that, friend Kaccana, I shall ask you a question in return.
Answer it as you choose.
What do you think, friend Kaccana? When one bhikkhu abides resolved upon an area the size of the root of one tree, pervading it as exalted, and another bhikkhu abides resolved upon the area the size of the roots of two or three trees, pervading it as exalted - which of these types of mental development is more exalted?”
- “The second, venerable sir.”
“What do you think, friend Kaccana? When one bhikkhu abides resolved upon an area the size of the roots of two or three trees, pervading it as exalted, and another bhikkhu abides resolved upon an area the size of one village, pervading it as exalted…
- “The second, venerable sir.”
“This is the cause and reason, friend Kaccana, why among those deities that have reappeared in a single order of gods, some are deities of Limited Radiance, some deities of Immeasurable Radiance.”
“Good, venerable Anuruddha,
“By reason of the factor responsible for rebirth, friend Kaccana, some are deities of Defiled Radiance, some deities of Pure Radiance.”
“Venerable Anuruddha, what is the cause and reason why among those deities that have reappeared in a single order of gods, some are deities of Defiled Radiance, some deities of Pure Radiance?”
“As to that, friend Kaccana, I shall give a simile,
Suppose an oil-lamp is burning with impure oil and an impure wick; because of the impurity of its oil and its wick it burns dimly.
His bodily inertia has not fully subsided, his sloth and torpor have not been fully eliminated, his restlessness and remorse have not been fully removed; because of this he meditates, as it were, dimly.1184
“Suppose an oil-lamp is burning with pure oil and a pure wick; because of the purity of its oil and its wick it does not burn dimly.
So too, here a bhikkhu abides resolved upon and pervading an area with a pure radiance.
His bodily inertia has fully subsided, his sloth and torpor have been fully eliminated, his restlessness and remorse have been fully removed;
On the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in the company of the gods of Pure Radiance.
“This is the cause and reason, friend Kaccana, why among those deities that have reappeared in the same order of gods, some are deities of Defiled Radiance, some deities of Pure Radiance.”
When this was said, the venerable Abhiya Kaccana said to the venerable Anuruddha: “Good, venerable Anuruddha.
The venerable Anuruddha does not say: ‘Thus have I heard’ or ‘It should be thus.’ Rather, the venerable Anuruddha says: ‘These gods are thus and those gods are such.’
It occurs to me, venerable sir, that the venerable Anuruddha certainly has associated with those deities and talked with them and held conversations with them.”
“Certainly, friend Kaccana, your words are offensive and discourteous, but still I will answer you. Over a long time I have associated with those deities and talked with them and held conversations with them.”1185
When this was said, the venerable Abhiya Kaccana said to the carpenter Pancakanga: “It is a gain for you, householder, it is a great gain for you that you have abandoned your state of doubt and have had the opportunity to hear this discourse on the Dhamma.”
and delivered his message.
and said to the venerable Anuruddha:
“Here, venerable sir, elder bhikkhus have come to me and said: ‘Householder, develop the immeasurable deliverance of mind’;
and some elders have said: ‘Householder, develop the exalted deliverance of mind.’
this is called the exalted deliverance of mind.1181
Here a bhikkhu abides resolved upon an area the size of the roots of two or three trees, pervading it as exalted:
this too is called the exalted deliverance of mind.
an area the size of two or three villages…
an area the size of one major kingdom…
an area the size of two or three major kingdoms…
an area the size of the earth bounded by the ocean, pervading it as exalted:
this too is called the exalted deliverance of mind.
What four?
on the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in the company of the gods of Limited Radiance.
on the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in the company of the gods of Immeasurable Radiance.
on the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in the company of the gods of Defiled Radiance.
on the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in the company of the gods of Pure Radiance.
a difference in the flames of the lamps might be discerned but no difference in their radiance; so too, there is an occasion when those deities assemble in one place …but no difference in their radiance.
a difference might be discerned in the flames of the lamps and also a difference in their radiance; so too, there is an occasion when those deities disperse from there…and also a difference in their radiance.
Are all those radiant ones deities of Limited Radiance, or are some of them deities of Immeasurable Radiance?”
an area the size of one village and an area the size of two or three villages…
an area the size of two or three villages and an area the size of one major kingdom…
an area the size of one major kingdom and an area the size of two or three major kingdoms…
an area the size of two or three major kingdoms and an area the size of the earth bounded by the ocean, pervading it as exalted - which of these two types of mental development is more exalted?”
yet I have something further to ask:
Are all those radiant ones deities of Defiled Radiance, or are some of them deities of Pure Radiance?”
for some wise men here understand the meaning of a statement by means of a simile.
So too, here a bhikkhu abides resolved upon and pervading an area with a defiled radiance.
On the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in the company of the gods of Defiled Radiance.
because of this he meditates, as it were, brightly.
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Rajagaha in the Bamboo Grove, the Squirrels’ Sanctuary.
Then, when it was morning, the venerable Bhumija dressed, and taking his bowl and outer robe, went to the house of Prince Jayasena and sat down on a seat made ready.1178
When this courteous and amiable talk was finished, he sat down at one side
What does the venerable Bhumija’s teacher say here, what does he declare?”
“I have not heard and learned that from the Blessed One’s own lips, prince.
But it is possible that the Blessed One might say this: ‘If one makes an aspiration and one leads the holy life unwisely, one is unable to procure any fruit; if one makes no aspiration and one leads the holy life unwisely, one is still unable to procure any fruit; if one both makes an aspiration and makes no aspiration and one leads the holy life unwisely, one is still unable to procure any fruit; if one neither makes an aspiration nor makes no aspiration and one leads the holy life unwisely, one is still unable to procure any fruit.
However, if one makes an aspiration and one leads the holy life wisely, one is able to procure fruit; if one makes no aspiration and one leads the holy life wisely, one is still able to procure fruit; if one both makes an aspiration and makes no aspiration and one leads the holy life wisely, one is still able to procure fruit; if one neither makes an aspiration nor makes no aspiration and one leads the holy life wisely, one is still able to procure fruit.’
I have not heard and learned this from the Blessed One’s own lips, prince,
“If Master Bhumija’s teacher speaks thus, if he declares thus, then it certainly seems that the venerable Bhumija’s teacher stands ahead of all the ordinary recluses and brahmins.”
Then Prince Jayasena served the venerable Bhumija from his own dish of milk rice.
Then, when the venerable Bhumija had returned from his almsround after his meal, he went to the Blessed One. After paying homage to him, he sat down at one side
I said what has been said by the Blessed One and did not misrepresent him with what is contrary to fact. I hope I explained in accordance with the Dhamma in such a way that nothing which provides a ground for censure can be legitimately deduced from my assertion.”
“Surely, Bhumija, when you were asked such a question and answered thus, you said what has been said by me and did not misrepresent me with what is contrary to fact. You explained in accordance with the Dhamma in such a way that nothing which provides a ground for censure can be legitimately deduced from your assertion.
Why is that?
Because that wrong path is not a proper method for procuring fruit.
“Suppose a man needing oil, seeking oil, wandering in search of oil, were to heap up gravel in a tub, sprinkle it all over with water, and press it.
Then, if he made an aspiration and acted thus, he would be unable to procure any oil; if he made no aspiration and acted thus, he would still be unable to procure any oil; if he both made an aspiration and made no aspiration and acted thus, he would still be unable to procure any oil; if he neither made an aspiration nor made no aspiration and acted thus, he would still be unable to procure any oil.
Why is that?
Because that way of acting is not a proper method for procuring oil.
So too, whatever recluses and brahmins have wrong view…they are still unable to procure any fruit.
Why is that?
Because that wrong path is not a proper method for procuring fruit.
“Suppose a man needing milk, seeking milk, wandering in search of milk, were to pull a recently-calved cow by her horn.
Then, if he made an aspiration…if he made no aspiration…if he both made an aspiration and made no aspiration, if he neither made an aspiration nor made no aspiration and acted thus, he would still be unable to procure any milk.
Why is that?
Because that way of acting is not a proper method for procuring milk.
So too, whatever recluses and brahmins have wrong view…they are still unable to procure any fruit.
Why is that?
Because that wrong path is not a proper method for procuring fruit.
“Suppose a man needing butter, seeking butter, wandering in search of butter, were to pour water into a churn and churn it with a churning-stick.
Then, if he made an aspiration…if he made no aspiration…if he both made an aspiration and made no aspiration…if he neither made an aspiration nor made no aspiration and acted thus, he would still be unable to procure any butter.
Why is that?
Because that way of acting is not a proper method for procuring butter.
So too, whatever recluses and brahmins have wrong view…they are still unable to procure any fruit.
Why is that?
Because that wrong path is not a proper method for procuring fruit.
“Suppose a man needing fire, seeking fire, wandering in search of fire, were to take an upper fire-stick and rub a wet sappy piece of wood with it.
Then, if he made an aspiration…if he made no aspiration…if he both made an aspiration and made no aspiration, if he neither made an aspiration nor made no aspiration and acted thus, he would still be unable to procure any fire.
Why is that?
Because that way of acting is not a proper method for procuring fire.
So too, whatever recluses and brahmins have wrong view…they are still unable to procure any fruit.
Why is that?
Because that wrong path is not a proper method for procuring fruit.
“Whatever recluses and brahmins have right view, right intention, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, and right concentration, if they make an aspiration and they lead the holy life, they are able to procure fruit; if they make no aspiration and they lead the holy life, they are still able to procure fruit; if they both make an aspiration and make no aspiration and they lead the holy life, they are still able to procure fruit; if they neither make an aspiration nor make no aspiration and they lead the holy life, they are still able to procure fruit.
Why is that?
Because that right path is a proper method for procuring fruit.
“Suppose a man needing oil, seeking oil, wandering in search of oil, were to heap up sesamum flour in a tub, sprinkle it all over with water, and press it.
Then, if he made an aspiration and acted thus, he would be able to procure oil; if he made no aspiration and acted thus, he would still be able to procure oil; if he both made an aspiration and made no aspiration and acted thus, he would still be able to procure oil; if he neither made an aspiration nor made no aspiration and acted thus, he would still be able to procure oil.
Why is that?
Because that way of acting is a proper method for procuring oil.
So too, whatever recluses and brahmins have right view …they are still able to procure fruit.
Why is that?
Because that right path is a proper method for procuring fruit.
“Suppose a man needing milk, seeking milk, wandering in search of milk, were to pull a recently-calved cow by her udder.
Then, if he made an aspiration…if he made no aspiration…if he both made an aspiration and made no aspiration, if he neither made an aspiration nor made no aspiration and acted thus, he would still be able to procure milk.
Why is that?
Because that way of acting is a proper method for procuring milk.
So too, whatever recluses and brahmins have right view…they are still able to procure fruit.
Why is that?
Because that right path is a proper method for procuring fruit.
“Suppose a man needing butter, seeking butter, wandering in search of butter, were to pour curd into a churn and churn it with a churning-stick.
Then, if he made an aspiration…if he made no aspiration…if he both made an aspiration and made no aspiration, if he neither made an aspiration nor made no aspiration and acted thus, he would still be able to procure butter.
Why is that?
Because that way of acting is a proper method for procuring butter.
So too, whatever recluses and brahmins have right view…they are still able to procure fruit.
Why is that?
Because that right path is a proper method for procuring fruit.
“Suppose a man needing fire, seeking fire, wandering in search of fire, were to take an upper fire-stick and rub a dry sapless piece of wood with it. Then, if he made an aspiration… if he made no aspiration…if he both made an aspiration and made no aspiration…if he neither made an aspiration nor made no aspiration and acted thus, he would still be able to procure fire.
Why is that?
Because that way of acting is a proper method for procuring fire.
So too, whatever recluses and brahmins have right view…they are still able to procure fruit.
Why is that?
Because that right path is a proper method for procuring fruit.
“Bhumija, if these four similes had occurred to you with reference to Prince Jayasena, he would have spontaneously acquired confidence in you, and being confident, would have shown his confidence to you.”
“Venerable sir, how could these four similes have occurred to me with reference to Prince Jayasena as they occur to the Blessed One, since they are spontaneous and have never been heard before?”
That is what the Blessed One said.
The venerable Bhumija was satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
Then Prince Jayasena went to the venerable Bhumija and exchanged greetings with him.
and said to the venerable Bhumija: “Master Bhumija, there are some recluses and brahmins who make such assertions and hold such views as this: ‘If one makes an aspiration1179 and one leads the holy life, one is unable to procure any fruit; if one makes no aspiration and one leads the holy life, one is still unable to procure any fruit; if one both makes an aspiration and makes no aspiration and one leads the holy life, one is still unable to procure any fruit; if one neither makes an aspiration nor makes no aspiration and one leads the holy life, one is still unable to procure any fruit.’
but it is possible that the Blessed One would answer as I have stated.”
and told the Blessed One what had occurred, adding:
On one occasion the Blessed One was dwelling at Nadika in the brick hall.
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus! “
“Venerable sir!” those bhikkhus replied.
The Blessed One said this:“Bhikkhus, mindfulness of death, when developed and cul­tivated, is of great fruit and benefit, culminating in the death­less, having the deathless as its consummation.1283
“ When this was said, one bhikkhu said to the Blessed One:“Bhante, I develop mindfulness of death.”
“But how , bhikkhu, do you develop mindfulness of death?”
“Here, Bhante, I think thus: ‘May I live just a night and a day so that I may attend to the Blessed One’s teaching.1284 I could then accomplish much!’1285
It is in this way that I develop mind­fulness of death.’
Another bhikkhu said to the Blessed One: “I too, Bhante, develop mindfulness of death.”
“But how , bhikkhu, do you develop mindfulness of death?
“‘Here, Bhante, I think: ‘May I live just a day so that I may attend to the Blessed One’s teaching. I could then accomplish much!
’ It is in this way that I develop mindfulness of death.”
Still another bhikkhu said to the Blessed One: “I too, Bhante, develop mindfulness of death.”
“But how , bhikkhu, do you develop mindfulness of death?
“‘Here, Bhante, I think: ‘May I live just the length of time it takes to eat a single alms meal1286 so that I may attend to the Blessed One’s teaching. I could then accomplish much!
’ It is in this way that I develop mindfulness of death.”
Still another bhikkhu said to the Blessed One: “I too, Bhante, develop mindfulness of death.”
“But how, bhikkhu, do you develop mindfulness of death? “
“Here, Bhante, I think: ‘May I live just the length of time it takes to chew and swallow four or five mouthfuls of food so that I may attend to the Blessed One’s teaching. I could then accomplish much!
’ It is in this way that I develop mindful­ness of death.”
Still another bhikkhu said to the Blessed One: “I too,Bhante, develop mindfulness of death.”
“But how , bhikkhu, do you develop mindfulness of death?
“‘Here, Bhante, I think: ‘May I live just the length of time it takes to chew and swallow a single mouthful of food so that I may attend to the Blessed One’s teaching. I could then accom­plish much!
’ It is in this way that I develop mindfulness of death,”
Still another bhikkhu said to the Blessed One: “I too, Bhante, develop mindfulness of death.”
“‘Here, Bhante, I think: ‘May I live just the length of time it takes to breathe out after breathing in, or to breathe in after breathing out, so that I may attend to the Blessed One’s teach­ing. I could then accomplish much!
’ It is in this way that I develop mindfulness of death.”
When this was said, the Blessed One said to those bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus, the bhikkhu who develops mindfulness of death thus: ‘May I live just a night and a day so that I may attend to the Blessed One’s teaching. I could then accomplish much!
’; and the one who develops mindfulness of death thus: ‘May I live just a day so that I may attend to the Blessed One’s teaching. I could then accomplish much!
’; and the one who develops mindfulness of death thus: ‘May I live just the length of time it takes to eat a single alms meal so that I may attend to the Blessed One’s teaching. I could then accomplish much!
’; and the one who develops mindfulness of death, thus: ‘May I live just the length of time it takes to chew and swallow four or five mouthfuls of food so that I may attend to the Blessed One’s teaching. I could then accomplish much!
’: these are called bhikkhus who dwell heedlessly. They develop mindfulness of death sluggishly for the destruction of the taints.”
But the bhikkhu who develops mindfulness of death thus: ‘May I live just the length of time it takes to chew and swallow a single mouthful of food so that I may attend to the Blessed One’s teaching. I could then accomplish much!
’; and the one who develops mindfulness of death thus: ‘May I live just the length of time it takes to breathe out after breathing in,or to breathe in after breathing out, so that I may attend to the Blessed One’s teaching. I could then accomplish much!
’: these are called bhikkhus who dwell heedfully. They develop mind­fulness of death keenly for the destruction of the taints.”
Therefore, bhikkhus, you should train yourselves thus: ‘We will dwell heedfully. We will develop mindfulness of death keenly for the destruction of the taints.’
Thus should you train yourselves.’
But do you,bhikkhus, develop mindfulness of death?
“But how, bhikkhu, do you develop mindfulness of death?
On one occasion the Blessed One was dwelling at Nadika in the brick hall.
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus:“Bhikkhus, mindfulness of death, when developed and cul­tivated, is of great fruit and benefit, culminating in the death­less, having the deathless as its consummation.
And how is this so?
“Here, bhikkhus, when day has receded and night has approached,1287 a bhikkhu reflects thus: ‘I could die on account of many causes, A snake might bite me, or a scorpion or centipede might sting me, and I might die; that would be an obstacle for me.
I might stumble and fall down, or my food might disagree with me, or my bile might become agitated, or my phlegm might become agitated, or sharp winds in me might become agitated, and I might die; that would be an obstacle for me.”
This bhikkhu should reflect thus: “Do I have any bad unwholesome qualities that have not been abandoned, which might become an obstacle for me if I were to die tonight?
’ If,upon review , the bhikkhu knows: I have bad unwholesome qualities that have not been abandoned, which might become an obstacle for me if I were to die tonight, then he should put forth extraordinary desire, effort, zeal, enthusiasm, indefatiga­bility, mindfulness, and clear comprehension to abandon those bad unwholesome qualities.
Just as one whose clothes or head had caught fire would put forth extraordinary desire, effort,zeal, enthusiasm , indefatigability, mindfulness, and clear com­prehension to extinguish the fire on his clothes or head, so that bhikkhu should put forth extraordinary desire, effort, zeal,enthusiasm , indefatigability, mindfulness, and clear compre­hension to abandon those bad unwholesome qualities.
“But if, upon review, the bhikkhu knows thus: I do not have any bad unwholesome qualities that have not been abandoned,which might become an obstacle for me if I were to die tonight, then he should dwell in that same rapture and joy, training day and night in wholesome qualities.”
But when night has receded and day has approached, a bhikkhu reflects thus: I could die on account of many causes. A snake might bite me …
This bhikkhu should reflect thus: ‘Do I have any bad unwholesome qualities that have not been abandoned which might become an obstacle for me if I were to die this day?
’ If,upon review, the bhikkhu knows: ‘I have bad unwholesome qualities that I have not yet abandoned, which might become an obstacle for me if I were to die this day’ then he should put forth extraordinary desire, effort, zeal, enthusiasm , indefa­tigability, mindfulness, and clear comprehension to abandon those bad unwholesome qualities.
Just as one whose clothes or head had caught fire would put forth extraordinary desire, effort, zeal, enthusiasm, indefatigability, mindfulness, and clear comprehension to extinguish the fire on his clothes or head, so that bhikkhu should put forth extraordinary desire, effort,zeal, enthusiasm, indefatigability, mindfulness, and clear com­prehension to abandon those bad unwholesome qualities.”
But if, upon review, the bhikkhu knows: ‘I do not have any bad unwholesome qualities that I have not yet abandoned, which might become an obstacle for me if I were to die this day’ then he should dwell in that same rapture and joy, train­ing day and night in wholesome qualities.”
It is, bhikkhus, when mindfulness of death is developed and cultivated in this way that it is of great fruit and benefit,culminating in the deathless, having the deathless as its con­summation.’
or sharp winds might become agitated in me, and I might die; that would be an obstacle for me.”
Now at that time the group of six monks went in a vehicle, and there was a bull in the middle yoked with cows and there was a cow in the middle yoked with bulls.
People … spread it about, saying: “As at the festival of the Ganges and Mahī”.
They told this matter to the Lord.
He said: “Monks, you should not go in a vehicle.
Whoever should go, there is an offence of wrong-doing.”
Now at that time a certain monk, going through the Kosala country to Sāvatthī in order to see the Lord, became ill on the way.
Then that monk, stepping aside from the road, sat down at the root of a certain tree.
People, seeing that monk, spoke thus: “Where, honoured sir, will the master go? ”
“I will go to Sāvatthī, sirs, in order to see the Lord.”
“Come, honoured sir, we will go along.”
“I am not able to, sirs, I am ill.”
“Come, honoured sir, get into a vehicle.”
“No, sirs, a vehicle is objected to by the Lord,” and being scrupulous, he did not get into a vehicle.
Then that monk, having arrived at Sāvatthī, told this matter to the monks.
The monks told this matter to the Lord.
He said: “I allow, monks, a vehicle to one who is ill.”
Then it occurred to these monks: “Now, should yoked with cows or yoked with bulls?
“They told this matter to the Lord.
He said: “I allow you, monks, a handcart yoked with a bull.”
Now at that time a certain monk became extremely uncomfortable owing to the jolting of a vehicle.
They told this matter to the Lord.
He said: “I allow, monks, a palanquin, a sedan-chair.”
At one time the awakened one, the Lord, was staying at Rājagaha on Mount Vulture Peak.
Now at that time King Seniya Bimbisāra of Magadha ruled with supreme authority over eighty thousand villages.
Now at that time, at Campā, a merchant’s son called Soṇa Koḷivisa was delicately nurtured
Then King Seniya Bimbisāra of Magadha, having had those eighty thousand village overseers convened, sent a messenger to Soṇa Koḷivisa on some business, saying: “Let Soṇa come, I want Soṇa to come.”
Then Soṇa Koḷivisa’s parents spoke thus to Soṇa Koḷivisa: “The king, dear Soṇa, wants to see your feet.
Do not you, dear Soṇa, stretch out your feet towards the king;
Then Soṇa Koḷivisa approached King Seniya Bimbisāra of Magadha, having approached, having greeted. King Seniya Bimbisāra of Magadha, he sat down cross-legged in front of the king.
So King Seniya Bimbisāra of Magadha saw the down that was growing on the soles of Soṇa Koḷivisa’s feet.
Then King Seniya Bimbisāra of Magadha, having instructed those eighty thousand village overseers in matters concerning this world, dismissed them, saying: “You, good sirs, are now instructed by me in matters concerning this world; go along, pay homage to this Lord, and our Lord will instruct you in transcendental matters.”
Now at that time the venerable Sāgata was the Lord’s attendant.
Then those eighty thousand village overseers approached the venerable Sāgata; having approached, they spoke thus to the venerable Sāgata: “Honoured sir, these eighty thousand village overseers are approaching here to see the Lord. It were good, honoured sir, if we might have a chance to see the Lord.”
“Well, then, do you, venerable ones, remain here for a moment until I have let the Lord know.”
Then the venerable Sāgata, having stepped down from the moonstone in front of the eighty thousand watching village overseers, having stepped up in front of the Lord, spoke thus to the Lord: “Lord, these eighty thousand village overseers are approaching here to see the Lord. Lord, does the Lord think it is now the right time for this? ”
“Well, then, do you, Sāgata, make a seat ready in the shade of the dwelling-place.”
“Very well, Lord,” and the venerable Sāgata having answered the Lord in assent, having taken a chair, having stepped down from in front of the Lord, having stepped up on the moonstone in front of the eighty thousand watching village overseers, made ready a seat in the shade of the dwelling-place.
Then the Lord, having issued from the dwelling-place, sat down on the seat made ready in the shade of the dwelling-place.
Then those eighty thousand village overseers approached the Lord; having approached, having greeted the Lord, they sat down at a respectful distance.
Then those eighty thousand village overseers paid respect only to the venerable Sāgata, not likewise to the Lord.
Then the Lord, knowing by reasoning of mind the minds of those eighty thousand village overseers, addressed the venerable Sāgata, saying: “Well then, do you, Sāgata, abundantly show a state of further-men, a wonder of psychic power.”
“Very well, Lord,” and the venerable Sagata, having answered the Lord in assent, having risen above the ground, paced up and down in the air, in the atmosphere, and he stood, and he sat down, and he lay down, and he smoked and he blazed, and then he vanished.
Then the venerable Sagata, having shown in the air, in the atmosphere, various states of further-men and wonders of psychic power, having inclined his head towards the Lord’s feet, spoke thus to the Lord: “Lord, the Lord is my teacher, I am a disciple;
Then those eighty thousand village overseers, saying: “Indeed it is marvellous,
Then the Lord, knowing by reasoning of mind the minds of those eighty thousand village overseers, talked a progressive talk, that is to say talk on giving, talk on moral habit, talk on heaven, he explained the peril, the vanity, the depravity of pleasures of the senses, the advantage in renouncing .
When the Lord knew that their minds were ready, malleable, devoid of the hindrances, uplifted, pleased, then he explained to them that teaching on dhamma which the awakened ones have themselves discovered: ill, uprising, stopping, the way.
And as a clean cloth without black specks will easily take dye, even so as those eighty thousand village overseers were on that very seat, dhamma-vision, dustless, stainless, arose: that, “whatever is of the nature to uprise, all that is of the nature to stop.”
These, having seen dhamma, attained dhamma, known dhamma, plunged into dhamma, having crossed over doubt, having put away uncertainty, having attained without another’s help to full confidence in the teacher’s instruction, spoke thus to the Lord: “Excellent, Lord, it is excellent, Lord.
Just as, Lord, one should set upright what has been upset or should uncover what is covered or should point out the way to one who is astray or should bring a lamp into the darkness so that those with eyes might see forms, even so is dhamma explained in many a figure by the Lord.
We, Lord, are those going to the Lord for refuge,
May the Lord receive us as lay-followers gone for refuge on this day for as long as life lasts.”
and down came to have grown on the soles of his feet.
sit down cross-legged in front of the king,
and as you are sitting down the king will see your feet.”
Then they sent Soṇa Koḷivisa away in a palanquin.
Then those eighty thousand village overseers approached Mount Vulture Peak.
Lord, the Lord is my teacher, I am a disciple”.
to dhamma and to the Order of monks.
indeed, it is wonderful,
that even a disciple can be of such great psychic power, of such great might. What must the teacher be? ” paid respect only to the Lord, not likewise to the venerable Sagata.
Then it occurred to Soṇa Koḷivisa: “In so far as I understand dhamma taught by the Lord it is not easy for those who live in a house to lead the Brahma-faring that is wholly complete, wholly pure, and polished like a conch-shell. What now if I, having cut off hair and beard, having donned yellow robes, should go forth from home into homelessness?
” Then those eighty thousand village overseers, delighted with the Lord’s speech, having given thanks for it, having risen from the seat, having greeted the Lord, departed keeping their right sides towards him.
Then Soṇa Koḷivisa, soon after those eighty thousand village overseers had departed, approached the Lord; having approached, having greeted the Lord, he sat down at a respectful distance.
As he was sitting down at a respectful distance, Soṇa Koḷivisa spoke thus to the Lord: “In so far as I, Lord, understand dhamma taught by the Lord it is not easy for those who live in a house to lead the Brahma-faring that is wholly complete, wholly pure and polished like a conch-shell.
I want, Lord, having cut off hair and beard, having donned yellow robes, to go forth from home into homelessness.
Lord, may the Lord let me go forth.”
And soon after he was ordained the venerable Soṇa stayed in the Cool Grove.
Because of his great output of energy in pacing up and down his feet broke,
yet my mind is not freed from the cankers with no grasping,
and moreover there are my family’s possessions. It might be possible to enjoy the possessions and to do good.
Suppose that I, having returned to the low life, should enjoy the possessions and should do good? ”
Then the Lord, knowing by mind the venerable Soṇa’s reasoning of mind, as a strong man might stretch out his bent arm, or might bend back his outstretched arm, so did he, vanishing from Mount Vulture Peak, appear in the Cool Grove.
Then the Lord, touring the lodgings together with several monks, approached the venerable Soṇa’s place for pacing up and down in.
The Lord saw that the venerable Soṇa’s place for pacing up and down in was stained with blood, and seeing , he addressed the monks, saying: “Now why, monks, is this place for pacing up and down in stained with blood as though there has been slaughter of cattle? ”
“Lord, because of the venerable Soṇa’s great energy in pacing up and down his feet broke,
Then the Lord approached the venerable Soṇa’s dwelling-place, and having approached he sat down on an appointed seat.
And the venerable Soṇa, having greeted the Lord, sat down at a respectful distance.
The Lord spoke thus to the venerable Soṇa as he was sitting at a respectful distance: “Soṇa, as you were meditating in private did not a reasoning arise in your mind like this: ‘Those who are the Lord’s disciples dwell putting forth energy; I am one of these,
“Yes, Lord.”
“What do you think about this, Soṇa? Were you clever at the lute’s stringed music when formerly you were a householder? ”
“Yes, Lord.”
“What do you think about this, Soṇa? When the strings of your lute were too taut, was your lute at that time tuneful and fit for playing? ”
“No, indeed, Lord.”
What do you think about this, Soṇa? When the strings of your lute were too slack, was your lute at that time tuneful and fit for playing? ”
“No, indeed, Lord.”
“What do you think about this, Soṇa? When the strings of your lute were neither too taut nor too slack, but were keyed to an even pitch, was your lute at that time tuneful and fit for playing? ”
“Yes, Lord.”
“Even so, Soṇa, does too much output of energy conduce to restlessness, does too feeble energy conduce to slothfulness.
“Therefore do you, Soṇa, determine upon evenness in energy and pierce the evenness of the faculties and reflect upon it.”
“Yes, Lord,” the venerable Soṇa answered the Lord in assent.
Then the Lord, having exhorted the venerable Soṇa with this exhortation, as a strong man might stretch out his bent arm or might bend back his outstretched arm, so did he, vanishing from in front of the venerable Soṇa in the Cool Grove, appear on Mount Vulture Peak.
After that the venerable Soṇa determined upon evenness in energy and he pierced the evenness of the faculties and reflected upon it.
Then the venerable Soṇa, dwelling alone, aloof, earnest, ardent, self-resolute, having soon realised here and now by his own super-knowledge that supreme goal of the Brahma-faring for the sake of which young men of family rightly go forth from home into homelessness, abided in it,
And so the venerable Soṇa became one of the perfected ones.
When the venerable Soṇa had attained perfection, it occurred to him: “Suppose I were to declare profound knowledge in the Lord’s presence?”
Then the venerable Soṇa approached the Lord; having approached, having greeted the Lord, he sat down at a respectful distance.
As he was sitting down at a respectful distance, the venerable Soṇa spoke thus to the Lord: “Lord, that monk who is one perfected, who has destroyed the cankers, lived the life, done what was to be done, shed the burden, won his own goal, destroyed utterly the fetter of becoming, and is wholly freed by profound knowledge, he comes to be intent upon six matters: he comes to be intent upon renunciation, he comes to be intent upon aloofness, he comes to be intent upon non-harming, he comes to be intent upon the destruction of grasping, he comes to be intent upon the destruction of craving, he comes to be intent upon non-confusion.
“Perhaps, Lord, one of the venerable ones here might think: ‘Could it be that this venerable one is intent upon renunciation depending upon mere faith alone?’ But this, Lord, is not to be regarded thus.
Lord, the monk who has destroyed the cankers, has lived the life, done what was to be done, not seeing aught in himself to be done or to be added to what has been done, being passionless comes to be intent on renunciation because of the destruction of passion, being without hatred comes to be intent on renunciation because of the destruction of hatred, being without confusion comes to be intent on renunciation because of the destruction of confusion.
“Perhaps, Lord, one of the venerable ones here might think: ‘Could it be that this venerable one of the destruction of passion, being without hatred … being without confusion comes to be intent on aloofness because of the destruction of confusion.
“Being passionless he comes to be intent on the destruction of grasping because of the destruction of passion, being without hatred he comes to be intent on the destruction of grasping because of the destruction of hatred, being without confusion he comes to be intent on the destruction of grasping because of the destruction of confusion;
“Thus, Lord, even if shapes cognisable by the eye come very strongly into the field of vision of a monk whose mind is wholly freed, they do not obsess his mind
If sounds cognisable by the ear … if scents cognisable by the nose … if tastes cognisable by the tongue … if touches cognisable by the body … if mental objects cognisable by the mind come very strongly into the field of thought of a monk whose mind is wholly freed, they do not obsess his mind for his mind comes to be undefiled, firm, won to composure, and he notes its passing hence.
“It is as if, Lord, there were a rocky mountain slope without a cleft, without a hollow, of one mass, and as if wild wind and rain should come very strongly from the eastern quarter—it would neither tremble nor quake nor shake violently; and as if wild wind and rain should come very strongly from the western quarter … from the northern quarter … from the southern quarter—it would neither tremble nor quake nor shake violently.
Even so, Lord, if shapes cognisable by the eye come very strongly into the field of vision of a monk whose mind is wholly freed … if mental objects cognisable by the mind come very strongly into the field of thought of a monk whose mind is wholly freed, they do not obsess his mind, for his mind comes to be undefiled, firm, won to composure, and he notes its passing hence.”
If one is intent upon renunciation and mind’s aloofness,
If one is intent upon non-harming and destruction of grasping,
If one is intent upon destruction of craving and mind’s non-confusion,
Having seen sensations’ rise, his mind is wholly freed.
For that monk whose mind is calmed and wholly freed
There is nothing to add to what has been done, there is naught to be done.
As a rock of one mass by wind is never moved,
So shapes, tastes, sounds, scents, touches and all
Pleasant and unpleasant mental objects stir not a man like this.
His mind is firm, well freed, and he notes its passing hence.
So Soṇa Koḷivisa received the going forth in the Lord’s presence, he received ordination.
the place for pacing up and down in became stained with blood as though there had been slaughter of cattle. Then as the venerable Soṇa was meditating in private a reasoning arose in his mind thus: “Those who are the Lord’s disciples dwell putting forth energy; I am one of these,
and this place for pacing up and down in is stained with his blood as though there had been slaughter of cattle.”
Suppose that I, having returned to the low life, should enjoy the possessions and should do good’? ”
yet my mind is not freed from the cankers with no grasping,
and moreover there are my family’s possessions. It might be possible to enjoy the possessions and to do good.
and he understood: Destroyed is birth, lived is the Brahma-faring, done is what was to be done, there is no more of being such and such.
being passionless he comes to be intent on non-confusion because of the destruction of passion, being without hatred he comes to be intent on non-confusion because of the destruction of hatred, being without confusion he comes to be intent on non-confusion because of the destruction of confusion.
being passionless he comes to be intent on the destruction of craving because of the destruction of passion, being without hatred he comes to be intent on the destruction of craving because of the destruction of hatred, being without confusion he comes to be intent on the destruction of craving because of the destruction of confusion;
for his mind comes to be undefiled, firm, won to composure, and he notes its passing hence.
Lord, the monk who has destroyed the cankers … or to be added to what has been done, being passionless comes to be intent on non-harming because of the destruction of passion, being without hatred … being without confusion comes to be intent on non-harming because of the destruction of confusion.
“Perhaps, Lord, one of the venerable ones here might think: ‘Could it be that this venerable one is intent on non-harming, is backsliding from the essence to the contagion of habit and custom?’
But this, Lord, is not to be regarded thus.
The King of Magadha, Soṇa, and eighty-thousand chieftains,
Sāgata showed much that was further on Vulture Peak, /
They were broken by his output on going forth, the lute, with one lining,
dark green, yellow, red, crimson, and indeed black, /
Orange, multi-coloured, and he objected to edgings,
heels, knee-boots, top-boots, cotton, partridges, rams, goats, /
Scorpions, peacocks, and embroidered, decorated with lions, tigers and panthers,
antelopes, beavers and cats, squirrels, owls, /
Sandals for split , corns, unwashed, tree-stumps, rasping,
palm, bamboo, and indeed grass, munja; babbaja, marshy date-palm, /
Kamala, woollen, golden, silver, gems, lapis lazuli,
crystal, bronze, and glass, and tin, lead, copper, /
Cows, a vehicle and ill, yoked with bulls, a palanquin,
things to recline on, large hides, and the depraved one with a cowhide, /
On what belongs to householders, with thongs of hide, they enter, on one being ill,
Kaccāna the Great, Soṇa from memory what belongs to the Divisions in the Eights, /
A group of five for ordination, many linings, constant bathing,
he allowed hides coverings, reckoning not necessary until:
The leader gave these five boons to the Elder Soṇa.
Then the Lord addressed the monks, saying: “Thus, monks, do young men of family declare profound knowledge. The goal is spoken of but the self is not obtruded.
But then it seems to me that there are some foolish men here who declare profound knowledge for fun; these afterwards come to disaster.”
Then the Lord addressed the venerable Soṇa, saying: “You, Soṇa, have been delicately nurtured.
I allow for you, Soṇa, sandals with one lining.”
“But I, Lord, gave up eighty cartloads of gold when I went forth from home into homelessness, and a herd of seven elephants.
Because of this there will be speakers against me, saying: ‘Soṇa Koḷivisa gave up eighty cartloads of gold when he went forth from home into homelessness, and a herd of seven elephants;
“If the Lord will allow them to the Order of monks, I too will make use of them, but if the Lord will not allow them to the Order of monks, neither will I make use of them.”
Monks, doubly lined sandals should not be worn,
Whoever should wear , there is an offence of wrong-doing.”
and now this very is clinging on to sandals with one lining.’
Then the Lord on this occasion, having given reasoned talk, addressed the monks, saying: “ Monks, I allow sandals with one lining.
trebly lined sandals should not be worn,
sandals with many linings should not be worn.
“Now at that time the group of six monks wore sandals that were entirely dark green … that were entirely yellow … that were entirely red … that were entirely crimson … that were entirely black … that were dyed entirely orange … that were dyed entirely multi-coloured.
People looked down upon, criticised, spread it about, saying: “Like householders who enjoy pleasures of the senses.”
He said: “Monks, sandals that are entirely dark green are not to be worn … sandals that are dyed entirely multi-coloured are not to be worn.
Whoever should wear , there is an offence of wrong-doing.”
Now at that time the group of six monks wore sandals with dark green straps … with yellow straps … with red straps … with crimson straps … with black straps … with dyed orange straps … with dyed multi-coloured straps.
People … spread it about, saying: “Like householders who enjoy pleasures of the senses”.
They told this matter to the Lord.
He said: “Monks, sandals with dark green straps … sandals with dyed multi-coloured straps are not to be worn.
Whoever should wear , there is an offence of wrong-doing.”
Now at that time the group of six monks wore sandals with heel-coverings … sandals that were knee-boots… sandals that were top-boots … sandals that were filled with cotton … sandals of partridges’ wings … sandals pointed with rams’ horns … sandals pointed with goats’ horns … sandals with scorpions’ tails … sandals sewn round with peacocks’ tail feathers … embroidered sandals.
People looked down upon, criticised, spread it about, saying: “Like householders who enjoy pleasures of the senses”.
They told this matter to the Lord.
He said: “Monks, sandals with heel-coverings should not be worn … embroidered sandals should not be worn.
Whoever should wear , there is an offence of wrong-doing.”
Now at that time the group of six monks wore sandals decorated with lion-skins… with tiger-skins … with panther-skins … with black antelope-skins … with otter-skins … with cat-skins … with squirrel-skins … with owl-skins.
People … spread it about, saying: “Like householders who enjoy pleasures of the senses.”
He said: “Monks, sandals decorated with lion-skins … with owl-skins are not to be worn.
Whoever should wear there is an offence of wrong-doing.”
They told this matter to the Lord.
They told this matter to the Lord.
Then the Lord, having dressed in the morning, taking his bowl and robe, entered Rājagaha for almsfood with a certain monk as his attendant.
“My feet are split, sir.”
“See, honoured sir, here are sandals.”
“No, sir, sandals with many linings are objected to by the Lord.”
“Take these sandals, monk.”
Monks, new sandals with many linings are not to be worn.
Whoever should wear , there is an offence of wrong-doing.”
Then that monk went limping along behind the Lord.
A certain lay follower, having put on sandals with many linings, saw the Lord coming from afar; seeing him, having taken off his sandals, he approached the Lord; having approached, having greeted the Lord, he approached that monk; having approached, having greeted that monk, he spoke thus: “Why, honoured sir, does the master limp? ”
Then the Lord in this connection having given reasoned talk, addressed the monks, saying: “ I allow you, monks, sandals with many linings that have been cast off.
Now at that time the Lord was pacing up and down without sandals in the open air.
Monks who were elders, thinking: “The teacher is pacing up and down without sandals”, also paced up and down without sandals.
The group of six monks, while the teacher was pacing up and down without sandals and while monks who were elders were pacing up and down without sandals, paced up and down with sandals on.
Those who were modest monks … spread it about, saying: How can this group of six monks, while the teacher is pacing up and down without sandals, and while monks who are elders are pacing up and down without sandals, pace up and down with sandals on? ”
Then these monks told this matter to the Lord. He said: “Is it true, as is said, monks, that the group of six monks, while the teacher … with sandals on? ”
“It is true, Lord.”
The awakened one, the Lord, rebuked them, saying: “How monks, can these foolish men, while the teacher was pacing up and down without sandals, and while monks who are elders were pacing up and down without sandals, pace up and down with sandals on?
For, monks, even these white-frocked householders, on account of procuring a craft for their livelihood, will be respectful, deferential, courteous towards their teachers.
“Herein, monks, let your light shine forth so that you who have thus gone forth in this dhamma and discipline which are well taught may be respectful, deferential, courteous towards teachers, grades of teachers, preceptors, grades of preceptors.
It is not, monks, for pleasing those who are not pleased …” and having rebuked them, having given reasoned talk, he addressed the monks, saying: “Monks, you should not pace up and down with sandals on while teachers, grades of teachers, preceptors, grades of preceptors are pacing up and down without sandals.
Whoever should pace up and down, there is an offence of wrong-doing.
And, monks, you should not wear sandals within a monastery.
Whoever should wear them , there is an offence of wrong-doing.”
Now at that time a certain monk came to have an affliction of corns on his feet.
Having taken hold of that monk, they made him go out to relieve himself.
As the Lord was touring the lodgings he saw those monks who, having taken hold of that monk, were making him go out to relieve himself, and seeing , he approached those monks, having approached, he spoke thus to those monks: “What, monks, is this monk’s disease? ”
“Lord, this venerable one has an affliction of corns on the feet, and having taken hold of him, we are making him go out to relieve himself.”
Now at that time monks got up on to couches and chairs with unwashed feet, and robes and lodgings were soiled.
They told this matter to the Lord.
He said: “I allow you, monks, when you think: ‘I will get up now on to a couch or a chair’, to wear sandals.”
Now at that time, monks, going to an Observance-hut and to a meeting-place at night, in the dark trod upon stumps of trees and on thorns, and their feet became painful.
They told this matter to the Lord.
He said: “I allow you, monks, to use sandals within a monastery, a torch, a light, a staff.”
Then the Lord in this connection having given reasoned talk, addressed the monks, saying: “I allow, monks, he whose feet are painful or he whose feet are split or he who has an affliction of corns on the feet, to wear sandals.”
Now at that time the group of six monks, getting up in the night towards dawn, having put on wooden shoes, paced up and down in the open air talking in high, loud, rasping tones a variety of worldly talk, that is to say talk of kings, talk of thieves, talk of great ministers, talk of armies, talk of dangers, talk of battles, talk of food, talk of drink, talk of clothes, talk of beds, talk of garlands, talk of scents, talk of relations, talk of vehicles, talk of villages, talk of little towns, talk of towns, talk of the country, talk of women, talk of heroes, talk of streets, talk of wells, talk of those departed before, talk of diversity, speculation about the world, speculation about the sea, talk on becoming and not becoming thus or thus; and they both killed insects, having trodden on them, and also made monks fall away from contemplation.
Those who were modest monks looked down upon, criticized, spread it about, saying: “How can this group of six monks getting up in the night towards dawn, having put on wooden shoes, pace up and down in the open air talking in high, loud rasping tones a variety of worldly talk … and both kill insects, having trodden on them, and also make monks fall away from contemplation?”
Then these monks told this matter to the Lord. He said: “Is it true, as is said, monks, that the group of six monks, getting up in the night towards dawn … and made monks fall away from contemplation? ”
“It is true, Lord.” Having rebuked them, having given reasoned talk, he addressed the monks, saying: “Monks, wooden shoes are not to be worn.
Whoever should wear , there is an offence of wrong-doing.”
Then the Lord, having stayed at Rājagaha for as long as he found suiting, set out on tour for Benares.
In due course, walking on tour, he arrived at Benares.
The Lord stayed there near Benares at Isipatana in the deer-park.
Now at that time the group of six monks, thinking, “Wooden shoes are objected to by the Lord”, having had young palmyra palms cut, wore shoes of palmyra palm leaves; those young palmyra palms which were cut, withered.
People … spread it about, saying: “How can these recluses, sons of the Sakyans, having had young palmyra palms cut, wear shoes of palmyra palm leaves? These young palmyra palms which were cut, are withering. These recluses, sons of the Sakyans, are harming life that is one-facultied”.
Monks heard these people who looked down upon, criticised, spread it about.
Then these monks told this matter to the Lord. He said: “Is it true, as is said, monks, that the group of six monks, having had young palmyra palms cut, wear shoes of palmyra palm leaves, and that those young palmyra palms which were cut are withering?
” “It is true, Lord.”
The awakened one, the Lord rebuked them, saying: “How, monks, can these foolish men, having had young palmyra palms cut, wear shoes of palmyra palm leaves the young palmyra palms wither?
For, monks, people think that there are living things in a tree.
It is not, monks, for pleasing those who are not pleased …” and having rebuked them, having given reasoned talk, he addressed the monks, saying: “Monks, you should not wear shoes of palmyra palm leaves.
Whoever should wear , there is an offence of wrong-doing.”
Now at that time the group of six monks, thinking: “Shoes of palmyra palm leaves are objected to by the Lord”, having had young bamboos cut, wore shoes of bamboo leaves;
Whoever should wear , there is an offence of wrong-doing.”
Then the Lord, having stayed at Benares for as long as he found suiting, set out on tour for Bhaddiya.
In due course, walking on tour, he arrived at Bhaddiya.
The Lord stayed there at Bhaddiya in the Jātiyā Grove.
Now at that time the monks of Bhaddiya were addicted to the practice of ornamenting their shoes in a variety of ways. They made tiṇa-grass shoes and had them made … muñja-grass shoes and had them made … shoes of reeds and had them made … marshy date-palm shoes and had them made … kamala-grass shoes and had them made, they made woollen shoes and had them made; they neglected the recitation, the interrogation, the higher morality, the higher thought, the higher wisdom.
Those who were modest monks looked down upon, criticised, spread it about, saying: “How can these monks of Bhaddiya be addicted to the practice of ornamenting shoes in a variety of ways, and make tiṇa-grass shoes and have them made … and neglect the recitation, the interrogation, the higher morality, the higher thought, the higher wisdom?”
Then these monks told this matter to the Lord. He said: “Is it true, as is said, monks, that the monks of Bhaddiya are addicted to the practice of … and neglect the recitation … the higher wisdom? ”
“It is true, Lord.”
The awakened one, the Lord rebuked them saying: “How, monks, can these foolish men be addicted to the practice of ornamenting shoes … and neglect the recitation … the higher wisdom?
It is not, monks, for pleasing those who are not pleased …” Having rebuked them, having given reasoned talk, he addressed the monks, saying: “Monks, tiṇa-grass shoes should not be worn, muñja-grass shoes … shoes of reeds … marshy date-palm shoes … kamala-grass shoes … woollen shoes should not be worn, shoes made with gold … shoes made with silver … shoes made with gems … shoes made with lapis lazuli … shoes made with crystal … with bronze … with glass … with tin … with lead … shoes made with copper should not be worn.
Whoever should wear , there is an offence of wrong-doing.
And any shoes, monks, that can be handed on should not be worn.
Whoever should wear , there is an offence of wrong-doing.
I allow, monks, three shoes that are in fixed places and that cannot be handed on: privy shoes, urinal shoes, rinsing shoes.”
Then the Lord, having stayed in Bhaddiya for as long as he found suiting, set out on tour for Sāvatthī.
In due course, walking on tour, he arrived at Sāvatthī.
The Lord stayed there in Sāvatthī in the Jeta Grove in Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time the group of six monks caught hold of cows, which were crossing the river Aciravatī, by their horns, and they caught hold of them by their ears, and they caught hold of them by their dewlaps, and they caught hold of them by their tails, and they mounted on their backs, and they touched their privy parts with lustful thoughts, and having ducked young calves, they killed them.
People … spread it about, saying: “How can these recluses, sons of the Sakyans, catch hold of cows, which are crossing the river Aciravatī, by their horns … like householders who enjoy pleasures of the senses?”
Monks heard these people who … spread it about.
Then these monks told this matter to the Lord. He said: “Is it true, as is said, monks, that the group of six monks caught hold of cows … and having ducked young calves, killed them? ” “It is true, Lord.” Having rebuked them, having given reasoned talk, he addressed the monks, saying: “ Monks, you should not catch hold of cows by their horns, nor should you catch hold of them by their ears, nor should you catch hold of them by their dewlaps, nor should you catch hold of them by their tails, nor should you mount on their backs.
Whoever should mount, there is an offence of wrong-doing.
Nor should you touch their privy parts with lustful thoughts.
Whoever should touch them, there is a grave offence.
Nor should you kill young calves.
Whoever should kill them should be dealt with according to the rule.”
those young bamboos that were cut withered
Monks, you should not wear shoes of bamboo leaves.
… as in Kd.5.7.1, Kd.5.7.2. Read bamboo instead of palmyra palm …”…
Now at that time the group of six monks used high and broad things to recline upon, that is to say: a sofa, a divan, a long-haired coverlet, a many-coloured coverlet, a white coverlet, a wool coverlet besprent with flowers, a cotton quilt, a wool coverlet decorated with animals’ forms, a wool covering with hair on the upper side, a wool covering with hair at one side, a silken sheet studded with jewels, a sheet made with silk threads and studded with jewels, a dancer’s carpet, an elephant rug, a horse rug, a chariot rug, rugs of black antelope skins, a splendid sheeting of the hide of the kadali-deer, a sheet with an awning above, a couch with a red cushion at either end.
People, engaged in touring the dwelling-places, having seen , looked down upon, criticised, spread it about, saying: “Like householders who enjoy pleasures of the senses.”
He said: “Monks, high and broad things to recline upon should not be used, that is to say: a sofa … a couch with a red cushion at either end.
Whoever should use there is an offence of wrong-doing.”
They told this matter to the Lord.
Now at that time the group of six monks thinking, “High and broad things to recline upon are objected to by the Lord”, used large hides: a lion’s hide, a tiger’s hide, a panther’s hide,
People, touring the dwelling-places, having seen , looked down upon, criticised, spread it about, saying: “Like householders who enjoy pleasures of the senses”.
They told this matter to the Lord.
He said: “Monks, large hides should not be used: a lion’s hide, a tiger’s hide, a panther’s hide.
Whoever should use , there is an offence of wrong-doing.”
Now at that time the group of six monks, thinking: “Large hides are objected to by the Lord”, used cow-hides.
These were cut to the measurement of a couch … as in Kd.5.10.6 above … and they were laid outside the chairs.
A certain depraved monk came to be dependent upon a certain depraved lay-follower.
Then that depraved monk, having dressed in the morning, taking his bowl and robe, approached the dwelling of that depraved lay-follower; having approached, he sat down on the appointed seat.
Then that depraved lay-follower approached that depraved monk; having approached, having greeted that depraved monk, he sat down at a respectful distance.
Now at that time that depraved lay-follower had a young calf, beautiful, good to look upon, charming; it was marked like a panther cub.
Then that depraved monk gazed longingly at and thought about that calf.
Then that depraved lay-follower spoke thus to that depraved monk: “Why, honoured sir, does the master gaze longingly at and think about this calf? ”
“Sir, this calf’s hide is of use to me.”
Then that depraved monk, having hidden the hide in his outer cloak, went away.
Then that cow, longing for her calf, followed close after that depraved monk.
Monks spoke thus: “Why, your reverence, is this cow following close after you? ”
“I don’t know, your reverences, why this cow is following close after me.”
Now at that time this depraved monk’s outer cloak became stained with blood.
Monks spoke thus: “But this outer cloak of yours, your reverence—what has happened to it?”
Then that depraved monk told this matter to the monks.
They said: “But did you, your reverence, incite to onslaught on creatures? ”
“Yes, your reverences.”
Then these monk told this matter to the Lord.
Then the Lord on this occasion, in this connection, having had the Order of monks convened, questioned that depraved monk, saying: “Is it true, as is said, that you, monk, incited to onslaught on creatures? ”
“It is true, Lord.” “How can you, foolish man, incite to onslaught on creatures? Foolish man, has not onslaught on creatures been condemned by me in many a figure, restraint from onslaught on creatures extolled?
It is not, foolish man, for pleasing those who are not pleased …” Having rebuked him, having given reasoned talk, he addressed the monks, saying: “ Monks, there should be no inciting to onslaught on creatures.
Whoever should incite, should be dealt with according to the rule.
Nor, monks, should a cow-hide be used.
Whoever should use one, there is an offence of wrong-doing.
Nor, monks, should any hide be used.
Whoever should use one, there is an offence of wrong-doing.”
These were cut to the measurement of a couch and they were cut to the measurement of a chair, and they were laid inside the couches and they were laid outside the couches and they were laid inside the chairs and they were laid outside the chairs.
Then that depraved lay-follower, having slaughtered that calf, having skinned it, bestowed the hide upon that depraved monk.
Those who were modest monks … spread it about, saying: “How can this monk incite to onslaught on creatures? Is not onslaught on creatures condemned in many a figure by the Lord, restraint from onslaught on creatures extolled?”
Now at that time people’s couches and chairs came to be covered up with hides, covered over with hides.
Monks being scrupulous, did not sit down on them.
They told this matter to the Lord.
He said: “I allow you, monks, to sit down on what is displayed by householders, but not to lie down on it.”
Now at that time dwelling-places were lashed together with thongs of hide.
Monks, being scrupulous, did not sit down .
They told this matter to the Lord.
He said: “I allow you, monks, to sit down against what is used only for lashing .”
Now at that time the group of six monks entered a village with their sandals on.
People looked down upon, criticised spread it about, saying: “Like householders who enjoy pleasures of the senses.”
He said: “Monks, you should not enter a village with your sandals on.
Whoever should enter it, there is an offence of wrong-doing.”
Now at that time a certain monk became ill; he was not able to enter the village without his sandals.
They told this matter to the Lord.
He said: “I allow, monks, a monk if he is ill to enter a village with his sandals on.”
They told this matter to the Lord.
Now at that time the venerable Kaccāna the Great was staying among the people of Avantī at Osprey’s Haunt on Steep Rock mountain slope.
Now at that time the lay-follower, Soṇa Kuṭikaṇṇa, was a supporter of the venerable Kaccāna the Great.
Then the lay-follower, Soṇa Kuṭikaṇṇa, approached the venerable Kaccāna the Great; having approached, having greeted the venerable Kaccāna the Great, he sat down at a respectful distance.
As he was sitting down at a respectful distance, the lay-follower, Soṇa Kuṭikaṇṇa, spoke thus to the venerable Kaccāna the Great: “In so far as I, honoured sir, understand dhamma taught by the master, Kaccāna the Great, it is no easy matter for one living in a house to lead the Brahma-faring which is utterly complete, utterly pure and polished like a conch-shell.
I want, honoured sir, having cut off hair and beard, having donned yellow robes, to go forth from home into homelessness.
Honoured sir, may the master Kaccāna the Great let me go forth.” He said: “Difficult, Soṇa, for as long as life lasts are the solitary sleeping-place, the one meal , the Brahma-faring.
Please do you, Soṇa, being a householder as before, practise the instruction of the awakened ones for a short time: the solitary sleeping-place, the one meal , the Brahma-faring.”
Then that abated which had been the lay follower Soṇa Kuṭikaṇṇa’s strong aspiration for the going forth.
But a second time did the lay follower Soṇa Kuṭikaṇṇa … But a third time did the lay follower Soṇa Kuṭikaṇṇa approach the venerable Kaccāna the Great … as in Kd.5.13.1
Now at that time the southern region of Avantī came to be short of monks.
Then did the venerable Kaccāna the Great at the end of three years, with difficulty, with trouble, having had convened from here and there an Order of monks consisting of ten, ordain the venerable Soṇa.
“… Honoured sir, may the master Kaccāna the Great let me go forth.”
Then the venerable Kaccāna the Great let the lay-follower Soṇa Kuṭikaṇṇa go forth.
Then as the venerable Soṇa was keeping the rains and meditating in seclusion, a reasoning arose in his mind thus: “I have only heard that this Lord is such and such a one, but I have not seen him face to face. I would go and see this Lord, the perfected, the all-awakened one, if a preceptor would allow me.”
Then the venerable Soṇa, emerging from seclusion towards the evening, approached the venerable Kaccāna the Great; having approached, having greeted the venerable Kaccāna the Great, he sat down at a respectful distance.
As he was sitting down at a respectful distance, the venerable Soṇa spoke thus to the venerable Kaccāna the Great: “Now, as I, honoured sir, was meditating in seclusion, a reasoning arose in my mind thus: ‘I have only heard that this Lord is such and such a one, but I have not seen him face to face. I would go to see this Lord, the perfected, the all-awakened one, if a preceptor would allow me.’ I, honoured sir, would go to see this Lord, the perfected, the all-awakened one, if the preceptor allows me.”
“Good, it is good, Soṇa.
Do you, Soṇa, go to see this Lord, the perfected, the all-awakened one.
“You, Soṇa, will see this Lord, who is pleasant and inspires one to be pleased, who is calmed in his sense-organs, calmed in mind, who has attained the uttermost taming and peace, the hero tamed, guarded, controlled in his sense-organs.
Well then, do you, Soṇa, in my name salute the Lord’s feet with your head, saying: ‘Lord, my preceptor, the venerable Kaccāna the Great, salutes the Lord’s feet with his head’,
“‘Lord, in the southern region of Avantī the surface-soil is dark, hard, trampled by the hooves of cattle. Perhaps the Lord would allow sandals with many linings in the southern region of Avantī.
Lord, in the southern region of Avantī people attach importance to bathing, to purification by water. Perhaps the Lord would allow constant bathing in the southern region of Avantī.
Lord, in the southern region of Avantī hides coverings: sheep-hide, goat-hide, deer-hide.
As, Lord, in the middle districts, eragu, moragu, majjhāru, jantu , so, Lord, in the southern region of Avantī hides coverings. Perhaps the Lord would allow hides coverings in the southern region of Avantī: sheep-hide, goat-hide, deer-hide.
“‘At present, Lord, people give robe-material to monks who have gone outside the boundaries, saying: “We are giving this robe-material for so and so.”
“Yes, honoured sir”, and the venerable Soṇa having spoken in assent to the venerable Kaccāna the Great, rising from his seat, having greeted the venerable Kaccāna the Great, having kept his right side towards him, having packed away his lodging, taking his bowl and robe, set out for Sāvatthī.
In due course he approached Sāvatthī, the Jeta Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery, the Lord; having approached, having greeted the Lord, he sat down at a respectful distance.
Then the Lord addressed the venerable Ānanda, saying: “Ānanda, make ready a lodging for this incoming monk”.
Then the venerable Ānanda thought: “The Lord desires to stay in the same dwelling-place together with this monk, the Lord desires to stay in the same dwelling-place together with the venerable Soṇa; it is he in regard to whom the Lord enjoined me, saying: ‘Ānanda, make ready a lodging for this incoming monk’,” and he made ready a lodging for the venerable Soṇa in that dwelling-place where the Lord was staying.
Then the Lord, having spent a great part of that night in the open air, entered the dwelling-place.
The venerable Soṇa also, having spent a great part of that night in the open air, entered the dwelling-place.
Then the Lord, getting up in the night towards dawn, requested the venerable Soṇa, saying: “May dhamma occur to you to speak, monk.”
“Very well, Lord”, and the venerable Soṇa, having replied in assent to the Lord, spoke from memory everything belonging to the Divisions in the Eights.
Then the Lord at the end of the venerable Soṇa’s recital expressed his approbation saying: “Good, it is good, monk, that by you, monk,
the Divisions in the Eights are well learnt, well attended to, well reflected upon,
Of how many years’ standing are you, monk? ”
“I, Lord, am of one year’s standing.”
“But what have you, monk, done thus long? ”
“For long, Lord, I have seen peril in pleasures of the senses, but household lives are crowded, there is much to be done, much business.”
“Having seen peril in the world, having known dhamma without attachment, /
the noble one delights not in evil, the pure one delights in instruction.”
Then the venerable Soṇa, thinking: “The Lord is much pleased with me, this is the time for that for which the preceptor prepared me,” rising from his seat, having arranged his upper robe over one shoulder, having inclined his head to the Lord’s feet, spoke thus:“Lord, my preceptor, the venerable Kaccāna the Great, salutes the Lord’s feet with his head, and speaks thus: ‘The southern region of Avantī, Lord …
I allow, monks, in all border districts ordination by a group with, as fifth, an expert on discipline.
“For this purpose, these are the border districts: the little town called Kajaṅgala is in the eastern direction, beyond it is Mahāsālā, further than that are border districts, on this side are the middle . The river called Sallavatī is in the south-eastern direction, further than that are border districts, on this side are the middle . The little town called Setakaṇṇika is in the southern direction, further than that are border districts, on this side are the middle . The brahmin village called Thūna is in the western direction, further than that are border districts, on this side are the middle . The mountain slope called Usīraddhaja is in the northern direction, further than that are border districts, on this side are the middle .
I allow, monks, in such border districts as these, ordination by a group with, as fifth, an expert on discipline.
“In the southern region of Avantī, monks, the surface-soil is dark, hard, trampled by the hooves of cattle.
I allow, monks, in all border districts, sandals with many linings.
In the southern region of Avantī, monks, people attach importance to bathing, to purification by water.
I allow, monks, in all border districts, constant bathing.
In the southern region of Avantī, monks, hides coverings: sheep-hide, goat-hide, deer-hide.
As, monks, in the middle districts eragu, moragu, majjhāra, jantu , so, monks, in the southern region of Avantī hides coverings: sheep-hide, goat-hide, deer-hide.
I allow, monks, in all border districts, hides coverings: sheep-hide, goat-hide, deer-hide.
And moreover, monks, people give robe-material for monks who have gone outside the boundaries, saying: ‘We are giving this robe-material for so and so’.
I allow you, monks, to consent . That reckoning is not necessary until it reaches the hand.”
and then speak thus: ‘Lord, the southern region of Avantī is short of monks. At the end of three years , with difficulty, with trouble, having had convened for me from here and there an Order of monks consisting of ten, I received ordination. Perhaps the Lord would allow ordination by a smaller group in the southern region of Avantī.
When these have come back announce: “Your reverences, robe-material was given for you by the people so and so”. But these, being scrupulous, do not consent to it, thinking: “Let there not be an offence involving forfeiture for us.” Perhaps the Lord would explain the procedure in regard to robe-material.’ ”
and that you are endowed with lovely speech, distinct, without hoarseness, so as to make the meaning clear.
Then the Lord, having understood this matter, at that time uttered this utterance:
Then the Lord, on this occasion, in this connection, having given reasoned talk, addressed the monks, saying: “Monks, the southern region of Avantī is short of monks.
… perhaps the Lord would explain the procedure in regard to robe-material’.”
One who wants to develop the recollection of peace mentioned next to mindfulness of breathing should go into solitary retreat and recollect the special qualities of Nibbāna, in other words, the stilling of all suffering, as follows: “Bhikkhus, in so far as there are dhammas, whether formed or unformed, fading away is pronounced the best of them, that is to say, the disillusionment of vanity, the elimination of thirst, the abolition of reliance, the termination of the round, the destruction of craving, fading away, cessation, Nibbāna” .
Herein in so far as means as many as.
Dhammas means individual essences.69
Whether formed or unformed: whether made by conditions going together, coming together, or not so made.70
Fading away is pronounced the best of them: of these formed and unformed dhammas, fading away is pronounced the best, is called the foremost, the highest.
Herein fading away is not mere absence of greed, but rather it is that unformed dhamma which, while given the names “disillusionment of vanity,” etc., in the clause, “that is to say, the disillusionment of vanity, … Nibbāna,” is treated basically as fading away.71
But it is called abolition of reliance because on coming to its reliance on the five cords of sense desire is abolished.
It is called termination of the round because on coming to it the round of the three planes of existence is terminated.
It is called destruction of craving because on coming to it craving is entirely destroyed, fades away and ceases.
It is called Nibbāna because it has gone away from , has escaped from , is dissociated from craving, which has acquired in common usage the name “fastening” because, by ensuring successive becoming, craving serves as a joining together, a binding together, a lacing together, of the four kinds of generation, five destinies, seven stations of consciousness and nine abodes of beings.73
This is how peace, in other words, Nibbāna, should be recollected according to its special qualities beginning with disillusionment of vanity.
But it should also be recollected according to the other special qualities of peace stated by the Blessed One in the suttas beginning with: “Bhikkhus, I shall teach you the unformed … the truth … the other shore … the hard-to-see … the undecaying … the lasting … the undiversified … the deathless … the auspicious … the safe … the marvellous … the intact … the unafflicted … the purity … the island … the shelter ….” .74
As he recollects peace in its special qualities of disillusionment of vanity, etc., in this way, then: “On that occasion his mind is not obsessed by greed or obsessed by hate or obsessed by delusion; his mind has rectitude on that occasion, being inspired by peace” .
So when he has suppressed the hindrances in the way already described under the recollection of the Enlightened One, etc., the jhāna factors arise in a single moment.
But owing to the profundity of the special qualities of peace, or owing to his being occupied in recollecting special qualities of various kinds, the jhāna is only access and does not reach absorption.
And that jhāna itself is known as “recollection of peace” too because it arises by means of the special qualities of peace.
And as in the case of the six recollections, this also comes to success only in a noble disciple. Still, though this is so, it can nevertheless also be brought to mind by an ordinary person who values peace.
For even by hearsay the mind has confidence in peace.
A bhikkhu who is devoted to this recollection of peace sleeps in bliss and wakes in bliss, his faculties are peaceful, his mind is peaceful, he has conscience and shame, he is confident, he is resolved to attain the superior state, he is respected and honoured by his fellows in the life of purity.
And even if he penetrates no higher, he is at least headed for a happy destiny.
So that is why a man of wit Untiringly devotes his days
To mind the noble peace, which can Reward him in so many ways.
This is the section dealing with the recollection of peace in the detailed explanation.
composed for the purpose of gladdening good people. in the Path of Purification
in the Treatise on the Development of Concentration
called “The Description of Recollections as Meditation Subjects”
It is called disillusionment of vanity because on coming to it all kinds of vanity , such as the vanity of conceit, and vanity of manhood, are disillusioned, undone, done away with.72
And it is called elimination of thirst because on coming to it all thirst for sense desires is eliminated and quenched.
The eighth chapter
“In such passages as ‘Dhammas that are concepts’ even a non- entity is thus called a ‘dhamma’ since it is borne and affirmed by knowledge. That kind of dhamma is excluded by his saying, ‘Dhammas means individual essences.’
The act of becoming , which constitutes existing- ness in the ultimate sense, is essence ; it is with essence , thus it is an individual essence ; the meaning is that it is possible in the true sense, in the ultimate sense.
For these are called ‘dhammas ’ because they bear their own individual essences , and they are called ‘individual essences’ in the sense already explained”
“‘Made’ is generated.
‘Not so made’ is not made by any conditions at all.”
“That dhamma possessing individual essence and having the characteristic of being not formed is to be treated basically as ‘fading away,’ since it is there that the dhamma of defilement fades away”
The words ‘such as’ refer to vanity of birth, and so on ”
Vanity of manhood’ is vanity about being of the male sex.
Herein, ‘vanity of conceit ’ is conceit that occurs as conceiving ‘I am superior’ . ‘
“When they are being abandoned by the noble path, which occurs by making Nibbāna its object, it is said that they are abandoned by reaching that Nibbāna which is why he said, ‘Because on coming to it,’ and so on.
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Jetavana with reference to the ministers of justice.
For on a certain day the monks made their rounds for alms in a settlement at the north gate of Sāvatthi, and returning from their pilgrimage to the monastery, passed through the center of the city.
At that moment a cloud came up, and the rain began to fall.
Entering a hall of justice opposite, they saw lords of justice taking bribes and depriving lawful owners of their property. Seeing this, they thought, “Ah, these men are unrighteous! Until now we supposed they rendered righteous judgments.” When the rain was over, they went to the monastery, saluted the Teacher, and sitting respectfully on one side, informed him of the incident.
Said the Teacher, “Monks, they that yield to evil desires and decide a cause by violence, are not properly called justices; they only that penetrate within a wrong and without violence render judgment according to the wrong committed, are properly called justices.” So saying, he pronounced the following Stanzas,
Not therefore is a man called a justice because he decides a cause arbitrarily;
Nay rather is it he that inquires into both right and wrong, he that is wise.
He that leads others without violence, justly and righteously,
He that is protected of the Law, he that is intelligent, he alone is properly called a justice.
“Venerable sir, I hope that when I was asked such a question
“Whatever recluses and brahmins have wrong view, wrong intention, wrong speech, wrong action, wrong livelihood, wrong effort, wrong mindfulness, and wrong concentration, if they make an aspiration and they lead the holy life, they are unable to procure any fruit; if they make no aspiration and they lead the holy life, they are still unable to procure any fruit; if they both make an aspiration and make no aspiration and they lead the holy life, they are still unable to procure any fruit; if they neither make an aspiration nor make no aspiration and they lead the holy life, they are still unable to procure any fruit.
and answered thus,
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Rajagaha in the Bamboo Grove, the Squirrels’ Sanctuary.
Now on that occasion the novice Aciravata was living in a forest hut.
Then Prince Jayasena, while wandering and walking for exercise, went to the novice Aciravata and exchanged greetings with him.1174
“That is so, prince, that is so.
A bhikkhu who abides here diligent, ardent, and resolute can achieve unification of mind.”
“It would be good if Master Aggivessana would teach me the Dhamma as he has heard it and mastered it.”
“I cannot teach you the Dhamma, prince, as I have heard it and mastered it.
For if I were to teach you the Dhamma as I have heard it and mastered it, you would not understand the meaning of my words, and that would be wearying and troublesome for me.”
“Let Master Aggivessana teach me the Dhamma as he has heard it and mastered it.
Perhaps I can understand the meaning of his words.”
“I shall teach you the Dhamma, prince, as I have heard it and mastered it.
If you can understand the meaning of my words, that will be good. But if you cannot understand the meaning, then leave it at that and do not question me about it further.”
“Let Master Aggivessana teach me the Dhamma as he has heard it and mastered it.
If I can understand the meaning of his words, that will be good. If I cannot understand the meaning, then I will leave it at that and I will not question him about it further”.
Then the novice Aciravata taught Prince Jayasena the Dhamma as he had heard it and mastered it.
After he had spoken, Prince Jayasena remarked: “It is impossible, Master Aggivessana, it cannot happen that a bhikkhu who abides diligent, ardent, and resolute can achieve unification of mind.”
Then, having declared to the novice Aciravata that this was impossible and could not happen, Prince Jayasena rose from his seat and departed.
Soon after Prince Jayasena had left, the novice Aciravata went to the Blessed One.
After paying homage to the Blessed One, he sat down at one side and reported to the Blessed One his entire conversation with Prince Jayasena.
When he had finished, the Blessed One said to him: 7. “Aggivessana, how is it possible
that Prince Jayasena, living in the midst of sensual pleasures, enjoying sensual pleasures, being devoured by thoughts of sensual pleasures, being consumed by the fever of sensual pleasures, bent on the search for sensual pleasures, could know, see, or realise that which must be known through renunciation, seen through renunciation, attained through renunciation, realised through renunciation? That is impossible.
“Suppose,1175 Aggivessana, there were two tamable elephants, horses, or oxen that were well tamed and well disciplined, and two tamable elephants, horses, or oxen that were untamed and undisciplined.
What do you think, Aggivessana? Would the two tamable elephants, horses, or oxen that were well tamed and well disciplined, being tamed, acquire the behaviour of the tamed, would they arrive at the grade of the tamed?”
- “Yes, venerable sir.”
- “But would the two tamable elephants, horses, or oxen that were untamed and undisciplined, being untamed, acquire the behaviour of the tamed, would they arrive at the grade of the tamed, like the two tamable elephants, horses, or oxen that were well tamed and well disciplined?”
- “No, venerable sir.”
- “So too, Aggivessana, it is impossible that Prince Jayasena, living in the midst of sensual pleasures,…could know, see, or realise that which must be known through renunciation, seen through renunciation, attained through renunciation, realised through renunciation.
“Suppose, Aggivessana, there were a high mountain not far from a village or town,
and two friends would leave the village or town and approach the mountain hand in hand. Having reached it, one friend would remain below at the foot of the mountain while the other would climb to the top.
Then the friend who remained below at the foot of the mountain would say to the friend who stood on the top: ‘Well, friend, what do you see, standing on top of the mountain?”
And the other replied: ‘Standing on top of the mountain, friend, I see lovely parks, lovely groves, lovely meadows, and lovely ponds.’
Then the first friend would say: ‘It is impossible, friend, it cannot happen that while Standing on top of the mountain you should see lovely parks, lovely groves, lovely meadows, and lovely ponds.’
“Then the other friend would come down to the foot of the mountain, take his friend by the arm, and make him climb to the top of the mountain. After giving him a few moments to catch his breath, he would ask: ‘Well, friend, standing on top of the mountain, what do you see?”
And his friend would reply: ‘Standing on top of the mountain, friend, I see lovely parks, lovely groves, lovely meadows, and lovely ponds.’
Then the other would say: ‘Friend, just a little earlier we heard you say: “It is impossible, friend, it cannot happen that while standing on top of the mountain you should see lovely parks…lovely ponds.”
But just now we heard you say: “Standing on top of the mountain, friend, I see lovely parks…lovely ponds.’“
Then the first friend would reply: ‘Because I was obstructed by this high mountain, friend, I did not see what was there to be seen.’
“So too, Aggivessana, Prince Jayasena is obstructed, hindered, blocked, and enveloped by a still greater mass than this -the mass of ignorance.
Thus it is impossible that Prince Jayasena, living in the midst of sensual pleasures,…could know, see, or realise that which must be known through renunciation, seen through renunciation, attained through renunciation, realised through renunciation.
“Aggivessana, if these two similes had occurred to you with reference to Prince Jayasena, he would have spontaneously acquired confidence in you, and being confident, would have shown his confidence to you.”
“Venerable sir, how could these two similes have occurred to me with reference to Prince Jayasena as they occur to the Blessed One, since they are spontaneous and have never been heard before?”
“Suppose, Aggivessana, a head-anointed noble king addresses his elephant woodsman thus: ‘Good elephant woodsman, mount the king’s elephant, enter the elephant wood, and when you see a forest elephant, bind him by the neck to the king’s elephant.’
Having replied ‘Yes, sire,’ the elephant woodsman mounts the king’s elephant, enters the elephant wood, and when he sees a forest elephant, binds him by the neck to the king’s elephant.
The king’s elephant leads him out into the open.
It is in this way that a forest elephant comes out into the open;
“Then the elephant woodsman informs the head-anointed noble king: ‘Sire, the forest elephant has come out into the open.’
The king addresses his elephant tamer thus: ‘Come, good elephant tamer, tame the forest elephant. Subdue his forest habits, subdue his forest memories and intentions, subdue his distress, fatigue, and fever over leaving the forest. Get him to take delight in the town, inculcate in him habits congenial to human beings.’
Having replied ‘Yes, sire,’ the elephant tamer plants a large post in the earth and binds the forest elephant to it by the neck in order to subdue his forest habits…and to inculcate in him habits congenial to human beings.
“Then the elephant tamer addresses the elephant with words that are gentle, pleasing to the ear, and loveable, as go to the heart, are courteous, desired by many, and agreeable to many.
When the forest elephant is addressed by such words, he listens, gives ear, and exerts his mind to understand. The elephant tamer next rewards him with grass-fodder and water.
When the forest elephant accepts the grass-fodder and water from him, the elephant tamer knows: ‘Now the king’s elephant will live!”
“Then the elephant tamer trains him further thus: ‘Take up, put down!”
When the king’s elephant obeys his tamer’s orders to take up and put down and carries out his instructions, the elephant tamer trains him further thus: ‘Go forward, go back!”
When the king’s elephant obeys his tamer’s orders to go forward and go back and carries out his instructions, the elephant tamer trains him further thus: ‘Get up, sit down!”
When the king’s elephant obeys his tamer’s orders to get up and sit down and carries out his instructions, the elephant tamer trains him further in the task called imperturbability. He ties a giant plank to his trunk; a man with a lance in his hand sits on his neck; men with lances in their hands surround him on all sides; and the elephant tamer himself stands in front of him holding a long lance pole.
When the elephant is being trained in the task of imperturbability, he does not move his forelegs or his hindlegs; he does not move his forequarters or his hindquarters; he does not move his head, ears, tusks, tail, or trunk.
The king’s elephant is able to endure blows from spears, blows from swords, blows from arrows, blows from other beings, and the thundering sounds of drums, kettledrums, trumpets, and tomtoms. Being rid of all faults and defects, purged of flaws, he is worthy of the king, in the king’s service, considered one of the factors of a king.
“So too, Aggivessana, a Tathagata appears in the world, accomplished, fully enlightened…
It is in this way that a noble disciple comes out into the open;
“Then the Tathagata disciplines him further: ‘Come, bhikkhu, be virtuous, restrained with the restraint of the Patimokkha, be perfect in conduct and resort, and seeing fear in the slightest fault, train by undertaking the training precepts.’
“When, Aggivessana, the noble disciple is virtuous…and seeing fear in the slightest fault, trains by undertaking the training precepts, then the Tathagata disciplines him further: ‘Come, bhikkhu, guard the doors of your sense faculties. On seeing a form with the eye, do not grasp at its signs and features. Since, if you were to leave the eye faculty unguarded, evil unwholesome states of covetousness and grief might invade you, practise the way of its restraint, guard the eye faculty, undertake the restraint of the eye faculty. On hearing a sound with the ear…On smelling an odour with the nose…On tasting a flavour with the tongue…On touching a tangible with the body…On cognizing a mind-object with the mind, do not grasp at its signs and features.
Since, if you were to leave the mind faculty unguarded, evil unwholesome states of covetousness and grief might invade you, practise the way of its restraint, guard the mind faculty, undertake the restraint of the mind faculty.’
“When, Aggivessana, the noble disciple guards the doors of his sense faculties, then the Tathagata disciplines him further: ‘Come, bhikkhu, be moderate in eating. Reflecting wisely, you should take food neither for amusement nor for intoxication nor for the sake of physical beauty and attractiveness, but only for the endurance and continuance of this body, for ending discomfort, and for assisting the holy life, considering: “Thus I shall terminate old feelings without arousing new feelings and I shall be healthy and blameless and shall live in comfort.’“ 18. “When, Aggivessana, the noble disciple is moderate in eating, then the Tathagata disciplines him further: ‘Come, bhikkhu, be devoted to wakefulness. During the day, while walking back and forth and sitting, purify your mind of obstructive states. In the first watch of the night, while walking back and forth and sitting, purify your mind of obstructive states. In the middle watch of the night you should lie down on the right side in the lion’s pose with one foot overlapping the other, mindful and fully aware, after noting in your mind the time for rising. After rising, in the last watch of the night, while walking back and forth and sitting, purify your mind of obstructive states.’ 19. “When, Aggivessana, the noble disciple is devoted to wakefulness, then the Tathagata disciplines him further: ‘Come, bhikkhu, be possessed of mindfulness and full awareness. Act in full awareness when going forward and returning…when looking ahead and looking away…when flexing and extending your limbswhen wearing your robes and carrying your outer robe and bowlwhen eating, drinking, consuming food, and tastingwhen defecating and urinatingwhen walking, standing, sitting, falling asleep, waking up, talking, and keeping silent.’ 20. “When, Aggivessana, the noble disciple possesses mindfulness and full awareness, then the Tathagata disciplines him further: ‘Come, bhikkhu, resort to a secluded resting place: the forest, the root of a tree, a mountain, a ravine, a hillside cave, a charnel ground, a jungle thicket, an open space, a heap of straw.’ 21. “He resorts to a secluded resting place: the forest…a heap of straw. On returning from his almsround, after his meal he sits down, folding his legs crosswise, setting his body erect, and establishing mindfulness before him. Abandoning covetousness for the world, he abides with a mind free from covetousness; he purifies his mind from covetousness. Abandoning ill will and hatred, he abides with a mind free from ill will, compassionate for the welfare of all living beings; he purifies his mind from ill will and hatred. Abandoning sloth and torpor, he abides free from sloth and torpor, percipient of light, mindful, and fully aware; he purifies his mind from sloth and torpor. Abandoning restlessness and remorse, he abides unagitated with a mind inwardly peaceful; he purifies his mind from restlessness and remorse. Abandoning doubt, he abides having gone beyond doubt, unperplexed about wholesome states; he purifies his mind from doubt. 22. “Having thus abandoned these five hindrances, imperfections of the mind that weaken wisdom, he abides contemplating the body as a body, ardent, fully aware, and mindful, having put away covetousness and grief for the world. He abides contemplating feelings as feelings…mind as mind…mind-objects as mind-objects, ardent, fully aware, and mindful, having put away covetousness and grief for the world.1176
“Then the Tathagata disciplines him further: ‘Come, bhikkhu, abide contemplating the body as a body but do not think thoughts connected with the body;
“With the stilling of applied and sustained thought, he enters upon and abides in the second jhana1177…the third jhana…the fourth jhana.
“When his concentrated mind is thus purified……
“That bhikkhu is able to endure cold and heat, hunger and thirst, and contact with gadflies, mosquitoes, wind, the sun, and creeping things; he is able to endure ill-spoken, unwelcome words and arisen bodily feelings that are painful, racking, sharp, piercing, disagreeable, distressing, and menacing to life. Being rid of all lust, hate, and delusion, purged of flaws, he is worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of reverential salutations, an unsurpassed field of merit for the world.
“If, Aggivessana, the king’s elephant dies in old age untamed and undisciplined, then he is considered an old elephant that has died an untamed death. If the king’s elephant dies when middle-aged untamed and undisciplined, then he is considered a middle-aged elephant that has died an untamed death.
If the king’s elephant dies when young untamed and undisciplined, then he is considered a young elephant that has died an untamed death. So too, Aggivessana, if an elder bhikkhu dies with his taints undestroyed, then he is considered an elder bhikkhu who has died an untamed death. If a bhikkhu of middle status dies with his taints undestroyed, then he is considered a bhikkhu of middle status who has died an untamed death.
If a newly ordained bhikkhu dies with his taints undestroyed, then he is considered a newly ordained bhikkhu who has died an untamed death.
“If, Aggivessana, the king’s elephant dies in old age well tamed and well disciplined, then he is considered an old elephant that has died a tamed death. If the king’s elephant dies when middle-aged well tamed and well disciplined, then he is considered a middle-aged elephant that has died a tamed death. If the king’s elephant dies when young well tamed and well disciplined, then he is considered a young elephant that has died a tamed death. So too, Aggivessana, if an elder bhikkhu dies with his taints destroyed, then he is considered an elder bhikkhu who has died a tamed death. If a bhikkhu of middle status dies with his taints destroyed, then he is considered a bhikkhu of middle status who has died a tamed death.
If a newly ordained bhikkhu dies with his taints destroyed, then he is considered a newly ordained bhikkhu who has died a tamed death.”
That is what the Blessed One said.
The novice Aciravata was satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
To the order of monks : to the collection of the eight ariyapuggalas compact247 through their equality as regards view and morality248.
To this extent, Suppabuddha announces the three refuge-goings, viz.
“May the Lord accept me as a layfollower such that ‘Beginning with today, whilst furnished with life’s breath, I be one gone as refuge’ “249,
And this one’s refuge-going had already been accomplished through attainment of the ariyan path, even though he speaks thus disclosing such to be his intention253.
Whilst furnished with life’s breath : pāṇupetaṃ, pāṇehi upetaṃ ; may the Lord accept me as—meaning may he know me as—one abiding by the rules, one who is a layfollower on account of close association with the Three jewels who be gone as refuge by way of the three refuge-goings, one having no other teacher, so long as I be furnished , as life continues for me.
Beginning with today 250: making today the starting point . Aija-d-agge is also a reading, wherein the syllable da provides a euphonic link between the words, meaning beginning with today , making today the starting point 251.
When this courteous and amiable talk was finished, he sat down at one side
and said to the novice Aciravata:
“Master Aggivessana, I have heard that a bhikkhu who abides here diligent, ardent, and resolute can achieve unification of mind.”
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Ghosita monastery near Kosambi, and it was with reference to the loss by death of the five hundred women led by Sāmāvatī and of Māgandiyā and her five hundred kinswomen. From beginning to end the story is as follows:
Once upon a time King Allakappa ruled over the kingdom of Allakappa and King Veṭhadīpaka ruled over the kingdom of Veṭhadīpaka. They had been intimate friends since their boyhood-days and had received their education in the house of the same teacher. On the death of their fathers they raised the royal parasol and became rulers of kingdoms, each of which was ten leagues in extent.
As they met from time to time, and stood and sat and lay down to sleep together, and watched the multitudes being born into the world and dying again, they came to the conclusion, “When a man goes to the world beyond he can take nothing with him: {1.162} he must leave everything behind him when he goes thither; even his own body does not follow him; of what use to us is the life of the householder? Let us retire from the world.”
Accordingly they resigned their kingdoms to son and wife, retired from the world, adopted the life of ascetics, and took up their residence in the Himālaya country.
Although we have renounced our kingdoms and retired from the world, we shall encounter no difficulty in gaining a living; but if we reside together in the same place, our life will be quite unlike the life of ascetics; therefore let us live apart. You live on this mountain; I will live on that. Every fortnight, on fast-day, we will meet together.”
Every fortnight, on fast-day, we will meet together.”
Then this thought occurred to them, “Under this arrangement 28.248 neither of us will be in regular communication with the other; but in order that each of us may know whether the other is living or not, you light a fire on your mountain, and I will light a fire on mine.”
And this they did.
After a time the ascetic Veṭhadīpaka died and was reborn as a prince of deities of mighty power
A fortnight later Allakappa saw no fire on the mountain and knew that his comrade was dead.
As soon as ever Veṭhadīpaka was reborn, he surveyed his own heavenly glory, considered the deeds of his former existence, reviewed the austerities he had performed from the day when he retired from the world, and said to himself, “I will go see my comrade.” Accordingly he laid aside his form as a deity, disguised himself as a wayfarer, went to Allakappa, paid obeisance to him, and stood respectfully on one side.
Allakappa said to him, “Whence have you come?”
“I am a wayfarer, Reverend Sir; I have come a long distance.
But, Reverend Sir, does your honor reside entirely alone in this place? Is there no one else here?”
I have a single comrade.”
“Where is he?”
He resides on that mountain; but as he failed to light a fire on fast-day, I know he must be dead.”
Is that so, Reverend Sir?”
That is so, brother.”
“I am he, Reverend Sir.”
“Where were you reborn?”
“Reverend Sir, I was reborn in the World of the Gods as a prince of deities of mighty power. I have returned to see your honor.
Does your honorable self reside in this place undisturbed, or are you subject to some annoyance?”
Yes, brother, I am bothered to death by the elephants.”
“Reverend Sir, what do the elephants do to trouble you?”
“They drop dung on the ground I have swept clean, and they stamp with their feet and kick up the dust. What with removing the dung and smoothing the ground, I am all worn out.”
“Well, would you like to keep them away?”
Yes, brother.”
“Well then, I will provide you with means whereby you can keep them away.”
Thereafter the ascetic lived in peace, driving the elephants away by uttering the proper spell and striking the proper string.
Accordingly Veṭhadīpaka gave Allakappa a lute to charm elephants with and likewise taught him spells for charming elephants. Now as he presented the lute to him, he showed him three strings and taught him three spells. “Strike this string,” said he, “and utter this spell, and the elephants will turn and run away without so much as daring even to look at you; strike this string and utter this spell, and they will turn and run away, eyeing you at every step; strike this string and utter this spell, and the leader of the herd will come up and offer you his back. Now do as you like.” With these words he departed.
At this time Parantapa was king of Kosambi.
One day he was sitting out in the open air basking himself in the rays of the newly risen sun, and beside him sat his queen, great with child.
The queen was wearing the king’s cloak, a crimson blanket worth a hundred thousand pieces of money; and as she sat there conversing with the king she removed from the king’s finger the royal signet, worth a hundred thousand pieces of money, and slipped it on her own.
Just at that moment a monster bird with a bill as big as an elephant’s trunk came soaring through the air. Seeing the queen and mistaking her for a piece of meat, he spread his wings and swooped down.
When the king heard the bird swoop down, he sprang to his feet and entered the royal palace.
But the queen, because she was great with child and because she was of a timid nature, was unable to make haste.
The bird pounced upon her, caught her up in the cage of his talons, and soared away with her into the air.
(These birds are said to possess the strength of five elephants;
they are therefore able to convey their victims through the air, settle wherever they wish, and devour their flesh.)
As the queen was being carried away by the bird, terrified though she was with the fear of death, she preserved her presence of mind and thought to herself, “Animals stand in great fear of the human voice. Therefore if I cry out, this bird will drop me the instant he hears the sound of my voice.
But in that case I should accomplish only my own destruction and that of my unborn child. If, however, I wait until he settles somewhere and begins to eat, then I can make a noise and frighten him away.”
Through her own wisdom, therefore, she kept patience and endured.
Now there stood at that time in the Himālaya country a banyan-tree which, although of brief growth, had attained great size {1.165} and was like a pavilion in form;
and to this tree that bird was accustomed to convey the carcasses of wild animals and eat them. To this very tree, therefore, the bird conveyed the queen, lodged her in a fork of the tree, and watched the path leading to the tree
At that moment the queen, thinking to herself, “Now is the time to frighten him away,” raised both her hands, clapped them together and shouted, and frightened the bird away.
At sunset the pains of travail came upon her,
and at the same time from all the four quarters of heaven arose a great storm.
he delicate queen, half dead with suffering, with no one beside her to say to her, “Fear not, lady,” slept not at all throughout the night.
s the night grew bright, the clouds scattered, the dawn came, and her child was born at one and the same moment.
Because the child was born at the time of a storm, at the time when she was upon a mountain, and at the time when the sun rose, she named her son Udena.
Not far from that tree was the place of residence of the ascetic Allakappa.
Now on rainy days it was the custom of the ascetic not to go into the forest for fruits and berries, for fear of the cold. Instead he used to go to the foot of the tree and gather up the bones from which the birds had picked the flesh; then he would pound the bones, make broth of them, and drink the broth.
On that very day, therefore, he went there to get bones. As he was picking up bones at the foot of the tree, he heard the voice of a child in the branches above. Looking up, he saw the queen. “Who are you?” said he. “I am a woman.”
“How did you get there?”
“A monster bird brought me here.” “Come down,” said he.
“Your honor, I am afraid to come down on account of difference of caste.”
“Of what caste are you?”
“Of the Warrior caste.”
“I am also of the Warrior caste.”
“Well then, give me the password of the Warrior caste.”
He did so.
. “Well then, climb up and set down my boy.”
Finding a way to climb the tree on one side, he climbed up and took the boy in his arms;
obeying the queen’s behest not to touch her with his hand, he set the boy down;
then the queen herself came down.
The ascetic conducted the queen along the path to his hermitage and cared for her tenderly without in any way violating his vow of chastity.
He brought honey free from flies and gave it to her; he brought rice grown in his own field and prepared broth and gave it to her. Thus did he minister to her needs.
After a time she thought to herself, “For my part I know neither the way to come nor the way to go, nor can I repose absolute confidence even in this ascetic. Now if he were to leave us and go elsewhere, we should both perish right here. I must by some means seduce him to violate his vow of chastity, so that he will not abandon us.
Accordingly she displayed herself before him with under and upper garments in disarray, and thus seduced him to violate his vow of chastity;
thenceforth the two lived together.
One day, as the ascetic was observing a conjunction of a constellation with one of the lunar mansions, he saw the occultation of Parantapa’s star. “ “My lady,” said he, “Parantapa, king of Kosambi, is dead.”
“Noble sir, why do you speak thus?
Why do you bear ill-will against him?”
“I bear him no ill-will, my lady. I say this because I have just seen the occultation of his star.” She burst into tears.
“Why do you weep?” he asked. Тhen she told him that Parantapa was her own husband. The ascetic replied, “Weep not, my lady; whoever is born is certain to die.”
“I know that, noble sir.” “Then why do you weep?”
“I weep, noble sir, because it pains me to think, ‘To my son belongs the sovereignty by right of succession; had he been there, he would have raised the white parasol;
ow he has become one of the common herd.’
“Never mind, my lady; be not disturbed. If you desire that he shall receive the sovereignty, I will devise some means by which he shall receive it.”
Accordingly the ascetic gave the boy the lute to charm elephants with and likewise taught him the spells for charming elephants.
Now at that time many thousands of elephants came and sat at the foot of the banyan-tree.
So the ascetic said to the boy, “Climb the tree before the elephants come, and when they come, utter this spell and strike this string, and they will all turn and run away, without even so much as daring to look at you; then descend and come to me.”
The boy did as he was told, and then went and told the ascetic.
On the second day the ascetic said to him, “To-day utter this spell and strike this string, if you please, and they will turn and run away, eyeing you at every step.”
On that day also the boy did as he was told, and then went and told the ascetic.
Then the ascetic addressed the mother, saying, “My lady, give your son his message and he will go hence and become king.”
So she addressed her son, saying, “You must say, ‘I am the son of King Parantapa of Kosambi; a monster bird carried me off.’ Then you must utter the names of the commander-in-chief and the other generals. If they still refuse to believe you, you must show them this blanket which was your father’s cloak and this signet-ring which he wore on his finger.” With these words she dismissed him.
The boy said to the ascetic, “Now what shall I do?”
The ascetic replied, “Seat yourself on the lowest branch of the tree, utter this spell and strike this string, and the leader of the elephants will approach and offer you his back. Seat yourself on his back, go to your kingdom, and take the sovereignty.”
The boy did reverence to his parents, and following the instructions of the ascetic, seated himself on the back of the elephant and whispered in his ear, “I am the son of King Parantapa of Kosambi. Get me and give me the sovereignty which I have inherited from my father.”
When the elephant heard that, he trumpeted, “Let many thousands of elephants assemble;”and many thousands of elephants assembled.
Again a second time he trumpeted, “Let the old, weak elephants retire;” and the old, weak elephants retired.
The third time he trumpeted, “Let those that are very young retire;” and they also retired.
So the boy went forth, surrounded by many thousands of warrior-elephants, and reaching a village on the frontier, proclaimed, “I am the son of the king;let those who desire worldly prosperity come with me.”
Levying forces as he proceeded, he invested the city and sent the following message to the citizens, “Give me battle or the kingdom.”
The citizens answered, “We will give neither.
Our queen was carried off by a monster bird when she was great with child, and we know not whether she is alive or dead.
So long as we hear no news of her,
we will give neither battle nor the kingdom.”
At that time, we are told, the kingdom was handed down from father to son.)
Thereupon the boy said, “I am her son.” So saying, he uttered the names of the commander-in-chief and the other generals, and when they still refused to believe him, showed the blanket and the ring.
They recognized the blanket and the ring, opened the gates, and sprinkled him king.
Once upon a time there was a famine in the kingdom of Ajita, and a man named Kotūhalaka, unable to get a living, took his young son Kāpi and his wife Kāḷi, and thinking, “I will go to Kosambi and get a living there,” set out with provisions for the journey
There are also those who say that he left his home because the people were dying of intestinal disease.)
As they proceeded on their journey, their provisions gave out, and finally they were so overcome with hunger that they were not able to carry the boy.
hereupon the husband said to his wife, “Wife, if we live, we shall have another son. Let us cast this child away and continue our journey alone.”
There is a proverb, “A mother’s heart is tender,” and so it was with this woman.
She replied, “I could never cast away a living child.”
“Well, what shall we do?”
“Carry him by turns.”
When the mother’s turn came, she would lift the child like a wreath of flowers, clasp him to her breast, or carry him on her hip, finally giving him back to his father.
When the father took the child, no matter where he held him he suffered more intense pain than ever from hunger.
Again and again he said to his wife, “Wife, if we live, we shall have another son. Let us cast this child away.”
But this the mother steadfastly refused to do.
Finally the child became so tired from being passed back and forth that he fell asleep in the arms of his father.
When the father observed that he was asleep, allowing the mother to precede him, he went and laid the child on a couch of leaves under a bush, immediately resuming his journey.
The mother turned, looked back, and not seeing the child, asked, “Husband, where is my son?”
I laid him down under a certain bush.”
“Husband, do not kill me. Without my son I cannot live. Bring my son back to me.” nd she smote upon her breast and wept.
So the husband retraced his steps, recovered the child, and brought him back to her.
(In consequence of having cast away his child on this one occasion, Kotūhalaka was himself cast away seven times in a later existence.
Let no one regard an evil deed lightly, saying, “It is only a small matter.”)
Continuing their journey, they came to the house of a certain herdsman.
On that day, as it happened, one of the herdsman’s cows had calved, and the herdsman was about to hold the customary festival in honor of the event
Now a certain Private Buddha was accustomed to take his meals in the house of the hersdman.
The herdsman, after providing the Private Buddha with food, celebrated the cow-festival
with an abundant supply of rice-porridge.
When the herdsman saw the visitors, he asked them, “Whence have you come?” They told him the whole story, whereupon the tender-hearted youth took pity on them and saw to it that they were given rice-porridge with a plentiful supply of ghee.
The wife said to the husband, “Husband, if only you can live, I can live. For a long time you have not had sufficient food. Now eat to your heart’s content.” So saying, she set the ghee and curds before him, eating only a little of the ghee herself.
The husband ate heartily; but so intense was the hunger from which he had suffered during the preceding seven or eight days that he was unable to satisfy it.
When the herdsman had seen to it that they were provided with rice-porridge, he began himself to eat.
Now under the herdsman’s stool lay a bitch he had raised, and as the herdsman sat there eating, he fed her with morsels of rice-porridge. Kotūhalaka watched him feed her and thought to himself, “Fortunate indeed is that bitch to get such food to eat!”
Kotūhalaka was unable to digest the rice-porridge he had eaten, died during the night, and received a new existence in the womb of that very bitch.
His wife performed the funeral ceremonies over his body, and remaining in that very house, worked for hire. Receiving a pint-pot of rice, she cooked it and placed it in the bowl of the Private Buddha, saying, “May these grains of rice bring a reward to your servant.” And she thought to herself, “It would be well for me to remain right here. The Private Buddha comes here regularly; and whether there be alms or not, I shall have the privilege of paying obeisance to him each day and of ministering to him. By so doing I shall obtain peace of mind and earn much merit.”
And she remained right there working for hire.
After six or seven months the bitch gave birth to a single pup.
The herdsman reserved the milk of one cow for the pup,
and in no long time he grew to be a fine big dog.
When the Private Buddha ate his meal, he invariably gave him a portion of his rice;
and because of this the dog became deeply attached to the Private Buddha.
Now the herdsman was accustomed to go regularly twice each day to wait upon the Private Buddha, and the dog always went with him.
On the way was a lair of wild beasts, and the herdsman used to frighten the wild beasts away by striking bushes and ground with a stick and calling out three times, “Su! su!”
One day he said to the Private Buddha, “Reverend Sir, in case at any time I should be unable to come, I will send this dog for you. Therefore if I send him, please understand that I wish you to come.”
A few days later the herdsman found it inconvenient to go in person. He therefore sent the dog in his place, saying, “Boy, go bring his reverence back.”
At the mere word of the herdsman the dog started off. Where he had seen his master stop and strike bushes and ground, the dog also stopped and barked three times; and when he was sure that his barking had frightened away the wild beasts, he went on. Early in the morning, having attended to nature’s needs, he entered the hut of leaves and grass, went to the place where the Private Buddha sat, barked three times by way of announcing his arrival, and then lay down at one side.
By this the Private Buddha knew that it was time for him to go, and therefore started out.
The dog ran before him, barking constantly.
From time to time the Private Buddha tested the dog by taking the wrong path; but every time he did so the dog, by standing across the path and barking, intimated to him to take the other path.
One day the Private Buddha took the wrong path, and when the dog tried to stop him, without turning back, he pushed away the dog with his foot and went on.
The dog, perceiving that he did not intend to turn back, took the hem of his undergarment in his teeth and dragged him along until he brought him to the right path. Such was the strength of the affection of the dog for the Private Buddha.
Later on the Private Buddha’s robe wore out.
When the herdsman provided him with materials for a new set of robes,
he Private Buddha said to him, “Brother, it is difficult for a person all alone to make a robe. I will go to a convenient place and have it made for me.”
“Make it right here, Reverend Sir.”
“No, brother, I cannot.”
“Well then, Reverend Sir, do not take up your residence far from here.”
The dog stood listening to every word they said. The Private Buddha said, “Wait a moment, brother.” Thereupon, leaving the herdsman behind, he flew up into the air and departed in the direction of Gandhamādana.
When the dog saw him flying through the air, he began to bark and howl, and he kept this up until the Private Buddha gradually faded from view, whereupon his heart broke.
Therefore said the Exalted One to a monk, “The ways of men are past finding out, but the ways of the beasts are easy to discover.” 04)
So when the dog died, he was reborn, because of his straightforwardness and lack of deceit, in the World of the Thirty-three with a retinue of a thousand celestial nymphs, and there he enjoyed glory and bliss unspeakable.
When he but whispered, his voice carried a distance of sixteen leagues; when he spoke in an ordinary tone, he could be heard all over the city of the gods, a city ten thousand leagues in extent.
(Do you ask, “Of what was this the consequence?”
It was because he barked and howled for love of the Private Buddha.)
Remaining in the World of the Thirty-three for no long time, he passed from that state of existence.
(Deities pass from the World of the Gods through four causes: exhaustion of life, exhaustion of merit, exhaustion of food, and anger.
He that has earned much merit is reborn in the World of the Gods, remains there during the term allotted to him, and is then reborn higher and higher.
Thus he passes through “exhaustion of life.”
He that has earned little merit soon exhausts that merit, just as three or four pint-pots of rice tossed into a royal storehouse disappear; and he therefore soon dies.
Thus he passes through “exhaustion of merit.”
Still a third, while enjoying the pleasures of sense, fails through confusion of memory to partake of food, and the strength of his body being thereby impaired, dies.
Thus he passes through “exhaustion of food.”
A fourth, jealous of the glory of another, becomes angry and dies.
Thus he passes through “anger.”)
Ghosaka, while enjoying the pleasures of sense, became forgetful, passed, through exhaustion of food, from the World of the Thirty-three, and was conceived in the womb of a courtezan of Kosambi.
On the day when the courtezan gave birth to the child, she asked her slave-woman, “What is it?” “A son, my lady.” “Very well, put this boy into an old winnowing basket and cast him away on the dust-heap.” Thus she caused him to be cast away.
Courtezans will bestow care on a daughter, but not on a son,
for it is through a daughter that their line of business is maintained.)
Crows and dogs surrounded the child and huddled about him;
but in consequence of his barking and howling for love of the Private Buddha, not one dared to approach him.
At that moment a man came out and saw the crows and dogs all huddled together. “What does this mean?” thought he to himself, going nearer. When he saw the boy, he immediately took a fancy to him, and saying to himself, “I have gained a son,” he picked the boy up and took him home with him.
Now the treasurer of Kosambi happened at that time to go to the royal palace. Seeing the house-priest returning from the royal residence, he asked him, “Teacher, have you observed a conjunction of a constellation with one of the lunar mansions to-day?”
“Yes, great treasurer. What else have we to do?”
“What will happen to the country?”
“Only this: a boy has been born in this city to-day who will one day become the principal treasurer.”
As the treasurer’s wife was at that time great with child,
he immediately sent a messenger to his house, saying, “Go find out whether or not she has given birth to a child.”
He received the answer that she had not yet given birth to a child. Therefore, as soon as he had seen the king, he went home quickly, summoned a slave-woman named Kāḷī, gave her a thousand pieces of money, and said, “Go scour this city, find the boy that was born to-day, and bring him hither to me.”
While she was scouring the city, she came to the house where the child was and asked the mistress of the house, “When was this boy born?” “To-day.” “Give him to me,” said she, first offering a penny and gradually increasing the amount until finally, by offering a thousand pieces of money, she obtained him. Then she took him with her and presented him to the treasurer.
The treasurer gave him a home in his house, thinking to himself, “If a daughter is born to me, I will marry her to this boy and make him treasurer;
but if a son is born to me, I will kill him.”
After a few days his wife gave birth to a son.
Thereupon the treasurer thought to himself, “If only this foundling did not exist, my own son would obtain the post of treasurer. I had best kill him immediately.” So he said to Kāḷī, “Carry this child to the cattle-pen, and when it is time for the cattle to come out, lay him across the doorway, and the cattle will trample him to death. Observe whether or not they trample him to death, and then come back and tell me.”
She carried the child to the cattle-pen, and as soon as the door was opened, laid him across the doorway.
Now at other times the leader of the herd, the bull, came out last of all; but on this particular day he came out first, inclosed the boy with his four feet, and stood stock still.
Several hundred cows came out on either side of the bull, rubbing against his flanks as they passed.
The herdsman thought to himself, “Hitherto this bull has always gone out last of all, but to-day he went out first and stood stock still in the doorway of the pen. What can this mean?” Going near, he saw the boy lying under the bull. Immediately taking a fancy to him, he said to himself, “I have gained a son,” and picking him up, he carried him home.
Kāḷī went back to the treasurer and in answer to his question told him what had happened. Said the treasurer, “Go to the herdsman, give him these thousand pieces of money, and bring the child back to me again.”
So she brought the child back again and gave him to the treasurer. Then he said to her, “Good Kāḷī, five hundred carts start from this city at dawn on a trading expedition. Take this child and lay him in the track of the wheels. Either the oxen will trample him under their feet or the wheels will crush him to death. Observe what happens to him, and then return to me.”
She took the child and laid him down in the track of the wheels.
The leader of the caravan came first;
but when his oxen reached the place where the child lay, they threw off the yoke. but when his oxen reached the place where the child lay, they threw off the yoke. Again and again the leader replaced the yoke and tried to drive the oxen forwards; but as often as he did so, they threw off the yoke and refused to move.
He was still struggling with them when the sun rose.
“Why have the oxen acted thus?” thought he. He looked at the road and saw the boy. “Oh, what a grievous wrong I have done!” thought he. His heart was filled with joy at the thought, “I have gained a son,” and picking up the boy, he carried him off.
Kāḷī went back to the treasurer and in answer to his question told him what had happened. Said the treasurer, “Go to the caravan-leader, give him a thousand pieces of money, and bring the child back to me again.”
When she had so done, he said to her, “Now carry him to the burning-ground and lay him in the bushes. There he will either be eaten by dogs or attacked by demons, and he will die. As soon as you know whether or not he is dead, return to me.”
She took the child, laid him in the bushes, and stood at one side.
But neither dog nor crow nor demon dared to approach him.
(Pray, if he had neither mother nor father nor brother nor other kinsman to protect him, what was it that did protect him?
All that protected him was his howling for love of the Private Buddha in his former existence as a dog.)
A certain she-goat made her way into the bushes eating leaves and grass, and seeing the boy, knelt down and gave him suck. The goatherd called, “He! he!” but she did not come out.
Thereupon he said to himself, “I will beat her with my stick and bring her out.” So saying, he made his way into the bushes. And there he saw the she-goat on her knees, giving suck to the boy. He immediately took a fancy to the boy, and saying to himself, “I have gained a son,” picked him up and carried him off.
āḷī went back to the treasurer and in answer to his question told him what had happened. Said the treasurer, “Go to the goatherd, give him a thousand pieces of money, and bring the child back to me again.”
Kāḷī went back to the treasurer and in answer to his question told him what had happened. Said the treasurer, “Go to the goatherd, give him a thousand pieces of money, and bring the child back to me again.” When she had so done, he said to her, “Good Kāḷī, take this child with you, climb the mountain that is known as Robbers’ Cliff, and throw him down the precipice. He will strike against the sides of the ravine and be dashed to pieces when he reaches the bottom. As soon as you know whether or not he is dead, return to me.”
She carried the child to Robbers’ Cliff, and standing at the top of the mountain, threw him down.
Now there grew along the mountain near that abyss a dense bamboo thicket, and the top of the mountain was covered with a thick growth of guñjā shrub.
As the boy fell, he dropped into this bamboo thicket as into a coverlet of goat’s hair.
Now that very day the leader of the reed-makers had received a gift of bamboo and accompanied by his son, he had gone to chop that thicket down.
“That sounds like the voice of a boy,” thought he. Climbing up on one side, he saw the boy. His heart was filled with joy at the thought, “I have gained a son,” and picking up the boy, he carried him off.
As he began his work, the bamboo shook and the boy cried out.
Kāḷī went back to the treasurer and in answer to his question told him what had happened. Said the treasurer, “Go to the reed-maker, give him a thousand pieces of money, and bring the child back to me again.”
She did so. But in spite of the treasurer’s attempts on his life, the child lived and thrived and grew to manhood. Ghosaka was his name.
He was like a thorn in the eye of the treasurer, who could not look him straight in the face.
Thinking of a way to kill him, the treasurer went to a friend of his who was a potter and asked him, “When are you going to fire your bake-house?” “To-morrow.” “Well then, take these thousand pieces of money and do a job for me.”
“What is it, master?”
“I have a single base-born son. I will send him to you. Take him into an inner room, chop him to pieces with a sharp axe, throw him into a chatty, and bake him in the bake-house. Here are a thousand pieces of money, to seal the bargain, as it were.
But in addition I will reward you suitably later.”
“Very well,” said the potter, consenting to the bargain.
On the following day the treasurer summoned Ghosaka and sent him to the potter, saying, “Yesterday I left an order with the potter to do a certain piece of work for me. Go say to him, ‘Finish the job my father gave you yesterday.’ ”
“Very well,” said Ghosaka, and set out.
As Ghosaka was on his way to the potter’s, the treasurer’s other son, who was playing marbles with some boys, saw him. And calling to him, he asked, “Where are you going?” “I am carrying a message to the potter for father.” “Let me go there.
These boys have won a big stake from me. You win it back and give it to me.”
“I am afraid of father.”
“Do not fear, brother; I will carry that message.
I have lost a big stake. You play until I return again, and win the stake back for me.”
So Ghosaka consented to let his foster-brother go in his place, saying, “Well then, go to the potter and say to him, ‘Finish the job my father gave you yesterday.’ ”
Thus it happened that the treasurer’s own son carried the message to the potter.
The potter killed him according to the letter of the directions he had received from the treasurer and threw his body into the bake-house.
Ghosaka played marbles all day and went home in the evening. “You have returned home, son?” queried the treasurer. Ghosaka then told him the reason why he had himself returned home and let his younger brother go to the potter.
“Woe is me!” cried the treasurer with a loud voice. He looked as though the blood had been drawn from his veins. He rushed to the potter, wringing his hands and wailing, “Oh, potter, do not kill me! do not kill me!”
The potter saw him approaching in this wise and said to him, “Master, make no noise; the job is done.”
Thus was the treasurer overwhelmed with sorrow as with a mountain. Thus did he suffer great grief,
even as do all who offend against those that are without offense.
Therefore said the Exalted One,
Whosoever visits punishment on those that deserve not punishment. Whosoever offends against those that are without offense.
Such an one will right quickly come to one of ten states:
he will incur cruel suffering, or infirmity, or injury of the body.
Or severe sickness, or loss of mind,
Or misfortune proceeding from the king, or a heavy accusation.
Or death of relatives, or loss of treasures,
Or else the fire of lightning will consume his houses;
Upon dissolution of the body such a fool will go to Hell.
Now under these circumstances the treasurer was unable to look Ghosaka straight in the face.
“How can I manage to kill him?” thought he. Finally he thought of a way. “I will send him to the superintendent of my hundred villages and order him to kill him,” said he to himself. Accordingly he wrote the following letter to the superintendent, “This is my base-born son. Kill him and throw him into the cesspool. Let this be done, and I shall know how to reward my uncle properly.” “Dear Ghosaka, there is a superintendent over our hundred villages. Take this letter and give it to him.” So saying, he fastened the letter to the hem of his garment.
(Now Ghosaka did not know how to read and write,
for ever since he was a boy the treasurer had striven, although without success, to kill him. Why, therefore, should he have taught him to read and write?)
As Ghosaka set out with his own death-warrant fastened to the hem of his garment, he said to his father, “Father, I have no provisions for the journey.”
“You have no need of provisions for the journey. On the way, in such and such a village, lives a friend of mine who is a treasurer. Obtain your breakfast at his house, and then continue your journey.”
“Very well,” said Ghosaka, and bowing to his father, set out on his journey. When he arrived at the village, he inquired where the treasurer’s house was, went there, and saw the treasurer’s wife.
“Whence have you come?” she inquired. “From the city,” he replied.
“Whose son are you?”
“I am the son of your friend the treasurer, my lady.”
“Then you are Ghosaka.”
“Yes, my lady.”
She fell in love with him at first sight.
Now the treasurer had a daughter about fifteen or sixteen years of age, and she was exceedingly beautiful and fair to look upon. In order to keep her safe and sound, her parents lodged her on the topmost floor of a seven-storied palace in an apartment of royal splendor, giving her a single slave-girl to run errands.
At that moment the treasurer’s daughter sent this slave-girl to a shop.
The treasurer’s wife, seeing her, asked, “Where are you going?” “On an errand for your daughter, my lady.” “Just come here a moment. Never mind the errand. Spread a seat for my son, bathe his feet, anoint them with oil, and then spread a couch for him. After you have done this, you may do your errand.”
The slave-girl did as she was told.
When she returned, the treasurer’s daughter scolded her for her long absence.
The slave-girl replied, “Be not angry with me. The treasurer’s son Ghosaka has arrived, and I had to do this and that for him, besides going on an errand for you, before I returned.”
When the treasurer’s daughter heard the name “treasurer’s son Ghosaka,” love suffused her body, cleaving her skin and penetrating the marrow of her bones.
(For she had been his wife in his former existence as Kotūhalaka and had given a pint-pot of rice to the Private Buddha. And through his supernatural power she had been reborn in the household of the treasurer.
No wonder her old passion for him returned and overwhelmed her!
Therefore said the Exalted One,
Through previous association or present advantage,
That love springs up like a lily in the water.)
The treasurer’s daughter said to the slave-girl, “Girl, where is he?”
“He is lying asleep on the couch.”
“Has he anything in his hand?”
“There is a letter fastened to his garment.”
“What can be in this letter?” she thought. So while Ghosaka was asleep, and her mother and father were otherwise engaged, she came down without attracting their attention, detached the letter from his garment, took it with her, went into her room, closed the door, opened the window, and through her knowledge of writing read the letter. “Oh!” she exclaimed, “the simpleton is going about with his own death-warrant fastened to his garment. {1.182} Had I not seen it, he would surely have been killed.” So she tore up this letter and wrote another in the name of the treasurer as follows, “This is my son Ghosaka. Procure presents for him from my hundred villages. Prepare a festival in honor of his marriage with the daughter of this district-treasurer. Build him a two-storied house in the center of the village wherein he resides. Surround his house with a wall and with a guard of men, and so provide him with ample protection. Then send me a message, saying, ‘I have done thus and so,’ and I shall know how to reward my uncle properly.” Having written the letter, she folded it up and fastened it to the hem of his garment.
After sleeping all day, Ghosaka arose, ate his meal, and went on his way.
Early on the morning of the following day he arrived at that village and saw the superintendent performing his village duties.
When the superintendent saw him, he asked him, “What is it, dear Ghosaka?”
“My father has sent you a letter.”
“What is it about, dear Ghosaka? Bring it to me.” He took the letter and read it, and then said with an exclamation of delight, “See, men, how my master loves me. He has sent me a message, saying, “My father has sent you a letter.” “What is it about, dear Ghosaka? Bring it to me.” He took the letter and read it, and then said with an exclamation of delight, “See, men, how my master loves me. He has sent me a message, saying, ‘Prepare a festival in honor of my oldest son.’
Bring wood and other building materials immediately.” Having thus given orders to the householders, he caused a house of the kind described in the letter to be erected in the center of the village, had presents brought from the hundred villages, conducted the daughter of the district-treasurer thither, celebrated the marriage festival, and then sent word to the treasurer, saying, “I have done thus and so.”
When the treasurer received the message, he said, “What I would do, that I do not; what I would not do, that I do.”
Disappointment over the failure of his latest plan, together with sorrow over the death of his own son, set him on fire within and produced diarrhea.
The treasurer’s daughter gave orders, saying, “Should anyone come here from the treasurer, tell me before you tell the treasurer’s son.”
The treasurer said to himself, “At any rate I will not make this rascally son of mine heir to my property.” With this thought in mind he said to a certain official, “Uncle, I wish to see my son. Send a servant and summon my son.”
“Very well,” replied the official, and giving a certain man the letter, sent him away.
When the treasurer’s daughter heard that the servant had arrived and was standing at the door, she sent for him and asked him, “What is it, my man?”
“The treasurer is sick and wishes to see his son, and has therefore sent for him, my lady.”
“My man, is he strong or weak?”
“He is still strong, my lady, and able to take nourishment.”
Without letting the treasurer’s son know, she ordered that the man should be given lodging and expenses and said to him, “You may go when I send you. Remain here for the present.”
Again the treasurer addressed the official, “Uncle, did you not send a messenger to my son?”
“I did, master, but the man who went has not yet returned.”
“Well then, try again and send another.”
So the official sent another man,
and the treasurer’s daughter treated him just as she had the first.
The treasurer’s condition grew worse; one chamber-pot went in and another came out.
Again the treasurer asked the official, “Uncle, did you not send a messenger to my son?”
“I did, master, but the man who went has not yet returned.”
“Well then, try again and send another.”
So the official sent another man.
When the third messenger arrived, the treasurer’s daughter asked him the news.
“The treasurer is a very sick man, my lady. He refuses to eat and is confined to his bed. One chamber-pot comes out and another goes in.”
“Now it is time to go,” thought the treasurer’s daughter. So she said to the treasurer’s son, “I learn that your father is sick.” “Wife, what say you?” “It may be only a slight ailment, husband.”
“What is to be done now?”
“Let us take presents from his hundred villages and go see him.”
“Very well,” said he. Having caused presents to be brought, he started out, conveying the presents in a cart.
Then she said to him, “Your father is very weak. If we take all these presents, we shall be delayed on the way; send them back.” Having sent all the presents back to their own house, she said to the treasurer’s son, “Husband, please stand at your father’s feet; I will stand beside his pillow.”
And as they entered the house, she gave orders to her own men, “Stand on guard both in the front of the house and in the rear.”
And when they had entered, the treasurer’s son took his stand at his father’s feet and his wife beside his pillow.
At that moment the treasurer was lying on his back and the official was rubbing his feet.
The latter said to him, “Master, your son has arrived.”
“Where is he?”
“Here he is, standing at your feet.”
When the treasurer saw his son, he sent for the receiver of his revenues and asked him, “How much wealth is there in my house?”
“Master, of money alone there are four hundred millions; as for objects for employment and enjoyment, such as villages and fields and men and animals and wagons and carriages, such and such is the total.” It was the treasurer’s intention to say, “All of this wealth I do not give to my son Ghosaka.” But instead of this he said, “I do give.”
When the treasurer’s daughter heard this, she thought to herself, “However, if this man should speak again, he might say something very different.” Accordingly, pretending to be overcome with grief, she disheveled her hair, burst into tears, and said, “Dear father, do you really mean this? In spite of these words of yours, which we hear, we are indeed unfortunate.” So saying, she fell on him, struck the middle of his breast with the crown of her head, and in order that he might not be able to speak again, rubbed the middle of his breast with the crown of her head, displaying at the same time signs of profound grief.
At that very moment the treasurer died.
They went and informed King Udena of his death.
The king had the funeral ceremonies performed over his body and asked, “Has he any son or daughter?”
“Your majesty, he has a son named Ghosaka; and, your majesty, he bestowed all his property on him before he died.”
Some time afterwards, the king sent for the treasurer’s son.
Now that day it rained,
and there were pools of water here and there in the palace court.
The treasurer’s son set out to see the king.
The king opened his window and watched him as he approached, noticing that as he crossed the palace court he leaped over the pools of water that stood in the court. When he reached the palace and paid obeisance to the king and stood before him, the king asked him, “Your name is Ghosaka?” “Yes, your majesty.” The king comforted him, saying, “Do not grieve at the thought that your father is dead. I will give you alone your father’s post as treasurer.” Then he dismissed him, saying, “Now, dear Ghosaka, you may go,”
and stood and watched him as he left the palace.
Now whereas Ghosaka leaped over the water in approaching the palace, he walked through it on his return.
The king sent orders for 28.265 him to return from where he was and asked him, “Dear Ghosaka, is it a fact that whereas, in coming to me, you leaped over the water, on your return you walk through it?”
“It is even so, your majesty. Then I was a boy and was fond of play, but now I have been promised a post of honor by your majesty.
Therefore I must now lay aside my former ways and deport myself with modesty and dignity.”
On hearing this, the king thought to himself, “There is a wise man. I will give him the post immediately.” Accordingly he gave him the wealth formerly possessed by his father and the post of treasurer, together with all the hundred villages.
Then Ghosaka mounted his chariot and drove sunwise round the city.
Every place he looked at quaked and trembled.
The treasurer’s daughter sat talking with the slave-woman Kāḷī. “Mother Kāḷī,” said she, “it was through me that your son obtained all this worldly glory.”
“How is that, my lady?”
“Why, this youth came to our house with his own death-warrant fastened to the hem of his garment. I tore up that letter and wrote another, ordering the celebration of a festival in honor of my marriage to him. In this way did I protect him all that time.”
“My lady, this is all you know about it. But as a matter of fact, from the time your husband was a little boy, the treasurer constantly sought to kill him, and though his attempts were unsuccessful, a large sum of money was spent solely for the purpose of accomplishing his death.”
“Kāḷī, the treasurer was indeed guilty of abominable crimes!”
Having performed his ceremonial circuit of the city, Ghosaka entered his house. Now when his wife saw him, she thought to herself, “It was through me that he obtained all this worldly glory,” and laughed.
The treasurer’s son asked her, “Why do you laugh?”
“For a certain reason.”
“Tell me the reason.”
She refused to do so.
He drew his sword and said, “If you do not tell me, I will cut you in twain.”
Then she said, “I laughed to think that it was through me that you obtained all this worldly glory.”
“If what I possess was handed over to me by my father, where do you come in?”
So she told him the whole story, saying, “When your father sent you forth bearing your own death-warrant, I did this and that and protected you.”
“What you say is not true,” replied Ghosaka, refusing to believe her. “I will ask Mother Kāḷī.” So he asked the slave-woman, “Kāḷī, is what she says true?”
“Yes, my lord. From the time you were a little boy your father sought constantly to kill you, and though his attempts were unsuccessful, a large sum of money was spent for the purpose of accomplishing your death. On seven occasions you had a narrow escape from death. Now, coming from the village of which he was headman, you have obtained the post of treasurer, together with all the hundred villages.”
When Ghosaka heard this, he thought to himself, “How great was my presumption! But since I have escaped from so terrible a death, I must no longer live the life of Heedlessness. Henceforth, therefore, I will live the life of Heedfulness.” Accordingly he established alms for the blind and the poor,
and employing his friend the householder as steward of his alms, he dispensed a thousand pieces of money daily.
Now at this time there lived in the city of Bhaddavatī a treasurer named Bhaddavatiya, and he was a friend of the treasurer Ghosaka, although Ghosaka had never seen him
Ghosaka heard, from traders who came from the city of Bhaddavatī, of the wealth and age of the treasurer Bhaddavatiya, and desiring to be friends with him, sent him a present.
Likewise the treasurer Bhaddavatiya heard, from traders who came from the city of Kosambi, of the wealth and age of the treasurer Ghosaka, and desiring to be friends with him, sent him a present.
Thus, although neither had seen the other, they dwelt as friends.
After a time intestinal disease broke out in the house of the treasurer Bhaddavatiya.
When this disease breaks out, the first to die are flies; afterwards, in regular order, insects, mice, domestic fowls, swine, cattle, slaves both female and male, and last of all the members of the household.
Only those that break down the wall and flee, save their lives. Now at that time the treasurer Bhaddavatiya and his wife and daughter fled in this manner, and intending to seek the treasurer Ghosaka, set out on the road to Kosambi.
While they were still on their way, their provisions for the journey gave out, and their bodies became exhausted from exposure to wind and sun, and from hunger and thirst. Reaching Kosambi with difficulty, they bathed in a pool of water in a pleasant place and then entered a certain rest-house at the gate of the city.
Then the treasurer said to his wife, “Wife, those who travel in this 28.267 way are not courteous even to a mother who has borne a child. Now I have a friend who, they say, dispenses a thousand pieces of money daily in alms to the blind, the poor, and other unfortunate persons.
We will send our daughter there, have her bring us food, remain right here for a day or two and refresh our bodies, and then we will go and see my friend.”
“Very well, husband,” she replied,
and they took up their residence right there in the rest-house.
On the following day, when meal-time was announced and the blind, the poor, and other unfortunate persons went to obtain food, the mother and father sent forth their daughter, saying, “Daughter, go bring us food.”
So the daughter of a wealthy house, pride overcome with misfortune, hid her shame, took a bowl, and went with poor folk to procure food. “How many portions will you have?” she was asked. “Three,” she replied.
So they gave her three portions.
he carried the food back to her parents, and the three sat down to eat together.
The mother and daughter said to the treasurer, “Master, misfortune comes even to prominent families. Eat without regarding us and do not worry.”
After a good deal of urging, they prevailed upon him to eat.
But after he had eaten, he was unable to digest his food, and when the sun rose, he died.
The mother and daughter wept and wailed and lamented.
On the following day the young girl went the second time to procure food. “How many portions will you have?” “Two.” She carried the food back to her mother, and after a good deal of urging, prevailed upon her to eat.
The mother yielded to her pleading and consented to eat, but died on that very day.
The young girl, left alone to herself, wept and wailed and lamented over the misfortune that had come upon her. On the following day, suffering the pangs of hunger keenly, she went weeping in the company of beggars to procure food. “How many portions will you have, daughter?” “One,” was her reply.
A householder named Mitta, remembering that she had received food for three days, said to her, “Perish, vile woman. To-day, at last, you have come to know the capacity of your belly.”
This daughter of a respectable family, modest and timid, felt as though she had received a sword-thrust in her bosom, or as though salt water had been sprinkled on a sore. She immediately replied, “What do you mean, sir?”
“Day before yesterday you took three portions, yesterday two, to-day you take but one.
To-day, then, you know the capacity of your belly.”
“Sir, do not think that I took these for myself.”
Why then did you take them?”
“Sir, day before yesterday we were three, yesterday we were two, to-day I am left alone.”
She then told him the whole story from the beginning. As he listened to her story, he was unable to control his tears, but was overcome by the power of the grief that arose within him. Finally he said to her, “My dear girl, if this is the case, do not worry. Hitherto you have been the daughter of the treasurer Bhaddavatiya, but from this day forth you shall be my very own daughter.” And he kissed her on the head, conducted her to his own house, and adopted her as his own oldest daughter.
One day she heard loud and piercing screams in the refectory, whereupon she said to her foster-father, “Father, why do you not keep these people quiet when you dispense alms?”
“It is impossible to do it, dear daughter.”
“It is impossible to do it, dear daughter.”
“How would you do it, dear daughter?”
“Father, put a fence around the refectory and hang two gates through which the people may pass in and out, allowing only sufficient space for one person to pass through at a time. Then direct the people to pass in through one gate and out through the other. If you do this, they will receive their alms peaceably and quietly.”
When the householder had heard her plan he remarked, “A happy device, dear daughter,” and did as she suggested.
Now up to that time her name had been Sāmā,
but through her construction of a fence she received the name Sāmāvatī.
From that time on there was no more tumult in the refectory.
Now the treasurer Ghosaka had long been accustomed to hear this noise in the refectory and rather liked to hear it; for it always made him think, “That is the noise in my refectory.”
Now the treasurer Ghosaka had long been accustomed to hear this noise in the refectory and rather liked to hear it; for it always made him think, “That is the noise in my refectory.” But after hearing no noise at all for two or three days, he asked the householder Mitta, who came one day to wait upon him, “Are alms being given to the blind, the poor, and other unfortunate persons?”
“Yes, sir.”
“How then does it happen that for two or three days past I have not heard a sound?”
“I have arranged matters so that the people now receive alms without making any noise.”
“Why didn’t you do so before?”
“I didn’t know how, sir.”
“How did you happen to find a way just now?”
“How did you happen to find a way just now?”
“Have you a daughter whom I have never seen?”
Then the householder told him the whole story of the treasurer Bhaddavatiya, beginning with the outbreak of the plague and ending with his adoption of the young girl as his own oldest daughter.
Then said the treasurer to him, “If this is the case, why did you not tell me? My friend’s daughter is my own daughter.” So he sent for her and asked her, “Dear girl, are you the daughter of the treasurer?”
“Yes, sir, I am.”
“Well then, do not worry; you are my own daughter.” Then he kissed her on the head, gave her five hundred women for her retinue, and adopted her as his own oldest daughter.
One day a festival was proclaimed in this city.
Now at this festival daughters of respectable families, who do not ordinarily go out, go on foot with their own retinue and bathe in the river.
Accordingly on that day Sāmāvatī also, accompanied by her five hundred women, went right through the palace court to bathe in the river.
King Udena stood at his window and saw her. “Whose are those nautch-girls?” he inquired.
“Nobody’s nautch-girls, your majesty.”
“Then whose daughters are they?”
“Your majesty, that is the daughter of the treasurer Bhaddavatiya, and her name is Sāmāvatī.”
Now the king fell in love with the girl the moment he saw her, and immediately sent word to the treasurer Ghosaka, “Send me the maiden they say is your daughter.”
“I will not send her, your majesty.”
“Do not act thus. Do as I ask and send her.”
“Your majesty, we householders do not give young girls, for fear people will say they are abused and maltreated.”
Angered by the treasurer’s reply, the king caused the treasurer’s house to be sealed and the treasurer and his wife to be seized and turned out of doors.
When Sāmāvatī returned after her bath and found no way of entering the house, she asked, “What does this mean, dear father?”
“Dear daughter, the king sent for you;
and when we refused to give you to him, he caused the house to be sealed and caused us to be turned out of doors.”
“Dear father, you made a great mistake. When one who is a king commands, you should not say, ‘We do not give.’ You should rather say, ‘If you will take our daughter with her retinue, we will give her to you.’
“Very well, dear daughter. If that is your desire, I will do as you say.” Accordingly Ghosaka sent a message to that effect to the king,
and the king accepted his offer, saying, “Very well.” Then the king conducted Sāmāvatī with her retinue to the royal palace, conferred the ceremonial sprinkling on her, and elevated her to the dignity of chief consort.
The other women became her ladies-in-waiting.
Yet another of Udena’s queen-consorts was Vāsuladattā,daughter of Caṇḍa Pajjota,
king of Ujjeni.
One day, as Caṇḍa Pajjota was returning from his pleasure-garden, he surveyed his own splendor and asked, “Is there any other soever possessed of splendor like mine?” “Splendor such as it is, King Udena of Kosambi possesses exceeding great splendor.” “Very well, let us take him captive.”
“It is impossible to capture him.”
“By employing some means or other, let us capture him all the same.”
“It is impossible, your majesty.”
“Why?”
“He understands the art of charming elephants. By reciting spells and playing his elephant-charming lute, he either drives elephants away or captures them at his pleasure.
No one possesses so many riding-elephants as he.”
“I suppose it is impossible for me to capture him.”
“If you are bent on doing it, have a wooden elephant made and turned loose near him.
Let him hear of a good mount, be it elephant or horse, and he will go a long way for it.
When he is close by, you can capture him.”
“A stratagem indeed!” exclaimed the king. So the king had a mechanical elephant made of wood, wrapped about with strips of cloth and deftly painted, and turned it loose on the bank of a certain lake near the country of his enemy.
Within the belly of the elephant sixty men walked back and forth; every now and then they loaded their shovels with elephant dung and dumped it out.
A certain woodman saw the elephant, and thinking to himself, “Just the thing for our king!” went and told the king, “Your majesty, I saw a noble elephant, pure white even as the peak of Kelasa, just the sort of elephant your majesty would like.”
Udena mounted his elephant and set out, taking the woodman along as a guide and accompanied by his retinue.
His approach was observed by spies, who went and informed Caṇḍa Pajjota.
The latter straightway dispatched armies on both flanks of his enemy, allowing the space between them to remain open.
Udena, unaware of his enemy’s approach, continued to pursue the elephant.
for the forest elephant clings to the elephant wood.
The king, unable to overtake the elephant, mounted his horse.
the wooden elephant, made as if it failed to hear the charm and continued its flight. He udena recited his spell and played his lute, but all to no purpose.
and the king was quite alone.
Then Caṇḍa Pajjota’s men, who were posted on both flanks, captured Udena and turned him over to their king.
Udena’s army, perceiving that their leader had fallen into the hands of the enemy, built a stockade just outside of Ujjeni and remained there.
Caṇḍa Pajjota, having thus captured Udena alive, clapped him into prison behind closed doors and kept wassail for three days.
On the third day Udena asked his keepers, “Friends, where’s your king?” “
“Carousing, for, says he, ‘I’ve landed my enemy.’ ”
“What does your king mean by acting like a woman? He has captured a royal adversary and surely ought either to release him or to kill him. He has brought humiliation upon us and is ‘carousing’– indeed!”
The keepers went and reported the incident to the king.
The king came and asked, “Is it true that you said thus and thus?”
“Yes, your majesty.”
“Very well, I will release you. They say you have such and such a charm; will you give it to me?”
“Certainly I will give it to you; but when you receive it,
will you pay me homage?”
“I pay you homage? I’ll not pay you homage.”
Then I’ll not give it to you.”
“In that case I will have you executed.”
“Do so; you are lord of my body, not of my mind.”
When the king heard Udena’s defiant answer, he thought to himself, “How in the world can I get the charm? I have it. I’ll have my daughter learn it from him, and then I’ll learn it from her. It would never do to let anyone else learn a charm like this.”
So he said to Udena, “Will you divulge the charm to another, if the other will pay you homage?”
“Yes, your majesty.”
“Well then, we have in our house a hunchbacked woman. She will sit behind a curtain; you remain outside and have her repeat the charm.”
“Be she hunchback or cripple, I will teach her the charm, provided she will pay me homage.”
Then the king went to his daughter Vāsuladattā and said, “Dear daughter, there is a certain leper who knows a priceless charm.
You sit behind a curtain, and he will remain outside and repeat it to you. You get it from him, for it would never do to let anyone else learn it,
and then I will get it from you.”
After this sort, for fear of their making love, did Caṇḍa Pajjota feign that his daughter was a hunchback and Udena a leper.
So Vāsuladattā seated herself behind a curtain, and Udena remained outside and caused her to repeat the charm.
One day Udena repeated the words of the charm over and over again to Vāsuladattā, but the latter was unable to reproduce it correctly. Thereupon Udena cried out, “Dunce of a hunchback, your lips are too thick and your cheeks too pudgy! I’ve a mind to beat your face in! Say it this way!”
Vāsuladattā replied in anger, “Villain of a leper, what do you mean by those words? Do you call such as I hunchback’?”
Udena lifted the fringe of the curtain and asked, “Who are you?” Said the maiden, “I am Vāsuladattā, daughter of the king.” “When your father spoke to me, he described you as a hunchback.”
“When he spoke to me, he made you out a leper.”
Both said, “He must have said it for fear of our making love.”
Then and there within the curtain they made love, and from that time on there was no learning charms or getting lessons.
The king regularly asked his daughter, “Daughter, are you learning your lessons?”
“Yes, father.”
Now one day Udena said to Vāsuladattā, “My dear, a husband can do that which neither father nor mother nor brothers nor sisters can do. If you will save my life, I will give you a retinue of five hundred women and make you my chief consort.”
“If you will carry out your promise without fail, I will save your life.”
“My dear, I will do so without fail.”
“Very well, husband.”So she went to her father, saluted him, and stood respectfully on one side.
Her father asked her, “Daughter, is your task completed?”
“Not quite completed, father.”
“What do you require, daughter?”
“We must have at our disposal a door and a mount, father.”
“Why this request?”
“Father, this is what my teacher says: ‘In order to work the charm, a certain medicinal herb is necessary, and this must be obtained at night at a time indicated by the stars.’
Therefore whenever we are obliged to go out, whether it be early or late, we must have a door and a mount at our disposal.” “
Very well,” said the king, giving his consent.
They secured permission to use a certain door at any time they pleased.
Now the king was possessed of the five conveyances:
a female elephant named Bhaddavatī, which could travel fifty leagues a day; a slave named Kāka, who could travel sixty leagues a day; two mares, Celakaṇṭhī and Muñjakesī, which could travel a hundred leagues a day; and an elephant named Nālāgiri, which could travel a hundred and twenty leagues a day.
Still another maiden who gained the dignity of chief consort of the king was Māgandiyā.
She, we are told, was the daughter of the Brahman Māgandiya, who lived in the Kuru country,
her mother also bore the name Māgandiyā
and her father’s younger brother likewise bore the name Māgandiya.
Now her father was unable to find a husband who was worthy of her; and although scions of all the great families in the country asked for her hand, her father sent them all away, reviling them and saying, “You are not worthy of my daughter.”
Now one day, as the Teacher surveyed the world at early dawn, he perceived that the Brahman Māgandiya and his wife possessed the dispositions requisite for the attainment of the Fruit of the Third Path. Therefore, taking his own bowl and robe, he went to a place just outside of a certain market-town, where the Brahman was tending the sacred fire.
For you ought to have a wife, and she ought to have a husband. I will give her to you. Wait right here until I come back.”
The Brahman surveyed the person of the Tathāgata, beholding in him the perfection of physical beauty, and thought to himself, “There is no other man in the whole world comparable to this man. I will give my daughter to this man to cherish and support.” Accordingly he said to the Teacher, “Monk, I have a single daughter, and all this time I have not seen a man worthy of her. But you are suitable for her, and she is suitable for you.
The Teacher said not a word, but remained silent.
The Brahman went home quickly and said to his wife, “Wife! wife! I saw a man who is worthy of our daughter. Hurry! hurry! Dress her in her beautiful garments.” So the Brahman had his daughter dressed in her beautiful garments, and taking daughter and wife with him, went to the Teacher.
The whole city was agitated.
“All this time,” said the people, “this man has said of every suitor, ‘He is not suitable for my daughter,’ and has refused to give her to anyone. But it is reported that he has said, ‘To-day I saw a man who is suitable for my daughter.’ What manner of man can he be? Let us go see him.” So a great throng of people went out of the city with him.
Now when the Brahman set out with his daughter, the Teacher, instead of remaining in the place mentioned by the Brahman, moved away from that place and took his stand in another place, leaving a footprint.
(When the Buddhas establish a footprint, it appears only in a trodden place and not elsewhere,
and only those for whom it is established can see it.
Let elephants or other wild animals tread upon a footprint of the Buddhas to render it invisible, or let a violent storm pour forth rain upon it, or let the roaring winds beat upon it, yet not one of them can obliterate it.)
Now the Brahman’s wife said to the Brahman, “Where is this man?”
The Brahman replied, “I said to him, ‘Remain in this place.’ Where can he possibly have gone?” He looked all about, and seeing his footprint, said, “Here is his footprint.”
Now the Brahman’s wife was familiar with the three Vedas, including the verses relating to signs. So she repeated the verses relating to signs, considering carefully the signs borne by the footprint before her. Finally she said, “Brahman, this is no footprint of one who follows the Five Lusts.” So saying, she pronounced the following Stanza,
This is the sort of footprint made by one who has rolled back the Veil of Passion.
Of one infatuate, the footprint will be shuffling;
That of a wicked man, violently pressed down;
The footprint of a lustful man will be squatty;
Then said the Brahman to her, “Wife, you are always seeing crocodiles in the water-vessel and thieves hiding in the house. Be still.”
“Brahman, you may say what you like, but this is no footprint of one who follows the Five Lusts.”
Just then the Brahman looked around and saw the Teacher. “There is the man!” said he. Thereupon the Brahman went to him and said, “Monk, I give you my daughter to cherish and support.”
The Teacher, instead of saying, “I have need of your daughter,” or “I have no need of your daughter,” said to him, “Brahman, I have something to say to you.” “Say it, monk,” replied the Brahman. Thereupon the Teacher told him how Māra had pursued him from the time of the Great Retirement to the time of the Session under the Goatherd’s Banyan-tree, and how, when Māra seated himself under the Goatherd’s Banyan-tree, overcome with sorrow at the thought, “Now this man has escaped from my power,” Māra’s daughters came to assuage their father’s sorrow and endeavored to seduce him by appearing before him in the forms of women both young and old. “At that time,” said the Teacher,
Having seen Craving, Pining, and Lust,
I had no desire for the pleasures of love.
What is this body, filled with urine and dung?
I should not be willing to touch it, even with my foot.
At the conclusion of the Stanza the Brahman and his wife were established in the Fruit of the Third Path.
As for Māgandiyā, she said to herself, “If this man has no need of me, it is perfectly proper for him to say so, but he declares me to be full of urine and dung. Very well! By virtue of the fact that I possess birth, lineage, social position, wealth, and the charm of youth, I shall obtain a husband who is my equal, and then I shall know what ought to be done to the monk Gotama.” And then and there she conceived hatred towards the Teacher.
(Did the Teacher know, or did he not know, that she had conceived hatred towards him?
He knew.
If he knew, why did he pronounce the Stanza?
For the sake of the other two.
For the Buddhas take no account of hatred directed against them, but preach the Law solely for the sake of those who are worthy to attain the Paths and the Fruits.)
Her mother and father took her and committed her to the charge of her uncle Culla Māgandiya, and then retired from the world and attained Arahatship.
Culla Māgandiya thought to himself,“My daughter is not suited to be the wife of a low person, but is suited to be the consort of a king.”
Accordingly he adorned her with all the adornments, took her with him to Kosambi, and presented her to King Udena, saying, “This jewel of a woman is worthy to become a consort of your majesty.”
When the king saw her, he fell deeply in love with her, conferred the ceremonial sprinkling upon her, provided her with a retinue of five hundred ladies-in-waiting, and raised her to the dignity of chief consort.
Thus the king had three chief consorts with a retinue of fifteen hundred nautch-girls.
Now at this time there were living in Kosambi three treasurers, Ghosaka, Kukkuṭa, and Pāvāriya.
As the beginning of the rainy season drew near, these men saw five hundred ascetics who had returned from the Himālaya country going the round of the city for alms. As the beginning of the rainy season drew near, these men saw five hundred ascetics who had returned from the Himālaya country going the round of the city for alms. With joyful hearts they provided them with seats, offered them food, and obtaining from them a promise to reside with them, they provided them with lodging in their own homes during the four months of the rains. Then, having obtained from them a promise to return and spend the following rainy season with them, they let them go.
From that time forth, after the ascetics had resided for eight months in the Himālaya country, they kept residence during the four months of the rains with the three treasurers.
On a later occasion, as the ascetics were on their way back from the Himālaya country, they saw a certain great banyan-tree in a forest retreat and went and sat down at the foot of it.
“The deity who resides in this tree cannot be mundane. There must be a deva-king of great power here. How good it would be if he would give this band of ascetics water to drink!”
Immediately the tree-spirit gave them water to drink.
Then the ascetic thought of water to bathe in, and the spirit gave that also.
Then he thought of food, and the spirit gave that also.
Then this thought occurred to the ascetic, “This deva-king gives us every single thing we think of. I wish we might see him.”
Immediately the spirit burst the trunk of the tree and showed himself.
Thereupon they asked him, “Deva-king, you possess great power. What did you do to get it?”
“Do not ask me, Reverend Sirs.”
“Deva-king, please tell us.”
But the spirit was exceedingly modest, for the reason that the work of merit he had performed was a very small one, and therefore he did not wish to tell.
However, after a good deal of urging, he said, “Well then, listen,” and told the following
The tree-spirit, it appears, was once a poor man who sought and obtained work for hire from Anāthapiṇḍika and through him made a living.
Now one fast-day Anāthapiṇḍika asked on his return from the monastery, “Has anyone told this laborer that to-day is fast-day?”
“He has not been told, master.”
“Well then, cook him his supper.”
So they cooked him a measure of rice.
Now the laborer had worked all day in the forest, and when he returned in the evening, he said, “I am hungry.” But when the rice had been prepared and given to him, all of a sudden he refused to eat. “On other days,” he thought to himself, “there is a great uproar in this house, ‘Give me rice, give me sauce, give me curry;’ but to-day all have lain down without making a sound, and they have prepared food for me alone. What can this mean?” So he asked them, “Have the rest eaten?”
“They have not eaten.”
“Why?”
“In this house people eat no supper on fast-days; all keep the fast.
The great treasurer requires all to fast, even infants at the breast, first causing them to rinse their mouths and to eat the four sweet foods.
A lamp of scented oil is lighted, and all, both young and old, retire to recite the Thirty-two Constituents of the Body.
But we did not think it worth while to tell you it was fast-day,
and therefore rice was cooked for you alone. Eat it.”
“If it is proper for me to begin the fast now, I should like to do so.”
“Well then, ask him.”
But we did not think it worth while to tell you it was fast-day,
nd he replied as follows, “If he begins the fast now and rinses his mouth and takes upon himself the fast-day precepts, he will earn half the merit of keeping fast-day.”
When the laborer heard the answer, he began the fast.
Now the laborer had worked all day long and was hungry, and the result was that the humors of his body became disordered.
He bound a girth about his body, and holding the end of the girth in his hand, he rolled over and over.
When the treasurer learned of this, he took the four sweet foods and with torches borne before him went to the laborer and asked, “Friend, what is the matter?”
“Master, the humors of my body are out of order.”
“Well then, get up and eat this medicinal food.”
“You eat it, master.”
“I am not sick. You eat it.”
Master, as for keeping the fast, I was not able to keep it all, but let me not be deprived of half.”
With these words the laborer refused to eat. “Do not act thus, friend,” said the treasurer. But the laborer steadfastly refused to eat, and when the sun rose, he died even as a garland of flowers withers, and was reborn in that banyan-tree.
Therefore the tree-spirit explained the matter as follows, “The treasurer was devoted to the Buddha, devoted to the Law, devoted to the Order; and it was through him, and in consequence of the merit I earned by keeping half of fast-day, that I obtained this power.”
When the five hundred ascetics heard the name “Buddha,” they arose and stretched out their hands in an attitude of reverent supplication to the spirit and said, “Say ‘Buddha.’ ” Three times they caused the spirit to confess his faith by repeating the formula, “I say ‘Buddha.’ ” Then they breathed forth the solemn utterance, “This is an utterance difficult to obtain in this world,” and said in conclusion, “Spirit, you have permitted us to hear a sound we have not heard for many hundred thousand cycles of time.”
Then the pupils addressed their teacher as follows, “Well then, let us go to the Teacher.”
“Friends, we have three treasurers who are generous benefactors of ours. To-morrow we will receive food in their residence, tell them also what we have heard, and go. Give your consent, friends.”
Thereupon they gave their consent.
On the following day the treasurers caused rice-porridge to be prepared and seats to be provided. And knowing that the ascetics would arrive on that day, they went forth and met them, escorted them to their residence, provided them with seats, and gave them food.
When the ascetics had finished their meal, they said, “Great treasurers, we are going away.”
Reverend Sirs, did we not obtain from you a promise to reside with us during the four months of the rains? Where are you going now?”
“The Buddha has appeared in the world, the Law has appeared, the Order has appeared. We are therefore going to see the Teacher.”
“But is it proper for you only to go to the Teacher?”
“It is not forbidden to others also, friends.”
“Well then, Reverend Sirs, you wait, and we also will go as soon as we have made preparations.”
“If you wait to make preparations, we shall be delayed. Therefore we will go on ahead, and you may follow after.” So they went on ahead, and seeing the Supremely Enlightened One, praised him, paid obeisance to him, and sat down respectfully on one side.
hen the Teacher preached the Law to them in orderly sequence,
hen the Teacher preached the Law to them in orderly sequence, and at the conclusion of his discourse all of them attained Arahatship, together with the Supernatural Faculties. Thereupon they asked to be received into the Order. “Come, monks!” said the Teacher. As soon as he spoke the word, they became full-fledged monks, possessed of bowls and robes created by magic.
Those three treasurers procured the requisites for alms, consisting of garments, coverlets, ghee, honey, molasses, and so forth, and conveying five hundred cartloads apiece, proceeded to Sāvatthi. On reaching Sāvatthi, they paid obeisance to the Teacher, listened to a discourse on the Law, and at the conclusion of the discourse were established in the Fruit of Conversion. For a fortnight they resided with the Teacher, bestowing alms, and then invited the Teacher to come to Kosambi. As the Teacher gave his promise, he said, “The Tathāgatas delight in solitude.” Said the treasurers, “Reverend Sir, as soon as we notify you by sending you a message, it will be proper for you to come.” With these words they returned to Kosambi. The treasurer Ghosaka erected Ghosita monastery, the treasurer Kukkuṭa erected Kukkuṭa monastery, and the treasurer Pāvāriya erected Pāvāriya monastery. When the treasurers had erected these three monasteries, they sent word to the Teacher to come and visit them.
The Teacher, receiving their message, went there;
whereupon they came forth to meet him, escorted him to the monasteries, and waited upon him by turns.
The Teacher resided one day in each monastery
and always went to receive alms at the door of the house of the particular treasurer in whose monastery he resided.
Now these three treasurers had a servitor named Sumana, and he was a gardener.
He said to the treasurers, “I have been a servitor of yours for a long time, and I should like to entertain the Teacher. Let me have the Teacher all to myself for just one day.”
“Well then,” said they, “entertain him to-morrow.”
“Very well, masters,” he replied, invited the Teacher, and made ready the usual honors.
Now at that time King Udena was in the habit of giving Queen Sāmāvatī eight pieces of money every day to buy flowers with.
A female slave of the queen named Khujjuttarā went regularly every day to the gardener Sumana and procured the flowers.
When she came on that particular day, the gardener said to her, “I have invited the Teacher to be my guest and shall use my flowers to-day to honor the Teacher. You just wait, join with me in attendance on the Buddha, and listen to the Law. Then you may take with you the flowers that remain.”
“Very well,” said she, consenting to remain.
Sumana waited upon the Congregation of Monks presided over by the Buddha and took his bowl that he might pronounce the words of thanksgiving.
. The Teacher began to pronounce the words of thanksgiving.
Khujjuttarā listened to the discourse on the Law and became established in the Fruit of Conversion.
On previous days she had been in the habit of appropriating to her own use four pieces of money and of buying flowers with the other four; but on that day, spending all eight to buy flowers with, she returned with them.
Sāmāvatī said to her, “My good woman, did the king give us twice as much money to-day to buy flowers with?”
“No, my lady.”
“Then why so many flowers?”
“On previous days I kept four pieces of money for myself and brought you only so many flowers as I could buy for four pieces of money.”
“Why didn’t you take the money to-day?”
“Because I heard the Supremely Enlightened discourse on the Law and acquired understanding of the Law.”
The queen did not revile her and say, “You wretched slave, give me back the pieces of money you have stolen during all this time.” You wretched slave, give me back the pieces of money you have stolen during all this time.” Instead she said to her, “My good woman, you have drunk the Deathless. Give me thereof to drink also.” “Well then,” replied Khujjuttarā, “order that a bath be prepared for me.”
So the queen had her bathed with sixteen bowls of scented water and presented her with garments of fine cloth. One of these garments she caused her to put on as an undergarment, the other she caused to be thrown over her shoulder; then she had a seat prepared for her. Khujjuttarā thereupon sat down, took in her hand a painted fan, and addressing the five hundred women, preached the Law to them just as the Teacher had preached it.
Then all of them paid obeisance to Khujjuttarā and said, “Friend, from this day forth do no sinful deed, but 28.282 be to us as a mother and a teacher. Go to the Teacher and listen to every discourse he preaches, and then come back and repeat it to us.”
And this she did so faithfully that later on she came to know the Tipiṭaka by heart.
Indeed the Teacher assigned her preeminence, saying, “Preeminent among my female lay disciples who are learned in the Scriptures and able to expound the Law is Khujjuttarā.”
Now those five hundred women said to her, “Woman, we should like to see the Teacher. Show him to us, that we may honor him with perfumes, garlands, and so forth.”
“My lady, it is a serious matter to live in a king’s house. You have obtained access to it, but it is impossible for you to leave it.”
“Woman, do not destroy us. Let us see the Teacher.”
“Well then, make holes in the walls of your rooms large enough to look through. Then bring perfumes and garlands, and when the Teacher goes to the door of the house of the three treasurers, stand in your several places and look out and stretch forth your hands and pay obeisance to him and honor him.”
They followed her directions, and when the Teacher went and returned, they looked out and paid obeisance to him and honored him.
Now one day Māgandiyā came forth from her own mansion and walked along until she came to the place where those women lived. Seeing a hole in a room, she asked, “What is this?” The women, not knowing of the hatred she had conceived towards the Teacher, said, “The Teacher has come to this city, and we stand here and look at the Teacher and honor him.” “So the hermit Gotama has come to this city!” thought Māgandiyā. “Now I shall know what ought to be done to him. These women also are his supporters. I shall know what ought to be done to them also.” So she said to the king, “Great king, Sāmāvatī and her followers are disloyal to you and in but a few days will take your life.”
The king replied, “They will do nothing of the sort,” and refused to believe the charge.
Even when the charge was repeated, he still refused to believe.
When she made the charge the third time and he still refused to believe, she said to him, “If you do not believe me, great king, go to the place where they reside and judge for yourself.”
The king went there, and seeing the holes in the walls of the rooms, asked, “What does this mean?” When the matter was explained to him, he did not get angry, said not a word, but had the holes filled up and windows made with openings above in all the rooms.
Unable to injure the women, Māgandiyā thought to herself, “At any rate I will do to the monk Gotama what ought to be done.”So she bribed the citizens and said to them, “When the monk Gotama comes into the city and walks about, instigate slaves to revile him and abuse him and drive him out of the city.”
So heretics who did not believe in the Three Jewels followed the Teacher about when he entered the city and shouted at him, “You are a thief, a simpleton, a fool, a camel, an ox, an ass, a denizen of hell, a beast, you have no hope of salvation, a state of punishment is all that you can look forward to.” Thus they reviled and abused him with the Ten Terms of Abuse.
Venerable Ānanda heard this and said to the Teacher, “Reverend Sir, these citizens are reviling and abusing us. Let us go elsewhere.”
“Where shall we go, Ānanda?”
“To some other city, Reverend Sir.”
“If men revile us there, where shall we go then, Ānanda?”
“To yet another city, Reverend Sir.”
“If men revile us there, where shall we go then?”
“To still another city, Reverend Sir.”
“Ānanda, one should not speak thus.
Where a difficulty arises, right there should it be settled. Only under those circumstances is it permissible to go elsewhere.
But who are reviling you, Ānanda?”
“Reverend Sir, everyone is reviling us, slaves and all.”
“Ānanda, I am like an elephant that has entered the fray. Even as it is the duty of an elephant that has entered the fray to withstand the arrows which come from the four quarters, precisely so it is my duty to endure with patience the words spoken by many wicked men.” So saying, he preached the Law with reference to himself by pronouncing the following three Stanzas in the Nāga Vagg
Even as an elephant engaged in the fray withstands arrows shot from the bow.
So also must I bear abuse, for the multitude is wicked.
It is a tamed elephant they lead to battle; it is a tamed elephant the king mounts;
It is the tamed that is best among men, he that endures abuse patiently.
Of surpassing excellence are mules which are tamed, and well-bred Sindh horses,
And great elephants of the jungle; but better yet is the man who has tamed himself.
This discourse benefited the assembled multitude.
When the Teacher had thus preached the Law, he said, “Ānanda, be not disturbed. These men will revile you for only seven days, and on the eighth day they will become silent. A difficulty encountered by the Buddhas lasts no longer than seven days.”
When Māgandiyā had failed in her attempt to drive the Teacher out of the city by abusing him, she thought to herself, “Pray what can I do now?” Then the thought occurred to her, “These women are his supporters. I will destroy them.” Accordingly one day, while King Udena was drinking strong drink and she was waiting upon him, she sent the following message to her uncle, “Let my uncle come with eight dead cocks and eight live cocks. Having arrived, let him stand at the top of the stairs and announce his arrival. When he hears the word ‘Enter,’ let him not enter, but send in first the eight live cocks and afterwards the others.”
And she gave a bribe to the page, saying, “Be sure to carry out my orders.”
Māgandiya came and announced himself to the king. When, however, he heard the word “Enter,” he said, “I will not enter the king’s drinking-place.”
Māgandiyā then sent her page, saying, “Boy, go to my uncle.”
He went, took the eight live cocks which Māgandiyā gave him, carried them to the king, and said, “Your majesty, the house-priest has sent you a present.”
“A most excellent and dainty morsel!” said the king.
Now who will cook them?” Māgandiyā said, “Great king, the five hundred women led by Sāmāvatī have nothing to do. Send the cocks to them. Let them cook them and carry them to you.”
Accordingly the king sent them, saying to the page, “Go give these cocks to these women. Tell them not to intrust them to the hands of anyone else, but to kill them and cook them themselves.”
“Very well, your majesty,” replied the page, and went and delivered the message. But the women refused to do the king’s bidding, saying, “We do not take the life of any living creature.” The page returned and so informed the king.
Māgandiyā said, “You see, great king? Now you shall find out whether or not they really take the life of living creatures. Your majesty, send word to them, ‘ Cook them and send them to the monk Gotama.’ ”
So the king sent this message to them.
But the page, while pretending to carry the live cocks to the women, in reality went and gave those cocks to the house-priest and carried the eight dead cocks to the women, saying, “Cook these cocks and send them to the Teacher.”
“This, to be sure, is our duty,” said the women in reply, and going to meet him, they received the cocks.
When the page returned to the king and the latter asked him, “What was the result, boy?” he gave the king the following report, “The moment I said to them, “Cook these cocks and send them to the hermit Gotama,’ they came to meet me and accepted them.”
“See, great king,” said Māgandiyā, “they will not do it for the like of you. But you would not believe me when I said to you, ‘Their inclination is towards another.’ ”
But even when the king heard this, he tolerated their conduct and remained silent.
Māgandiyā thought to herself, “What shall I do now?”
Now at this time the king was accustomed to divide his time equally among his three consorts, Sāmāvatī, Vāsuladattā, and Māgandiyā, spending seven days by turns in the apartment of each.
Māgandiyā, knowing that he would go on the morrow or on the day after to the apartment of Sāmāvatī, sent word to her uncle, “Send me a snake, first washing its fangs with a poisonous drug.”
He did as she told him to and sent her a snake.
Now wherever the king went, he was accustomed to take with him his lute for charming elephants, and in the shell of this lute was a hole.
Māgandiyā inserted the snake in the hole and stopped the hole with a bunch of flowers;
for two or three days the snake remained within the lute.
On the day when the king was to go to Sāmāvatī’s apartment, Māgandiyā asked him, “To whose apartment will you go to-day, your majesty?” “To Sāmāvatī’s apartment.” Said Māgandiyā, “Your majesty, to-day I had a bad dream;
you must not go there.”
“I am going all the same.”
Three times she tried to dissuade him from going and failed. Finally she said, “In that case I will go too.” In spite of the king’s protests she went with him, saying, “Your majesty, I do not know what will happen to you.”
The king, wearing garments, flowers, perfumes, and ornaments given him by Sāmāvatī and her followers, ate heartily, and then placed his lute by his pillow and lay down on the bed.
Māgandiyā, pretending to be merely walking back and forth, removed the bunch of flowers from the opening in the lute;
whereupon the snake, which had been without food for two or three days, glided from the opening, hissed, raised his hood, and coiled himself up on the top of the bed.
When Māgandiyā saw the snake, she screamed with a loud voice, “Oh, your majesty, there is a snake!” And she straightway abused the king, saying, “This stupid, unlucky king will not listen to anything I say to him. As for these shameless scoundrels, what do they not receive from the king? You will live happily just as soon as the king is dead, but so long as he lives, you will have a hard time. Your majesty, when I cried out to you, ‘To-day I had a bad dream; you must not go to Sāmāvatī’s apartment’ you would not listen to what I said.”
When the king saw the snake, he was terrified with the fear of death, the fire of anger was kindled within him, and he said, “So this is the sort of thing they are capable of doing! What criminals they are! Yet I would not believe Māgandiyā when she told me of their evil nature. First they made holes in the walls of their own rooms and sat there; again, when I sent the cocks to them, they sent them back; to-day they have let a snake loose in my bed.”
Sāmāvatī delivered the following admonition to her five hundred women, “Friends, we have no other refuge. Cherish precisely the same feelings towards the king and the queen as you do towards yourselves. Be not angry with anyone.”
The king took his horn-bow, which required a thousand men to string, twanged the bowstring, fitted a poisoned arrow to the string, and placing Sāmāvatī in front and all the other women in single file behind her, shot an arrow at Sāmāvatī’s breast.
But through the supernatural power of her love the arrow turned back, and returning by the same path it had come, penetrated, as it were, the king’s heart.
The king thought to himself, “The arrow I shot is capable of piercing even a rock, and there was nothing in the air to make it turn back. But it turned and came back by the same path it went. Indeed this senseless, lifeless arrow knows her goodness, but I, who am a human being, know it not.” And throwing the bow away and stretching forth his hands in an attitude of reverent supplication, he knelt before Sāmāvatī’s feet and pronounced the following Stanza,
Protect me, Sāmāvatī, and be a refuge to me.
I am utterly confused and bewildered; all four quarters are confused in my mind.
Sāmāvatī, hearing his words, instead of saying, “Very well, your majesty, seek refuge in me,” said, “Great king, in whom I have sought refuge, in him do you also seek refuge.” Having thus spoken, Sāmāvatī, disciple of the Supremely Enlightened, said,
Seek refuge in that Buddha, and do you be a refuge to me.
He is the Buddha, great king, he is the Buddha Incomparable!
Do not seek refuge in me! He in whom I have sought refuge,–
The king said, “Now I am the more afraid,” and pronounced the following Stanza,
Now I am the more confused; all four quarters are confused in my mind.
Protect me, Sāmāvatī, and be a refuge to me.
But she refused him precisely as before. Finally he said, “Well then, I seek refuge in you and in the Teacher, and I grant you a boon.” “I accept the boon, great king,” she replied.
But she refused him precisely as before. Finally he said, “Well then, I seek refuge in you and in the Teacher, and I grant you a boon.” “I accept the boon, great king,” she replied.
Sāmāvatī replied, “Great king, I have no need of gold and silver, but grant me this boon. Arrange matters so that the Teacher may come here regularly with his five hundred monks, so that I may hear the Law.”
So the king paid obeisance to the Teacher and said, “Reverend Sir, come here regularly with your five hundred monks. Sāmāvatī and her attendants say they wish to hear the Law.”
The Teacher replied, “Great king, the Buddhas may not always go to one place; many desire their presence.”
“Well then, direct one monk to come.”
The Teacher directed Ānanda to go.
So Ānanda went every day to the royal palace with five hundred monks,
and those women every day provided the Elder with food and listened to the Law.
One day, after they had listened to the Elder’s discourse on the Law, their hearts were filled with joy, and they rendered honor to the Elder by presenting him with five hundred yellow robes such as are worn over the shoulders,
each worth five hundred pieces of money.
When the king saw that they had not a single garment left, he asked them, “Where are your yellow robes?”
“We gave them to the Reverend Elder.”
“Did he take them all?”
“Yes, he took them all.”
The king approached the Elder, paid obeisance to him, questioned him about the gift of the robes by the women, and learning that the women had given the robes and that the Elder had received them, asked, “Reverend Sir, there were a great many robes, were there not? What will you do with so many?”
“I shall keep as many as we require for ourselves and send the rest to those whose robes are worn out, great king.”
“What will they do with their own worn-out robes?”
“They will give them to those whose robes are in a still worse state of repair.”
“What will they do with their own worn-out robes?”
“They will make bedspreads of them.”
“What will they do with the old bedspreads?”
“They will make carpets of them.”
“What will they do with the old carpets?”
“They will make foot-towels of them.”
“What will they do with the old foot-towels?”
“They will cut them into small pieces, mix them with mortar, and use them to plaster walls with.”
“Reverend Sir, although all these are given to your reverences, nothing is lost.”
“Quite so, great king.”
The king was so pleased that he caused five hundred more robes to be brought and placed at the Elder’s feet.
(We are told that robes worth five hundred pieces of money were presented to the Elder and laid at his feet in lots of a thousand, and that he received this number a hundred thousand times; that robes worth a thousand pieces of money were presented to the Elder and laid at his feet in lots of a thousand, and that he received this number a thousand times; that robes worth a hundred thousand pieces of money were presented to the Elder and laid at his feet in lots of a thousand, and that he received this number a hundred times.
It is impossible to enumerate the number of robes he received by ones and twos and threes and fours and fives and tens.
We are told that, upon the death of the Teacher, the Elder traveled all over the Land of the Rose-apple, presenting to the monks in all of the monasteries bowls and robes of his own.)
Māgandiyā thought to herself, “Whatever I do turns out otherwise than I expect.
What shall I do now?” Finally she decided on a plan. On her way to the garden to amuse herself, she sent the following message to her uncle, “Go to Sāmāvatī’s palace, open the linen-closets and the oil-closets, soak pieces of cloth in the jars of oil, and wrap these cloths about the pillars. Then assemble all the women within the house, close the door, bar it from without, set fire to the house with torches, and then descend and go your way.”
Māgandiya went up into the palace, opened the closets, soaked garments in the oil-jars,
and was just beginning to wrap them about the pillars when the women led by Sāmāvatī came up to him and said, “Why are you doing this, uncle?”
“My ladies, the king desires these pillars to be strengthened, and has therefore given orders that they be wrapped in cloths soaked in oil. It is hard to understand why certain things should be done in a king’s house and certain other things should not be done. I beg of you, my ladies, not to remain here with me.” As soon as they had departed and entered their rooms at his suggestion, he closed the doors, barred them from without, set fire to first one cloth and then another, and descended.
Sāmāvatī delivered the following admonition to her followers, “It would not be an easy matter, even with the knowledge of a Buddha, to determine exactly the number of times our bodies have thus been burned with fire as we have passed from birth to rebirth in the round of existences which has no conceivable beginning. Therefore be heedful.”
As the fire consumed the house, the women applied themselves to meditation on the element of pain, with the result that some of them attained the Fruit of the Second Path, while others attained the Fruit of the Third Path.
Therefore it is said, Now a large number of monks, returning from their alms-pilgrimage after breakfast, drew near to where the Exalted One was, and having drawn near, paid obeisance to the Exalted One and sat down reverently on one side. And as they sat there on one side, those monks said this to the Exalted One, “Here, Reverend Sir, while King Udena was in his pleasure-garden, the quarters of his women were consumed with fire, and five hundred women led by Sāmāvatī lost their lives.
Reverend Sir, what will be the end, what will be the future state of these female lay disciples?”
“Monks, some of these female lay disciples obtained the Fruit of Conversion, others obtained the Fruit of the Second Path, others obtained the Fruit of the Third Path. Monks, none of those female lay disciples failed to receive the fruit of their past deeds.”
And the Exalted One, clearly understanding the matter, breathed forth at that time the following Solemn Utterance,
Bound with the bond of delusion, the world appears to be good.
The simpleton, fettered by the conditions of being, enshrouded by darkness,
Thinks it eternal. But to him who really sees, there is naught.
So saying, he preached the Law, saying, “Monks, as living beings pass through the round of existences, they are not always heedful, and sometimes they commit sin.
Therefore as they pass through the round of existences, they experience both pleasure and pain.”
When the king heard the cry, “Sāmāvatī’s house is on fire!” he went there quickly, but the house was burned before he could reach it.
“Having extinguished the flames, he sat down surrounded by his retinue of courtiers, overwhelmed with profound grief, and recalled to his mind the virtues of Sāmāvatī. “Who could have done this deed?” thought he. Coming to the conclusion that Māgandiyā was the author of the crime, he thought to himself, “If I frighten her by my questions, she will not tell me. Therefore I will employ craft and question her gently.” Accordingly he said to his ministers, “Well, until this moment, no matter what I was engaged in or occupied with, I was apprehensive and suspicious; Sāmāvatī was ever seeking occasion to slay me. But now my mind will rest in peace, and I shall be able to lie down to sleep in security.” “Who was it that did this deed, your majesty?”
“Someone who really loved me must have done it.”
Now Māgandiyā happened to be standing near, and when she heard the king say this, she said, “None other than I could have done this. I alone did it. I sent word to my uncle and ordered him to do it.”
“Except you, there is not a living being who really loves me. I am delighted. I grant you a boon. Send for all of your relatives.”
So Māgandiyā sent the following message to her relatives, “The king is pleased with me and has granted me a boon. Come immediately.”
The king rendered high honor to all those who came,
insomuch that even persons who were in no way related to Māgandiyā, hearing about it, gave bribes and came and said, “We are relatives of Māgandiyā.”
When the king had them all in his hands, he caused pits to be dug waist-deep in the palace-court, set them therein, filled up the pits with earth, spread straw on top, and set the straw on fire.
When the skin had been burned to a crisp, he caused the bodies to be plowed with an iron plow and to be broken up into pieces and fragments.
As for Māgandiyā, he had pieces of solid flesh ripped from various parts of her body with a sharp knife, and setting a vessel of oil on the brazier, he had them fried like cakes and made her eat them.
In the Hall of Truth the monks began to discuss matters, saying, “It is not right that a female lay disciple endowed with such faith should suffer such a death.”
The Teacher came in and asked them, “Monks, what is it you are sitting here now talking about?” When they told him, he said, “Monks, if you regard this existence alone, it is indeed highly improper and unjust that the five hundred women led by Sāmāvatī should suffer such a death.
What they received, however, was in every way proper, considering the sin they committed in a previous existence.” “Reverend Sir, what was the sin they committed in a previous existence? Pray tell us.” Responding to their request, the Teacher related the following
Once upon a time, when Brahmadatta reigned in Benāres, there were eight Private Buddhas who regularly took their meals in the royal palace,
and there were five hundred women who waited upon them.
Seven of these Private Buddhas retired to the Himālaya, and the Private Buddha who remained sat down on the bank of the river where there was a tangle of grass, and entered into mystic meditation.
Now one day, after the Private Buddhas had departed, the king took those women and went to sport in the water.
When those women, who had sported there in the water all day, came out, they were stung with cold. Desiring to warm themselves, they said to each other, “Seek out some place where we can build a fire.” As they walked back and forth, they saw the tangle of grass, and thinking it was no more than a heap of grass, they gathered round it and set it on fire.
When the grass burned down and they saw the Private Buddha, they cried out, “We are lost! we are lost! The king’s Private Buddha is burning up. If the king finds it out, he will kill everyone of us. Let us burn him well while we are about it.” So all those women brought firewood from all directions and piled it on the Private Buddha
Then they poured oil on it, and saying to themselves, “Now he will burn,” they departed.
Now in the beginning their act was a thoughtless one, and they were not bound thereby. But afterwards they committed a deliberate sin and were bound to suffer the consequences thereof.
While the Private Buddha was absorbed in mystic meditation, they might have brought a hundred thousand cartloads of firewood and poured oil thereon, and they could not even have caused him to feel the heat.
o on the seventh day the Private Buddha arose and went where he pleased.
Because they committed this sin, those women were boiled for many hundreds of thousands of years in Hell, and because the fruit of that same evil deed was not yet exhausted, their houses were burned, and they were burned in their houses in a hundred successive states of existence in this very manner.
This is the sin they committed in a previous state of existence.
When the Teacher had related this story, the monks asked him, “But, Reverend Sir, how did Khujjuttarā come to be a hunchback? How did she become so wise? How did she obtain the Fruit of Conversion? How did she become an errand-girl?”
Monks, while that same king was ruling in Benāres, there was a Private Buddha who was slightly hunchbacked.
Now a certain serving-woman, throwing a blanket over her shoulder and taking a golden vessel in her hand, bent over so that she looked like a hunchback, and saying, “This is the way our Private Buddha walks,” imitated his manner of walking.
It was in consequence of this that she came to be a hunchback.
But on the first day she provided those Private Buddhas with seats in the royal palace, took their bowls, filled them with rice-porridge, and presented them to them.
The Private Buddhas took the bowls of porridge, but they were so hot that they were obliged to shift them from one hand to the other.
That woman, seeing what they were doing, presented to them eight ivory bracelets of her own, saying, “Use these bracelets as stands for your bowls.”
When they had so done, they looked at her, whereupon she said, “Reverend Sirs, we have no use for these bracelets.
Accept them as a present from us before you go.”
.The Private Buddhas took them with them to Nandamūla mountain-cave,
and those bracelets are preserved there unimpaired to this day.
As the result of this act of hers, she now knows the Tipiṭaka by heart and possesses profound wisdom.
Likewise it was through waiting upon the Private Buddhas that she obtained the Fruit of Conversion.
These were her deeds in the interval between two Buddhas
In the dispensation of Kassapa, the Supremely Enlightened, a certain treasurer’s daughter of Benāres took her mirror one day, as the shades of evening drew on, and sat down to adorn herself.
Now a certain intimate friend of hers, a nun freed from the Depravities, came to see her.
For nuns freed from the Depravities like to visit the households of their supporters at eventide.
But at that moment the treasurer’s daughter happened to have no errand-girl with her. So she said to the nun, “I greet you, Reverend Lady. Just take that basket of ornaments and give it to me.”
The nun thought to herself, “If I do not take this basket and give it to her, she will take a dislike to me and will be reborn in Hell;
but if I do give it to her, she will be reborn as the errand-girl of another.
However, it is better to be the errand-girl of another than to suffer torment in Hell.”
So out of pity for her she took the basket and gave it to her.
Again one day in the Hall of Truth the monks started a discussion. “Sāmāvatī and her five hundred women were burned with fire in their house; as for Māgandiyā and her kinswomen, a fire of straw was built over their bodies, and their bodies were torn asunder with iron plows, and Māgandiyā was boiled in boiling oil. Which of these are alive and which are dead?”
The Teacher came in and asked, “Monks, what are you sitting here now talking about?” When they told him, he said to them, “Monks, they that are heedless, though they live a hundred years, yet are they dead.
They that are heedful, be they dead or alive, yet are they alive.
Māgandiyā, while she yet lived, was dead already. Sāmāvatī and her followers, though they be dead, yet are they alive.
For, monks, the heedful never die.” So saying, he pronounced the following Stanzas,
Heedfulness is the Way to the Deathless; heedlessness is the way to death.
The heedful never die, but they that are heedless are, as it were, dead already.
Knowing this clearly, they that are advanced in heedfulness
Delight in heedfulness, and rejoice in the state of the Elect.
They that devote themselves to meditation, they that are persevering, they that put forth resolute effort.
They, the wise, attain Nibbāna, the highest bliss.
…he shaves off his hair and beard, puts on the yellow robe, and goes forth from the home life into homelessness.
for gods and humans cling to the five cords of sensual pleasure.
until they had erected a great pyre.
In consequence of this act she became the errand-girl of another.
“Just as, Aggivessana, the elephant tamer plants a large post in the earth and binds the forest elephant to it by the neck in order to subdue his forest habits…and to inculcate in him habits congenial to human beings, so these four foundations of mindfulness are the bindings for the mind of the noble disciple in order to subdue his habits based on the household life, to subdue his memories and intentions based on the household life, to subdue his distress, fatigue, and fever based on the household life, and in order that he may attain the true way and realise Nibbana.
abide contemplating feelings as feelings but do not think thoughts connected with feelings; abide contemplating mind as mind but do not think thoughts connected with the mind; abide contemplating mind-objects as mind-objects but do not think thoughts connected with mind-objects.’
He understands:
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Jetavana with reference to the Brahman Little One-Robe, Culla Ekasāṭaka.
For in the dispensation of the Buddha Vipassī lived a Brahman named Mahā Ekasāṭaka, and he it was who was reborn in the present dispensation in Sāvatthi as One-Robe, Culla Ekasāṭaka.
For Culla Ekasāṭaka possessed but a single undergarment, and his wife possessed but a single undergarment, and both of them together possessed but a single upper garment.
The result was that, whenever either the Brahman or his wife went out of doors, the other had to stay at home.
“Wife, announcement is made that there will be preaching at the monastery. Will you go to hear the Law by day or by night?
For we have not enough upper garments between us to permit both of us to go together.”
The Brahman’s wife replied, “Husband, I will go in the daytime.” So saying, she put on the upper garment and went.
The Brahman spent the day at home. At night he went to the monastery, seated himself in front of the Teacher, and listened to the Law.
Law. As he listened to the Law, the five sorts of joy arose within him, suffusing his body.
He greatly desired to do honor to the Teacher, but the following thought restrained him, “If I give this garment to the Teacher, there will be no upper garment left for my wife or me.”
A thousand selfish thoughts arose within him; then a single believing thought arose within him.
Then thought of self arose within him and overmastered the believing thought.
Even so did the mighty thought of self seize, as it were, and bind and thrust out the believing thought.
“I will give it! No, I will not give it!” said the Brahman to himself. As he thus reflected, the first watch passed and the second watch arrived.
Even then he was not able to bring himself to give the garment to the Teacher.
Then the last watch came. Finally the Brahman thought to himself, “While I have been fighting with thoughts of faith and thoughts of self, two watches have elapsed. If these powerful thoughts of self increase, they will not permit me to lift up my head from the Four States of Suffering. I will therefore give my gift.”
Thus the Brahman finally overmastered a thousand thoughts of self and followed the lead of a thought of faith. Taking his garment, he laid it at the Teacher’s feet and thrice cried out with a loud voice, “I have conquered! I have conquered!”
King Pasenadi Kosala happened to be listening to the Law. When he heard that cry, he said, “Ask him what he has conquered.”
The king’s men asked the Brahman the question, and the Brahman explained the matter to them.
When the king heard the explanation, he said, “It was a hard thing to do what the Brahman did. I will do him a kindness.” So he caused a pair of garments to be presented to him.
The Brahman presented these garments also to the Tathāgata.
Then the king doubled his gift, presenting the Brahman first with two pairs of garments, then with four, then with eight, finally with sixteen.
The Brahman presented all these garments also to the Tathāgata.
Then the king directed thirty-two pairs of garments to be presented to the Brahman.
But to avoid having it said, “The Brahman has kept not a single pair for himself, but has given away every pair he received,” he said to the Brahman, “Keep one pair for yourself and give another pair to your wife.” So saying, he caused the Brahman to keep two pairs and gave the remaining thirty pairs to the Tathāgata alone.
Even had the Brahman given away what he possessed a hundred times, the king would have met his gifts with equal gifts.
The king gave orders to his men, “It was indeed a hard thing to do what the Brahman did. Fetch my two blankets into the presence-chamber.”
They did so.
The king presented him with the two blankets, valued at a thousand pieces of money.
But the Brahman said to himself, “I am not worthy to cover my body with these blankets. These are suitable only for the Religion of the Buddha.” Accordingly he made a canopy of one of the blankets and hung it up in the Perfumed Chamber over the Teacher’s bed; likewise he made a canopy of the other blanket and hung it up in his own house over the spot where the monk who resorted to his house for alms took his meals.
At eventide the king went to visit the Teacher. Recognizing the blanket, he asked him, “Reverend Sir, who was it that honored you with the gift of this blanket?” “Ekasāṭaka.” Thought the king to himself, “Even as I believe and rejoice in my belief, even so does this Brahman believe and rejoice in his belief.” Accordingly he presented to him four elephants, four horses, four thousand pieces of money, four women, four female slaves, and four most excellent villages. Thus therefore did the king cause the Brahman to be given the Gift of Fours.
The monks started a discussion in the Hall of Truth: “Oh how wonderful was the deed of Culla Ekasāṭaka! No sooner done than he received all manner of presents of four! As soon as he did a good deed, straightway the fruit thereof was given to him.”
The Teacher approached and asked the monks, “Monks, what are you sitting here now talking about?” When they told him, he said, “Monks, had Ekasāṭaka been able to bring himself to give me his gift in the first watch, he would have received the Gift of Sixteens;
had he been able to do so in the middle watch, he would have received the Gift of Eights;
because it was not until late in the last watch that he gave me his gift, he received only the Gift of Fours.
He who does good works should not put away the impulse to good that arises within him, but should act on the instant.
A meritorious deed tardily done brings its reward, but tardy is the reward it brings. Therefore a man should perform a good work the instant the impulse to good arises within him.” So saying, he joined the connection, and preaching the Law, pronounced the following Stanza,
Let a man make haste to do good; let him restrain his heart from evil;
For if a man is slow in doing good, his mind delights in evil.
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Jetavana with reference to Elder Seyyasaka.
For Elder Seyyasaka was Elder Lāḷudāyi’s fellow-monk. Becoming discontented with the continence required by the Religious Life, he told his companion, who put him up to violating the first Saṅghadisesa Rule.Thereafter, as often as he fell into that sin of discontent, he broke that same Rule.
The Teacher heard about his doings, sent for him, and asked him, “Is the report true that you do thus and so?” “Yes, Reverend Sir.” “Fond man,” said the Teacher, “why have you sinned so grievously, in a manner so unbecoming to your state?” In such fashion did the Teacher reprove him. Having so done, he enjoined upon him the observance of the Precepts. Then he said to him, “Such a course of action inevitably leads to suffering, both in this world and in the world to come.” So saying, he joined the connection, and preaching the Law, pronounced the following Stanza,
Should a man commit sin, he should not repeat his sin again and again;
He should not seek after evil; suffering is the outcome of evil.
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Jetavana with reference to the goddess Lājā.
The story begins at Rājagaha.
For while Venerable Kassapa the Great was in residence at Pipphali Cave, he entered into a state of trance, remaining therein for seven days. Arising from trance on the seventh day, he surveyed with Supernatural Vision the places where he was wont to go his rounds for alms. As he looked abroad, he beheld a certain woman, the keeper of a field of rice-paddy, parching heads of rice which she had gathered. Thereupon he considered within himself, “Is she endowed with faith or is she not endowed with faith?” Straightway becoming aware that she was endowed with faith, he reflected, “Will she be able to render me assistance?” Straightway he became aware of the following, “This noble young woman is wise and resourceful; she will render me assistance, and as the result of so doing will receive a rich reward.” So he put on his robe, took bowl in hand, and went and stood near the rice-field.
When this noble young woman saw the Elder, her heart believed, and her body was suffused with the five sorts of joy. “Wait a moment, Reverend Sir,” said she. Taking some of the parched rice, she went quickly to him, poured the rice into the Elder’s bowl, and then, saluting him with the Five Rests, she made an Earnest Wish, saying, “Reverend Sir, may I be a partaker of the Truth you have seen.”
“So be it,” replied the Elder, pronouncing the words of thanksgiving.
Then that noble young woman saluted the Elder and set out to return, reflecting upon the alms she had given to the Elder.
Now in a certain hole by the road skirting the field of growing rice lurked a poisonous snake.
He was not able to bite the Elder’s leg, for it was covered with his yellow robe.
But as that noble young woman reached that spot on her return, reflecting upon the alms she had given to the Elder,
the snake wriggled out of his hole, bit her, and then and there caused her to fall prostrate on the ground.
Dying with believing heart, she was reborn in the World of the Thirty-three. Like a sleeper awakened, she awoke in a celestial mansion of gold thirty leagues in extent; her stature was three-quarters of a league.
Dying with believing heart, she was reborn in the World of the Thirty-three. Like a sleeper awakened, she awoke in a celestial mansion of gold thirty leagues in extent; her stature was three-quarters of a league. Standing at the portal of the mansion, she surveyed her glory and considered within herself, “Through what work of merit did I attain this glory?” Straightway she became aware of the following, “This my glory is the result of my gift of parched rice to Elder Kassapa the Great.”
Then she thought to herself, “Since I have received this splendor and glory as the result of a trifling work of merit, I ought not henceforth to be heedless. I will therefore perform the major and minor duties for the Elder and so make my salvation sure.” Accordingly early in the morning she took a golden broom and a golden receptacle for sweepings, went to the Elder’s cell, swept it clean, and set out water for drinking.
When the Elder saw what had been done, he concluded, “Some probationer or novice must have rendered me this service.”
On the second day the goddess did the same thing again, and the Elder again came to the same conclusion.
ut on the third day the Elder heard the sound of her sweeping, and looking in through the keyhole, saw the radiant image of her body. And straightway he asked, “Who is it that is sweeping?”
“It is I, Reverend Sir, your female disciple the goddess Lājā.”
“I have no female disciple by that name.”
“Reverend Sir, when I was a young woman tending a rice-field, I gave you parched rice; as I returned on my way, a snake bit me, and I died with believing heart and was reborn in the World of the Thirty-three. Since it was through you that I received this glory, I said to myself, ‘I will perform the major and minor duties for you and so make my salvation sure.’ Therefore came I hither, Reverend Sir.”
“Was it you that swept this place for me yesterday and on the preceding days, setting out water for drinking?”
“Yes, Reverend Sir.”
“Pray depart hence, goddess. Never mind about the duties you have rendered, but henceforth come no more hither.”
“Reverend Sir, do not destroy me. Permit me to perform the major and minor services for you and so make my salvation sure.”
“Goddess, depart hence, lest in the future, when expounders of the Law take the variegated fan and sit down, they have reason to say, ‘Report has it that a goddess comes and performs the major and minor duties for Elder Kassapa the Great, setting out water for him to drink.’ Henceforth, therefore, come no more hither, but turn your steps elsewhere.”
“Reverend Sir, do not destroy me,” begged the goddess again and again.
The Elder thought to himself, “This goddess pays no attention to my command.” Therefore he said to her, “You do not know your place.” So saying, he snapped his fingers in contempt.
The goddess, not daring to remain where she was, flew up into the air, and extending her clasped hands in an attitude of reverence, cried out, “Reverend Sir, do not nullify the attainment I have attained. Let me make my salvation sure.” Thereupon the goddess wept and wailed and lamented, standing poised in the air.
As the Teacher sat in his Perfumed Chamber at Jetavana, {3.9} he heard the sound of her lamentation. Therefore he sent forth a luminous image of himself, and sitting down face to face as it were with the goddess, he opened his lips and said, “Goddess, it was indeed the duty of my son Kassapa the Great to restrain himself. But they who desire to perform works of merit conclude, ‘This one thing alone is needful,’ and recognize the doing of works of merit as their sole duty.
Indeed, both in this world and the world to come, it is the doing of good works alone that brings happiness.” Then he joined the connection, and preaching the Law, pronounced the following Stanza,
If a man do works of merit, he should do them again and again;
He should long to do works of merit; happy is the outcome of works of merit.
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Jetavana with reference to Anāthapiṇḍika.
For Anāthapiṇḍika, who spent fifty-four crores of treasure in the Religion of the Buddha on Jetavana monastery alone, proceeded in state three times a day to wait upon the Teacher during the Teacher’s residence at Jetavana. Whenever he set out to go thither, he thought, “The probationers and novices will look at my hands and ask the question, ‘What has he brought with him as offerings?’ ” and therefore never went empty-handed.
When he went thither early in the morning he carried rice-porridge with him; after breakfast he carried ghee, fresh butter, and the other medicaments;
in the evening he carried with him perfumes, garlands, unguents, and garments.
although he was unable to give choice food such as he had before.
But in spite of this, he just gave alms to the Congregation of Monks as before,
Now those who lived by trade had borrowed from him eighteen crores of treasure. Moreover eighteen crores of treasure belonging to his family, secretly buried at the bank of the river, had been swept into the great ocean at the time when the river burst its banks. The result was that he was gradually being reduced to a state of poverty.
One day the Teacher asked him, “Are alms provided for us in the house of our householder?” Anāthapiṇḍika replied, “Yes, Reverend Sir, but the food is naught but bird-feed and sour gruel.”
Then said the Teacher to him, “Householder, do not allow yourself to think, ‘It is naught but coarse food that I give to the Teacher,’
and be not disturbed thereat. If the intention be pure, it is impossible to give the Buddhas and others food that is really coarse. You have given food to the Eight Holy Personages. I, however, in the time of Velāma stirred up all India by setting rich offerings agoing, {3.11} but yet I failed to win a single man to betake himself to the Three Refuges. It is a hard thing to find those on whom it is proper to bestow offerings.
Therefore be not disturbed at the thought, ‘My offerings are coarse food.’ ” So saying, the Teacher recited in full the Velāma Sutta.
When the Teacher and the Teacher’s disciples entered the house of Anāthapiṇḍika, the goddess who dwelt over the gate, unable to remain by reason of the intensity of their goodness, thought to herself, “I will detach the householder from his allegiance, that they may no more enter this house.” Now although the goddess had longed to address the householder, she could say not a word to him in the heyday of his wealth and power. At this time, however, she thought to herself, “The householder is now a poor man, and will therefore be disposed to give heed to my words.” Accordingly she went by night, entered the treasurer’s chamber of state, and stood poised in the air
When the treasurer saw her, he said, “Who is that?”
“It is I, great treasurer, the goddess that resides over your fourth gate. I am come to give you admonition.”
“Well then, say what you have to say.”
“Great treasurer, without considering the future, you have dissipated your great wealth in the religion of the monk Gotama. Now, although you have reduced yourself to poverty, you still continue to give of your wealth. If you continue this course, in a few days you will not have enough left to provide you with clothing and food. Of what use to you is the monk Gotama? Abandon your lavish giving, devote your attention to business, and make a fortune.”
“Is this the advice you came to give me?”
“Yes, treasurer.”
“Then begone. Though a hundred thousand like you should try, you would not be able to move me from my course. You have said to me what you had no right to say; what business have you to dwell in my house? Leave my house instantly.”
The goddess, unable to withstand the words of a Noble Disciple who had attained the Fruit of Conversion, left his house, taking her children with her. But after the goddess had left his house, she was unable to find lodging elsewhere. Then she thought to herself, “I will ask the treasurer to pardon me and to allow me to resume my residence in his house.” Accordingly she approached the tutelary deity of the city, told him of her offense, and said to him, “Come now, conduct me to the treasurer, persuade him to pardon me, and persuade him to allow me to resume my residence in his house.”
But the tutelary deity of the city replied, “You said something you had no business to say; it will be impossible for me to go with you to the treasurer’s residence.” Thus did the tutelary deity of the city refuse her request.
Then she went to the Four Great Kings, but they likewise refused her request. Then she approached Sakka king of gods, told him her story, and entreated him yet more earnestly. Said she, “Sire, I am 29.270 unable to find a place wherein to lodge myself, but wander about without protection, children in hand. Obtain for me the privilege of returning to my former residence.”
Sakka replied, “But neither will it be possible for me to speak to the treasurer in your behalf. However, I will tell you a way.”
“Very good, sire; tell me what it is.”
“Go assume the dress of the treasurer’s steward; note on a leaf from the hand of the treasurer a list of the wealth he once possessed; put forth your supernatural power and recover the eighteen crores of wealth borrowed by those who live by trade, and fill therewith the treasurer’s empty storeroom. {3.13} Besides this wealth, there are eighteen crores of wealth which were swept into the great ocean. Yet again there are eighteen crores of wealth without an owner, to be found in such and such a place. Gather all this together and therewith fill his empty store-room. Having thus atoned for your offense, ask him to grant you pardon.”
“Very well,” said the goddess. And straightway she did all, just as Sakka king of gods told her to. Having so done, she went and stood poised in the air, illuminating with supernatural radiance the treasurer’s chamber of state. “Who is that?” asked the treasurer. “It is I,” replied the goddess, “the blind, stupid goddess that once dwelt over your fourth gate. Pardon me the words I once spoke to you in my blind stupidity.
In obedience to the command of Sakka king of gods, I have recovered the fifty-four crores of wealth and filled your empty store-room therewith; thus have I atoned for my offense; I have no place wherein to lodge myself, and therefore am I greatly wearied.”
Anāthapiṇḍika thought to himself, “This goddess says to me, ‘I have made atonement for my offense,’ and confesses her fault; I will conduct her to the Supremely Enlightened.” Accordingly he conducted her to the Teacher, saying to her, “Tell the Teacher all you have done.”
The goddess fell upon her face before the feet of the Teacher and said, “Reverend Sir, because of my folly I did not recognize your eminent merit and uttered evil words; pardon me for having uttered them.” Thus did the goddess ask pardon both of the Teacher and of the great treasurer.
Then the Teacher admonished both the treasurer and the fairy with reference to the ripening of deeds both good and evil, saying, “Here in this present life, great treasurer, even an evildoer sees happiness, so long as his evil deed has not yet ripened.
But so soon as his evil deed has ripened, then he sees only evil.
Likewise a good man sees evil things, so long as his good deeds have not yet ripened;
but so soon as his good deeds have ripened, then he sees only happiness.” So saying, he joined the connection, and preaching the Law, pronounced the following Stanzas,
Еven an evildoer sees happiness, so long as his evil deed has not yet ripened;
But so soon as his evil deed has ripened, then the evildoer sees evil things.
Even a good man sees evil, so long as his good deeds have not yet ripened;
But so soon as his good deeds have ripened, then the good man sees happiness.
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Jetavana with reference to Visākhā’s companions.
The story goes that five hundred young men of respectable families living at Sāvatthi intrusted their wives to the care of the eminent female lay disciple Visākhā, confident that under such auspices they would live the life of Heedfulness.
From that time forth, whether they went to the pleasure garden or to the monastery, they went always with Visākhā.
Now on a certain occasion proclamation was made of a drinking festival to last seven days. Accordingly those women prepared strong drink for their husbands, and their husbands took part in the festival, carousing for a period of seven days.
On the eighth day the drum went forth to announce the resumption of work, and they returned to their work.
Those women thought to themselves, “We have not been permitted to drink strong drink in the presence of our husbands. Yet plenty of strong drink remains. Let us therefore drink it, but let us take care that our husbands shall know nothing about it.” Accordingly they went to Visākhā and said to her, “Noble lady, we desire to visit the pleasure garden.” “Very well, dear friends, perform your various duties first; then you may go out.” They went with Visākhā, causing strong drink to be removed surreptitiously, drank it in the garden, and roamed about in a state of intoxication.
Visākhā thought to herself, “These women have committed a gross impropriety. Now the heretics also will find ground of reproach and will say, ‘The female lay disciples of the monk Gotama go about drinking strong drink.’ ” So she said to those women, “Dear friends, you have committed a gross impropriety and have brought disgrace upon me also. Your husbands also will be enraged at you. Now what will you do?”
“Noble lady, we shall pretend to be sick.”
“Very well, you will acquire notoriety by your own doings.”
The women went home and pretended to be sick.
Now their husbands inquired, “Where is So-and-so? Where is So-and-so?” “Sick.” “They undoubtedly drank the strong drink that remained,” concluded their husbands. Therefore they beat them and brought distress and unhappiness upon them.
At a subsequent drinking festival those same women desired to drink strong drink in the same manner as before. So they went to Visākhā and said to her, “Noble lady, conduct us to the pleasure garden.” But Visākhā refused to do so, saying, “The last time I did so, you brought disgrace upon me. Go by yourselves; I will not conduct you thither.” The women decided, “We will not act so this time.” So they went to Visākhā again and said to her, “Noble lady, we desire to do honor to the Buddha; conduct us to the monastery.”
“What you propose to do now is quite proper; go make preparations.”
So taking perfumes and garlands in caskets, carrying in their hands jugs filled with strong drink, wearing great cloaks, they approached Visākhā, and accompanied her to the monastery. Then they went off by themselves and drank strong drink out of their jugs. And throwing away their jugs, they seated themselves in the Hall of Truth in the presence of the Teacher.
Said Visākhā to the Teacher, “Reverend Sir, preach the Law to these women.”
But those same women were so drunk that their bodies swayed back and forth, and suddenly they took it into their heads to dance and sing.
Now a certain deity belonging to the host of Māra thought to herself, “I will possess the bodies of these women and cause them to commit gross improprieties in the presence of the monk Gotama.” And straightway she took possession of their bodies.
Thereupon some of them clapped their hands before the Teacher and laughed, while others began to dance.
The Teacher considered within himself, “What does this mean?” Immediately perceiving the cause, he said to himself, “I shall not now permit the deities of the host of Māra to descend.
For during all the time I was fulfilling the Perfections, it was certainly not for the purpose of allowing the deities of the host of Māra to descend that I fulfilled them.”Accordingly, that he might frighten those women, the Teacher sent forth a dark-blue ray from the hair of his eyebrow. Straightway there was black darkness.
Those women were terrified with the fear of death.
So intense was their fear that the strong drink within their bellies dried up.
Then the Teacher vanished from the couch on which he sat, stood on the top of Mount Sineru, and sent forth a ray of light from the hair between his eyebrows. At that moment it was as though a thousand moons had risen.
Then he addressed those women, saying, “When you approach and come into my presence, you must not approach in heedlessness.
For in consequence of your heedlessness a deity of the host of Māra got possession of you, and at a time when you should not have laughed or behaved lightly, he caused you to laugh and to misbehave. You should henceforth make every effort to quench the fire of lust and of the other evil passions.” So saying, he pronounced the following Stanza,
Why laughter? why exultation? For the world is ever aflame.
Will ye not seek a light, ye that are shrouded in darkness?
The Teacher, knowing that the women were established in faith that cannot be shaken, descended from the summit of Mount Sineru and seated himself in the Seat of the Buddha.
Women of such quality as these women, seating themselves before a Buddha like you, were unable to control their movements, but springing to their feet, clapped their hands and began to laugh and sing and dance.”
Thereupon Visākhā said to him, “Verily strong drink is an evil thing.
The Teacher replied, “Yes, Visākhā, strong drink is indeed an evil thing,
for because of it numberless living beings have come to distress and unhappiness.” But, Reverend Sir, at what time did this episode have its beginning?” In response to this question the Teacher, desiring to relate in detail the circumstances that led to this episode, told a Story of the Past, relating the Kumbha Jātaka. Jātaka 512: v. 12-20.
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Jetavana with reference to five hundred monks who obtained Insight.
It appears that five hundred monks obtained a Subject of Meditation from the Teacher, retired to the forest, and devoted themselves to meditation. But although they strove and struggled with might and main, they were unable to develop Specific Attainment. Thereupon they thought to themselves, “We will obtain a Subject of Meditation better suited to our needs.” With this thought in mind, they set out to return to the Teacher. On the way they saw a mirage. Concentrating their attention on the mirage, they developed Specific Attainment.
The moment they entered the precincts of the monastery, it began to rain.
Standing here and there on the terraces, they watched the bubbles formed by the force of the downpour, rising and bursting. Thereupon the following thought occurred to them, “Even as a bubble, so also does this personality of ours rise and burst.” Immediately they concentrated their attention on this thought.
The Teacher, sitting in the Perfumed Chamber, sent forth a luminous image of himself, and as it were looking into the faces of those monks, spoke with them, pronouncing the following Stanza,
As a bubble, as a mirage, so should one view the world;
If a man so look upon the world, the King of Death sees him not.
At the conclusion of the lesson those monks, even in the place wherein they stood, attained Arahatship.
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Jetavana with reference to thirty monks.
For one day thirty monks residing in foreign parts came to visit the Teacher.
Elder Ānanda saw those monks just as he was approaching the Teacher to wait upon him. So he thought to himself, “I will wait until the Teacher has exchanged friendly greetings with these monks, and then I will wait upon the Teacher.”
Accordingly he waited at the gate. When the Teacher had exchanged friendly greetings with them, he preached the Law to them in a pleasing manner.
After listening to the Law all those monks attained Arahatship. Thereupon they soared aloft and departed through the air.
When they tarried, Elder Ānanda approached the Teacher and said, “Reverend Sir, thirty monks came here. Where are they?”
“Gone, Ānanda.”
“By what path did they go, Reverend Sir?”
“Through the air, Ānanda.”
“But, Reverend Sir, have they already rid themselves of the Depravities?”
“Yes, Ānanda. After hearing me preach the Law, they attained Arahatship.”
Now at that moment some swans came flying through the air.
Said the Teacher, “Ānanda, he who has fully developed the Four Grades of Magical Power, flies through the air like a swan.” So saying, he pronounced the following Stanza,
Swans follow the track of the sun; they that possess magical power go through the air;
The resolute are conducted out of this world, having conquered Māra and his train.
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence among the Sākiyas with reference to the cessation of a quarrel among kinsmen.
The story goes that the Sākiyas and the Koliyas caused the waters of the river Rohiṇī to be confined by a single dam between the city of Kapilavatthu and the city of Koliya, and cultivated the fields on both sides of the river.
Now in the month Jeṭṭhamūla the crops began to droop, whereupon the laborers employed by the residents of both cities assembled.
Said the residents of the city of Koliya, “If this water is diverted to both sides of the river, there will not be enough both for you and for us too. But our crops will ripen with a single watering. Therefore let us have the water.”
The Sākiyas replied, “After you have filled your storehouses, we shall not have the heart to take ruddy gold and emeralds and black pennies, and, baskets and sacks in our hands, go from house to house seeking favors at your hands. Our crops also will ripen with a single watering. Therefore let us have this water.”
“We will not give it to you.”
“Neither will we give it to you.” Talk waxed bitter, until finally one arose and struck another a blow. The other returned the blow and a general fight ensued, the combatants making matters worse by aspersions on the origin of the two royal families.
Said the laborers employed by the Koliyas, “You who live in the city of Kapilavatthu, take your children and go where you belong. Are we likely to suffer harm from the elephants and horses and shields and weapons of those who, like dogs and jackals, have cohabited with heir own sisters?”
The laborers employed by the Sākiyas replied, “You lepers, take your children and go where you belong. Are we likely to suffer harm from the elephants and horses and shields and weapons of destitute outcasts who have lived in jujube-trees like animals?”
Both parties of laborers went and reported the quarrel to the ministers who had charge of the work, and the ministers reported the matter to the royal households.
Thereupon the Sākiyas came forth armed for battle and cried out, “We will show what strength and power belong to those who have cohabited with their sisters.”
Likewise the Koliyas came forth armed for battle and cried out, “We will show what strength and power belong to those who dwell in jujube-trees.”
As the Teacher surveyed the world at dawn and beheld his kinsmen, he thought to himself, “If I refrain from going to them, these men will destroy each other. It is clearly my duty to go to them.” Accordingly he flew through the air quite alone to the spot where his kinsmen were gathered together, and seated himself cross-legged in the air over the middle of the river Rohiṇī.
When the Teacher’s kinsmen saw the Teacher, they threw away their weapons and did reverence to him.
Said the Teacher to his kinsmen, “What is all this quarrel about, great king?”
“We do not know, Reverend Sir.”
“Who then would be likely to know?”
“The commander-in-chief of the army would be likely to know.” The commander-in-chief of the army said, “The viceroy would be likely to know.” Thus the Teacher put the question first to one and then to another, asking the slave-laborers last of all. The slave-laborers replied, “The quarrel is about water, Reverend Sir.”
Then the Teacher asked the king, “How much is water worth, great king?”
“Very little, Reverend Sir.”
“How much are Khattiyas worth, great king?”
“Khattiyas are beyond price, Reverend Sir.”
“It is not fitting that because of a little water you should destroy Khattiyas who are beyond price.”
They were silent.
Then the Teacher addressed them and said, “Great kings, why do you act in this manner? Were I not here present to-day, you would set flowing a river of blood. You have acted in a most unbecoming manner. You live in enmity, indulging in the five kinds of hatred. I live free from hatred.
You live afflicted with the sickness of the evil passions. I live free from disease.
You live in eager pursuit of the five kinds of sensual pleasure. I live free from the eager pursuit of aught.” So saying, he pronounced the following Stanzas,
Oh, happily let us live! free from hatred, among those who hate;
Among men who hate, let us live free from hatred.
Oh, happily let us live! free from disease, among those who are afflicted with disease;
Among men who are afflicted with disease, let us live free from disease.
Oh, happily let us live! free from longing, among those who are possessed with longing;
Among those who are possessed with longing, let us live free from longing.
‘Birth is destroyed, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more coming to any state of being.’
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Veḷuvana, and it was with reference to the announcement made by the Chief Disciples of Sañjaya’s refusal to go to the Teacher. From first to last the story is as follows:
Four Incalculables and a hundred thousand cycles of time in the past our Teacher was born as a Brahman prince in the city of Amaravatī, and his name was Sumedha. After acquiring proficiency in all the arts, he renounced wealth amounting to countless millions which he inherited on the death of his mother and father, retired from the world, adopted the life of an anchorite, took up his residence in the Himālaya country, and there won for himself by Ecstatic Meditation the Supernatural Powers. Now it came to pass on a certain day that 28.194 Dīpaṅkara, Master of the Ten Forces, set out from Sudassana monastery to go to the city Ramma, and the populace came forth to clear the way. As Sumedha came flying through the air on that day, he observed that a road was being cleared.
Therefore selecting for himself a portion of the road which had not yet been cleared, when the Teacher approached, he made of himself a bridge for him, spread his mantle of antelope skin in the mud, laid himself thereon, and said, “Let not the Teacher with his company of disciples tread upon the mud. Let him rather tread upon me; so let him proceed upon his journey.”
When the Teacher beheld Sumedha, he said, “Yonder prince is a nascent Buddha; four Incalculables and a hundred thousand cycles of time hence he will become a Buddha named Gotama.”
Thus did the Teacher Dīpaṅkara prophesy regarding the Brahman prince Sumedha. After Dīpaṅkara came the following Buddhas: Koṇḍañña, Maṅgala, Sumana, Revata, Sobhita, Anomadassī, Paduma, Nārada, Padumuttara, Sumedha, Sujāta, Piyadassī, Atthadassī, Dhammadassī, Siddhattha, Tissa, Phussa, Vipassī, Sikhī, Vessabhū, Kakusandha, Koṇāgamana, and Kassapa. One after another these twenty-four Buddhas arose in the world and enlightened the world, and from each of them the Brahman prince Sumedha received the prophecy that he should one day become a Buddha. Now after Sumedha had fulfilled the Ten Perfections and the Ten Minor Perfections and the Ten Major Perfections, making in all Thirty Perfections, he was reborn as Vessantara; and in his existence as Vessantara he bestowed mighty alms which caused the earth to quake, and in that existence also he renounced both son and wife. When the term of life allotted to him was come to an end, he was reborn in the Heaven of the Tusita gods; and when he had remained in this state of existence during the term of life allotted to him, the deities of the Ten Thousand Worlds assembled together and thus addressed him,
The time is come, mighty hero; descend into the womb of your mother;
Rescue the worlds of men and gods; discover the Region of the Deathless.
Thereupon he made the Five Great Observations, and passing from that state of existence, received a new existence in the royal household of the Sākiyas.
In this royal household he was brought up amid great splendor and in the course of time attained auspicious youth. He spent his youth in three mansions appropriate to the three seasons of the year, enjoying splendor and majesty of sovereignty comparable 28.195 to the splendor of the World of the Gods. In the course of time it came to pass that, as he proceeded on three successive days to the garden to amuse himself, he beheld the Three Heavenly Messengers; namely, a man worn out by old age, a man afflicted with disease, and a dead man. On each of the three days he returned to his palace, overcome with emotion. On the fourth day he beheld a man who had retired from the world and adopted the life of a monk. “It were well for me to retire from the world and adopt the life of a monk,” said he, conceiving a desire for the religious life; and with this thought in mind, he proceeded to the garden and spent the entire day sitting on the bank of the royal pool. While he sat there, the god Vissakamma approached him, disguised as a barber, and dressed him in rich apparel and adorned him with all manner of adornments. There also he received the message that a son had been born to him, Prince Rāhula; and realizing the strength of affection for a son, he reflected, “I must straightway break this bond, lest it become too strong for me.” In the evening, as he entered the city, Kisā Gotamī, daughter of his father’s sister, pronounced the following Stanza,
Happy indeed is that mother, happy indeed is that father,
Happy indeed is that wife whose husband is such a one as he
The monks were offended and said, “The Teacher shows favoritism in bestowing this distinction. In bestowing the place of Chief Disciples, he ought to give the preference to those who were the first to retire from the world; namely, the Band of Five. If he disregard their claims, he ought to give the preference to the Elder Yasa and his Fifty-four Companions. If he disregard their claims, he ought to give the preference to the Thirty Youths. If he disregard their claims, he ought to give the preference to the Three Brothers, Uruvelā-Kassapa, Nadī-Kassapa, and Gayā-Kassapa. In rejecting the prior claims of all these monks and giving the place of Chief Disciples to those who retired from the world last of all, the Teacher shows favoritism.”
The Teacher asked them, “Monks, what is the subject you are discussing?” When they told him, he said, “Monks, I show no favoritism in bestowing this distinction. On the contrary I bestow on these monks and on all others that for which each has made his Earnest Wish.
For Añña-Koṇḍañña gave the first fruits of a certain crop nine times, but in so doing did not make an Earnest Wish for the place of Chief Disciple. On the contrary, in bestowing his gift, he made the Earnest Wish that he might be the first to win the foremost estate of all; namely, Arahatship.”
“When was that, Reverend Sir?”
“Listen, monks.”
“Yes, Reverend Sir.” Thereupon the Exalted One related the following
Monks, ninety-one cycles of time in the past the Exalted Vipassī appeared in the world.
At that time two brothers, Mahā Kāḷa and Culla Kāḷa, both of them householders, caused a great field to be planted with rice.
One day Culla Kāḷa went to the rice-field, hulled a kernel of rice, and ate it, and found it unusually sweet.
Shortly afterwards he desired to make a gift of unripe rice to the Congregation of Monks presided over by the Buddha. So he went to his older brother and said to him, “Brother, let us have unripe rice hulled and cooked in a manner suitable for the Buddhas, and let us bestow the same in alms.”
“What say you, brother? No one has ever yet had unripe rice hulled and given in alms, nor is anyone likely to do such a thing in the future; don’t spoil the crop.”
The younger brother repeated his suggestion several times. Finally the older brother said, “Very well, divide the field into two parts. Do not touch my portion, but do whatever you like in your own portion of the field.”
“Very well,” said Culla Kāḷa. So he divided the field into two parts, hired a large number of men for manual labor, caused grains of unripe rice to be hulled, had it cooked in rich milk, adding ghee, honey, and sugar, and presented the rice thus prepared to the Congregation of Monks presided over by the Buddha, saying at the conclusion of the meal, “Reverend Sir, by virtue of this my gift of first-fruits may I be the first to win the foremost estate of all; namely, Arahatship.”
“So be it,” said the Teacher, returning thanks.
When he went back to the field and looked at it again, he saw that the entire field was filled with heads of growing rice, bound together, as it were, in sheaves. At this sight he experienced the five kinds of joy. Thought he, “I am indeed fortunate.” When the rice was in the ear, he gave first-fruits of rice in the ear. In association with the residents of the village he bestowed the first-fruits of the crop. When the rice was reaped, he gave the first-fruits of the reaping; when it was in the sheaf, the first-fruits of the sheaves; when it was in the shock, the first-fruits of the shocks; when it was in the rick, the first-fruits of the ricks; when it was threshed, the first-fruits of the threshing-floor; when it was ground, the first-fruits of the flour; when it was measured, the first-fruits of the measuring; when it was put away in the storehouse, the first-fruits of the store.
Thus he bestowed the first-fruits of a single crop nine times.
Whatever he took away was made up, and he had a bumper harvest.
Goodness keeps him who keeps it.
Therefore said the Exalted One,
Righteousness truly keeps him who keeps righteousness;
righteous living brings happiness.
Herein is the advantage of living righteously,
that he who walks righteously will never go to a state of suffering.
Thus, in the dispensation of the Supremely Enlightened Vipassī, did Añña-Koṇḍañña bestow the gift of first fruits nine times, making the Earnest Wish to be the first to attain the foremost of all estates.
Likewise in the dispensation of the Buddha Padumuttara, a hundred thousand cycles of time in the past, in the city Haṁsavatī, he gave mighty gifts, and falling at the feet of that Exalted Buddha, made the Earnest Wish to be the first to attain the foremost of all estates; namely, Arahatship. Thus I bestowed on him only that for which he made his Earnest Wish.
I show no favoritism in bestowing distinction.
Reverend Sir, what work of merit did the fifty-five noble youths led by Yasa perform?
– They too made an Earnest Wish for Arahatship at the feet of a certain Buddha and did many works of merit. Subsequently, but before the present Buddha had appeared in the world, they became friends, banded themselves together for the performance of works of merit, and devoted themselves to the care of the corpses of paupers.
One day, seeing the dead body of a pregnant woman, they carried the body to the cemetery for the purpose of burning it.
To Yasa and four of his companions was assigned the duty of burning the corpse; the rest returned and entered the village.
As the youth Yasa burned the body, piercing it with stakes and turning it over and over, he grasped the thought of the Impurity of the Body. This thought he communicated to his four companions also, saying, “Behold, brethren, this body. Here and there the skin has burst open; it resembles nothing so much as the skin of a mottled cow. It is impure, stinking, repulsive.”
Straightway his four companions also grasped the thought of the Impurity of the Body.
In their turn these five companions went to the village and informed the rest of their friends.
As for Yasa, he went home and informed his mother and father and wife,
and they all developed the thought of Impurity.
This is the work of merit these youths performed in a previous state of existence.
And because of this very work of merit, consciousness of the Impurity of the Body arose within Yasa’s mind in the women’s apartments. And thus, because they had acquired the faculties requisite thereto, all of them developed Specific Attainment.
herefore these youths also obtained precisely that for which they made their Earnest Wish.
I show no favoritism in bestowing distinction.
But, Reverend Sir, what work of merit did the thirty noble youths perform?
– They also made an Earnest Wish for Arahatship at the feet of previous Buddhas and performed works of merit. Subsequently, but before the present Buddha appeared in the world, they were reborn as thirty evildoers; but hearing the admonition addressed to Tuṇḍila, they kept the Five Precepts for sixty thousand years.
Thus these men also obtained only that for which they made their Earnest Wish.
I show no favoritism in bestowing distinction.
But, Reverend Sir, what work of merit was performed by the three brothers Kassapa: Uruvelā-Kassapa, Nadī-Kassapa, and Gayā-Kassapa?
They also performed works of merit, making an Earnest Wish to attain Arahatship.
Ninety-two cycles of time in the past, two Buddhas appeared in the world at the same time, Tissa and Phussa;
Phussa’s father was King Mahinda.
When Phussa attained Enlightenment, the king’s youngest son became his Chief Disciple, and the son of the house-priest became his Second Disciple
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the venerable Bakkula was living at Rajagaha in the Bamboo Grove, the Squirrels’ Sanctuary.1167
Then Acela Kassapa, a former companion of the venerable Bakkula in his lay life, went to the venerable Bakkula and exchanged greetings with him.
“It is eighty years since I went forth, friend.”
“Friend Bakkula, in these eighty years how many times have you engaged in sexual intercourse?”
“Friend Kassapa, you should not ask me such a question as that.
You should ask me such a question as this: ‘Friend Bakkula, in these eighty years how many times have perceptions of sensual desire arisen in you?” “Friend Bakkula, in these eighty years how many times have perceptions of sensual desire arisen in you?”
“Friend Kassapa, in the eighty years since I went forth I do not recall any perception of sensual desire to have ever arisen in me.”
That in the eighty years since he went forth the venerable Bakkula did not recall any perception of sensual desire to have ever arisen in him - this we remember as a wonderful and marvellous quality of the venerable Bakkula.1168
That in the eighty years since he went forth the vener-able Bakkula did not recall any perception of ill will… any perception of cruelty to have ever arisen in him -this we remember as a wonderful and marvellous quality of the venerable Bakkula.
…this too we remember as a wonderful and marvellous quality of the venerable Bakkula.
…this too we remember as a wonderful and marvel-lous quality of the venerable Bakkula.
ever having sewn a robe with a needle… ever having coloured a robe with dye…ever having sewn a robe at the kathina time ever having worked on making robes for my companions in the holy life.” …this too we remember as a wonderful and marvellous quality of the venerable Bakkula. 16-19. “Friend, in the eighty years since I went forth I do not recall ever having accepted an invitation to a meal…ever having given rise to the thought: ‘Oh, may someone invite me to a meal! ‘…ever having sat down inside a house…ever having eaten inside a house.” …this too we remember as a wonderful and marvellous quality of the venerable Bakkula. 20-25. “Friend, in the eighty years since I went forth I do not recall ever having grasped at the signs and features of a woman…ever having taught the Dhamma to a woman, even as much as a fourline stanza…ever having gone to the bhikkhunis’ quarters…ever having taught the Dhamma to a bhikkhuni… ever having taught the Dhamma to a female probationer…ever having taught the Dhamma to a female novice.” …this too we remember as a wonderful and marvellous quality of the venerable Bakkula. 26-29. “Friend, in the eighty years since I went forth I do not recall ever having given the going forth…ever having given the full admission…ever having given dependence…ever having had a novice wait on me.” …this too we remember as a wonderful and marvellous quality of the venerable Bakkula. 30-37. “Friend, in the eighty years since I went forth I do not recall ever having bathed in a bath house…ever having bathed with bath powder…ever having undertaking the work of massaging the limbs of my companions in the holy life …ever having had an affliction arise in me even for as long as it takes to milk a cow…ever having taken medicine, even as much as a piece of gallnut…ever having used a bolster…ever having made up a bed…
That for seven days the venerable Bakkula ate the country’s almsfood as a debtor, and on the eighth day final knowledge arose - this too we remember as a wonderful and marvellous quality of the venerable Bakkula.
And Acela Kassapa received the going forth in this Dhamma and Discipline, he received the full admission.1171
He knew directly: “Birth is destroyed, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more coming to any state of being.”
And the venerable Kassapa became one of the arahants.
Then, on a later occasion, the venerable Bakkula took a key and went from cell to cell, saying: “Come forth, venerable sirs; come forth, venerable sirs.
Today I shall attain final Nibbana.”
That the venerable Bakkula took a key and went from cell to cell saying: “Come forth, venerable sirs; come forth, venerable sirs. Today I shall attain final Nibbana” - this too we remember as a wonderful and marvellous quality of the venerable Bakkula.
The king went to the Teacher and said, “My oldest son is the Buddha, my youngest son is Chief Disciple, and the son of my house-priest is Second Disciple.” And looking upon the three, he said, “My very own is the Buddha, my very own is the Law, my very own is the Order.” And thrice he breathed forth the Solemn Utterance, “Praise be unto Him that is Highly Exalted, All-Worthy, Supremely Enlightened.” Then he prostrated himself before the feet of the Teacher and said, “Reverend Sir, now, at the end of a life lasting ninety thousand years, it is time, as it were, for me to sit down and close my eyes in slumber. So long as I live, go not to the door of others’ houses, but receive the Four Requisites from me alone.” Having thus obtained the Teacher’s consent,
the king thereafter ministered to him regularly.
Now the king had three other sons besides, the eldest of whom had a retinue of five hundred soldiers, the middlemost three, and the youngest two.
Now the king had three other sons besides, the eldest of whom had a retinue of five hundred soldiers, the middlemost three, and the youngest two. Succeeding in restoring order on the frontier, they returned to their father.
Their father embraced them, kissed their heads, and said to them, “Dear sons, I grant you whatever you desire.”
“Very well, your majesty,” said they, accepting his offer. When, after a few days, their father again said, “Dear sons, I grant you whatever you desire,” they replied, “Your majesty, we desire naught else but only this, that henceforth we may entertain our brother; grant us this boon.”
I will not grant you this boon, dear sons.”
“If you are unwilling to grant us this privilege permanently, then grant it to us for seven years.”
“That will I not, dear sons.”
“Well then, grant us the privilege for six years, or five, or four, or three, or two years, or for one year;
“That will I not, dear sons.”
or for seven months,
or six, or five, or four, or three,
or two months, or for one month.” Well then, your majesty, make it one month for each of us; grant us this privilege for three months in all.”
“Very well, dear sons; then entertain your brother for three months.”
Now all three brothers had a single treasurer and a single steward, the latter of whom had a retinue of twelve nahutas of serving-men.
The three brothers summoned the treasurer and the steward and said to them, “During the coming three months we shall take upon ourselves the Ten Precepts, put on yellow robes, and reside with the Teacher. In our absence it will be your duty to administer the alms; every day you are to provide all the food, both hard and soft, for ninety thousand monks and a thousand soldiers.
From henceforth we shall have nothing at all to say.”
The treasurer and the steward joined forces and performed the duty of almsgiving by turns, taking provisions from the storehouses of the three brothers and bestowing them in alms. But when the children of the serving-men cried for rice-porridge and other kinds of food,
the treasurer and the steward would give them what they cried for, even before the Congregation of Monks arrived.
The result was that the Congregation of Monks received only what was left over at the end of a meal, and not a fresh supply of food at all.
Finally the treasurer and the steward became so greedy that they would take food, and pretending that they were going to give it to the children, eat it themselves.
The mere sight of the pleasing food they were unable to resist.
They and their associates numbered eighty-four thousand men.
Because they ate food which it was their duty to give to the Congregation of Monks, when they died and their bodies were dissolved, they were reborn in the World of Ghosts.
When the three brothers and their thousand men died, they were reborn in the World of the Gods and spent ninety-two cycles of time in passing from one celestial world to another.
Thus did those three brothers perform works of merit at that time, making the Earnest Wish to attain Arahatship.
What they received was only that for which they made their Earnest Wish.
I show no favoritism in giving what I give.
(Now at that time their steward was Bimbisāra, their treasurer was the lay disciple Visākha, a
nd the three royal princes were the three ascetics of the matted locks.)
Their serving-men, reborn at that time among the ghosts, after passing from one state of existence to another, both good and evil, were reborn in this present world-cycle in the World of the Ghosts for the space of four Buddha-intervals.
In this present world-cycle they approached first of all the Exalted Kakusandha, whose term of life was forty thousand years, and asked him, “Tell us when we shall obtain something to eat.”
He replied, “You will receive nothing to eat in my time; but after me the great earth will be elevated a league, and the Buddha Koṇāgamana will appear; you had best ask him.”
They waited all that time, and when the Buddha Koṇāgamana appeared, asked him.
He replied, “You will receive nothing to eat in my time; but after me the great earth will be elevated a league, and the Buddha Kassapa will appear; you had best ask him.”
They waited all that time, and when the Buddha Kassapa appeared, asked him.
He replied, “You will receive nothing to eat in my time; but after me the great earth will be elevated a league, and the Buddha Gotama will appear. At that time your kinsman Bimbisāra will be king; he will give alms to the Teacher and will make over to you the merit acquired by that act; at that time you will receive something to eat.”
The length of the period intervening between two Buddhas was to them as the morrow.
When the Tathāgata appeared in the world and King Bimbisāra gave alms on the first day and they failed to receive the fruit thereof, they waited until it was night, and then made a fearful noise and showed themselves to the king.
When the king went to Veḷuvana on the following day, he related the incident to the Tathāgata.
Said the Teacher, “Great king, ninety-two cycles of time in the past, in the dispensation of the Buddha Phussa, these ghosts were kinsmen of yours. They ate food which it was their duty to give to the Congregation of Monks, and because of this were reborn in the World of Ghosts. Passing through the round of existences, they asked the Buddhas Kakusandha, Koṇāgamana, and Kassapa when they should obtain food, and the Buddhas told them this and that. All this time they desired greatly to receive your alms; and the reason why they acted as they did last night was that, when you gave alms, they failed to receive the fruit thereof.”
“But, Reverend Sir, in case I were to give alms now, would they receive the fruit thereof?”
“Yes, great king.”
On the following day the king invited the Congregation of Monks presided over by the Buddha, bestowed abundant offerings, and said, “Reverend Sir, henceforth may celestial food and drink be the portion of these ghosts.” And when he had thus transferred to the ghosts the merit of his offering, they received celestial food and drink.
On the following day the ghosts made their appearance naked.
Said the king to the Buddha, “To-day, Reverend Sir, these ghosts made their appearance naked,” and asked him what he should do.
Said the Teacher, “Great king, you did not give them clothes.”
So on the following day the king presented robes to the Congregation of Monks presided over by the Buddha, saying, “Henceforth may they possess celestial raiment.”
And when he had thus made over to them the merit of his offering, instantly they became possessed of celestial raiment,
whereupon they put off their ghostly forms and took on the forms of celestial beings.
When the Teacher returned thanks, he said, “Without the walls they stand,” reciting the extra-mural formula.
At the conclusion of his words of thanksgiving eighty-four thousand living beings obtained Comprehension of the Law.
Thus did the Teacher expound the Law, relating the story of the three brothers of the matted locks.
But, Reverend Sir, what work of merit did the Chief Disciples perform?
– They made their Earnest Wish to attain the station of Chief Disciples.
For an Incalculable of cycles of time and a hundred thousand cycles of time additional in the past, Sāriputta was reborn in the family of a Brahman of great wealth, and his name was Prince Sarada.
Moggallāna was reborn in the family of a householder of great wealth, and his name was Householder Sirivaḍḍha.
The two youths were friends from the time when they played in the dirt together.
Prince Sarada came into a large family-inheritance on the death of his father. One day, when he was alone by himself, he thought, “I have certain knowledge of the life of this world only; I know nothing of the life of the world beyond.
All they that are born are certain to die. I ought to retire from the world, enter some Order, and seek the Way of Release.”
Therefore he approached his friend and said, “Friend Sirivaḍḍha, it is my intention to retire from the world and seek the Way of Release. Can you, or can you not, retire from the world with me?”
“Friend, I cannot retire from the world; you alone retire from the world.”
Prince Sarada thought to himself, “No one ever yet went to the world beyond with companions or kinsmen or friends. What one does, he must do by himself.”
Accordingly he threw open the doors of his treasure-house and bestowed abundant alms on paupers and travelers and beggars.
Having so done, he retired to the foot of a certain mountain and adopted the life of an anchorite. First one, then two, then three, then many others followed his example in adopting the monastic life
Finally there were seventy-four thousand ascetics with matted locks. Sarada acquired the Five Supernatural Faculties and the Eight Higher Attainments, and taught those ascetics of the matted locks the processes necessary to the practice of Ecstatic Meditation.
All of them acquired the Five Supernatural Faculties and the Eight Higher Attainments.
At this time the Buddha Anomadassī appeared in the world.
His city was Candavatī. His father was Yasavanta, of the Warrior caste, and his mother was Lady Yasodharā. His Bo-tree was the ajjuna-tree. Nisabha and Anoma were his Chief Disciples, Varuṇa was his supporter, and Sundarā and Sumanā were his principal female lay disciples.
His term of life was a hundred thousand years, his stature was fifty-eight cubits, and the radiance from his body flashed twelve leagues. He had a retinue of a hundred thousand monks.
One day at dawn, arising from a Trance of Great Compassion, he surveyed the world and beheld the ascetic Sarada. Thereupon he became aware of the following, “To-day, through my approaching the ascetic Sarada, there will be mighty preaching of the Law. Sarada will make his Wish for the place of Chief Disciple, and his friend, Householder Sirivaḍḍha, will make his Wish for the place of Second Disciple. At the conclusion of the discourse the seventy-four thousand ascetics with matted locks who compose his retinue will attain Arahatship. Therefore it behooves me to go there.” Accordingly, taking his own bowl and robe, saying not a word to anyone else, proceeding in solitude like a lion, he commanded, “Let Sarada know that I am the Buddha.” And while the ascetic Sarada’s pupils were absent seeking various kinds of fruits, he descended from the sky and alighted on the earth before Sarada’s very eyes.
When the ascetic Sarada beheld the supernatural power of the Buddha and the perfection of form of the Buddha, he pondered in his mind the memorial verses relating to the characteristics of a great man. And he said to himself, “One endowed with these marks, if he lives the house-life, is a King, a Universal Monarch. Living the life of retirement, he is one who has rolled back the veil of passion, an Omniscient Buddha.
This man is without doubt a Buddha.” Therefore he advanced to meet him, paid obeisance to him with the Five Rests, prepared a seat and offered it to him.
The Exalted One seated himself in the seat prepared for him,
and the ascetic Sarada, selecting a seat appropriate to himself, sat down respectfully on one side.
At that moment the seventy-four thousand ascetics of the matted locks, who had been absent gathering various kinds of sweet and juicy fruits, returned to their teacher. Seeing the Buddha seated and their own teacher seated near him, they said,“Teacher, we used to go about this world thinking to ourselves, ‘There is no one greater than you.’ But as for this man, we are certain that he is greater than you.”
“Friends, what say you? Do you mean to compare a grain of mustard seed to Mount Sineru, sixty-eight thousand leagues high? Little sons, do not compare me to an Omniscient Buddha.”
Then those ascetics thought to themselves, “Were this an insignificant man, our teacher would not use such a comparison as this. How great indeed must this man be!” And forthwith they fell before his feet and prostrated themselves before him.
Then their teacher said to them, “Friends, we have here no offering suitable to present to the Buddhas, and the Teacher has come here at a time when we usually go the rounds for alms; let us give him gifts according to our ability. Fetch hither all manner of fruits that are choicest.” And having thus caused them to fetch fruits, he washed his hands and himself placed the fruits in the bowl of the Tathāgata.
The moment the Teacher touched the fruits which were brought, the deities imparted a celestial flavor to them.
The ascetic Sarada also himself filtered water and presented it to the Teacher.
After the meal was over, while the Teacher still remained seated, Sarada summoned all of his pupils, and sitting down, discoursed pleasantly with the Teacher.
Thought the Teacher to himself, “Let the two Chief Disciples approach, together with the Congregation of Monks.”
Straightway those two ascetics with their retinue of a hundred thousand Arahats approached, paid obeisance to the Teacher, and sat down respectfully on one side.
Then the ascetic Sarada addressed his pupils as follows, “Friends, the seat wherein sit the Buddhas is low, and there is no seat for the hundred thousand monks. To-day you should render high honor to the Buddha. Fetch from the foot of the mountain flowers possessing bright colors and sweet perfumes.”
There is a saying, “Time occupied in talk is wasted; inconceivable is the range of magical power possessed by one endowed with supernatural power;” and so it was in this case. In but an instant those ascetics brought back flowers possessing bright colors and sweet perfumes and arranged a cushion of flowers a league long for the Buddhas.
Then they arranged a cushion of flowers three gavutas long for the two Chief Disciples. The cushions for the rest of the monks were half a league long or less; those for the novices were an usabha long.
This was made possible by the power of magic.
It is not permissible to ask the question, “How could seats of such great size be arranged in this hermitage?”
When the seats had thus been made ready, the ascetic Sarada took his stand before the Tathāgata, and raising his clasped hands in an attitude of reverent salutation, said, “Reverend Sir, ascend this bed of flowers to my everlasting welfare and salvation.”
Therefore it is said,
He gathered together various flowers and perfumes,
Prepared a bed of flowers, and spoke these words,
“Here, mighty hero, have I prepared a seat suitable for you.
Sit down on this bed of flowers, and render my heart tranquil.
“For seven nights and days the Buddha sat upon my bed of flowers.
Rendering my heart tranquil, gladdening the world of men and the Worlds of the Gods.”
While the Teacher sat thus, the two Chief Disciples with the rest of the monks sat each in the seat which had been prepared for him.
The ascetic Sarada, taking a great flower-parasol, held it over the head of the Tathāgata.
Said the Teacher, “May this honor rendered to me by the ascetics of the matted locks yield rich fruit.”
And straightway he entered into a state of trance, attaining the Attainment of Cessation. Observing that the Teacher had attained the Attainment of Cessation, the two Chief Disciples likewise entered into a state of trance and attained the Attainment of Cessation.
For seven days the Teacher sat there, enjoying the bliss of the Attainment of Cessation. When it was time to seek food, Sarada’s pupils went into the forest and ate wild fruits and other varieties of fruits. The rest of the time they stood holding out their hands in an attitude of reverent salutation before the Buddhas.
he ascetic Sarada, however, went not to seek food, but for seven days continuously held the flower-parasol over the Buddha, experiencing thereby intense joy and pleasure.
When the Teacher arose from trance, he said to his Chief Disciple the Elder Nisabha, who sat on his right hand, “Nisabha, return thanks to the ascetics who have honored us with flowers and seats.”
Thereupon the Elder, like a mighty warrior who has just received high distinction at the hands of a Universal Monarch, his heart filled with joy, manifesting the Perfection of Knowledge capable of attainment by a disciple, began the address of thanksgiving for the flowers and seats.
At the end of the discourse the Buddha addressed the Second Disciple as follows, “Do you also preach the Law to the monks.”
Thereupon the Elder Anoma, pondering the Tipiṭaka, the Word of the Buddhas, preached the Law.
But although the two Chief Disciples preached the Law, not a single monk present attained Comprehension of the Law.
with the result that at the conclusion of his discourse all seventy-four thousand ascetics of the matted locks attained Arahatship, with the sole exception of the ascetic Sarada. Then the Teacher stretched forth his hand and said to them, “Come, monks!”
Instantly their hair and beard disappeared, and the Eight Requisites were attached to their persons.
Do you ask, “Why did not the ascetic Sarada attain Arahatship?”
It was because his mind was distracted.
We are told that when he seated himself in the seat of the Second Disciple of the Buddhas, аnd the Chief Disciple, manifesting the Perfection of Knowledge of a disciple, preached the Law, at the very moment when he began to listen to the preaching of the Law by the Chief Disciple, the following thought arose in his mind, “Oh that at some time in the future, in the dispensation of a Buddha who shall arise hereafter, I might receive the burden which this disciple has received!
Because of this thought, we are told, he was unable to attain the Path and the Fruit.
Sarada, however, paid obeisance to the Tathāgata, and standing face to face with him, said, “Reverend Sir, what is the title in your Religion borne by the monk who sits in the seat next to you?”
“He it is that follows me in setting in motion the Wheel of the Law which I have set in motion; he it is that has reached the pinnacle of the Perfection of Knowledge capable of attainment by a disciple; he it is that has grasped the Sixteen Forms of Knowledge; he it is that is therefore called in my Religion Chief Disciple,”
“Reverend Sir, here for seven days have I stood holding the flower-parasol over you, thereby rendering honor to you. As the fruit of this work of merit, I do not wish for a second existence as Sakka or Brahmā. But at some time in the future may I become the Chief Disciple of a certain Buddha, even as is this present Elder Nisabha.”
When Sarada had made this Earnest Wish, the Teacher considered within himself, “Will the Wish of this man be fulfilled?” Therefore he sent forth his perception into the future, and surveying the ages of the future, he passed before his mind a period of incalculable length and a hundred thousand cycles of time in addition; whereupon he saw that his Wish would be fulfilled.
So when the Teacher saw that his Wish would be fulfilled, he said to the ascetic Sarada, “This Earnest Wish of yours will not be in vain. For at the end of a period of incalculable length and a hundred thousand cycles of time in addition, Gotama Buddha will appear in the world. His mother will be Lady Mahā Māyā, his father will be King Suddhodana, his son will be Rāhula, his servitor will be Ānanda, and his Second Disciple will be Moggallāna. And you will be his Chief Disciple, the Captain of the Faith, and your name will be Sāriputta.”
When the Teacher had thus predicted the future of the ascetic, he preached the Law, and then, surrounded by his company of monks, flew up into the air and departed.
The ascetic Sarada sought out the pupils and elders and sent the following message to his friend, Householder Sirivaḍḍha, “Reverend Sirs, say to my friend, ‘Your friend the ascetic Sarada fell down before the feet of the Buddha Anomadassī and made his Earnest Wish for the place of Chief Disciple under the dispensation of the Buddha Gotama, who shall hereafter arise in the world. Do you make your Earnest Wish for the place of Second Disciple.’ ”
And when he had thus spoken, he preceded the Elders by a different route and went and stood at the door of Sirivaḍḍha’s residence.
When Sirivaḍḍha saw him he said, “At last, after a long absence, my noble friend has returned.” And straightway he seated his friend in a seat, and having seated himself in a lower seat, asked him, “But, Reverend Sir, have you no pupils and attendants?”
“Yes, my friend, the Buddha Anomadassī came to our hermitage, and we did him honor to the extent of our power. The Teacher preached the Law to all, and at the conclusion of his discourse all the members of our community excepting me attained Arahatship and entered the Order.
When I saw the Chief Disciple of the Teacher, the Elder Nisabha, I made my Earnest Wish for the place of Chief Disciple under the dispensation of the Buddha Gotama, who shall hereafter arise in the world. Do you also make your Earnest Wish for the place of Second Disciple under his dispensation.”
“But, Reverend Sir, I am not on terms of familiar acquaintance with the Buddhas.”
“I will assume the burden of talking with the Buddhas; you prepare a Great Resolve.”
When Sirivaḍḍha heard his words, he adorned a space eight karīsas in extent before the door of his residence with the respect due to a king, sprinkled sand, {1.112} scattered flowers of five kinds, including lāja flowers, caused a pavilion to be erected with a thatch of blue lotuses, caused the Seat of the Buddha to be made ready, and seats for the monks also to be prepared. And having caused abundant offerings and gifts to be prepared, he directed the ascetic Sarada to invite the Buddhas.
So the ascetic Sarada took the Congregation of Monks presided over by the Buddha and went with them to Sarada’s residence.
Sarada advanced to meet them, took the bowl from the hand of the Tathāgata, conducted them into the pavilion, seated the Congregation of Monks on the seats prepared for them, offered them Water of Donation, and provided them with the choicest food. At the conclusion of the meal, having clothed the Congregation of Monks with robes of great price, he said to the Teacher, “Reverend Sir, it was for the purpose of gaining no mean place that this entertainment was undertaken. Show your gracious compassion by remaining here in this manner for a period of seven days.”
The Teacher condescended to remain.
For seven days Sirivaḍḍha bestowed abundant offerings in this manner. At the end of his almsgiving he paid obeisance to the Teacher, and standing before him with hands clasped in an attitude of reverent salutation, said, “Reverend Sir, my friend the ascetic Sarada made his Earnest Wish to become Chief Disciple of a certain Teacher. May I also become the Second Disciple of that same Teacher.”
The Teacher looked into the future, and beholding the fulfillment of his Earnest Wish, made the following prophecy, “At the end of a period of incalculable length and a hundred thousand cycles of time in addition, you will become the Second Disciple of Gotama Buddha.”
Hearing this prophecy of the Buddhas, Sirivaḍḍha was filled with joy and satisfaction.
he Teacher returned thanks for the offering of food, and then, surrounded by the company of monks, returned to the monastery.
This, monks, was the Earnest Wish made by my sons at that time.
They have received precisely that for which they made their Earnest Wish.
When I give, I give without respect of persons.
When the Teacher had thus spoken, the two Chief Disciples paid obeisance to the Exalted One and said, “Reverend Sir, when we were yet householders, we went to see the festivities of Mountain-top;” and then told the entire story of the events which had recently taken place, to their attainment of the Fruit of Conversion at the hands of the Elder Assaji. Then they said, “Reverend Sir, we went to our teacher, desiring to lead him to your feet, and pointed out to him the shallowness of his own views, and dwelt upon the advantages of his coming here.
But he said to us, ‘For me to try to live the life of a pupil now would be as absurd as for a chatty to go to the well. I shall not be able to live the life of a pupil.’ We replied, ‘Teacher, 28.217 the populace will now take perfumes, garlands, and so forth in their hands, and will go to do honor to the Teacher alone. What do you intend to do?’ Said he, ‘Which are the more numerous in this world, the stupid or the wise?’
We replied, ‘Teacher, the stupid are many; the wise are few.’ ‘Well then,’ said he, ‘let the wise men go to the wise monk Gotama, and let the stupid come to stupid me. As for you, go where you like.’ With these words, Reverend Sir, did he refuse to come hither.”
When the Teacher heard this, he said, “Monks, by reason of the false views which he holds, Sañjaya has mistaken falsehood for truth and truth for falsehood.
But you, by reason of your own wisdom, have rightly discerned that which is true in its truth and that which is false in its falsity, and you have done wisely to reject that which is false and accept that which is true.” So saying, he pronounced the following Stanzas,
They who think to find the truth in falsehood, they who discern but falsehood in the truth,
They never attain the goal of truth, but abide in the pasture-ground of error.
They who have rightly discerned the true in its truth and the false in its falsity,
They attain the goal of truth and abide in the pasture-ground of right thinking.
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Banyan Grove with reference to the Khattiya maiden Rohiṇī.
The story goes that once upon a time Venerable Anuruddha went with his retinue of five hundred monks to Kapilavatthu.
When the Elder’s kinsfolk heard that he had arrived, all except the Elder’s sister, a maiden named Rohiṇī, went to the monastery where the Elder was in residence and paid their respects to him.
The Elder asked his kinsfolk, “Where is Rohiṇī?”
“At home, Reverend Sir.”
“Why did she not come here?”
“Reverend Sir, she is suffering from an eruption of the skin, and on this account was ashamed to come.”
The Elder caused her to be summoned, saying, “Summon her immediately.” Rohiṇī fastened a covering of cloth about her face and went to the Elder. When she came into his presence, the Elder asked her, “Rohiṇī, why did you not come here before?”
“Reverend Sir, I am suffering from an eruption of the skin, and on this account I was ashamed to come.”
“But ought you not to perform works of merit?”
“What can I do, Reverend Sir?”
“Cause an assembly-hall to be erected.”
“What funds have I to use for this purpose?”
“Have you not a set of jewels?”
“Yes, Reverend Sir, I have.”
“How much did it cost?”
“It must have cost ten thousand pieces of money.”
“Well then, spend this in building an assembly-hall.”
“Who will build it for me, Reverend Sir?”
The Elder looked at her kinsfolk who stood near and said, “This shall be your duty.”
“But, Reverend Sir, what will you do?”
“I shall stay right here;
therefore bring her the building materials.”
“Very well, Reverend Sir,” said they, and brought them.
The Elder superintended the arrangements for the erection of the assembly-hall. Said he to Rohiṇī, “Cause an assembly-hall two stories in height to be erected and as soon as the planks are put in place above, you take your stand below, sweep constantly, prepare seats, and keep the water-vessels filled with water.”
“Very well, Reverend Sir,” replied Rohiṇī. So she spent her set of jewels in the erection of an assembly-hall two stories in height. As soon as the planks were put in place above, she took her stand below, swept,
and performed the other duties, and monks sat therein constantly.
Even as she swept the assembly-hall, the eruption subsided.
When the assembly-hall was completed, she invited the Congregation of Monks presided over by the Buddha; and when the Congregation of Monks presided over by the Buddha had taken their seats, filling the assembly-hall, she offered them choice food, both hard and soft.
When the Teacher finished his meal, he asked, “Whose is this offering?”
“Your sister Rohiṇī’s, Reverend Sir.”
“But where is she?”
“In the house, Reverend Sir.”
“Summon her.”
She was unwilling to go.
But in spite of her unwillingness, the Teacher caused her to be summoned all the same.
When she had come and saluted him and taken her seat, the Teacher said to her, “Rohiṇī, why did you not come before?”
“Reverend Sir, I was suffering from an eruption of the skin and was ashamed to come.”
“But do you know the reason why this eruption of the skin broke out on your body?”
“No, Reverend Sir, I do not.”
“It was because of anger that this eruption of the skin broke out on your body.”
“Why, Reverend Sir, what did I do?”
“Well then, listen,” said the Teacher.
So saying, he told her the following
In times long past, the chief consort of the king of Benāres took a dislike to one of the king’s nautch-girls and said to herself, “I will make her suffer.” So she procured a number of large ripe scabs, reduced them to powder, and summoning that nautch-girl to her, contrived secretly to place the powdered scabs in her bed and cloak and her goats’ hair coverlet. Then, as if in fun, she sprinkled some of the powder on her body.
Immediately the girl’s body became covered with pimples and boils so as to have a horridly angry look, and she went about scratching herself.
When she lay down on her bed, there too the powdered scabs ate her up, and she suffered yet harsher pain.
The chief consort at that time was Rohiṇī.
When the Teacher had related this Story of the Past, he said, “Rohiṇī, that was the evil deed which you committed at that time.
Anger or jealousy, however slight, is always unbecoming.” So saying, he pronounced the following Stanza,
one should utterly renounce pride; one should overcome every attachment.
One should put away anger;
He who clings not to Name and Form,
and is free from attachment, is not beset with pain.
At the conclusion of the lesson many obtained the Fruit of Conversion and the Fruits of the Second and Third Paths.
Rohiṇī also was established in the Fruit of Conversion, and at that moment her body took on a golden hue.
Rohiṇī passed from that state of existence and was reborn in the Abode of the Thirty-three at the meeting-point of the boundaries of four deities.
Fair to look upon was she, and possessed of the perfection of beauty. When the four deities looked upon her, desire arose within them, and they began to quarrel over her, saying, “She was reborn within my boundary, she was reborn within my boundary.” Finally they went to Sakka king of gods and said to him, “Sire, a dispute has arisen among us over this nymph; decide the dispute for us.”
When Sakka looked at the nymph, desire arose within him also. Said he, “What manner of thoughts have arisen within you since you saw this nymph?”
The first deity said, “As for me, the thoughts which have arisen within me have no more been able to subside than a battle-drum.”
The second said, “My thoughts have run wild like a mountain torrent.”
The third said, “From the time I first saw this nymph, my eyes have popped out like the eyes of a crab.”
The fourth said, “My thoughts have no more been able to stand still than a banner raised on a shrine.”
Then Sakka said to them, “Friends, as for you, your thoughts are on fire. For my part, if I can have this nymph, I can live, but if I cannot have her, I shall surely die.”
The deities replied, “Great king, there is no need of your dying.”So saying, they yielded the nymph to Sakka and went their way.
She was Sakka’s darling and delight.
If she ever said, “Let us go engage in such and such sport,” he could not refuse her.
When this courteous and amiable talk was finished, he sat down at one side
and asked the venerable Bakkula:
“Friend Bakkula, how long is it since you went forth?”
“Friend, in the eighty years since I went forth I do not recall any perception of ill will…any perception of cruelty to have ever arisen in me.”
“Friend, in the eighty years since I went forth I do not recall any thought of sensual desire to have ever arisen in me.”
“Friend, in the eighty years since I went forth I do not recall any thought of ill will…any thought of cruelty to have ever arisen in me.”
“Friend, in the eighty years since I went forth I do not recall ever having accepted a robe from a householder1169
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Aggāḷava Shrine with reference to a certain monk.
For after the Teacher had given permission to the Congregation of Monks to lodge without the walls of the monastery, and while the treasurer of Rājagaha and others were busy providing such lodgings, a certain monk of Āḷavi decided to build himself a lodging, and seeing a tree which suited him, began to cut it down.
Thereupon a certain spirit who had been reborn in that tree, and who had an infant child, appeared before the monk, carrying her child on her hip, and begged him not to cut down the trees, saying, “Master, do not cut down my home; it will be impossible for me to take my child and wander about without a home.”
But the monk said, “I shall not be able to find another tree like this,” and paid no further attention to what she said.
The tree-spirit thought to herself, “If he but look upon this child, he will desist,” and placed the child on a branch of the tree.
The monk, however, had already swung his axe, was unable to check the force of his upraised axe, and cut off the arm of the child. Furious with anger, the tree-spirit raised both her hands and exclaimed, “I will strike him dead.” In an instant, however, the thought came to her, “This monk is a righteous man;
if I kill him, I shall go to Hell.
Moreover, if other tree-spirits see monks cutting down their own trees, they will say to themselves, ‘Such and such a tree-spirit killed a monk under such circumstances,’ and will follow my example and kill other monks.
Besides, this monk has a master; I will therefore content myself with reporting this matter to his master.” Lowering her upraised hands, she went weeping to the Teacher, and having saluted him, stood on one side.
Said the Teacher, “What is the matter, tree-spirit?”
The tree-spirit replied, “Reverend Sir, your disciple did this and that to me. I was sorely tempted to kill him, but I thought this and that, refrained from killing him, and came here.”
So saying, she told him the story in all its details. When the Teacher heard her story, he said to her, “Well done, well done, spirit! you have done well in holding in, like a swift-speeding chariot, your anger when it was thus aroused.” So saying, he pronounced the following Stanza,
Whoever controls his anger like a swift-speeding chariot, when it is aroused, –
Him I call a charioteer; other folk are merely holders of reins.
At the conclusion of the lesson the tree-spirit was established in the Fruit of Conversion; the assembled company also profited by it.
But even after the tree-spirit had obtained the Fruit of Conversion, she stood weeping.
The Teacher asked her, “What is the matter, tree-spirit?” “Reverend Sir,” she replied, “my home has been destroyed; what am I to do now? Said the Teacher, “Enough, tree-spirit; be not disturbed; I will give you a place of abode.” With these words he pointed out near the Perfumed Chamber at Jetavana a certain tree from which a tree-spirit had departed on the preceding day and said, “In such and such a place is a tree which stands by itself; enter therein.”
Accordingly the tree-spirit entered into that tree.
Thenceforth, because the tree-spirit had received her place of abode as a gift from the Buddha, although spirits of great power approached that tree, they were unable to shake it.
The Teacher took this occasion to lay down and enjoin upon the monks the observance of the precept regarding the injuring of plants and trees.
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Veḷuvana, after he had eaten a meal at the house of Uttarā, with reference to the female lay disciple Uttarā.
The story in due sequence is as follows: The story goes that there was a poor man in Rājagaha named Puṇṇa, who made a living by working for hire for the treasurer Sumana.
Puṇṇa had a wife, and a daughter named Uttarā, both of whom were servants in the treasurer’s household.
Now one day they made a proclamation in Rājagaha, “For seven days let everyone make holiday in Rājagaha.”
The treasurer Sumana heard this proclamation; and when Puṇṇa came to him early the following morning, he addressed him, saying, “My man, our servants want to make holiday; will you make holiday, or will you work for hire?”
Puṇṇa replied, “Master, a holiday is for the rich; I have not even enough rice in my house for to-morrow’s porridge; what business have I making holiday? I will take my oxen and go plow.”
“Very well, take your oxen and go plow.”
So Puṇṇa took a strong pair of oxen and a plow and went home and said to his wife, “My dear wife, the citizens are making holiday, but I am so poor that I shall be obliged to work for hire; to-day when you bring me my meal, just cook me twice my usual allowance of rice.” So saying, he went to the field.
On that very day the Elder Sāriputta arose from a Trance of Cessation which had lasted seven days, and considered within himself, “On whom shall I bestow my blessing to-day?” Perceiving that Puṇṇa had entered the Net of his Knowledge, he considered further, “Has he faith and will he be able to entertain me?” Perceiving that Puṇṇa had faith, that he would be able to entertain him, and that he would thereby obtain a rich reward, the Elder took bowl and robe, went to the field where Puṇṇa was plowing, took his stand on the bank of a pit, and gazed earnestly at a certain bush.
When Puṇṇa saw the Elder, he left his plow, saluted the Elder with the Five Rests, and said to him, “You must have need of a tooth-stick.”And preparing a tooth-stick for the Elder, he gave it to him.
Thereupon the Elder drew from under the folds of his robe his bowl and water-strainer and gave them to Puṇṇa.
“He must wish some water,” thought Puṇṇa. So taking the water-strainer, he strained water and gave it to the Elder.
Thought the Elder, “This man lives in the last house of all.
If I go to the door of his house, his wife will not be able to see me;
therefore I will wait right here until she sets out on the road with his meal.”
So the Elder waited right there a little while, and when he perceived that she had set out on the road, he started off in the direction of the city.
The poor man’s wife saw the Elder on the road and thought to herself, “Once when I had alms to give, I did not see the Elder; and once again when I saw the Elder, I had not alms to give.
To-day, however, I not only see the Elder, but also have alms to give. Will he give me his blessing?”
Thereupon she set down the jar of rice, saluted the Elder with the Five Rests, and said to him, “Reverend Sir, consider not whether this is coarse food or fine food, but bestow a blessing on your servant.”
The Elder held out his bowl. The woman held the jar with one hand and with the other hand took the boiled rice out of the jar and gave it to the Elder. When she had given him half of the rice, the Elder said, “Enough!”
So saying, he covered the bowl with his hand. Said the woman, “Reverend Sir, one portion cannot be divided into two parts.
Bestow not a blessing on your servant in this present life, but bestow a blessing upon her in the life to come. I desire to give you all without reserve.” So saying, she emptied all of the rice in the Elder’s bowl and made the following Earnest Wish, “May I be a partaker of the Law you have yourself beheld.”
“So be it,” said the Elder. Remaining standing, he pronounced the words of thanksgiving. Then seating himself in a pleasant place where there was water, he ate his meal.
The woman turned back, sought fresh rice, and boiled it.
Puṇṇa plowed half a karīsa of land, and then, unable longer to endure hunger, he unyoked his oxen and went and sat down in the shade of a certain tree, watching the road.
As his wife came along with her husband’s meal of boiled rice, she saw him, and thought to herself, “There is my husband, overcome with hunger, sitting beside the road, watching for me.
If {3.305} he upbraids me, saying, ‘You have tarried too long,’ and strikes me with the handle of his whip, that which I have done will go for naught;
I will therefore speak first.” So she said to him, “Husband, have patience to-day for once, and do not bring to naught that which I have done.
Early in the morning I set out to bring you your rice; but on the way, seeing the Captain of the Faith, I gave him your rice.Having so done, I went back home and boiled more rice; now I have returned. Husband, be well content.”
“What say you, wife?” asked Puṇṇa. On hearing her explanation repeated the second time, he said to her, “Wife, you did well to give my rice to the noble Elder. I also gave him a toothstick and water for rinsing the mouth early this very morning.” With contented heart, rejoicing at the words he had heard, weak because he had not eaten since sunrise, he laid his head on her lap and fell asleep.
Now the piece he had plowed early in the morning, with its well-broken-up soil, all turned to ruddy gold, and was bright as a heap of Kaṇikāra flowers.
Puṇṇa woke up, looked at the piece, and said to his wife, “My dear wife, this piece which I plowed looks to me as if it had turned to gold. Are my eyes deceiving me just because I have had nothing to eat since early sunrise?”
“Husband, to me too it looks just the same way.”
Puṇṇa arose, went to the field, and taking a lump of earth in his hand, he struck the handle of the plow with it, whereupon he perceived that it was solid gold. “Oh,” he exclaimed, “this very day is manifested the fruit of the alms given to the noble Captain of the Faith! But it will be impossible for us to conceal so much wealth and to make use of it ourselves.” So he filled with gold the dinner-basket his wife had brought, and going to the royal palace, as soon as the king was ready to receive him, he entered and paid obeisance to the king. “What is it, my man?” asked the king. “Your majesty,” replied Puṇṇa, “to-day all the ground I have plowed stands covered with gold. Should not orders be given to haul it to the palace?”
“Who are you?”
“Puṇṇa is my name.”
“But what did you do to-day?”
“Early in the morning I gave the Captain of the Faith a toothstick and water for rinsing the mouth; likewise my wife gave him the boiled rice which she was bringing to me.”
When the king heard this he exclaimed, “This very day is manifested the fruit of the alms which you gave to the Captain of the Faith. Friend, what shall I do?” “
Send several thousand carts and have the gold hauled to the palace.”
The king sent the carts.
As the king’s men gathered up the gold, they said, “This is the property of the king.” Thereupon every particle of gold they took into their hands turned to earth once more.
They went and reported the matter to the king.The king asked them, “What did you say when you gathered up the gold?”
“Your majesty,” replied the men, “we said that the gold was your property.”
“My men,” replied the king, “who am I?” Go and say, ‘This is the property of Puṇṇa.’ Then gather up the gold.”
The king’s men did as they were told. Immediately every particle they took into their hands turned to gold once more.
They hauled all of this gold to the palace-court and heaped it up in a pile; the pile was eighty cubits high.
The king ordered the citizens to assemble and asked them, “Is there anyone in this city who possesses so much gold as this?”
“No, your majesty, there is not.”
“What should be given to him?”
“The treasurer’s parasol, your majesty.”
Said the king, “Let his name be Treasurer Great-Wealth, Treasurer Bahudhana.” So the king gave him the treasurer’s parasol and bestowed all this great wealth upon him.
Then said Puṇṇa to the king, “Your majesty, all this time we have lived in other people’s houses; give us a place to live in.”
The king pointed to the site of the former treasurer’s house and said, “Well, look, – you notice a thicket growing over there. Have that thicket cleared and a house built for yourself there.”
In a few days Puṇṇa built him a house in this place. When the house was finished, he gave a festival in honor of the opening of the house and a festival in honor of the raising of the parasol simultaneously; and for the space of seven days he gave alms to the Congregation of Monks presided over by the Buddha.
In pronouncing the words of thanksgiving, the Teacher preached the Law in orderly sequence.
At the conclusion of his discourse, the treasurer Puṇṇa and his wife and his daughter Uttarā, all three, obtained the Fruit of Conversion.
After a time the treasurer of Rājagaha selected the daughter of the treasurer Puṇṇa to be the wife of his own son. “
“I will not give her,” said Puṇṇa. Said the treasurer of Rājagaha, “Do not act in this manner. All this time you have dwelt near us, аnd now you have obtained great wealth and high position. Give your daughter to be the wife of my son.” But Puṇṇa said to himself, “He is a heretic, and my daughter cannot live without the Three Jewels. I will not give him my daughter.”
Many noble youths, treasurers and accountants and others who held high office, sought to persuade him to reconsider his decision, saying, “Do not break off friendly relations with him; give him your daughter.”
Finally he accepted their advice, and on the day of full moon of the month Āsāḷhi, gave him his daughter.
From the day Uttarā went to the house of her husband, she was no longer privileged to approach a monk or a nun, or to give alms, or to listen to the Law.
When two months and a half had thus passed, she asked the women-servants who waited upon her, “How much of the rainy season still remains?”
“Half a month, your ladyship.”
So Uttarā sent the following message to her father, “Why have they thrown me into such a prison? It would be far better to put a brand on me and proclaim me a common wench,
than to give me over to such an unbelieving household as this.
From the day I first entered this house, I have not so much as seen a monk, nor have I had the opportunity to perform a single work of merit.”
When her father received this message, he expressed displeasure, saying, “Oh, how unhappy my daughter is!” And he sent fifteen thousand pieces of money to his daughter, together with the following message, “There is a courtezan in this city named Sirimā, who receives a thousand pieces of money a night.
With this money have her brought to your husband’s house and install her as your husband’s mistress. Then you can devote your time to the performance of good works.”
So Uttarā caused Sirimā to be summoned to her house and said to her, “Friend, take this money and minister to your friend during the coming fortnight.”
“Very well,” replied Sirimā, consenting to the bargain.
When Uttarā’s husband saw Sirimā, he asked, “What does this mean?” Uttarā replied, “Husband, during the coming fortnight my friend is to be your mistress. For my part, during the coming fortnight I desire to give alms and listen to the Law.”
When Uttarā’s husband saw Sirimā, beautiful woman that she was, desire took possession of him, and he immediately consented to the arrangement, saying, “Very well; so be it.”
Thereupon Uttarā invited the Congregation of Monks presided over by the Buddha, saying, “Reverend Sir, during the coming fortnight pray take your meals right here and go nowhere else.” On obtaining the Teacher’s consent, she rejoiced at heart and said to herself, “From this day forth, until the Great Terminal Festival, I shall have the privilege of waiting on the Teacher and listening to the Law.” And she bustled about the kitchen making the necessary arrangements, saying, “Cook the porridge thus; cook the cakes thus.”
“To-morrow will be the Terminal Festival,” thought her husband as he stood at his window looking towards the kitchen. “What is that foolish woman doing?” When he saw her going to and fro arranging for the feast, her body moist with sweat and sprinkled with ashes and smeared with charcoal and soot, he thought to himself, “Ah, in such a place the fool does not enjoy luxury and comfort. ‘I will minister to the shaveling monklings,’ thinks she; and her heart rejoices as she goes about.” He laughed and left the window.
As he left the window, Sirimā who stood near him, thought to herself, “What did he see to make him laugh?” Looking out of the same window, she saw Uttarā. “It was because he saw her that he laughed,” thought Sirimā; “doubtless an intimacy exists between them.”
Sirimā immediately conceived hatred towards Uttarā and said to herself, “I’ll make her suffer.” So descending from the palace-terrace, she entered the kitchen; and going to the place where the cakes were being fried, she took some boiling ghee in a spoon and advanced towards Uttarā.
Uttarā saw her advancing and said, “My friend has done me a great service. This world may be narrow, and the World of Brahmā low; but the goodness of my friend is great indeed,
in that through her assistance I have received the privilege of giving alms and listening to the Law.
If I cherish anger towards her, may this ghee burn me.
If not, may it not burn me.” So saying, she suffused her enemy with the sentiment of love.
When Sirimā flung the boiling ghee on her head, it felt like cold water
“The next spoonful will feel cool,” said Sirimā. And filling the spoon again, she advanced towards Uttarā with the second spoonful of boiling ghee in her hand.When Uttarā’s serving-women saw her, they tried to frighten her away, crying out, “Begone, miscreant! What right have you to fling boiling ghee on the head of our mistress!” And springing to their feet in every part of the kitchen, they beat her with their fists and kicked her with their feet and flung her to the ground.
Uttarā, although she strove to stop them, was unable to do so.
Finally she stood over Sirimā, pushed all of her serving-women away, and admonished Sirimā, saying, “Why did you do so wicked a deed?” So saying, she bathed her with hot water and anointed her with oil a hundred times refined.
she pushed them all away when they strove to belabor me, and then did for me all that could possibly be done.
At that moment Sirimā realized that she was but a concubine. And straightway she thought to herself, “It was indeed a most wicked deed I committed when I flung boiling ghee on the head of this woman, merely because my master laughed at her. As for this woman, instead of ordering her serving-women to seize me,
If I do not ask her to pardon me, my head is likely to split into seven pieces.” And forthwith Sirimā fell at the feet of Uttarā and said to her, “Pardon me, my lady.”
Uttarā replied, “I am a daughter and my father is living. If my father pardons you, I will also pardon you.”
“Very well, my lady, I will also ask pardon of your father the treasurer Puṇṇa.”
“Puṇṇa is my father in the round of birth and rebirth. If my father in that state where there is no round of birth and rebirth will pardon you, then will I also pardon you.”
“But who is your father in that state where there is no round of birth and rebirth?”
“The Buddha, the Supremely Enlightened.”
“I put no confidence in him.”
“I will cause you to do so. To-morrow the Teacher will come here with his retinue of monks; obtain such offerings as you can and come right here and ask his pardon.”
“Very well, my lady,” replied Sirimā. And rising from her seat, she went home and gave orders to the five hundred women of her retinue to put themselves in readiness to accompany her. Then she procured various kinds of hard foods and sauces, and on the following day, taking these offerings with her, she went to Uttarā’s house. Not daring to place her offerings in the bowls of the Congregation of Monks presided over by the Buddha, she stood waiting.
Uttarā took all of her offerings and made the proper disposal of them,
and at the conclusion of the meal Sirimā together with her retinue prostrated herself at the Teacher’s feet.
and at the conclusion of the meal Sirimā together with her retinue prostrated herself at the Teacher’s feet.
“Reverend Sir, yesterday I did this and that. But my friend only made her serving-women stop beating me and could not do enough to befriend me.
Recognizing her goodness, I asked her to pardon me. But she said to me, ‘If the Teacher will pardon you, I also will pardon you.’ ”
“Uttarā, is this true?”
“Yes, Reverend Sir. My friend flung boiling ghee on my head.”
“What thoughts did you then entertain?”
“Reverend Sir, I suffused her with love, thinking to myself, ‘This world may be narrow, and the World of Brahmā low; but the goodness of my friend is great indeed,
in that through her assistance I have received the privilege of giving alms and listening to the Law.
If I cherish anger towards her, may this ghee burn me. If not, may it not burn me.’ ”
Said the Teacher, “Well done, well done, Uttarā! That is the right way to overcome anger.
Anger should be overcome with kindness. He that utters abuse and slander may be overcome by him who refrains from uttering abuse and slander. An obstinate miser may be overcome by the giving of one’s own. A speaker of lies may be overcome by speaking the truth.” So saying, he pronounced the following Stanza,
One should overcome anger with kindness;One should overcome evil with good;
One should overcome the niggard with gifts, And the speaker of falsehood with truth.
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Jetavana with reference to Elder Moggallāna the Great.
The spirit straightway approached the Elder, saluted him, and took his stand before him. Thereupon the Elder said to him, “Spirit, you possess great glory; what did you do to get it?”
“Oh, Reverend Sir, do not ask me.”
The Elder repeated his question, saying, “Please tell me.” Finally the spirit said, “Reverend Sir, I neither gave alms nor rendered honor nor listened to the Law; all that I did was to tell the truth.”
The Elderstopped at the doors of other mansions also, and put the same question to one after another of the female spirits who approached him.
They likewise strove to conceal the works of merit which they had performed, but likewise failed to put off the Elder. One of them said, “Reverend Sir, as for almsgiving and the other duties of religion, I did nothing. But in the dispensation of the Buddha Kassapa, I was the slave of a certain man who was excessively harsh and cruel. He thought nothing of seizing a stick or a staff and striking off a person’s head.
But when angry thoughts arose within me, I would rebuke myself, saying, ‘He is your master and has power to make public proclamation concerning you, or to cut off your nose or other members; therefore be not angry.’Thus would I rebuke myself and restrain my angry thoughts; by so doing, I attained this glory.
Another said, “Reverend Sir, while I was guarding a field of sugar-cane, I gave a stalk of sugar-cane to a certain monk.”
Another said, “I gave a timbarūsaka.”
Another said, “I gave an elāḷuka.”
Another said, “I gave a phārusaka.”
Another said, “I gave a handful of radishes.”
Another said, “I gave a handful of nimb-fruit.” In such terms did each mention the slight gift which each had made. All concluded as follows, “By these means did we obtain this glory.
After listening to the recital of their former deeds of merit, the Elder approached the Teacher and asked him, “Reverend Sir, is it possible to obtain heavenly glory merely by telling the truth or restraining one’s angry thoughts or giving a timbarūsaka and the like?”
“Moggallāna, why do you ask me? Did not the female spirits explain the whole matter to you?”
“Yes, Reverend Sir, I am convinced that by such slight acts as these heavenly glory may be gained.”
Then the Teacher said to him, “Moggallāna, merely by telling the truth, merely by putting away anger, merely by giving a slight gift, men may attain the heavenly world.” So saying, he pronounced the following Stanza,
A man should speak the truth, a man should not get angry,
A man should give, when asked to give a little; By these three acts a man may attain the World of the Gods.
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Añjanavana near Sāketa with reference to a question asked by the monks.
The story goes that once upon a time, as the Exalted One, accompanied by the Congregation of Monks, was entering Sāketa for alms, a certain old Brahman who lived in Sāketa passed out of the city, and seeing the Possessor of the Ten Forces entering within the gate, fell down before his feet, and grasping him firmly by the ankles, said to him, “Dear son, is it not the duty of sons to care for their mother and father when they have grown old? Why is it that for so long a time you have not shown yourself to us?
This is the first time I have seen you. Come look upon your mother.” And taking the Teacher with him, he escorted him into his house.
When the Teacher had entered the house, he sat down on the seat prepared for him, together with the Congregation of Monks.
The Brahman’s wife also approached the Teacher, and falling before his feet, said, “Dear son, where have you been all this time? Ought not mothers and fathers to be cared for when they have grown old?” And she directed her sons and daughters to salute the Teacher, saying, “Go salute your brother.”
Delighted at heart, the Brahman and his wife offered food to the Congregation of Monks presided over by the Buddha, saying, “Reverend Sir, take all of your meals right here.” The Teacher replied, “The Buddhas never take their meals regularly in the same place.” Then said the Brahman and his wife, “Well then, Reverend Sir, be good enough to send to us all those who come to you and invite you to be their guest.”
From that time forward, the Teacher sent to the Brahman and his wife all those who came to him with an invitation to be their guest, saying, “Go tell the Brahman.”
Such persons would then go and say to the Brahman, “We would invite the Teacher for to-morrow;”
and the Brahman on the following day would take from his own house jars of boiled rice and jars of curries, and go to the place where the Teacher sat.
In case the Teacher was invited nowhere else, he always took his meal in the house of the Brahman.
Both the Brahman and his wife gave alms regularly to the Tathāgata, listened to the Law, and in the course of time obtained the Fruit of the Third Path.
The monks began a discussion in the Hall of Truth: “Brethren, the Brahman knows perfectly well that the Tathāgata’s father is Suddhodana and that his mother is Mahāmāyā. But although he knows this, both he and his wife address the Tathāgata as ‘our son,’ and the Teacher acquiesces in this form of address;
pray what can be the explanation of this?”
The Teacher overheard their talk and said, “Monks, both the Brahman and his wife are addressing their own son when they say to me, ‘Our son.’ ” Having said this, he related the following Story of the Past:
Monks, in times past this Brahman was my father for five hundred successive existences, my uncle for five hundred existences, and my grandfather for five hundred existences;
likewise the Brahman’s wife was my mother for five hundred existences, my aunt for five hundred existences, and my grandmother for five hundred existences.
Thus I was brought up by this Brahman during fifteen hundred states of existence, and by the wife of this Brahman during fifteen hundred states of existence. Having thus explained that he had been their son during three thousand states of existence, he pronounced the following Stanzas,
That old love springs up again like the lotus in the water.
Through previous association or present advantage,
If the mind rests satisfied, and the heart reposes confidence in a man,
One may repose confidence in that man, though it be the first time one has seen him.
For the entire period of three months during which the Teacher kept residence, he resorted only to that family for his meals,
and at the end of the three months they experienced Arahatship and passed into Nibbāna.
Men rendered high honors to their bodies, placed both bodies on one hearse, and carried them out.
The Teacher, surrounded by a retinue of five hundred monks, accompanied the bodies to the burning-ground.
Hearing the report, “They were the mother and father of the Buddhas,” a great multitude went forth from the city.
The Teacher entered a certain hall near the burning-ground and remained therein.
Men saluted the Teacher, saying to him, “Reverend Sir, do not grieve because your mother and father are dead,” and held sweet converse with him.
Instead of repulsing them by saying, “Speak not thus,” the Teacher surveyed the thoughts of the company and preaching the Law with reference to that particular occasion,
Short indeed is this life;
even before a hundred years have passed, one dies;
If one lives longer,
then he dies of old age.
The monks, not knowing that the Brahman and his wife had passed into Nibbāna, asked the Teacher, “Reverend Sir, what will be their future state?”
The Teacher replied, “Monks, in the case of such as they, Arahats and sages, there is no future state.
Such as they attain the Eternal, the Deathless, Great Nibbāna. So saying, he pronounced the following Stanza,
They who do no injury, the sages, they who ever control their bodies,
Such go to a place from which they pass no more; and having gone there, sorrow not.
“Friend, for seven days after going forth I ate the country’s almsfood as a debtor; on the eighth day final knowledge arose.”
Then Acela Kassapa said: “I would receive the going forth in this Dhamma and Discipline, I would receive the full admission.”
And soon, not long after his full admission, dwelling alone, withdrawn, diligent, ardent, and resolute, the venerable Kassapa, by realising for himself with direct knowledge, here and now entered upon and abided in that supreme goal of the holy life for the sake of which clansmen rightly go forth from the home life into homelessness.
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence on Mount Vulture Peak with reference to Puṇṇā, a female slave of the treasurer of Rājagaha.
The story goes that one day they gave her much rice to pound.
She pounded away until late at night, lighting a lamp to work by; finally she became very weary and in order to rest herself, stepped outside and stood in the wind with her body moist with sweat.
Now at that time Dabba the Malla was steward of lodgings for the monks.
Having listened to the Law, that he might show the monks the way to their respective lodgings, he lighted his finger, and preceding the monks, created by supernatural power a light for them.
The light enabled Puṇṇā to see the monks making their way along the mountain. She thought to herself, “As for me, I am oppressed by my own discomfort, and so, even at this time, am unable to sleep. Why is it that the reverend monks are unable to sleep?” Having considered the matter, she came to the following conclusion, “It must be that some monk who resides there is sick, or else is suffering from the bite of some reptile.” So when it was dawn, she took some rice-dust, placed it in the palm of her hand, moistened it with water, and having thus mixed a cake, cooked it over a bed of charcoal. Then, saying to herself, “I will eat it on the road leading to the bathing-place on the river,” she placed the cake in a fold of her dress, and taking a water-pot in her hand, set out for the bathing-place on the river.
The Teacher set out on the same path, intending likewise to enter that village for alms.
When Puṇṇā saw the Teacher, she thought to herself, “On other days when I have seen the Teacher, I have had no alms to give him, or if I have had alms to give him, I have not seen him; to-day, however, not only do I meet the Teacher face to face, but I have alms to give him.
If he would accept this cake without considering whether the food is of inferior or superior quality, I would give it to him.” So setting her water-pot down on one side, she saluted the Teacher and said to him, “Reverend Sir, accept this coarse food and bestow your blessing upon me.”
The Teacher looked at Elder Ānanda, whereupon the Elder drew from under a fold of his robe and presented to the Teacher a bowl which was an offering to the Teacher from a great king.
The Teacher held out the bowl and received therein the offering of the cake. When Puṇṇā had placed the cake in the Teacher’s bowl, she saluted him with the Five Rests and said to him, “Reverend Sir, may the Truth which you have beheld be of avail to me also.”
he Teacher replied, “So be it.” And remaining standing as before, he pronounced the words of thanksgiving.
Thereupon Puṇṇā thought to herself, “Although the Teacher bestowed on me a blessing as he took my cake, yet he will not eat it himself.
He will doubtless keep it until he has gone a little way and will then give it to a crow or a dog. Then he will go to the house of some king or prince and make a meal of choice food.”
Thought the Teacher to himself, “What was the thought in the mind of this woman?” Perceiving what was in her mind, the Teacher looked at Elder Ānanda and intimated that he wished to sit down.
The Elder spread out a robe and offered the Teacher a seat.
The Teacher sat down without the city and ate his breakfast.
The deities squeezed out nectar, food proper to gods and men alike throughout the circle of the worlds, even as one squeezes a honeycomb, and imparted it to the Teacher’s food.
Puṇṇā stood looking on.
At the conclusion of the Teacher’s breakfast the Elder gave him water.
When the Teacher had finished his breakfast, he addressed Puṇṇā and said, “Puṇṇā, why have you blamed my disciples?”
“I do not blame your disciples, Reverend Sir.”
“Then what did you say when you saw my disciples?”
“Reverend Sir, the explanation is very simple. I thought to myself, ‘As for me, I am oppressed by my own discomfort, and so am unable to sleep; why is it that the reverend monks are unable to sleep? It must be that some monk who resides there is sick, or else is suffering from the bite of some reptile.’ ”
The Teacher listened to her words and then said to her, “Puṇṇā, in your own case it is because you are afflicted with discomfort that you are unable to sleep. But my disciples are assiduously watchful and therefore sleep not.” So saying, he pronounced the following Stanza,
They that are ever watchful, they that study both by day and by night,
They that strive after Nibbāna, such men rid themselves of the evil passions.
At the conclusion of the lesson Puṇṇā, even as she stood there, was established in the Fruit of Conversion; the assembled company also profited by the lesson.
The Teacher, having made a meal of the cake which Puṇṇā made of rice-flour and cooked over a bed of coals, returned to the monastery.
Thereupon the monks began a discussion in the Hall of Truth: “Brethren, how hard it must have been for the Supremely Enlightened One to make his breakfast of the cake of rice-flour which Puṇṇā cooked over a bed of coals and gave him!”
At that moment the Teacher drew near and asked them, “Monks, what are you discussing now as you sit here all gathered together?” When they told him, he said, “Monks, this is not the first time I have eaten red-rice-powder which she gave me; the same thing happened to me in a previous state of existence also.” So saying, he recited the following Stanzas,
You used to eat leavings of grass, you used to eat scum of red-rice-gruel;
Such was your food in days gone by; why do you not eat your food to-day?
Where they know not a body by birth or training.
There, Great Brahmā, the scum of red-rice-gruel will suffice.
But you know full well that I am a horse of noblest breed;
I know my breed; it is because of my breed that I will not eat your red-rice-gruel.
And the Teacher related this Kuṇḍakasindhavapotaka Jātaka in detail.
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Jetavana with reference to the lay disciple Atula.
For Atula was a lay disciple who lived at Sāvatthi, and he had a retinue of five hundred other lay disciples. One day he took those lay disciples with him to the monastery to hear the Law. Desiring to hear Elder Revata preach the Law, he saluted Elder Revata and sat down respectfully on one side.
Now this Venerable Elder Revata was a solitary recluse, delighting in solitude even as a lion delights in solitude, wherefore he had nothing to say to Atula.
“This Elder has nothing to say,” thought Atula. Provoked, he arose from his seat, went to Elder Sāriputta, and took his stand respectfully on one side. “For what reason have you come to me?” asked Elder Sāriputta. “Reverend Sir,” replied Atula, “I took these lay disciples of mine to hear the Law and approached Elder Revata. But he had nothing to say to me; therefore I was provoked at him and have come here. Preach the Law to me.”
“Well then, lay disciple,” said the Elder Sāriputta, “sit down.” And forthwith Elder Sāriputta expounded the Abhidhamma at great length.
Thought the lay disciple, “Abhidhamma is exceedingly abstruse, and the Elder has expounded this alone to me at great length; of what use is he to us? Provoked, he took his retinue with him and went to Elder Ānanda.
Driven with great speed by the men concealed within its belly
Said Elder Ānanda, “What is it, lay disciple?” Atula replied, “Reverend Sir, we approached Elder Revata for the purpose of hearing the Law, and got not so much as a syllable from him. Provoked at this, we went to Elder Sāriputta and he expounded to us at great length Abhidhamma alone with all its subtleties. ‘Of what use is he to us?’ thought we to ourselves; and provoked at him also, we came here. Preach the Law to us, Reverend Sir.”
On and on sped the horse, galloping so rapidly that by degrees the army of the king was left far behind
“Well then,” replied Elder Ānanda, “sit down and listen.” Thereupon Elder Ānanda expounded the Law to them very briefly, and making it very easy for them to understand.
But they were provoked at the Elder Ānanda also, and going to the Teacher, saluted him, and sat down respectfully on one side. Said the Teacher to them, “Lay disciples, why have you come here?”
“To hear the Law, Reverend Sir.”
“But you have heard the Law.”
“Reverend Sir, first we went to Elder Revata, and he had nothing to say to us; provoked at him, we approached Elder Sāriputta, and he expounded the Abhidhamma to us at great length; but we were unable to understand his discourse, and provoked at him, approached the Elder Ānanda; Elder Ānanda, however, expounded the Law to us very briefly, wherefore we were provoked at him also and came here.”
The Teacher heard them say their say and then replied, “Atula, from days of yore until now, it has been the invariable practice of men to blame him who said nothing, him who said much, and him who said little.
There is no one who deserves unqualified blame and no one who deserves unqualified praise.
Even kings are blamed by some and praised by others.
Even the great earth, even the sun and moon, even a Supremely Enlightened Buddha, sitting and speaking in the midst of the Fourfold Assembly, some blame, and others praise.
For blame or praise bestowed by utter simpletons is a matter of no account. But he whom a man of learning and intelligence blames or praises, – he is blamed or praised indeed.” So saying, he pronounced the following Stanzas,
This is an old, old saying, Atula, this is no mere saying of to-day:
“They blame him who sits silent, they blame him who says much,
They also blame him who says little.” There is no one in the world that is not blamed.
There never was, there never will be, there lives not now
A man who receives unqualified blame or unqualified praise.
If men of intelligence always, from day to day, praise
Some man as free from flaws, wise, endowed with learning and goodness, –
Who would venture to find fault with such a man, any more than with a coin made of gold of the Jambu river?
Even the gods praise such a man, even by Brahmā is he praised.
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Veḷuvana with reference to the monks of the Band of Six.
For one day the monks of the Band of Six put wooden shoes on their feet, and taking staves of wood in their two hands, walked up and down on the surface of a flat rock. The Teacher hearing the clatter, asked Elder Ānanda, “Ānanda, what is that noise?” The Elder replied, “The monks of the Band of Six are walking about in wooden shoes; they are making the clatter you hear.” When the Teacher heard this, he promulgated the following precept, “A monk should control his deeds, his words, and his thoughts.” So saying, he expounded the Law by pronouncing the following Stanzas,
Angry deeds should one control; one should be restrained in action;
One should renounce evil deeds; one should do good deeds.
Angry words should one control; one should be restrained in word;
One should renounce evil words; one should speak good words.
Angry thoughts should one control; one should be restrained in thought;
One should renounce evil thoughts; one should cultivate good thoughts.
Wise men who control their deeds, wise men who control their speech,
Wise men who control their thoughts, such men are indeed well controlled.
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Jetavana with reference to a certain killer of cows.
At Sāvatthi, so we are told, lived a certain killer of cows. He would kill cows, select the choicest portions of their flesh for his own table, cause the same to be cooked, and then sit down with son and wife and eat the same; the rest he sold for a price.
For fifty-five years he kept up this practice of killing cows. During all this time, although the Teacher resided at a neighboring monastery, on no occasion did he give the Teacher so much as a spoonful of rice-gruel or boiled rice by way of alms.
Unless he had meat to eat, he never ate rice.
recited the Jarā Sutta, as 
One day while it was still light, after selling some beef, he gave his wife a piece of beef to cook for his supper, and then went to the pool to bathe.
While he was absent, a friend of his came to the house and said to his wife, “Let me have a little of the beef which your husband has for sale; a guest has come to my house.”
“We have no beef for sale. Your friend has sold all his beef and has gone to the pool to bathe.”
“Do not refuse my request; if you have a piece of beef in the house, give it to me.”
“There is not a piece of beef in the house, except a piece which your friend has set aside for his own supper.”
Thought the friend of the cow-killer, “If there is not a piece of beef in the house except a piece which my friend has set aside for his own supper, and if he will not eat unless he can have meat to eat, he will certainly not give me this piece of beef.” So he took the piece of beef himself and went off with it.
After the cow-killer had bathed, he returned home. When his wife set before him rice which she had boiled for him, seasoned with leaves of her own cooking, he said to her, “Where is the meat?”
“Husband, there is none.”
“Did I not give you meat to cook before I left the house?”
A friend of yours came to the house and said to me, ‘A guest has come to my house; let me have a little of the beef which you have for sale.’ I said to him, ‘There is not a piece of beef in the house, except a piece which your friend has set aside for his own supper, and he will not eat unless he can have meat to eat.’ But in spite of what I said to him, he took the piece of beef himself and went off with it.”
“Unless I have meat to eat with it, I will not eat rice; take it away.”
“What is to be done, husband? Pray eat the rice.”
“That I will not.” Having caused his wife to remove the rice, he took a knife in his hand and left the house. Now an ox was tethered in the rear of his house. The man went up to the ox, thrust his hand into the mouth of the ox, jerked out his tongue, cut it off at the root with his knife, and returned to the house with it. Having had it cooked on a bed of coals, he placed it on the boiled rice and sat down to eat his supper. He first ate a mouthful of rice, and then placed a piece of meat in his mouth.
That very moment his own tongue was cleft in twain and fell out of his mouth into the dish of rice.
That very moment he received retribution similar in kind to the sin which he had committed.
With a stream of blood flowing from his mouth, he entered the court of his house and crawled about on his hands and knees, bellowing just like an ox.
At this time the cow-killer’s son stood close by, watching his father.
His mother said to him, “Son, behold this cow-killer crawling about the court of the house on his hands and knees, bellowing like an ox. This punishment is likely to fall upon your own head. Pay no attention to me, but seek safety in flight.”
The son, terrified by the fear of death, bade farewell to his mother and fled.Having made good his escape, he went to Takkasilā.
As for the cow-killer, after he had crawled about the court of the house for a time, bellowing like an ox, he died, and was reborn in the Avīci Hell.
The ox also died.
Having gone to Takkasilā, the cow-killer’s son became apprenticed to a goldsmith.
One day his master, as he set out for the village, said to him, “You are to make such and such an ornament.”So saying, his master departed.
The apprentice made the ornament according to the directions he received.
hen his master returned and looked at the ornament, he thought to himself, “No matter where this youth may go, he will be able to earn his living anywhere.”
So when the apprentice came of age, the goldsmith gave him his daughter in marriage.
He increased with sons and daughters. When his sons came of age, they acquired the various arts, and subsequently going to Sāvatthi to live, established households of their own, and became faithful followers of the Buddha.
Their father remained in Takkasilā, spent his days without performing a single work of merit, аnd finally reached old age.
His sons thought to themselves, “Our father is now an old man,” and sent for him to come and live with them. Then they thought to themselves, “Let us give alms in behalf of our father.” Accordingly they invited the Congregation of Monks presided over by the Buddha to take a meal with them.
On the following day they provided seats in their house for the Congregation of Monks presided over by the Buddha, served them with food, showing them every attention, and at the conclusion of the meal said to the Teacher, “Reverend Sir, this food which we have presented to you is the food whereby our father lives; render thanks therefor to our father.”
The Teacher thereupon addressed him and said, “Lay disciple, you are an old man. Your body has ripened and is like a withered leaf. You have no good works to serve as provisions for the journey to the world beyond. Make for yourself a refuge. Be wise; be not a simpleton.” Thus spoke the Teacher, pronouncing the words of thanksgiving; and having thus spoken, pronounced the following Stanzas,
Now art thou as a withered leaf;
death’s messengers await thee;
Thou standest at the point of departure;
thou hast no provisions for the journey.
Make for thyself an island;
haste thee to struggle; be wise;
When thy infirmities have been blown away, and thou hast freed thyself from the evil passions,
thou shalt go to the heavenly place of the Elect.
At the conclusion of the lesson the lay disciple was established in the Fruit of Conversion; the assembled company also profited by the lesson.
They invited the Teacher also for the following day and gave alms to him. When the Teacher had finished his meal, and it was time for him to pronounce the words of thanksgiving, they said to him, “Reverend Sir, this food which we have presented to you is the food whereby our father lives; render thanks therefor to him alone.”
So the Teacher thanked him, pronouncing the two following Stanzas,
Thy life is now brought to a close;
thou art come into the presence of Death;
Thou hast no abiding-place by the way;
thou hast no provisions for the journey.
Make for thyself an island;
haste thee to struggle; be wise.
When thy infirmities have been blown away, and thou hast freed thyself from the evil passions,
thou shalt no more come unto birth and old age.
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Jetavana with reference to a certain Brahman.
The story goes that early one morning this Brahman went out of the city, stopped at the place where the monks put on their robes, and stood and watched them as they put on their robes.
Now this place was thickly overgrown with grass.
As one of the monks put on his robe, the skirt of the robe dragged through the grass and became wet with drops of dew.
Thought the Brahman, “The grass should be cleared away from this place.” So on the following day he took his mattock, went thither, cleared the place, and made it as clean and smooth as a threshing-floor.
The day after, he went to that place again. As the monks put on their robes, he observed that the skirt of the robe of one of the monks dropped to the ground and dragged in the dust. Thought the Brahman, “Sand should be sprinkled here.” So he brought sand and sprinkled it on the ground
Now one day before breakfast the heat was intense. On this occasion he noticed that as the monks put on their robes, sweat poured from their bodies. Thought the Brahman, “Here I ought to cause a pavilion to be erected.” Accordingly he caused a pavilion to be erected.
Again one day, early in the morning, it rained.
On this occasion also, as the Brahman watched the monks, he noticed that their robes were wetted by the drops of rain. Thought the Brahman, “Here I ought to cause a hall to be erected.” So there he caused a hall to be erected. When the hall was finished, he thought to himself, “Now I will hold a festival in honor of the completion of the hall.” Accordingly he invited the Congregation of Monks presided over by the Buddha, seated the monks within and without the hall, and gave alms.At the conclusion of the meal he took the Teacher’s bowl to permit him to pronounce the words of thanksgiving. “Reverend Sir,” said he, “as I stood in this place when the monks were putting on their robes and watched them, I saw this and that, and I did this and that.” And beginning at the beginning, he told the Teacher the whole story.
The Teacher listened to his words and then said, “Brahman, a wise man by doing good works, time after time, little by little, gradually removes the stains of his own evil deeds.” So saying, he pronounced the following Stanza,
One after another, little by little, time after time, a wise man
Should blow away his own impurities, even as a smith blows away the impurities of silver.
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Jetavana with reference to a monk named Elder Tissa.
The story goes that a certain youth of respectable family, who lived at Sāvatthi, retired from the world, became a monk, and made his full profession, becoming known as Elder Tissa.
Subsequently, while he was in residence at a monastery in the country, he received a coarse cloth eight cubits in length. Having completed residence, he celebrated the Terminal Festival, and taking his cloth with him, went home and placed it in the hands of his sister.
Thought his sister, “This robe-cloth is not suited to my brother.” So with a sharp knife she cut it into strips, pounded them in a mortar, whipped and beat and cleaned the shoddy, and, spinning fine yarn, had it woven into a robe-cloth.
The Elder procured thread and needles, and assembling some young monks and novices who were skilled makers of robes, went to his sister and said, “Give me that cloth; I will have a robe made out of it.”
She took down a robe-cloth nine cubits in length and placed it in the hands of her youngest brother.
He took it, spread it out, and said, “My robe-cloth was a coarse one, eight cubits long, but this is a fine one, nine cubits long.
This is not mine; it is yours. I don’t want it. Give me the same one I gave you.”
“Reverend Sir, this cloth is yours; take it.”
He refused to do so.
Then his sister told him everything she had done and gave him the cloth again, saying, “Reverend Sir, this one is yours; take it.”
Finally he took it, went to the monastery and set the robe-makers to work.
His sister prepared rice-gruel, boiled rice, and other provisions for the robe-makers,
and on the day when the cloak was finished, gave them an extra allowance.
Tissa looked at the robe and took a liking to it. Said he, “To-morrow I will wear this robe as an upper garment.” So he folded it and laid it on the bamboo rack. During the night, unable to digest the food he had eaten, he died, and was reborn as a louse in that very robe.
When his sister learned that he was dead, she flung herself at the feet of the monks, rolled on the ground, and wept.
When the monks had performed the funeral rites over his body, they said,
“Since there was no one to attend him in his sickness, this robe belongs to the Congregation of Monks; let us divide it among us.”
Thereupon that louse screamed, “These monks are plundering my property!” And thus screaming, he ran this way and that.
The Teacher, even as he sat in the Perfumed Chamber, heard that sound by Supernatural Audition, and said to Elder Ānanda, “Ānanda, tell them to lay aside Tissa’s robe for seven days.”
The Elder caused this to be done.
At the end of seven days that louse died and was reborn in the Abode of the Tusita gods.
On the eighth day the Teacher issued the following order, “Let the monks now divide Tissa’s robe and take their several portions.”
The monks did so.
Having so done, the monks began the following discussion: “Why was it that the Teacher caused Tissa’s robe to be put aside for seven days, and on the eighth day permitted us to divide it among us and take our several portions?”
The Teacher approached and asked, “Monks, what are you discussing now as you sit here all gathered together?” When they told him, he said, “Monks, Tissa was reborn as a louse in his own robe. When you set about to divide the robe among you, he screamed, ‘They are plundering my property.’
And thus screaming, he ran this way and that. Had you taken his robe, he would have cherished a grudge against you, and because of this sin would have been reborn in Hell. That is the reason why I directed that the robe should be laid aside.
But now he has been reborn in the Abode of the Tusita gods, and for this reason I have permitted you to take the robe and divide it among you.” Again said the monks, “Reverend Sir, a grievous matter indeed is this thing which is called Craving.” “Yes, monks,” replied the Teacher, “Craving is indeed a grievous matter among living beings here in the world.
Even as rust which springs from iron eats away the iron and corrodes it and renders it useless, so also this thing which is called Craving, when it arises among living beings here in the world, causes these same living beings to be reborn in Hell and plunges them to ruin.” So saying, the Teacher pronounced the following Stanza,
Even as rust which springs from iron
no sooner appears than it eats away the iron,
Precisely so in the case of transgressors,
their own evil deeds bring them to an evil end.
Then, seated in the midst of the Sangha of bhikkhus, the venerable Bakkula attained final Nibbana.1172
That seated in the midst of the Sangha of bhikkhus, the venerable Bakkula attained final Nibbana - this too we remember as a wonderful and marvellous quality of the venerable Bakkulla.1173
ever having cut a robe with a cutter…
…this too we remember as a wonderful and marvellous quality of the venerable Bakkula.
ever having entered upon residence for the Rains in a resting place inside a village.”
THUS HAVE I HEARD.1145 On one occasion the Blessed One was living in the Sakyan country at Kapilavatthu in Nigrodha’s Park.
Then, when it was morning, the Blessed One dressed, and taking his bowl and outer robe, went into Kapilavatthu for alms.
Now on that occasion there were many resting places prepared in Kalakhemaka the Sakyan’s dwelling.1146
Do many bhikkhus live there?”
Now on that occasion the venerable Ananda, along with many bhikkhus, was busy making robes at Ghata the Sakyan’s dwelling.
Then, when it was evening, the Blessed One rose from retreat and went to Ghata the Sakyan’s dwelling. There he sat down on a seat made ready
Do many bhikkhus live there?”1147
“Venerable sir, many resting places have been prepared in Kalakhemaka the Sakyan’s dwelling.
Many bhikkhus are living there.
This is our time for making robes, venerable sir.”1148
“Ananda, a bhikkhu does not shine by delighting in company, by taking delight in company, by devoting himself to delight in company; by delighting in society, by taking delight in society, by rejoicing in society.
Indeed, Ananda, it is not possible that a bhikkhu who delights in company, takes delight in company, and devotes himself to delight in company, who delights in society, takes delight in society, and rejoices in society, will ever obtain at will, without trouble or difficulty, the bliss of renunciation, the bliss of seclusion, the bliss of peace, the bliss of enlightenment.”1149
But it can be expected that when a bhikkhu lives alone, withdrawn from society, he will obtain at will, without trouble or difficulty, the bliss of renunciation, the bliss of seclusion, the bliss of peace, the bliss of enlightenment.
“Indeed, Ananda, it is not possible that a bhikkhu who delights in company, takes delight in company, and devotes himself to delight in company, who delights in society, takes delight in society, and rejoices in society, will ever enter upon and abide in either the deliverance of mind that is temporary and delectable or in the deliverance of mind that is perpetual and unshakeable.1150
“I do not see even a single kind of form, Ananda, from the change and alteration of which there would not arise sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair in one who lusts for it and takes delight in it.
“However, Ananda, there is this abiding discovered by the Tathagata: to enter and abide in voidness internally by giving no attention to all signs.1151
“Therefore, Ananda, if a bhikkhu should wish: ‘May I enter upon and abide in voidness internally’ he should steady his mind internally, quiet it, bring it to singleness, and concentrate it.
And how does he steady his mind internally, quiet it, bring it to singleness, and concentrate it?
“Here, Ananda, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the first jhana… the second jhana…the third jhana…the fourth jhana, which has neither-pain-nor-pleasure and purity of mindfulness due to equanimity.
“Then he gives attention to voidness internally.1152
While he is giving attention to voidness internally, his mind does not enter into voidness internally or acquire confidence, steadiness, and decision.
When that is so, he understands thus: ‘While I am giving attention to voidness internally, my mind does not enter into voidness internally or acquire confidence, steadiness, and decision.’
In this way he has full awareness of that.
“He gives attention to voidness externally…He gives attention to voidness internally and externallyHe gives attention to imperturbability.1153
When that is so, he understands thus: ‘While I am giving attention to imperturbability, my mind does not enter into imperturbability or acquire confidence, steadiness, and decision.’
In this way he has full awareness of that.
“Then that bhikkhu should steady his mind internally, quiet it, bring it to singleness, and concentrate it on that same sign of concentration as before.1154
While he is giving attention to voidness internally, his mind enters into voidness internally and acquires confidence, steadiness, and decision.
When that is so, he understands thus: ‘While I am giving attention to voidness internally, my mind enters into voidness internally and acquires confidence, steadiness, and decision.’
In this way he has full awareness of that.
“He gives attention to voidness externally…He gives attention to voidness internally and externally…He gives attention to imperturbability.
While he is giving attention to imperturbability, his mind enters into imperturbability and acquires confidence, steadiness, and decision.
When that is so, he understands thus: ‘While I am giving attention to imperturbability, my mind enters into imperturbability and acquires confidence, steadiness, and decision.’
In this way he has full awareness of that.
“When a bhikkhu abides thus, if his mind inclines to walking, he walks, thinking: ‘While I am walking thus, no evil unwholesome states of covetousness and grief will beset me.’
In this way he has full awareness of that.
And when a bhikkhu abides thus, if his mind inclines to standing, he stands…
In this way he has full awareness of that.
“When a bhikkhu abides thus, if his mind inclines to talking, he resolves: ‘Such talk as is low, vulgar, coarse, ignoble, unbeneficial, and which does not lead to disenchantment, dispassion, cessation, peace, direct knowledge, enlightenment, and Nibbana, that is, talk of kings, robbers, ministers, armies, dangers, battles, food, drink, clothing, beds, garlands, perfumes, relatives, vehicles, villages, towns, cities, countries, women, heroes, streets, wells, the dead, trivialities, the origin of the world, the origin of the sea, whether things are so or are not so: such talk I shall not utter.’
In this way he has full awareness of that.
“But he resolves: ‘Such talk as deals with effacement, as favours the mind’s release, and which leads to complete disenchantment, dispassion, cessation, peace, direct knowledge, enlightenment, and Nibbana, that is, talk on wanting little, on contentment, seclusion, aloofness from society, arousing energy, virtue, concentration, wisdom, deliverance, knowledge and vision of deliverance: such talk I shall utter.’
In this way he has full awareness of that.
“When a bhikkhu abides thus, if his mind inclines to thinking, he resolves: ‘Such thoughts as are low, vulgar, coarse, ignoble, unbeneficial, and which do not lead to disenchantment, dispassion, cessation, peace, direct knowledge, enlightenment, and Nibbana, that is, thoughts of sensual desire, thoughts of ill will, and thoughts of cruelty: such thoughts I shall not think.’
In this way he has full awareness of that.
“But he resolves: ‘Such thoughts as are noble and emancipating, and lead the one who practises in accordance with them to the complete destruction of suffering, that is, thoughts of renunciation, thoughts of nonill will, and thoughts of non-cruelty: such thoughts I shall think.’
In this way he has full awareness of that.
“Ananda, there are these five cords of sensual pleasure.1155
Forms cognizable by the eye that are wished for, desired, agreeable, and likeable, connected with sensual desire and provocative of lust. Sounds cognizable by the ear…Odours cognizable by the nose…Flavours cognizable by the tongue… Tangibles cognizable by the body that are wished for, desired, agreeable, and likeable, connected with sensual desire and provocative of lust. These are the five cords of sensual pleasure. 15. “Herein a bhikkhu should constantly review his own mind thus: ‘Does any mental excitement concerning these five cords of sensual pleasure ever arise in me on any occasion?”
If, on reviewing his mind, the bhikkhu understands: ‘Mental excitement concerning these five cords of sensual pleasure does arise in me on certain occasions,’ then he understands: ‘Desire and lust for the five cords of sensual pleasure are unabandoned in me.’
In this way he has full awareness of that.
But if, on reviewing his mind, the bhikkhu understands: ‘No mental excitement concerning these five cords of sensual pleasure arises in me on any occasion,’ then he understands: ‘Desire and lust for the five cords of sensual pleasure are abandoned in me.’
In this way he has full awareness of that.
“Ananda, there are these five aggregates affected by clinging,1156 in regard to which a bhikkhu should abide contemplating rise and fall thus: ‘Such is material form, such its arising, such its disappearance; such is feeling, such its arising, such its disappearance; such is perception, such its arising, such its disappearance; such are formations, such their arising, such their disappearance; such is consciousness, such its arising, such its disappearance.’
“When he abides contemplating rise and fall in these five aggregates affected by clinging, the conceit ‘I am’ based on these five aggregates affected by clinging is abandoned in him.
When that is so, that bhikkhu understands: ‘The conceit “I am” based on these five aggregates affected by clinging is abandoned in me.’
In that way he has full awareness of that.
“These states have an entirely wholesome basis; they are noble, supramundane, and inaccessible to the Evil One.
“What do you think, Ananda? What good does a disciple see that he should seek the Teacher’s company even if he is told to go away?”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One, guided by the Blessed One, have the Blessed One as their resort.
It would be good if the Blessed One would explain the meaning of these words.
Having heard it from the Blessed One, the bhikkhus will remember it.”
“Ananda, a disciple should not seek the Teacher’s company for the sake of discourses, stanzas, and expositions.
Why is that?
For a long time, Ananda, you have learned the teachings, remembered them, recited them verbally, examined them with the mind, and penetrated them well by view.
But such talk as deals with effacement, as favours the mind’s release, and which leads to complete disenchantment, dispassion, cessation, peace, direct knowledge, enlightenment, and Nibbana, that is, talk on wanting little, on contentment, seclusion, aloofness from society, arousing energy, virtue, concentration, wisdom, deliverance, knowledge and vision of deliverance: for the sake of such talk a disciple should seek the Teacher’s company even if he is told to go away.
“Since this is so, Ananda, a teacher’s undoing may come about, a pupil’s undoing may come about, and the undoing of one who lives the holy life may come about.1157
Here some teacher resorts to a secluded resting place: the forest, the root of a tree, a mountain, a ravine, a hillside cave, a charnel ground, a jungle thicket, an open space, a heap of straw.
While he lives thus withdrawn, brahmins and householders from town and country visit him,
This teacher is said to be undone by the teacher’s undoing.
He has been struck down by evil unwholesome states that defile, bring renewal of being, give trouble, ripen in suffering, and lead to future birth, ageing, and death.
This is how the teacher’s undoing comes about.
“And how does a pupil’s undoing come about?
A pupil of that teacher, emulating the teacher’s seclusion, resorts to a secluded resting place: the forest…a heap of straw.
While he lives thus withdrawn, brahmins and householders from town and country visit him,
This pupil is said to be undone by the pupil’s undoing.
He has been struck down by evil unwholesome states that defile, bring renewal of being, give trouble, ripen in suffering, and lead to future birth, ageing, and death.
This is how the pupil’s undoing comes about.
“And how does the undoing of one who lives the holy life come about?
Here a Tathagata appears in the world, accomplished and fully enlightened, perfect in true knowledge and conduct, sublime, knower of worlds, incomparable leader of persons to be tamed, teacher of gods and humans, enlightened, blessed.
He resorts to a secluded resting place: the forest…a heap of straw.
While he lives thus withdrawn, brahmins and householders from town and country visit him,
But a disciple of this teacher, emulating his teacher’s seclusion, resorts to a secluded resting place: the forest…a heap of straw.
While he lives thus withdrawn, brahmins and householders from town and country visit him,
This one who lives the holy life is said to be undone by the undoing of one who lives the holy life.
He has been struck down by evil unwholesome states that defile, bring renewal of being, give trouble, ripen in suffering, and lead to future birth, ageing, and death.
Thus there comes to be the undoing of one who leads the holy life.
And herein, Ananda, the undoing of one who leads the holy life has a more painful result, a more bitter result, than the teacher’s undoing or the pupil’s undoing, and it even leads to perdition.1158
That will lead to your welfare and happiness for a long time.
And how do disciples behave towards the Teacher with hostility, not with friendliness?
Here, Ananda, compassionate and seeking their welfare, the Teacher teaches the Dhamma to the disciples out of compassion: “This is for your welfare, this is for your happiness.’
His disciples do not want to hear or give ear or exert their minds to understand; they err and turn aside from the Teacher’s Dispensation.
Thus do disciples behave towards the Teacher with hostility, not with friendliness.
“And how do disciples behave towards the Teacher with friendliness, not with hostility?
Here, Ananda, compassionate and seeking their welfare, the Teacher teaches the Dhamma to the disciples out of compassion: “This is for your welfare, this is for your happiness.’
His disciples want to hear and give ear and exert their minds to understand; they “do not err and turn aside from the Teacher’s Dispensation.
Thus do disciples behave towards the Teacher with friendliness, not with hostility.
Therefore, Ananda, behave towards me with friendliness, not with hostility.
That will lead to your welfare and happiness for a long time.
“I shall not treat you as the potter treats the raw damp clay.
Repeatedly restraining you, I shall speak to you, Ananda. Repeatedly admonishing you, I shall speak to you, Ananda.
The sound core will stand the test.”1159
That is what the Blessed One said.
The venerable Ananda was satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
When he had wandered for alms in Kapilavatthu and had returned from his almsround, after his meal he went for his day-time abiding to the dwelling of Kalakhemaka the Sakyan.
When the Blessed One saw this,
he thought: “There are many resting places prepared in Kalakhemaka the Sakyan’s dwelling.
and asked the venerable Ananda: “Ananda, there are many resting places prepared in Kalakhemaka the Sakyan’s dwelling.
But it can be expected that when a bhikkhu lives alone, withdrawn from society, he will enter upon and abide in the deliverance of mind that is temporary and delectable or in the deliverance of mind that is perpetual and unshakeable.
If, while the Tathagata is abiding thus, he is visited by bhikkhus or bhikkhunls, by men or women lay followers, by kings or kings’ ministers, by other sectarians or their disciples,
then with a mind leaning to seclusion, tending and inclining to seclusion, withdrawn, delighting in renunciation, and altogether done with things that are the basis for taints, he invariably talks to them in a way concerned with dismissing them.
That is how a bhikkhu steadies his mind internally, quiets it, brings it to singleness, and concentrates it.
While he is giving attention to imperturbability, his mind does not enter into imperturbability or acquire confidence, steadiness, and decision.
Then he gives attention to voidness internally.
“Bulls first, and trees.“—This story was told by the Master while at Jetavana about sixteen wonderful dreams.
For in the last watch of one night the King of Kosala, who had been asleep all the night, dreamed sixteen great dreams, and woke up in great fright and alarm as to what they might portend for him. So strong was the fear of death upon him that he could not stir, but lay there huddled up on his bed.
Now, when the night grew light, his brahmins and chaplains came to him and with due obeisance asked whether his majesty had slept well.
“How could I sleep well, my directors?” answered the king. “For just at daybreak I dreamed sixteen wonderful dreams, and I have been in terror ever since! Tell me, my directors, what it all means.”
“We shall be able to judge, on hearing them.” Then the king told them his dreams, and asked what those visions would entail upon him.
The brahmins fell a-wringing their hands!
Why wring your hands, brahmins?” asked the king. “Because, sire, these are evil dreams.”
“What will come of them?” said the king.
“One of three calamities,—harm to your kingdom, to your life, or to your riches.”
“Is there a remedy, or is there not?”
Undoubtedly these dreams in themselves are so threatening as to be without remedy; but none the less we will find a remedy for them. Otherwise, what boots our much study and learning?”
“What then do you propose to do to avert the evil?”
“Wherever four roads meet, we would offer sacrifice, sire.”
“My directors,” cried the king in his terror, “my life is in your hands; make haste and work my safety.”
“Large sums of money, and large supplies of food of every kind will be ours,” thought the exultant brahmins; and, bidding the king have no fear, they departed from the palace. Outside the town they dug a sacrificial pit and collected a host of fourfooted creatures, perfect and without blemish, and a multitude of birds. But still they discovered something lacking, and back they kept coming to the king to ask for this that and the other.
Now their doings were watched by Queen Mallikā, who came to the king and asked what made these brahmins keep coming to him.
“I envy you,” said the king; “a snake in your ear, and you not to know of it!”
“What does your majesty mean?”
“I have dreamed, oh such unlucky dreams! The brahmins tell me they point to one of three calamities; and they are anxious to offer sacrifices to avert the evil. And this is what brings them here so often.”
“But has your majesty consulted the Chief Brahmin both of this world and of the world of devas?”
“Who, pray, may he be, my dear?” asked the king.
“Know you not that chiefest personage of all the world, the all-knowing and pure, the spotless master-brahmin?
Surely, he, the Blessed One, will understand your dreams. Go, ask him.”
“And so I will, my queen,” said the king. And away he went to the monastery, saluted the Master, and sat down.
“What, pray, brings your majesty here so early in the morning?” asked the Master in his sweet tones.
“Sir,” said the king, “just before daybreak I dreamed sixteen wonderful dreams, which so terrified me that I told them to the brahmins.
They told me that my dreams boded evil, and that to avert the threatened calamity they must offer sacrifice wherever four roads met. And so they are busy with their preparations, and many living creatures have the fear of death before their eyes. But I pray you, who are the chiefest personage in the world of men and devas, you into whose ken comes all possible knowledge of things past and present and to be,
I pray you tell me what will come of my dreams, O Blessed One.”
“True it is, sire, that there is none other save me, who can tell what your dreams signify or what will come of them.I will tell you. Only first of all relate to me your dreams as they appeared to you.”
“I will, sir,” said the king, and at once began this list, following the order of the dreams’ appearance:—
Bulls first, and trees, and cows, and calves,
“How was it, sir, that I had the following one of my dreams? Methought, four black bulls, like collyrium in hue, came from the four cardinal directions to the royal courtyard with avowed intent to fight; and people flocked together to see the bull-fight, till a great crowd had gathered. But the bulls only made a show of fighting, roared and bellowed, and finally went off without fighting at all.
This was my first dream. What will come of it?”
“Sire, that dream shall have no issue in your days or in mine. But hereafter, when kings shall be niggardly and unrighteous, and when folk shall be unrighteous, in days when the world is perverted, when good is waning and evil waxing apace,—in those days of the world’s backsliding there shall fall no rain from the heavens, the feet of the storm shall be lamed, the crops shall wither, and famine shall be on the land. Then shall the clouds gather as if for rain from the four quarters of the heavens; there shall be haste first to carry indoors the rice and crops that the women have spread in the sun to dry, for fear the harvest should get wet; and then with spade and basket in hand the men shall go forth to bank up the dykes. As though in sign of coming rain, the thunder shall bellow, the lightning shall flash from the clouds,—but even as the bulls in your dream, that fought not, so the clouds shall flee away without raining.
This is what shall come of this dream.
But no harm shall come therefrom to you; for it was with regard to the future that you dreamed this dream. What the brahmins told you, was said only to get themselves a livelihood.” And when the Master had thus. told the fulfilment of this dream, he said, “Tell me your second dream, sire.”
“Sir,” said the king, “my second dream was after this manner:—Methought little tiny trees and shrubs burst through the soil, and when they had grown scarce a span or two high, they flowered and bore fruit!
This was my second dream; what shall come of it?”
“Sire,” said the Master, “this dream shall have its fulfilment in days when the world has fallen into decay and when men are shortlived.
“Sire,” said the Master, “this dream shall have its fulfilment in days when the world has fallen into decay and when men are shortlived. In times to come the passions shall be strong; quite young girls shall go to live with men, and it shall be with them after the manner of women, they shall conceive and bear children.
The flowers typify their issues, and the fruit their offspring.
But you, sire, have nothing to fear therefrom. Tell me your third dream, O great king.”
“Methought, sir, I saw cows sucking the milk of calves which they had borne that selfsame day.
This was my third dream. What shall come of it?”
“This dream too shall have its fulfilment only in days to come, when respect shall cease to be paid to age.
For in the future men, shewing no reverence for parents or parents-in-law, shall themselves administer the family estate, and, if such be their good pleasure, shall bestow food and clothing on the old folks, but shall withhold their gifts, if it be not their pleasure to give.
Then shall the old folks, destitute and dependent, exist by favour of their own children, like big cows suckled by calves a day old.
But you have nothing to fear therefrom. Tell me your fourth dream.”
“Methought, sir, I saw men unyoking a team of draught-oxen, sturdy and strong, and setting young steers to draw the load;
and the steers, proving unequal to the task laid on them, refused and stood stock-still, so that wains moved not on their way.
This was my fourth dream. What shall come of it?”
“Here again the dream shall not have its fulfilment until the future, in the days of unrighteous kings.
For in days to come, unrighteous and niggardly kings shall shew no honour to wise lords skilled in precedent, fertile in expedient, and able to get through business;
nor shall appoint to the courts of law and justice aged councillors of wisdom and of learning in the law. Nay, they shall honour the very young and foolish, and appoint such to preside in the courts. And these latter, ignorant alike of state-craft and of practical knowledge, shall not be able to bear the burthen of their honours or to govern,
but because of their incompetence shall throw off the yoke of office. Whereon the aged and wise lords, albeit right able to cope with all difficulties, shall keep in mind how they were passed over, and shall decline to aid, saying:—‘It is no business of ours; we are outsiders; let the boys of the inner circle see to it.’ Hence they shall stand aloof, and ruin shall assail those kings on every hand. It shall be even as when the yoke was laid on the young steers, who were not strong enough for the burthen, and not upon the team of sturdy and strong draught-oxen, who alone were able to do the work.
Howbeit, you have nothing to fear therefrom. Tell me your fifth dream.”
“Methought, sir, I saw a horse with a mouth on either side, to which fodder was given on both sides, and it ate with both its mouths.
This was my fifth dream. What shall come of it?”
“This dream too shall have its fulfilment only in the future, in the days of unrighteous and foolish kings,
who shall appoint unrighteous and covetous men to be judges. These base ones, fools, despising the good, shall take bribes from both sides as they sit in the seat of judgment, and shall be filled with this two-fold corruption, even as the horse that ate fodder with two mouths at once.
Howbeit, you have nothing to fear therefrom. Tell me your sixth dream.”
“Methought, sir, I saw people holding out a well-scoured golden bowl worth a hundred thousand pieces, and begging an old jackal to stale therein. And I saw the beast do so.
This was my sixth dream. What shall come of it?
“This dream too shall only have its fulfilment in the future.
“This dream too shall only have its fulfilment in the future. For in the days to come, unrighteous kings, though sprung of a race of kings, mistrusting the scions of their old nobility, shall not honour them, but exalt in their stead the low-born;
whereby the nobles shall be brought low and the law-born raised to lordship.
Then shall the great families be brought by very need to seek to live by dependence on the upstarts, and shall offer them their daughters in marriage. And the union of the noble maidens with the low-born shall be like unto the staling of the old jackal in the golden bowl.
Howbeit, you have nothing to fear therefrom. Tell me your seventh dream.”
“A man was weaving rope, sir, and as he wove, he threw it down at his feet. Under his bench lay a hungry she jackal, which kept eating the rope as he wove, but without the man knowing it. This is what I saw.
This was my seventh dream. What shall come of it?”
“This dream too shall not have its fulfilment till the future.
For in days to come, women shall lust after men and strong drink and finery and gadding abroad and after the joys of this world. In their wickedness and profligacy these women shall drink strong drink with their paramours; they shall flaunt in garlands and perfumes and unguents; and heedless of even the most pressing of their household duties, they shall keep watching for their paramours, even at crevices high up in the outer wall; aye, they shall pound up the very seed-corn that should be sown on the morrow so as to provide good cheer;—in all these ways shall they plunder the store won by the hard work of their husbands in field and byre, devouring the poor men’s substance even as the hungry jackal under the bench ate up the rope of the rope-maker as he wove it.
Howbeit, you have nothing to fear therefrom. Tell me your eighth dream.”
“Methought, sir, I saw at a palace gate a big pitcher which was full to the brim and stood amid a number of empty ones.
And from the four cardinal points, and from the four intermediate points as well, there kept coming a constant stream of people of all the four castes, carrying water in pipkins and pouring it into the full pitcher. And the water overflowed and ran away. But none the less they still kept on pouring more and more water into the over-flowing vessel, without a single man giving so much as a glance at the empty pitchers.
This was my eighth dream. What shall come of it?”
“This dream too shall not have its fulfilment until the future.
For in days to come the world shall decay; the kingdom shall grow weak, its kings shall grow poor and niggardly;
the foremost among them shall have no more than 100,000 pieces of money in his treasury. Then shall these kings in their need set the whole of the country-folk to work for them;—for the kings’ sake shall the toiling folk, leaving their own work, sow grain and pulse, and keep watch and reap and thresh and garner; for the kings’ sake shall they plant sugar-canes, make and drive sugar-mills, and boil down the molasses; for the kings’ sake shall they lay out flower-gardens and orchards, and gather in the fruits. And as they gather in all the divers kinds of produce they shall fill the royal garners to overflowing, not giving so much as a glance at their own empty barns at home. Thus it shall be like filling up the full pitcher, heedless of the quite-empty ones.
Howbeit, you have nothing to fear therefrom. Tell me your ninth dream.”
“Methought, sir, I saw a deep pool with shelving banks all round and over-grown with the five kinds of lotuses.
From every side two-footed creatures and four-footed creatures flocked thither to drink of its waters.
The depths in the middle were muddy, but the water was clear and sparkling at the margin where the various creatures went down into the pool.
This was my ninth dream. What shall come of it?”
“This dream too shall not have its fulfilment till the future.
For in days to come kings shall grow unrighteous; they shall rule after their own will and pleasure, and shall not execute judgment according to righteousness. These kings shall hunger after riches and wax fat on bribes; they shall not shew mercy, love and compassion toward their people, but be fierce and cruel, amassing wealth by crushing their subjects like sugar-canes in a mill and by taxing them even to the uttermost farthing.
Unable to pay the oppressive tax, the people Shall fly from village and town and the like, and take refuge upon the borders of the realm; the heart of the land shall be a wilderness, while the borders shall teem with people,—even as the water was muddy in the middle of the pool and clear at the margin.
Howbeit, you have nothing to fear therefrom. Tell me your tenth dream.”
“Methought, sir, I saw rice boiling in a pot without getting done. By not getting done, I mean that it looked as though it were sharply marked off and kept apart, so that the cooking went on in three distinct stages. For part was sodden, part hard and raw, and part just cooked to a nicety.
This was my tenth dream. What shall come of it?”
“This dream too shall not have its fulfilment till the future.
For in days to come kings shall grow unrighteous; the people surrounding the kings shall grow unrighteous too, as also shall brahmins and householders, townsmen, and countryfolk; yes, all people alike shall grow unrighteous, not excepting even sages and brahmins. Next, their very tutelary deities—the spirits to whom they offer sacrifice, the spirits of the trees, and the spirits of the air—shall become unrighteous also.
The very winds that blow over the realms of these unrighteous kings shall grow cruel and lawless; they shall shake the mansions of the skies and thereby kindle the anger of the spirits that dwell there, so that they will not suffer rain to fall—or, if it does rain, it shall not fall on all the kingdom at once, nor shall the kindly shower fall on all tilled or sown lands alike to help them in their need.
And, as in the kingdom at large, so in each several district and village and over each separate pool or lake, the rain shall not fall at one and the same time on its whole expanse; if it rain on the upper part, it shall not rain upon the lower;
here the crops shall be spoiled by a heavy downpour,there wither for very drought, and here again thrive apace with kindly showers to water them.
So the crops sown within the confines of a single kingdom—like the rice in the one pot—shall have no uniform character.
Howbeit, you have nothing to fear therefrom. Tell me your eleventh dream.”
“Methought, sir, I saw sour buttermilk bartered for precious sandal-wood, worth 100,000 pieces of money.
This was my eleventh dream. What shall come of it?”
“This dream too shall not have its fulfilment till the future—in the days when my doctrine is waning.
For in days to come many greedy and shameless Brethren shall arise, who for their belly’s sake shall preach the very words in which I inveighed against greed! Because they have deserted by reason of their belly and have taken their stand on the side of the sectaries 1, they shall fail to make their preaching lead up to Nirvana. Nay, their only thought, as they preach, shall be by fine words and sweet voices to induce men to give them costly raiment and the like, and to be minded to give such gifts.
Others again seated in the highways, at the street-corners, at the doors of kings’ palaces, and so forth, shall stoop to preach for money, yea for mere coined kahāpanas, half-kahāpanas, pādas, or māsakas!
And as they thus barter away for food or raiment or for kahāpanas and half-kahāpanas my doctrine the worth whereof is Nirvana, they shall be even as those who bartered away for soar buttermilk precious sandal-wood worth 100,000 pieces.
Howbeit, you have nothing to fear therefrom. Tell me your twelfth dream.”
“Methought, sir, I saw empty pumpkins sinking in the water. What shall come of it?”
“This dream also shall not have its fulfilment till the future, in the days of unrighteous kings, when the world is perverted.
For in those days shall kings shew favour not to the scions of the nobility, but to the low-born only; and these latter shall become great lords, whilst the nobles sink into poverty.
Alike in the royal presence, in the palace gates, in the council chamber, and in the courts of justice, the words of the low-born alone shall be stablished, as though they had sunk down till they rested on the bottom.
So too in the assemblies of the Brotherhood, in the greater and lesser conclaves, and in enquiries regarding bowls, robes, lodging, and the like,—the counsel only of the wicked and the vile shall be considered to have saving power, not that of the modest Brethren. Thus everywhere it shall be as when the empty pumpkins sank.
Howbeit, you have Nothing to fear therefrom. Tell me your thirteenth dream.”
Hereupon the king said, “Methought, sir, I saw huge blocks of solid rock, as big as houses, floating like ships upon the waters. What shall come of it?”
“This dream also shall not have its fulfilment before such times as those of which I have spoken.
For in those days unrighteous kings shall shew honour to the low-born, who shall become great lords, whilst the nobles sink into poverty.
Not to the nobles, but to the upstarts alone shall respect be paid.
In the royal presence, in the council chamber, or in the courts of justice, the words of the nobles learned in the law shall drift idly by, and not sink deep into the hearts of men;
when they speak, the upstarts shall merely laugh them to scorn, saying, ‘What is this these fellows are saying?’
So too in the assemblies of the Brethren, as afore said, men shall not deem worthy of respect the excellent among the Brethren; the words of such shall not sink deep, but drift idly by,—even as when the rocks floated upon the waters.
Howbeit, you have nothing to fear therefrom. Tell me your fourteenth dream.”
“Methought, sir, I saw tiny frogs, no bigger than minute flowerets, swiftly pursuing huge black snakes, chopping them up like so many lotus-stalks and gobbling them up. What shall come of this?”
“This dream too shall not have its fulfilment till those days to come such as those of which I have spoken, when the world is decaying.
For then shall men’s passions be so strong, and their lusts so hot, that they shall be the thralls of the very youngest of their wives for the time being, at whose sole disposal shall be slaves and hired servants, oxen, buffalos and all cattle, gold and silver, and everything that is in the house.
Should the poor husband ask where the money or a robe is, at once he shall be told that it is where it is, that he should mind his own business, and not be so inquisitive as to what is, or is not, in her house. And therewithal in divers ways the wives with abuse and goading taunts shall establish their dominion over their husbands, as over slaves and bond-servants.
Thus shall it be like as when the tiny frogs, no bigger than minute flowerets, gobbled up the big black snakes.
Howbeit, you have nothing to fear therefrom. Tell me your fifteenth dream.”
“Methought, sir, I saw a village crow, in which dwelt the whole of the Ten Vices, escorted by a retinue of those birds which, because of their golden sheen, are called Royal Golden Mallards. What shall come of it?”
“This dream too shall not have its fulfilment till the future, till the reign of weakling kings.
In days to come kings shall arise who shall know nothing about elephants or other arts, and shall be cowards in the field. Fearing to be deposed and cast from their royal estate, they shall raise to power not their peers but their footmen, bath-attendants, barbers, and such like. Thus, shut out from royal favour and unable to support themselves, the nobles shall be reduced to dancing attendance on the upstarts,—as when the crow had Royal Golden Mallards for a retinue.
Howbeit, you have nothing to fear therefrom. Tell me your sixteenth dream.”
“Heretofore, sir, it always used to be panthers that preyed on goats; but methought I saw goats chasing panthers and devouring them—munch, munch, munch!
—whilst at bare sight of the goats afar off, terror-stricken wolves fled quaking with fear and hid themselves in their fastnesses in the thicket. Such was my dream. What shall come of it?”
“This dream too shall not have its fulfilment till the future, till the reign of unrighteous kings.
In those days the low-born shall be raised to lordship and be made royal favourites, whilst the nobles shall sink into obscurity and distress.
Gaining influence in the courts of law because of their favour with the king, these upstarts shall claim perforce the ancestral estates, the raiment, and all the property of the old nobility. And-when these latter plead their rights before the courts, then shall the king’s minions have them cudgelled and bastinadoed and taken by the throat and cast out with words of scorn, such as:—‘Know your place, fools! What? do you dispute with us? The king shall know of your insolence, and we will have your hands and feet chopped off and other correctives applied!’
Hereupon the terrified nobles shall affirm that their own belongings really belong to the overbearing upstarts, and will tell the favourites to accept them. And they shall hie them home and there cower in an agony of fear.
Likewise, evil Brethren shall harry at pleasure good and worthy Brethren, till these latter, finding none to help them, shall flee to the jungle.
And this oppression of the nobles and of the good Brethren by the low-born and by the evil brethren, shall be like the scaring of wolves by goats.
Howbeit, you have nothing to fear therefrom.
For this dream too has reference to future times only.
It was not truth, it was not love for you, that prompted the brahmins to prophesy as they did. No, it was greed of gain, and the insight that is bred of covetousness, that shaped all their self-seeking utterances.”
Thus did the Master expound the import of these sixteen great dreams, adding,—“You, sire, are not the first to have these dreams; they were dreamed by kings of bygone days also;
and, then as now, the brahmins found in them a pretext for sacrifices; whereupon, at the instance of the wise and good, the Bodhisatta was consulted,
and the dreams were expounded by them of old time in just the same manner as they have now been expounded.” And so saying, at the king’s request, he told this story of the past.
Once on a time when Brahmadatta was reigning in Benares, the Bodhisatta was born a brahmin in the North country. When he came to years of discretion he renounced the world for a hermit’s life; he won the higher Knowledges and the Attainments, and dwelt in the Himalaya country in the bliss that comes from Insight.
In those days, in just the same manner, Brahmadatta dreamed these dreams at Benares, and enquired of the brahmins concerning them.
And the brahmins, then as now, set to work at sacrifices.
Amongst them was a young brahmin of learning and wisdom, a pupil of the king’s chaplain, who addressed his master thus:—“Master, you have taught me the Three Vedas. Is there not therein a text that says ‘The slaying of one creature giveth not life to another’?”
“My son, this means money to us, a great deal of money. You only seem anxious to spare the king’s treasury!”
“Do as you will, master,” said the young brahmin; “as for me, to what end shall I tarry longer here with you?” And so saying, he left him, and betook himself to the royal pleasaunce.
That selfsame day the Bodhisatta, knowing all this, thought to himself: “If I visit to-day the haunts of men, I shall work the deliverance of a great multitude from their bondage.” So, passing through the air, he alighted in the royal pleasaunce and seated himself, radiant as a statue of gold, upon the Ceremonial Stone.
The young brahmin drew near and with due obeisance seated himself by the Bodhisatta in all friendliness.
Sweet converse passed; and the Bodhisatta asked whether the young brahmin thought the king ruled righteously.
“Sir,” answered the young man, “the king is righteous himself; but the brahmins make him side with evil.
Being consulted by the king as to sixteen dreams which he had dreamed,
the brahmins clutched at the opportunity for sacrifices and set to work thereon.
Oh, sir, would it not be a good thing that you should offer to make known to the king the real import of his dreams and so deliver great numbers of creatures from their dread?”
“But, my son, I do not know the king, nor he me.
Still, if he should cone here and ask me, I will tell him.”
“I will bring the king, sir,” said the young brahmin; “if you will only be so good as to wait here a minute till I come back.” And having gained the Bodhisatta’s consent, he went before the king, and said that there had alighted in the royal pleasaunce an air-travelling ascetic, who said he would expound the king’s dreams; would not his majesty relate them to this ascetic?
When the king heard this, he repaired at once to the pleasaunce with a large retinue. Saluting the ascetic, he sat down by the holy man’s side, and asked whether it was true that he knew what would come of his dreams.
“Certainly, sire,” said the Bodhisatta;
“but first let me hear the dreams as you dreamed them.”
“Readily, sir,” answered the king; and he began as follows:—
Bulls first, and trees, and cows, and calves,
And his majesty went on to tell his dreams in just the same manner as that in which King Pasenadi had described them.
“Enough,” said the Great Being; “you have nothing to fear or dread from all this.” Having thus reassured the king, and having freed a great multitude from bondage, the Bodhisatta again took up his position in mid-air, whence he exhorted the king and established him in the Five Commandments, ending with these words:—“Henceforth, O king, join not with the brahmins in slaughtering animals for sacrifice.” His teaching ended, the Bodhisatta passed straight through the air to his own abode.
And the king, remaining stedfast in the teaching he had heard, passed away after a life of alms-giving and other good works to fare according to his deserts.
His lesson ended, the Master said, “You have nothing to fear from these dreams; away with the sacrifice!” Having had the sacrifice removed, and having saved the lives of a multitude of creatures, he shewed the connexion and identified the Birth by saying, “Ānanda was the king of those days, Sāriputta the young Brahmin, and I the ascetic.”
 1, put the whole story into the First Book.)
If his mind inclines to sitting, he sits…
If his mind inclines to lying down, he lies down, thinking: ‘While I am lying down thus, no evil unwholesome states will beset me.’
What five?
Horse, dish, she-jackal, waterpot,
A crow with gay-plumed retinue, And wolves in panic-fear of goats!
And gourds that sank, and stones that swam 1, With frogs that gobbled up black snakes,
A pond, raw rice, and sandal-wood,
“And how does a teacher’s undoing come about?
Horse, dish, she-jackal, waterpot,
A pond, raw rice, and sandal-wood,
And gourds that sank, and stones that swam, and so forth,
ending up with And wolves in panic-fear of goats.
and as a result he goes astray, becomes filled with desire, succumbs to craving, and reverts to luxury.
and as a result he goes astray, becomes filled with desire, succumbs to craving, and reverts to luxury.
yet he does not go astray, or become filled with desire, succumb to craving, and revert to luxury.
and as a result he goes astray, becomes filled with desire, succumbs to craving, and reverts to luxury.
“Therefore, Ananda, behave towards me with friendliness, not with hostility.
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Savatthl in the Eastern Park, in the Palace of Migara’s Mother.
Then, when it was evening, the venerable Ananda rose from meditation, went to the Blessed One, and after paying homage to him, he sat down at one side
There, venerable sir, I heard and learned this from the Blessed One’s own lips: ‘Now, Ananda, I often abide in voidness.’1137
Did I hear that correctly, venerable sir, did I learn that correctly, attend to that correctly, remember that correctly?”
“Certainly, Ananda, you heard that correctly, learned that correctly, attended to that correctly, remembered that correctly.
As formerly, Ananda, so now too I often abide in voidness.
“Ananda, just as this Palace of Migara’s Mother is void of elephants, cattle, horses, and mares, void of gold and silver, void of the assembly of men and women, and there is present only this non-voidness, namely, the singleness dependent on the Sangha of bhikkhus; so too, a bhikkhu - not attending to the perception of village, not attending to the perception of people -attends to the singleness dependent on the perception of forest.1138
He understands thus: ‘Whatever disturbances there might be dependent on the perception of village, those are not present here; whatever disturbances there might be dependent on the perception of people, those are not present here. There is present only this amount of disturbance, namely, the singleness dependent on the perception of forest.’1139
He understands: ‘This field of perception is void of the perception of village; this field of perception is void of the perception of people. There is present only this non-voidness, namely, the singleness dependent on the perception of forest.’
Thus he regards it as void of what is not there, but as to what remains there he understands that which is present thus: ‘This is present.’
Thus, Ananda, this is his genuine, undistorted, pure descent into voidness.
“Again, Ananda, a bhikkhu - not attending to the perception of people, not attending to the perception of forest - attends to the singleness dependent on the perception of earth.2240
Just as a bull’s hide becomes free from folds when fully stretched with a hundred pegs; so too, a bhikkhu - not attending to any of the ridges and hollows of this earth, to the rivers and ravines, the tracts of stumps and thorns, the mountains and uneven places - attends to the singleness dependent on the perception of earth.
His mind enters into that perception of earth and acquires confidence, steadiness, and decision.
He understands thus: ‘Whatever disturbances there might be dependent on the perception of people, those are not present here; whatever disturbances there might be dependent on the perception of forest, those are not present here. There is present only this amount of disturbance, namely, the singleness dependent on the perception of earth.’
He understands: ‘This field of perception is void of the perception of people; this field of perception is void of the perception of forest. There is present only this non-voidness, namely, the singleness dependent on the perception of earth.’
Thus he regards it as void of what is not there, but as to what remains there he understands that which is present thus: ‘This is present.’
Thus, Ananda, this too is his genuine, undistorted, pure descent into voidness.
“Again, Ananda, a bhikkhu - not attending to the perception of forest, not attending to the perception of earth - attends to the singleness dependent on the perception of the base of infinite space.1141
He understands thus: ‘Whatever disturbances there might be dependent on the perception of forest, those are not present here; whatever disturbances there might be dependent on the perception of earth, those are not present here. There is present only this amount of disturbance, namely, the singleness dependent on the perception of the base of infinite space.’
He understands: ‘This field of perception is void of the perception of forest; this field of perception is void of the perception of earth. There is present only this non-voidness, namely, the singleness dependent on the perception of the base of infinite space.’
Thus he regards it as void of what is not there, but as to what remains there he understands that which is present thus: ‘This is present.’
Thus, Ananda, this too is his genuine, undistorted, pure descent into voidness.
“Again, Ananda, a bhikkhu - not attending to the perception of earth, not attending to the perception of the base of infinite space - attends to the singleness dependent on the perception of the base of infinite consciousness.
His mind enters into that perception of the base of infinite consciousness and acquires confidence, steadiness, and decision.
He understands thus: ‘Whatever disturbances there might be dependent on the perception of earth, those are not present here; whatever disturbances there might be dependent on the perception of the base of infinite space, those are not present here. There is present only this amount of disturbance, namely, the singleness dependent on the perception of the base of infinite consciousness.’
He understands: ‘This field of perception is void of the perception of earth; this field of perception is void of the perception of the base of infinite space. There is present only this non-voidness, namely, the singleness dependent on the perception of the base of infinite consciousness.’
Thus he regards it as void of what is not there, but as to what remains there he understands that which is present thus: ‘This is present.’
Thus, Ananda, this too is his genuine, undistorted, pure descent into voidness.
“Again, Ananda, a bhikkhu - not attending to the percepttion of the base of infinite space, not attending to the perception of the base of infinite consciousness - attends to the singleness dependent on the perception of the base of nothingness.
His mind enters into that perception of the base of nothingness and acquires confidence, steadiness, and decision.
He understands thus: ‘Whatever disturbances there might be dependent on the perception of the base of infinite space, those are not present here; whatever disturbances there might be dependent on the perception of the base of infinite consciousness, those are not present here. There is present only this amount of disturbance, namely, the singleness dependent on the perception of the base of nothingness.’
He understands: ‘This field of perception is void of the perception of the base of infinite space; this field of perception is void of the perception of the base of infinite consciousness. There is present only this non-voidness, namely, the singleness dependent on the perception of the base of nothingness.’
Thus he regards it as void of what is not there, but as to what remains there he understands that which is present thus: ‘This is present.’
Thus, Ananda, this too is his genuine, undistorted, pure descent into voidness.
“Again, Ananda, a bhikkhu - not attending to the perception of the base of infinite consciousness, not attending to the perception of the base of nothingness - attends to the singleness dependent on the perception of the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception.
His mind enters into that perception of the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception and acquires confidence, steadiness, and decision.
He understands thus: ‘Whatever disturbances there might be dependent on the perception of the base of infinite consciousness, those are not present here; whatever disturbances there might be dependent on the perception of the base of nothingness, those are not present here. There is present only this amount of disturbance, namely, the singleness dependent on the perception of the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception.’
He understands: ‘This field of perception is void of the perception of the base of infinite consciousness; this field of perception is void of the perception of the base of nothingness. There is present only this non-voidness, namely, the singleness dependent on the perception of the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception.’
Thus he regards it as void of what is not there, but as to what remains there he understands that which is present thus: ‘This is present.’
Thus, Ananda, this too is his genuine, undistorted, pure descent into voidness.
“Again, Ananda, a bhikkhu - not attending to the perception of the base of nothingness, not attending to the perception of the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception - attends to the singleness dependent on the signless concentration of mind.1142
He understand thus: ‘Whatever disturbances there might be dependent on the perception of the base of nothingness, those are not present here; whatever disturbances there might be dependent on the perception of the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception, those are not present here. There is present only this amount of disturbance, namely, that connected with the six bases that are dependent on this body and conditioned by life.’
He understands: ‘This field of perception is void of the perception of the base of nothingness; this field of perception is void of the perception of the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception. There is present only this non-voidness, namely, that connected with the six bases that are dependent on this body and conditioned by life.’
Thus he regards it as void of what is not there, but as to what remains there he understands that which is present thus: ‘This is present.’
Thus, Ananda, this too is his genuine, undistorted, pure descent into voidness.
“Again, Ananda, a bhikkhu - not attending to the perception of the base of nothingness, not attending to the perception of the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception - attends to the singleness dependent on the signless concentration of mind.
His mind enters into that signless concentration of mind and acquires confidence, steadiness, and decision.
He understands thus: ‘This signless concentration of mind is conditioned and volitionally produced.
But whatever is conditioned and volitionally produced is impermanent, subject to cessation.’1143
When he knows and sees thus, his mind is liberated from the taint of sensual desire, from the taint of being, and from the taint of ignorance.
When it is liberated there comes the knowledge: ‘It is liberated.’
He understands: ‘Birth is destroyed, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more coming to any state of being.’
“He understands thus: ‘Whatever disturbances there might be dependent on the taint of sensual desire, those are not present here; whatever disturbances there might be dependent on the taint of being, those are not present here; whatever disturbances there might be dependent on the taint of ignorance, those are not present here. There is present only this amount of disturbance, namely, that connected with the six bases that are dependent on this body and conditioned by life.’
He understands: ‘This field of perception is void of the taint of sensual desire; this field of perception is void of the taint of being; this field of perception is void of the taint of ignorance. There is present only this non-voidness, namely, that connected with the six bases that are dependent on this body and conditioned by life.’
Thus he regards it as void of what is not there, but as to what remains there he understands that which is present thus: ‘This is present.’
Thus, Ananda, this is his genuine, undistorted, pure descent into voidness, supreme and unsurpassed.1144
Whatever recluses and brahmins in the future will enter upon and abide in pure, supreme, unsurpassed voidness, all will enter upon and abide in this same pure, supreme, unsurpassed voidness.
Whatever recluses and brahmins in the present enter upon and abide in pure, supreme, unsurpassed voidness, all enter upon and abide in this same pure, supreme, unsurpassed voidness.
Therefore, Ananda, you should train thus: ‘We will enter upon and abide in pure, supreme, unsurpassed voidness.’“
That is what the Blessed One said.
The venerable Ananda was satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
and said to the Blessed One: 3. “Venerable sir, on one occasion the Blessed One was living in the Sakyan country at a town of the Sakyans named Nagaraka.
His mind enters into that perception of forest and acquires confidence, steadiness, and decision.
His mind enters into that perception of earth and acquires confidence, steadiness, and decision.
His mind enters into that perception of the base of infinite space and acquires confidence, steadiness, and decision.
His mind enters into that signless concentration of mind and acquires confidence, steadiness, and decision.
“Ananda, whatever recluses and brahmins in the past entered upon and abided in pure, supreme, unsurpassed voidness, all entered upon and abided in this same pure, supreme, unsurpassed voidness.
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Savatthl in Jeta’s Grove, Anathapindika’s Park.
There he addressed the bhikkhus thus: “Bhikkhus.”
- “Venerable sir,” they replied.
The Blessed One said this: 2. “Bhikkhus, I shall teach you reappearance in accordance with one’s aspiration.1132 Listen and attend closely to what I shall say.”
- “Yes, venerable sir,” the bhikkhus replied.
The Blessed One said this:
He fixes his mind on that, establishes it, develops it.
These aspirations and this abiding of his, thus developed and cultivated, lead to his reappearance there.
This, bhikkhus, is the path, the way that leads to reappearance there.1133
He thinks: ‘Oh, that on the dissolution of the body, after death, I might reappear in the company of well-to-do brahmins! …in the company of well-to-do householders!”
He fixes his mind on that…
“Again, a bhikkhu possesses faith…and wisdom.
He hears that the gods of the heaven of the Four Great Kings are long-lived, beautiful, and enjoy great happiness.
He thinks: ‘Oh, that on the dissolution of the body, after death, I might reappear in the company of the gods of the heaven of the Four Great Kings!”
He fixes his mind on that…
“Again, a bhikkhu possesses faith…and wisdom.
He hears that the gods of the heaven of the Thirty-three…the Yama gods…the gods of the Tusita heaven…the gods who delight in creating…the gods who wield power over others’ creations are long-lived, beautiful, and enjoy great happiness.
He thinks: ‘Oh, that on the dissolution of the body, after death, I might reappear in the company of the gods who wield power over others’ creations!”
He fixes his mind on that…
“Again, a bhikkhu possesses faith …and wisdom.
He hears that the Brahma of a Thousand is long-lived, beautiful, and enjoys great happiness.
Now the Brahma of a Thousand abides intent on pervading a world-system of a thousand worlds,
The bhikkhu thinks: ‘Oh, that on the dissolution of the body, after death, I might reappear in the company of the Brahma of a Thousand!”
He fixes his mind on that…
“Again, a bhikkhu possesses faith…and wisdom.
He hears that the Brahma of Two Thousand…the Brahma of Three Thousand…the Brahma of Four Thousand…the Brahma of Five Thousand is long-lived, beautiful, and enjoys great happiness.
Now the Brahma of Five Thousand abides intent on pervading a world-system of five thousand worlds,
Just as a man with good sight might take five gallnuts in his hand and review them, so the Brahma of Five Thousand abides intent on pervading a world-system of five thousand worlds,
The bhikkhu thinks: ‘Oh, that on the dissolution of the body, after death, I might reappear in the company of the Brahma of Five Thousand!”
He fixes his mind on that…
“Again, a bhikkhu possesses faith…and wisdom.
He hears that the Brahma of Ten Thousand is long-lived, beautiful, and enjoys great happiness.
Now the Brahma of Ten Thousand abides intent on pervading a world-system of ten thousand worlds,
Just as a fine beryl gem of purest water, eight-faceted, well cut, lying on red brocade, glows, radiates, and shines, so the Brahma of Ten Thousand abides intent on pervading a world-system of ten thousand worlds,
The bhikkhu thinks: ‘Oh, that on the dissolution of the body, after death, I might reappear in the company of the Brahma of Ten Thousand!”
He fixes his mind on that…
“Again, a bhikkhu possesses faith…and wisdom.
He hears that the Brahma of a Hundred Thousand is long-lived, beautiful, and enjoys great happiness.
Now the Brahma of a Hundred Thousand abides intent on pervading a world-system of a hundred thousand worlds,
Just as an ornament of finest gold, very skilfully wrought in the furnace by a clever goldsmith, lying on red brocade, glows, radiates, and shines, so the Brahma of a Hundred Thousand abides intent on pervading a world-system of a hundred thousand worlds,
The bhikkhu thinks: ‘Oh, that on the dissolution of the body, after death, I might reappear in the company of the Brahma of a Hundred Thousand!”
He fixes his mind on that…
“Again, a bhikkhu possesses faith…and wisdom.
He hears that the gods of Radiance1135…the gods of Limited Radiance…the gods of Immeasurable Radiance…the gods of Streaming Radiance…
He thinks: ‘Oh, that on the dissolution of the body, after death, I might reappear in the company of the Akanittha gods!”
He fixes his mind on that…
“Again, a bhikkhu possesses faith…and wisdom.
He hears that the gods of the base of infinite space…
He thinks: ‘Oh, that on the dissolution of the body, after death, I might reappear in the company of the gods of the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception!”
He fixes his mind on that, establishes it, develops it.
These aspirations and this abiding of his, thus developed and cultivated, lead to his reappearance there.
This, bhikkhus, is the path, the way that leads to reappearance there.
“Again, a bhikkhu possesses faith, virtue, learning, generosity, and wisdom.
He thinks: ‘Oh, that by realising for myself with direct knowledge, I might here and now enter upon and abide in the deliverance of mind and deliverance by wisdom that are taintless with the destruction of the taints!”
And by realising for himself with direct knowledge, he here and now enters upon and abides in the deliverance of mind and deliverance by wisdom that are taintless with the destruction of the taints.
Bhikkhus, this bhikkhu does not reappear anywhere at all.”1136
That is what the Blessed One said.
The bhikkhus were satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence in the Brahman village Pañcasālā with reference to Māra.
For one day the Teacher perceived that five hundred maidens possessed the faculties requisite for attaining the Fruit of Conversion, and therefore went and took up his residence near this village.
Now on a certain festival day those maidens went to the river and bathed, and having so done, adorned themselves with rich apparel and jewels and set out in the direction of the village.
Accordingly the Teacher also entered that village and went about the village receiving alms.
Now Māra took possession of the bodies of all the inhabitants of that village, with the result that the Teacher received not so much as a spoonful of boiled rice. As the Teacher departed from that village with bowl clean as it had been washed, Māra took his stand at the gate of that village and said to him, “Monk, you received no alms?”
“Embodiment of evil, why have you so wrought that I should receive no alms?”
“Very well, Reverend Sir, enter the village again.”
This thought, we are told, was in Māra’s mind, “If he enters the village again, I will take possession of the bodies of all the villagers and will cause them to clap their hands before his face, laugh in his face, and make all manner of fun of him.”
At that moment those maidens reached the gate of the village, and seeing the Teacher, saluted him and stood respectfully on one side.
Then said Māra to the Teacher, “Reverend Sir, seeing that you received not a morsel of food, you must be oppressed with the pangs of hunger.”
The Teacher replied, “Embodiment of evil, though to-day we received naught, yet shall we spend the day in the bliss of joy, like Great Brahmā in the Heaven of the Bright Gods.” So saying, he pronounced the following Stanza,
Oh, happily let us live! we who possess naught;
Let us live on the food of joy, like the Bright Gods.
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Jetavana with reference to the defeat of the king of Kosala.
The story goes that the king of Kosala fought against his nephew Ajātasattu near the village Kāsika and suffered defeat three times. As he returned from defeat the third time, he thought to himself, “Since I have not been able to subdue this milk-faced youth, what is the use of my living any longer?”
So he refused to eat and took to his bed.
The news of what he had done, spread throughout city and monastery.
The monks reported the matter to the Teacher, saying, “Reverend Sir, report has it that the king, who thrice suffered defeat near the village Kāsika and has just now returned from defeat, has refused to eat and has taken to his bed, saying, ‘Since I have not been able to defeat this milk-faced youth, what is the use of my living any longer?’ ”
When the Teacher heard this report, he said, “Monks, by winning a victory, a man produces hatred; and he that is defeated is afflicted with suffering.” So saying, the Teacher pronounced the following Stanza,
Victory produces hatred; he that is defeated is afflicted with suffering;
He that has renounced both victory and defeat lives in tranquillity and happiness.
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Jetavana with reference to a certain maiden of respectable family.
The story goes that the mother and father of this maiden arranged a marriage for her and invited the Teacher to be present on the wedding-day.
So the Teacher, accompanied by the Congregation of Monks, went thither and sat down.
The bride passed to and fro, straining water for the Congregation of Monks and performing the other duties.
As the bride passed to and fro, the husband stood and gazed at her.
As he gazed at her, he was overpowered by desire and lust arose within him.
Overcome by nescience, he ministered neither to the Buddha nor to the Eighty Chief Elders,
but made up his mind, “I will stretch forth my arms and embrace that woman.”
The Teacher perceived what was passing through his mind and so wrought that he no longer saw that woman.
Seeing her no longer, he stood and gazed at the Teacher.
As he stood there gazing at the Teacher, the Teacher said to him, “Youth, there is no fire like the fire of lust. There is no sin like the sin of hatred. There is no suffering like the suffering involved in keeping up the Aggregates of Being. There is no happiness like the happiness of Nibbāna.” So saying, he pronounced the following Stanza,
There is no fire like the fire of lust; There is no sin like the sin of hatred;
There are no sufferings like the sufferings of existence; There is no happiness like Supreme Tranquillity.
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Āḷavi with reference to a certain lay disciple.
For one day, as the Teacher seated in the Perfumed Chamber at Jetavana surveyed the world at dawn, he beheld a certain poor man at Āḷavi. Perceiving that he possessed the faculties requisite for attaining the Fruit of Conversion, he surrounded himself with a company of five hundred monks and went to Āḷavi.
The inhabitants of Āḷavi straightway invited the Teacher to be their guest.
That poor man also heard that the Teacher had arrived and made up his mind to go and hear the Teacher preach the Law.
But that very day an ox of his strayed off.
So he considered within himself, “Shall I seek that ox, or shall I go and hear the Law?” And he came to the following conclusion, “I will first seek that ox and then go and hear the Law.” Accordingly, early in the morning, he set out to seek his ox.
The residents of Āḷavi provided seats for the Congregation of Monks presided over by the Buddha, served them with food, and after the meal took the Teacher’s bowl, that he might pronounce the words of thanksgiving.
Said the Teacher, “He for whose sake I came hither a journey of thirty leagues has gone into the forest to seek his ox which was lost. Not until he returns, will I preach the Law.” And he held his peace.
While it was still day, that poor man found his ox and straightway drove the ox back to the herd. Then he thought to himself, “Even if I can do nothing else, I will at least pay my respects to the Teacher.” Accordingly, although he was oppressed with the pangs of hunger, he decided not to go home, but went quickly to the Teacher, and having paid obeisance to the Teacher, sat down respectfully on one side.
When the poor man came and stood before the Teacher, the Teacher said to the steward of the alms, “Is there any food remaining over and above to the Congregation of Monks?”
“Reverend Sir, the food has not been touched.”
“Well then, serve this poor man with food.”
So when the steward had provided that poor man with a seat in a place indicated by the Teacher, he served him dutifully with rice-porridge and other food, both hard and soft.
When the poor man had eaten his meal, he rinsed his mouth.
As soon as the poor man’s physical sufferings had been relieved, his mind became tranquil.
Then the Teacher preached the Law in orderly sequence, expounding one after another the Four Noble Truths.
At the conclusion of the lesson, the poor man was established in the Fruit of Conversion.
Then the Teacher pronounced the words of thanksgiving, and having so done, arose from his seat and departed.
The multitude accompanied him a little way and then turned back.
The monks who accompanied the Teacher were highly indignant and said, “Just consider, brethren, what the Teacher did. Nothing of the sort ever happened before. But to-day, seeing a certain poor man, the Teacher inquired about the supply of food and directed that food to be given to another.”
The Teacher turned around, stopped, 30.76 and said, “Monks, what are you saying?” When he heard what they were saying, he said to them, “It is even so, monks. When I came hither a journey of thirty leagues, a long and difficult journey, my sole reason for coming hither was the fact that I saw that this lay disciple possessed the faculties requisite for the attainment of the Fruit of Conversion. Early in the morning, oppressed with the pangs of hunger, this man went to the forest and spent the day in the forest seeking his ox which was lost.
Therefore I thought to myself, ‘If I preach the Law to this man while he is suffering from the pangs of hunger, he will not be able to comprehend it.’ Therefore was it that I did what I did. Monks, there is no affliction like the affliction of hunger.” So saying, he pronounced the following Stanza,
Hunger is the greatest of afflictions; the Aggregates of Being are the principal source of suffering;
If a man thoroughly understand this, he has attained Nibbāna, Supreme Happiness.
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Jetavana with reference to King Pasenadi Kosala.
For at a certain period of his life King Pasenadi Kosala used to eat boiled rice cooked by the bucketful, and sauce and curry in proportion.
. One day after he had eaten his breakfast, unable to shake off the drowsiness occasioned by over-eating, he went to see the Teacher and paced back and forth before him with a very weary look. Overcome with a desire to sleep, but not daring to lie down and stretch himself out, he sat down on one side.
Thereupon the Teacher said to him, “Did you come, great king, before you were well rested?”
“Oh no, Reverend Sir; but I always suffer greatly after eating a meal.”
Then said the Teacher to him, “Great king, over-eating brings just such suffering in its train.” o saying, the Teacher pronounced the following Stanza,
If a man gives way to indolence, eats overmuch.
Spends his time in sleep, and lies and rolls about
Like a great hog fed on grain.
Such a simpleton will enter the womb again and again.
After admonishing the king with this Stanza, the Teacher continued, “Great king, one ought to observe moderation in eating,
for in moderate eating there is comfort.” And admonishing him further, the Teacher pronounced the following Stanza,
If a man be ever mindful,
if he observe moderation in taking food.
His sufferings will be but slight;
he will grow old slowly, preserving his life.
The king was unable to memorize this Stanza. So the Teacher said to the king’s nephew, Prince Good-looking, Sudassana, who stood near, “Memorize this Stanza.”
Sudassana asked the Teacher, “Reverend Sir, after I have memorized this Stanza, what shall I do with it?”
The Teacher replied, “When the king eats his meal, just as he is about to take the last lump of boiled rice, you must recite this Stanza. The king will understand its purport and will immediately throw away that lump of rice. When it comes time to boil the rice for the king’s next meal, you must fetch just as many grains of fresh rice as there were grains of boiled rice in that lump of rice.”
“Very well, Reverend Sir,” replied Sudassana. So both evening and morning, when the king ate his meal, his nephew would recite that Stanza just as the king was about to take the last lump of boiled rice, and would fetch for his next meal just as many grains of fresh rice as there were grains of boiled rice in the lump of boiled rice which the king had thrown away
And every time the king heard that Stanza recited, he gave away a thousand pieces of money in alms.
The king contented himself with a pint-pot of boiled rice a day, never exceeding that amount. After a time he became cheerful and lean.
One day the king went to pay his respects to the Teacher, and having saluted the Teacher, said to him, “Reverend Sir, now I am happy. Once more I am able to follow the chase and to catch wild beasts and horses.
I used to quarrel with my nephew. But recently, however, I gave my nephew my daughter, the Princess Vajirā, to wife. I have given her this village, that she may have a pool wherein to bathe. My quarrels with my nephew have ceased, and for this reason also I am happy.
The other day a precious stone, the property of the royal household was lost; this has but recently returned to my hand, and for this reason also I am happy.
Desiring to establish friendly relations with your disciples, I established the daughter of one of your kinsmen in our household, and for this reason also I am happy.”
The Teacher replied, “Great king, health is the greatest blessing one can ask for, contentment with whatever one has received is the greatest wealth, confidence is the best of relatives. But there is no happiness that can be compared with Nibbāna.” So saying, he pronounced the following Stanza,
Health is the greatest acquisition, contentment is the greatest wealth,
Confidence is the best of relatives, Nibbāna is the greatest happiness.
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Vesāli with reference to a certain monk.
For when the Teacher said, “Monks, four months hence I shall pass into Nibbāna,” seven hundred monks of his retinue were overwhelmed with fear, the Arahats experienced religious exaltation, while those who had not yet attained the Fruit of Conversion were unable to restrain their tears.
The monks gathered in little groups and went about consulting each other and asking, “What are we to do?”
Now a certain monk named Elder Tissa thought to himself, “If it be true that at the expiration of four months the Teacher will pass into Nibbāna, inasmuch as I am not yet free from the evil passions, it behooves me to win Arahatship while the Teacher yet remains alive.” Accordingly he adopted the Four Postures and kept residence by himself,
never associating with the other monks and never talking or conversing with any one.
The monks said to him, “Brother Tissa, why do you act in this manner?”
Tissa, however, paid no attention to what they said.
The monks therefore reported the matter to the Teacher, saying, “Reverend Sir, Elder Tissa has no affection for you.”
The Teacher caused Tissa to be summoned and asked him, “Tissa, why do you act in this manner?” When Tissa told the motive that actuated him, the Teacher applauded his conduct, saying, “Well done, Tissa.” Then said the Teacher to the monks, “Monks, he only that is like Tissa has real affection for me.
For though men honor me with perfumes and garlands, they honor me not. But they that practice the Higher and the Lower Law, they alone truly honor me.” So saying, he pronounced the following Stanza,
He who has tasted the sweetness of solitude and the sweetness of tranquillity,
Such a one is free from fear and free from sin, for he drinks the sweetness of the joy of the Law.
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Beḷuva village with reference to Sakka.
For when the Tathāgata’s Aggregate of Life was at an end and he was suffering from an attack of dysentery, Sakka king of gods became aware of it and thought to himself, “It is my duty to go to the Teacher and to minister to him in his sickness.” Accordingly he laid aside his own body, three-quarters of a league in height, approached the Teacher, saluted him, and with his own hands rubbed the Teacher’s feet.
The Teacher said to him, “Who is that?”
“It is I, Reverend Sir, Sakka.”
“Why did you come here?”
“To minister to you in your sickness, Reverend Sir.”
“Sakka, to the gods the smell of men, even at a distance of a hundred leagues, is like that of carrion tied to the throat; depart hence, for I have monks who will wait upon me in my sickness.”
“Reverend Sir, at a distance of eighty-four thousand leagues I smelt the fragrance of your goodness, and therefore came I hither; I alone will minister to you in your sickness.” Sakka permitted no other so much as to touch with his hand the vessel which contained the excrement of the Teacher’s body, but himself carried the vessel out on his own head. Moreover he carried it out without the slightest contraction of the muscles of his mouth, acting as though he were bearing about a vessel filled with perfumes.
Thus did Sakka minister to the Teacher and departed only when the Teacher felt more comfortable
The monks began a discussion, saying, “Oh, how great must be the affection of Sakka for the Teacher! To think that Sakka should lay aside such heavenly glory as is his, to wait upon the Teacher in his sickness! To think that he should carry out on his head the vessel containing the excrement of the Teacher’s body, as though he were removing a vessel filled with perfumes, without the slightest contraction of the muscles of his mouth!”
Hearing their talk, the Teacher said, “What say you, monks? It is not at all strange that Sakka king of gods should cherish warm affection for me.
For because of me this Sakka king of gods laid aside the form of Old Sakka, obtained the Fruit of Conversion, and took upon himself the form of Young Sakka. For once, when he came to me terrified with the fear of death, preceded by the celestial musician Pañcasikha, and sat down in Indasāla Cave in the midst of the company of the gods, I dispelled his suffering by saying to him,
Vāsava, ask me whatever question you desire in your heart to ask;
I will answer whatever question you ask me
“Having dispelled his suffering, I preached the Law to him.
At the conclusion of the discourse fourteen crores of living beings obtained Comprehension of the Law, and Sakka himself, even as he sat there, obtained the Fruit of Conversion and became Young Sakka.
Thus I have been a mighty helper to him,
аnd it is not at all strange that he should cherish warm affection for me.
For, monks, it is a pleasant thing to look upon the Noble, and it is likewise a pleasant thing to live with them in the same place;
but to have aught to do with simpletons brings suffering.” So saying, he pronounced the following Stanzas,
It is a good thing to look upon the Noble, and to live with them is ever pleasant;
It would be pleasant, might one never look upon a simpleton at all.
For he who walks in the company of simpletons suffers a long time;
Living with simpletons, as with an enemy, always brings suffering;
Pleasant is it to live with the steadfast, even as is a meeting of kinsfolk.
Therefore,
One should follow the steadfast, the wise, the learned, the patient, the dutiful, the Noble;
One should follow so good and intelligent a man, as the moon follows the path of the stars.
“Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu possesses faith, virtue, learning, generosity, and wisdom.
He thinks: ‘Oh, that on the dissolution of the body, after death, I might reappear in the company of well-to-do nobles!”
“Again, a bhikkhu possesses faith…and wisdom.
This, bhikkhus, is the path, the way that leads to reappearance there.
This, bhikkhus, is the path, the way that leads to reappearance there.
This, bhikkhus, is the path, the way that leads to reappearance there.
and he abides intent on pervading the beings that have reappeared there.1134
Just as a man with good sight might take a gallnut in his hand and review it, so the Brahma of a Thousand abides intent on pervading a world-system of a thousand worlds,
and he abides intent on pervading the beings that have reappeared there.
This, bhikkhus, is the path, the way that leads to reappearance there.
and he abides intent on pervading the beings that have reappeared there.
and he abides intent on pervading the beings that have reappeared there.
This, bhikkhus, is the path, the way that leads to reappearance there.
and he abides intent on pervading the beings that have reappeared there.
and he abides intent on pervading the beings that have reappeared there.
This, bhikkhus, is the path, the way that leads to reappearance there.
and he abides intent on pervading the beings that have reappeared there.
and he abides intent on pervading the beings that have reappeared there.
This, bhikkhus, is the path, the way that leads to reappearance there.
This, bhikkhus, is the path, the way that leads to reappearance there.
the gods of Glory…the gods of Limited Glory…the gods of Immeasurable Glory…the gods of Refulgent Glory…
…the gods of Great Fruit…the Aviha gods…the Atappa gods…the Sudassa gods…the Sudassi gods…the Akanittha gods are long-lived, beautiful, and enjoy great happiness.
the gods of the base of infinite consciousness…
the gods of the base of nothingness… the gods of the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception are long-lived, long-enduring, and enjoy great happiness.
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Savatthi in Jeta’s Grove, Anathapindika’s Park.
Now a number of bhikkhus were sitting in the assembly hall, where they had met together on returning from their almsround, after their meal, when this discussion arose among them: “It is wonderful, friends, it is marvellous,
However, their discussion was interrupted; for the Blessed One rose from meditation when it was evening, went to the assembly hall, and sat down on a seat made ready.
Then he addressed the bhikkhus thus: “Bhikkhus, for what discussion are you sitting together here now? And what was your discussion that was interrupted?”
“Here, venerable sir, we were sitting in the assembly hall, where we had met together on returning from our almsround, after our meal, when this discussion arose among us: ‘It is wonderful, friends, it is marvellous,
This was our discussion, venerable sir, that was interrupted when the Blessed One arrived.”
“And how, bhikkhus, is mindfulness of the body developed and cultivated so that it is of great fruit and great benefit?
“Here a bhikkhu,1129 gone to the forest or to the root of a tree or to an empty hut, sits down; having folded his legs crosswise, set his body erect, and established mindfulness in front of him,
ever mindful he breathes in, mindful he breathes out. Breathing in long, he understands: ‘I breathe in long’; or breathing out long, he understands: ‘I breathe out long.’ Breathing in short, he understands: ‘I breathe in short’; or breathing out short, he understands: ‘I breathe out short.’ He trains thus: ‘I shall breathe in experiencing the whole body of breath’; he trains thus: ‘I shall breathe out experiencing the whole body of breath.’ He trains thus: ‘I shall breathe in tranquillising the bodily formation’; he trains thus: ‘I shall breathe out tranquillising the bodily formation.’
As he abides thus diligent, ardent, and resolute, his memories and intentions based on the household life are abandoned;
That is how a bhikkhu develops mindfulness of the body.
“Again, bhikkhus, when walking, a bhikkhu understands: ‘I am walking’; when standing, he understands: ‘I am standing’; when sitting, he understands: ‘I am sitting’; when lying down, he understands: ‘I am lying down’;
As he abides thus diligent, ardent, and resolute, his memories and intentions based on the household life are abandoned…
“Again, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu is one who acts in full awareness when going forward and returning; who acts in full awareness when looking ahead and looking away; who acts in full awareness when flexing and extending his limbs; who acts in full awareness when wearing his robes and carrying his outer robe and bowl; who acts in full awareness when eating, drinking, consuming food, and tasting; who acts in full awareness when defecating or urinating; who acts in full awareness when walking, standing, sitting, falling asleep, waking up, talking, and keeping silent.
As he abides thus diligent, ardent, and resolute, his memories and intentions based on the household life are abandoned…
“Again, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu reviews this same body up from the soles of the feet and down from the top of the hair, bounded by skin, as full of many kinds of impurity thus: Tn this body there are head-hairs, body-hairs, nails, teeth, skin, flesh, sinews, bones, bone-marrow, kidneys, heart, liver, diaphragm, spleen, lungs, large intestines, small intestines, contents of the stomach, feces, bile, phlegm, pus, blood, sweat, fat, tears, grease, spittle, snot, oil of the joints, and urine.’
Just as though there were a bag with an opening at both ends full of many sorts of grain, such as hill rice, red rice, beans, peas, millet, and white rice, and a man with good eyes were to open it and review it thus: ‘This is hill rice, this is red rice, these are beans, these are peas, this is millet, this is white rice’; so too, a bhikkhu reviews this same body as full of many kinds of impurity thus: ‘In this body there are head-hairs…and urine.’
As he abides thus diligent, ardent, and resolute, his memories and intentions based on the household life are abandoned…
“Again, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu reviews this same body, however it is placed, however disposed, as consisting of elements thus: ‘In this body there are the earth element, the water element, the fire element, and the air element.’
Just as though a skilled butcher or his apprentice had killed a cow and were seated at the crossroads with it cut up into pieces; so too, a bhikkhu reviews this same body however it is placed, however disposed, as consisting of elements thus: Tn this body there are the earth element, the water element, the fire element, and the air element.’
As he abides thus diligent, ardent, and resolute, his memories and intentions connected with the household life are abandoned…
“Again, bhikkhus, as though he were to see a corpse thrown aside in a charnel ground, one, two, or three days dead, bloated, livid, and oozing matter,
As he abides thus diligent…
“Again, as though he were to see a corpse thrown aside in a charnel ground, being devoured by crows, hawks, vultures, dogs, jackals, or various kinds of worms,
As he abides thus diligent…That too is how a bhikkhu develops mindfulness of the body.
“Again, as though he were to see a corpse thrown aside in a charnel ground, a skeleton with flesh and blood, held together with sinews…a fleshless skeleton smeared with blood, held together with sinews…a skeleton without flesh and blood, held together with sinews…disconnected bones scattered in all directions - here a hand-bone, there a foot-bone, here a shin- bone, there a thigh-bone, here a hip-bone, there a back-bone, here a rib-bone, there a breast-bone, here an arm-bone, there a shoulder-bone, here a neck-bone, there a jaw-bone, here a tooth, there the skull -
As he abides thus diligent…That too is how a bhikkhu develops mindfulness of the body.
“Again, as though he were to see a corpse thrown aside in a charnel ground, bones bleached white, the colour of shells…bones heaped up, more than a year old…bones rotted and crumbled to dust,
As he abides thus diligent…That too is how a bhikkhu develops mindfulness of the body.
“Again, bhikkhus, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the first jhana, which is accompanied by applied and sustained thought, with rapture and pleasure born of seclusion.
He makes the rapture and pleasure born of seclusion drench, steep, fill, and pervade this body, so that there is no part of his whole body unpervaded by the rapture and pleasure born of seclusion.
Just as a skilled bath man or a bath man’s apprentice1130 heaps bath powder in a metal basin and, sprinkling it gradually with water, kneads it till the moisture wets his ball of bath powder, soaks it and pervades it inside and out, yet the ball itself does not ooze; so too, a bhikkhu makes the rapture and pleasure born of seclusion drench, steep, fill, and pervade this body, so that there is no part of his whole body unpervaded by the rapture and pleasure born of seclusion.
As he abides thus diligent…That too is how a bhikkhu develops mindfulness of the body.
“Again, bhikkhus, with the stilling of applied and sustained thought, a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the second jhana, which has self-confidence and singleness of mind without applied and sustained thought, with rapture and pleasure born of concentration.
He makes the rapture and pleasure born of concentration drench, steep, fill, and pervade this body, so that there is no part of his whole body unpervaded by the rapture and pleasure born of concentration.
Just as though there were a lake whose waters welled up from below
As he abides thus diligent…That too is how a bhikkhu develops mindfulness of the body.
“Again, bhikkhus, with the fading away as well of rapture, a bhikkhu abides in equanimity, and mindful and fully aware, still feeling pleasure with the body, he enters upon and abides in the third jhana, on account of which noble ones announce: ‘He has a pleasant abiding who has equanimity and is mindful.’
He makes the pleasure divested of rapture drench, steep, fill, and pervade this body, so that there is no part of his whole body unpervaded by the pleasure divested of rapture.
Just as in a pond of blue or white or red lotuses, some lotuses that are born and grow in the water thrive immersed in the water without rising out of it, and cool water drenches, steeps, fills, and pervades them to their tips and their roots, so that there is no part of all those lotuses unpervaded by cool water; so too, a bhikkhu makes the pleasure divested of rapture drench, steep, fill, and pervade this body, so that there is no part of his whole body unpervaded by the pleasure divested of rapture.
As he abides thus diligent…That too is how a bhikkhu develops mindfulness of the body.
“Again, bhikkhus, with the abandoning of pleasure and pain, and with the previous disappearance of joy and grief, a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the fourth jhana, which has neither-pain-nor-pleasure and purity of mindfulness due to equanimity.
He sits pervading this body with a pure bright mind, so that there is no part of his whole body unpervaded by the pure bright mind.
Just as though a man were sitting covered from head down with a white cloth, so that there would be no part of his whole body not covered by the white cloth; so too, a bhikkhu sits pervading this body with a pure bright mind, so that there is no part of his body unpervaded by the pure bright mind.
As he abides thus diligent, ardent, and resolute, his memories and intentions based on the household life are abandoned;
That too is how a bhikkhu develops mindfulness of the body.
“Bhikkhus, anyone who has developed and cultivated mindfulness of the body has included within himself whatever wholesome states there are that partake of true knowledge.1131
“Bhikkhus, when anyone has not developed and cultivated mindfulness of the body, Mara finds an opportunity and a support in him.
Suppose a man were to throw a heavy stone ball upon a mound of wet clay.
What do you think, bhikkhus? Would that heavy ball find entry into that mound of wet clay?”
- “Yes, venerable sir.”
- “So too, bhikkhus, when anyone has not developed and cultivated mindfulness of the body, Mara finds an opportunity and a support in him.
“Suppose there were a dry sapless piece of wood, and a man came with an upper fire-stick, thinking: ‘I shall light a fire, I shall produce heat.’
What do you think, bhikkhus? Could the man light a fire and produce heat by rubbing the dry sapless piece of wood with an upper fire-stick?”
- “Yes, venerable sir.”
- “So too, bhikkhus, when anyone has not developed and cultivated mindfulness of the body, Mara finds an opportunity and a support in him.
“Suppose there were a hollow empty water jug set out on a stand, and a man came with a supply of water.
What do you think, bhikkhus? Could the man pour the water into the jug?”
- “Yes, venerable sir.”
- “So too, bhikkhus, when anyone has not developed and cultivated mindfulness of the body, Mara finds an opportunity and a support in him.
“Bhikkhus, when anyone has developed and cultivated mindfulness of the body, Mara cannot find an opportunity or a support in him.
Suppose a man were to throw a light ball of string at a door-panel made entirely of heartwood.
What do you think, bhikkhus? Would that light ball of string find entry through that door-panel made entirely of heartwood?”
- “No, venerable sir.”
- “So too, bhikkhus, when anyone has developed and cultivated mindfulness of the body, Mara cannot find an opportunity or a support in him.
“Suppose there were a wet sappy piece of wood, and a man came with an upper fire-stick, thinking: ‘I shall light a fire, I shall produce heat.’
What do you think, bhikkhus? Could the man light a fire and produce heat by taking the upper fire- stick and rubbing it against the wet sappy piece of wood?”
- “No, venerable sir.”
- “So too, bhikkhus, when anyone has developed and cultivated mindfulness of the body, Mara cannot find an opportunity or a support in him.
“Suppose, set out on a stand, there were a water jug full of water right up to the brim so that crows could drink from it, and a man came with a supply of water.
What do you think, bhikkhus? Could the man pour the water into the jug?”
- “No, venerable sir.”
- “So too, bhikkhus, when anyone has developed and cultivated mindfulness of the body, Mara cannot find an opportunity or a support in him.
“Bhikkhus, when anyone has developed and cultivated mindfulness of the body, then when he inclines his mind towards realising any state that may be realised by direct knowledge, he attains the ability to witness any aspect therein, there being a suitable basis.
Suppose, set out on a stand, there were a water jug full of water right up to the brim so that crows could drink from it.
Whenever a strong man tips it, would water come out?”
- “Yes, venerable sir.”
- “So too, bhikkhus, when anyone has developed and cultivated mindfulness of the body, then when he inclines his mind towards realising any state that may be realised by direct knowledge, he attains the ability to witness any aspect therein, there being a suitable basis.
“Suppose there were a square pond on level ground, surrounded by an embankment, full of water right up to the brim so that crows could drink from it.
Whenever a strong man loosens the embankment, would water come out?”
- “Yes, venerable sir.”
- “So too, bhikkhus, when anyone has developed and cultivated mindfulness of the body…he attains the ability to witness any aspect therein, there being a suitable basis.
“Suppose there were a chariot on even ground at the crossroads, harnessed to thoroughbreds, waiting with goad lying ready, so that a skilled trainer, a charioteer of horses to be tamed, might mount it, and taking the reins in his left hand and the goad in his right hand, might drive out and back by any road whenever he likes. So too, bhikkhus, when anyone has developed and cultivated mindfulness of the body…he attains the ability to witness any aspect therein, there being a suitable basis.
“Bhikkhus, when mindfulness of the body has been repeatedly practised, developed, cultivated, used as a vehicle, used as a basis, established, consolidated, and well undertaken, these ten benefits may be expected. What ten?
 “One becomes a conqueror of discontent and delight, and discontent does not conquer oneself; one abides overcoming discontent whenever it arises.
 “One becomes a conqueror of fear and dread, and fear and dread do not conquer oneself; one abides overcoming fear and dread whenever they arise.
 “One bears cold and heat, hunger and thirst, and contact with gadflies, mosquitoes, wind, the sun, and creeping things; one endures ill-spoken, unwelcome words and arisen bodily feelings that are painful, racking, sharp, piercing, disagreeable, distressing, and menacing to life.
 “One obtains at will, without trouble or difficulty, the four jhanas that constitute the higher mind and provide a pleasant abiding here and now.
 “One wields the various kinds of supernormal power… 
 “With the divine ear element, which is purified and surpasses the human, one hears both kinds of sounds, the divine and the human, those that are far as well as near.
 “One understands the minds of other beings, of other persons, having encompassed them with one’s own mind.
One understands a mind affected by lust as affected by lust……an unliberated mind as unliberated.
 “One recollects one’s manifold past lives, that is, one birth, two births……Thus with their aspects and particulars one recollects one’s manifold past lives.
 “With the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, one sees beings passing away and reappearing, infej rior and superior, fair and ugly, fortunate and unfortunate, and one understands how beings pass on according to their actions.
 “By realising for oneself with direct knowledge, one here and now enters upon and abides in the deliverance of mind and deliverance by wisdom that are taintless with the destruction of the taints.
“Bhikkhus, when mindfulness of the body has been repeatedly practised, developed, cultivated, used as a vehicle, used as a basis, established, consolidated, and well undertaken, these ten benefits may be expected.”
That is what the Blessed One said.
The bhikkhus were satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
how it has been said by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened, that mindfulness of the body, when developed and cultivated, is of great fruit and great benefit.”
how it has been said by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened, that mindfulness of the body, when developed and cultivated, is of great fruit and great benefit.’
with their abandoning his mind becomes steadied internally, quieted, brought to singleness, and concentrated.
or he understands accordingly however his body is disposed.
That too is how a bhikkhu develops mindfulness of the body.
That too is how a bhikkhu develops mindfulness of the body.
That too is how a bhikkhu develops mindfulness of the body.
That too is how a bhikkhu develops mindfulness of the body.
a bhikkhu compares this same body with it thus: ‘This body too is of the same nature, it will be like that, it is not exempt from that fate.’
That too is how a bhikkhu develops mindfulness of the body.
a bhikkhu compares this same body with it thus: ‘This body too is of the same nature, it will be like that, it is not exempt from that fate.’
a bhikkhu compares this same body with it thus: ‘This body too is of the same nature, it will be like that, it is not exempt from that fate.’
a bhikkhu compares this same body with it thus: ‘This body too is of the same nature, it will be like that, it is not exempt from that fate.”
and it had no inflow from east, west, north, or south, and would not be replenished from time to time by showers of rain, then the cool fount of water welling up in the lake would make the cool water drench, steep, fill, and pervade the lake, so that there would be no part of the whole lake unpervaded by cool water; so too, a bhikkhu makes the rapture and pleasure born of concentration drench, steep, fill, and pervade this body, so that there is no part of his whole body unpervaded by the rapture and pleasure born of concentration.
with their abandoning his mind becomes steadied internally, quieted, brought to singleness, and concentrated.
Just as anyone who has extended his mind over the great ocean has included within it whatever streams there are that flow into the ocean; so too, anyone who has developed and cultivated mindfulness of the body has included within himself whatever wholesome states there are that partake of true knowledge.
On one occasion the Blessed One was dwelling at Vesali in the hall with the peaked roof in the Great Wood.
Then, in the eve­ ning, the Blessed One emerged from seclusion and approached the infirmary,
where he saw a certain bhikkhu who was frail and sick. He then sat down in the prepared seat
What five?
Here, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the unattractiveness of the body, perceiving the repulsiveness of food, perceiving non-delight in the entire world, contem­ plating impermanence in all conditioned phenomena; and he has the perception of death well established internally.
If these five things do not slip away from a frail and sick bhikkhu, it can be expected of him: ‘In no long time, with the destruction of the taints, he will realize for himself, with direct knowledge, in this very life, the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, and having entered upon it, he will dwell in it.”
and addressed the bhikkhus:
“Bhikkhus, if five things do not slip away from a frail and sick bhikkhu, it can be expected of him: ‘In no long time, with the destruction of the taints, he will realize for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, and having entered upon it, he will dwell in it.
“Bhikkhus, possessing five qualities, a patient is difficult to take care of.
What five?
He does what is harmful. He does not observe m oderation in what is beneficial. He does not take his medicine. He does not accurately disclose his symp­ toms to his kindhearted attendant; he does not report, as fits the case, that his condition is getting worse, or getting better, or remaining the same. He cannot patiently endure arisen bodily feelings that are painful, racking, sharp, piercing, har­ rowing, disagreeable, sapping one’s vitality.
Possessing these five qualities, a patient is difficult to take care of.
What five?
He does what is beneficial. He observes moderation in what is beneficial. He takes his medicine. He accurately discloses his symptoms to his kind-hearted attendant; he reports, as fits the case, that his condition is getting worse, or getting better, or remaining the same. He can patiently endure arisen bodily feelings that are painful, racking, sharp, piercing, harrowing, disagreeable, sapping one’s vitality.
Possessing these five qualities, a patient is easy to take care of.”
“Bhikkhus, possessing five other qualities, a patient is easy to take care of.
“Bhikkhus, possessing five qualities, an attendant is not quali­ fied to take care of a patient.
What five?
He is unable to prepare medicine. He does not know what is beneficial and harmful, so he offers what is harmful and withholds what is beneficial. He takes care of the patient for the sake of material rewards, not with a mind of loving-kindness. He is disgusted at having to remove feces, urine, vomit, or spittle. He is unable from time to time to instruct, encourage, inspire, and gladden the patient with a Dhamma talk.
Possessing these five qualities, an attendant is not qualified to take care of a patient.
“Bhikkhus, possessing five other qualities, an attendant is qualified to take care of a patient.
What five?
He is able to prepare medicine. He knows what is beneficial and harm­ful, so that he withholds what is harmful and offers what is beneficial, He takes care of the patient with a mind of loving- kindness, not for the sake of material rewards. He is not disgusted at having to remove feces, urine, vomit, or spittle, He is able from time to time to instruct, encourage, inspire, and gladden the patient with a Dhamma talk.
Possessing these five qualities, an attendant is qualified to take care of a patient.’
…one wields bodily mastery even as far as the Brahma-world.
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Savatthi in Jeta’s Grove, Anathapindika’s Park.
There he addressed the bhikkhus thus: “Bhikkhus.”
- “Venerable sir,” they replied.
The Blessed One said this:
Just as a fire that starts in a shed made of rushes or grass burns down even a house with a peaked roof, with walls plastered inside and outside, shut off, secured by bars, with shuttered windows; so too, bhikkhus, whatever fears arise, all arise because of the fool, not because of the wise man.
Thus: the fool brings fear, the wise man brings no fear; the fool brings trouble, the wise man brings no trouble; the fool brings calamity, the wise man brings no calamity.
No fear comes from the wise man, no trouble comes from the wise man, no calamity comes from the wise man.
Therefore, bhikkhus, you should train thus: ‘We shall be wise men, we shall be inquirers.’“
When this was said, the venerable Ananda asked the Blessed One: “In what way, venerable sir, can a bhikkhu be called a wise man and an inquirer?”
“When, Ananda, a bhikkhu is skilled in the elements, skilled in the bases, skilled in dependent origination, skilled in what is possible and what is impossible, in that way he can be called a wise man and an inquirer.”
“But, venerable sir, in what way can a bhikkhu be called skilled in the elements?”
“There are, Ananda, these eighteen elements: the eye element, the form element, the eye-consciousness element; the ear element, the sound element, the ear-consciousness element; the nose element, the odour element, the nose-consciousness element; the tongue element, the flavour element, the tongue-consciousness element; the body element, the tangible element, the body-consciousness element; the mind element, the mind-object element, the mind-consciousness element.
When he knows and sees these eighteen elements, a bhikkhu can be called skilled in the elements.”1077
“But, venerable sir, might there be another way in which a bhikkhu can be called skilled in the elements?”
“There might be, Ananda.
There are, Ananda, these six ele-ments: the earth element, the water element, the fire element, the air element, the space element, and the consciousness element.
When he knows and sees these six elements, a bhikkhu can be called skilled in the elements.”
“But, venerable sir, might there be another way in which a bhikkhu can be called skilled in the elements?”
“There might be, Ananda.
There are, Ananda, these six elements: the pleasure element, the pain element, the joy element, the grief element, the equanimity element, and the ignorance element.
When he knows and sees these six elements, a bhikkhu can be called skilled in the elements.”1078
“But, venerable sir, might there be another way in which a bhikkhu can be called skilled in the elements?”
“There might be, Ananda.
There are, Ananda, these six elements: the sensual desire element, the renunciation element, the ill will element, the non-ill will element, the cruelty element, and the non-cruelty element.
When he knows and sees these six elements, a bhikkhu can be called skilled in the elements.”1079
“But, venerable sir, might there be another way in which a bhikkhu can be called skilled in the elements?”
“There might be, Ananda.
There are, Ananda, these three elements: the sense-sphere element, the fine-material element, and the immaterial element.
When he knows and sees these three elements, a bhikkhu can be called skilled in the elements.”1080
“But, venerable sir, might there be another way in which a bhikkhu can be called skilled in the elements?”
“There might be, Ananda.
There are, Ananda, these two elements: the conditioned element and the unconditioned element.
When he knows and sees these two elements, a bhikkhu can be called skilled in the elements.”1081
“But, venerable sir, in what way can a bhikkhu be called skilled in the bases?”
“There are, Ananda, these six internal and external bases: the eye and forms, the ear and sounds, the nose and odours, the tongue and flavours, the body and tangibles, the mind and mind-objects.1082
“But, venerable sir, in what way can a bhikkhu be called skilled in dependent origination?”
“Here, Ananda, a bhikkhu knows thus: ‘When this exists, that comes to be; with the arising of this, that arises. When this does not exist, that does not come to be; with the cessation of this, that ceases. That is, with ignorance as condition, formations come to be; with formations as condition, consciousness; with consciousness as condition, mentality-materiality; with mentality- materiality as condition, the sixfold base; with the sixfold base as condition, contact; with contact as condition, feeling; with feeling as condition, craving; with craving as condition, clinging; with clinging as condition, being; with being as condition, birth; with birth as condition, ageing and death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair come to be.
Such is the origin of this whole mass of suffering.
‘“But with the remainderless fading away and cessation of ignorance comes cessation of formations; with the cessation of formations, cessation of consciousness; with the cessation of consciousness, cessation of mentality-materiality; with the cessation of mentality-materiality, cessation of the sixfold base; with the cessation of the sixfold base, cessation of contact; with the cessation of contact, cessation of feeling; with the cessation of feeling, cessation of craving; with the cessation of craving, cessation of clinging; with the cessation of clinging, cessation of being; with the cessation of being, cessation of birth; with the cessation of birth, ageing and death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair cease.
Such is the cessation of this whole mass of suffering.’
In this way, Ananda, a bhikkhu can be called skilled in dependent origination.”
“But, venerable sir, in what way can a bhikkhu be called skilled in what is possible and what is impossible?”
“Here, Ananda, a bhikkhu understands: ‘It is impossible, it cannot happen that a person possessing right view could treat any formation as permanent - there is no such possibility.’ 1084 And he understands: ‘It is possible that an ordinary person might treat some formation as permanent - there is such a possibility.’ He understands: ‘It is impossible, it cannot happen that a person possessing right view could treat any formation as pleasurable - there is no such possibility.’ 1085 And he understands: ‘It is possible that an ordinary person might treat some formation as pleasurable - there is such a possibility.’
He understands: ‘It is impossible, it carfnot happen that a person possessing right view could treat anything as self - there is no such possibility.’ And he understands: ‘It is possible that an ordinary person might treat something as self - there is such a possibility.’1086
“He understands: ‘It is impossible, it cannot happen that a person possessing right view could deprive his mother of life - there is no such possibility.’ 1087 And he understands: ‘It is possible that an ordinary person might deprive his mother of life - there is such a possibility.’
He understands: ‘It is impossible, it cannot happen that a person possessing right view could deprive his father of life…could deprive an arahant of life - there is no such possibility.’ And he understands: ‘It is possible that an ordinary person might deprive his father of life…might deprive an arahant of life - there is such a possibility.’ He understands: ‘It is impossible, it cannot happen that a person possessing right view could, with a mind of hate, shed a Tathagata’s blood - there is no such possibility.’ And he understands: ‘It is possible that an ordinary person might, with a mind of hate, shed a Tathagata’s blood - there is such a possibility.’
He understands: ‘It is impossible, it cannot happen that a person possessing right view could cause a schism in the Sangha…could acknowledge another teacher1088 - there is no such possibility.’
And he understands: ‘It is possible that an ordinary person might cause a schism in the Sangha…might acknowledge another teacher - there is such a possibility.’
‘He understands: ‘It is impossible, it cannot happen that two Accomplished Ones, Fully Enlightened Ones, could arise contemporaneously in one world-system - there is no such possibility.” ‘ 1089 And he understands: ‘It is possible that one Accomplished One, a Fully Enlightened One, might arise in one world-system - there is such a possibility.’
He understands: ‘It is impossible, it cannot happen that two Wheel-turning Monarchs could arise contemporaneously in one world-system…It is possible that one Wheel-turning Monarch might arise in one world-system - there is such a possibility.’
“He understands: ‘It is impossible, it cannot happen that a woman could be an Accomplished One, a Fully Enlightened One - there is no such possibility.’ 1090 And he understands: ‘It is possible that a man might be an Accomplished One, a Fully Enlightened One - there is such a possibility.’
He understands: ‘It is impossible, it cannot happen that a woman could be a Wheel-turning Monarch…
“He understands: ‘It is impossible, it cannot happen that an unwished for, undesired, disagreeable result could be produced from good bodily conduct…
“He understands: ‘It is impossible, it cannot happen that a person engaging in bodily misconduct..
And he understands: ‘It is possible that a person engaging in bodily misconduct…engaging in verbal misconduct…engaging in mental misconduct might on that account, for that reason, on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappear in a state of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, even in hell - there is such a possibility.’
“He understands: ‘It is impossible, it cannot happen that a person engaging in good bodily conduct…engaging in good verbal conduct, engaging in good mental conduct could on that account, for that reason, on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappear in a state of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, even in hell - there is no such possibility.’
And he understands: ‘It is possible that a person engaging in good bodily conduct…
“In this way, Ananda, a bhikkhu can be called skilled in what is possible and what is impossible.”
When this was said, the venerable Ananda said to the Blessed One: “It is wonderful, venerable sir, it is marvellous!
What is the name of this discourse on the Dhamma?”
“You may remember this discourse on the Dhamma, Ananda, as ‘The Many Kinds of Elements’ and as ‘The Four Cycles’ and as ‘The Mirror of the Dhamma’ and as ‘The Drum of the Deathless’ and as ‘The Supreme Victory in Battle.’“
That is what the Blessed One said.
The venerable Ananda was satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
“Bhikkhus, whatever fears arise, all arise because of the fool, not because of the wise man; whatever troubles arise, all arise because of the fool, not because of the wise man; whatever calamities arise, all arise because of the fool, not because of the wise man.
When he knows and sees these six internal and external bases, a bhikkhu can be called skilled in the bases.”
“When a wise man, established well in virtue, Develops consciousness and understanding,
Then as a bhikkhu ardent and sagacious He succeeds in disentangling this tangle” .
This was said. But why was it said? While the Blessed One was living at Sāvatthī, it seems, a certain deity came to him in the night, and in order to do away with his doubts,
“The inner tangle and the outer tangle— This generation is entangled in a tangle.
And so I ask of Gotama this question: Who succeeds in disentangling this tangle? ” .
he asked this question .
Here is the meaning in brief. Tangle is a term for the network of craving.
For that is a tangle in the sense of lacing together, like the tangle called network of branches in bamboo thickets, etc., because it goes on arising again and again up and down1 among the objects of consciousness beginning with what is visible. But it is called the inner tangle and the outer tangle because it arises as craving for one’s own requisites and another’s, for one’s own person and another’s, and for the internal and external bases for consciousness.
Since it arises in this way, this generation is entangled in a tangle.
As the bamboos, etc., are entangled by the bamboo tangle, etc., so too this generation, in other words, this order of living beings, is all entangled by the tangle of craving—the meaning is that it is intertwined, interlaced by it.
And because it is entangled like this,
He addressed the Blessed One by his clan name as Gotama.
Who succeeds in disentangling this tangle: who may disentangle this tangle that keeps the three kinds of existence entangled in this way? —What he asks is, who is capable of disentangling it?
However, when questioned thus, the Blessed One, whose knowledge of all things is unimpeded, deity of deities, excelling Sakka , excelling Brahmā, fearless in the possession of the four kinds of perfect confidence, wielder of the ten powers, all-seer with unobstructed knowledge, in reply to explain the meaning:
“When a wise man, established well in virtue, Develops consciousness and understanding,
Then as a bhikkhu ardent and sagacious He succeeds in disentangling this tangle.”
uttered this stanza .
Of this same verse composed by the Great Sage.
My task is now to set out the true sense, Divided into virtue and the rest.
Right hard to find, — There are here in the Victor’s Dispensation Seekers gone forth from home to homelessness,
Have no right knowledge And who although desiring purity
Who, though they strive, here gain no purity.
To them, pure in expositions,
Relying on the teaching of the dwellers In the Great Monastery;2 let all those
I shall expound the comforting Path Of Purification
Good men who do desire purity Listen intently to my exposition.
Herein, purification should be understood as Nibbāna, which being devoid of all stains, is utterly pure.
The path of purification is the path to that purification;
The meaning is, I shall expound that path of purification.
In some instances this path of purification is taught by insight alone,3
according as it is said:
“Formations are all impermanent: When he sees thus with understanding
And turns away from what is ill, That is the path to purity” .
And in some instances by jhāna and understanding,
“He is near unto Nibbāna In whom are jhāna and understanding” .
And in some instances by deeds , etc.,
“By deeds, vision and righteousness, By virtue, the sublimest life—
By these are mortals purified, And not by lineage and wealth” .
And in some instances by virtue, etc., according as it is said:
“He who is possessed of constant virtue,
Who has understanding, and is concentrated,
Who is strenuous and diligent as well,
Will cross the flood so difficult to cross” .
And in some instances by the foundations of mindfulness, etc., according as it is said: “Bhikkhus, this path is the only way for the purification of beings … for the realization of Nibbāna, that is to say, the four foundations of mindfulness” ;
But in the answer to this question it is taught by virtue and the other two.
Here is a brief commentary on the stanza. Established well in virtue: standing on virtue. It is only one actually fulfilling virtue who is here said to “stand on virtue.”
So the meaning here is this: being established well in virtue by fulfilling virtue.
A man: a living being.
Wise: possessing the kind of understanding that is born of kamma by means of a rebirth-linking with triple root-cause.
Develops consciousness and understanding: develops both concentration and insight. For it is concentration that is described here under the heading of “consciousness,”
and insight under that of “understanding.”4
For it is energy that is called “ardour” in the sense of burning up and consuming defilements.
He has that, thus he is ardent.
Sagacious: it is understanding that is called “sagacity”; possessing that, is the meaning.
This word shows protective understanding.
For understanding is mentioned three times in the reply to the question.
Herein, the first is naïve understanding, the second is understanding consisting in insight, while the third is the protective understanding that guides all affairs.
He sees fear in the round of rebirths, thus he is a bhikkhu.
He succeeds in disentangling this tangle: this bhikkhu who possesses the six things, namely, this virtue, and this concentration described under the heading of consciousness, and this threefold understanding, and this ardour
But it is at the moment of the path that he is said to be disentangling that tangle;
That is why the Blessed One said:
“When a wise man, established well in virtue, Develops consciousness and understanding,
Then as a bhikkhu ardent and sagacious He succeeds in disentangling this tangle.”
Herein there is nothing for him to do about the naïve understanding on account of which he is called wise;
But the words ardent and sagacious mean that by persevering with energy of the kind here described and by acting in full awareness with understanding he should, having become well established in virtue, develop the serenity and insight that are described as concentration and understanding. This is how the Blessed One shows the path of purification under the headings of virtue, concentration, and understanding there.
What has been shown so far is the three trainings, the dispensation that is good in three ways, the necessary condition for the threefold clear-vision, etc., the avoidance of the two extremes and the cultivation of the middle way, the means to surmounting the states of loss, etc., the abandoning of defilements in three aspects, prevention of transgression etc., purification from the three kinds of defilements, and the reason for the states of stream-entry and so on.
How?
Here the training of higher virtue is shown by virtue; the training of higher consciousness, by concentration; and the training of higher understanding, by understanding.
The dispensation’s goodness in the beginning is shown by virtue.
Because of the passage, “And what is the beginning of profitable things? Virtue that is quite purified” , and because of the passage beginning, “The not doing of any evil” , virtue is the beginning of the dispensation. And that is good because it brings about the special qualities of non-remorse,5 and so on.
Its goodness in the middle is shown by concentration.
Because of the passage beginning, “Entering upon the profitable” , concentration is the middle of the dispensation. And that is good because it brings about the special qualities of supernormal power, and so on.
Its goodness in the end is shown by understanding.
Because of the passage, “The purifying of one’s own mind—this is the Buddhas’ dispensation” , and because understanding is its culmination, understanding is the end of the dispensation. And that is good because it brings about equipoise with respect to the desired and the undesired.
“Just as a solid massive rock Remains unshaken by the wind,
So too, in face of blame and praise The wise remain immovable” .
For this is said .
Likewise the necessary condition for the triple clear-vision is shown by virtue.
For with the support of perfected virtue one arrives at the three kinds of clear- vision, but nothing besides that.
The necessary condition for the six kinds of direct- knowledge is shown by concentration.
For with the support of perfected concentration one arrives at the six kinds of direct-knowledge, but nothing besides that.
The necessary condition for the categories of discrimination is shown by understanding.
For with the support of perfected understanding one arrives at the four kinds of discrimination, but not for any other reason.6
And the avoidance of the extreme called devotion to indulgence of sense desires is shown by virtue. The avoidance of the extreme called devotion to mortification of self is shown by concentration.
The cultivation of the middle way is shown by understanding.
Likewise the means for surmounting the states of loss is shown by virtue; the means for surmounting the element of sense desires, by concentration; and the means for surmounting all becoming, by understanding.
And the abandoning of defilements by substitution of opposites is shown by virtue; that by suppression is shown by concentration; and that by cutting off is shown by understanding.
Likewise prevention of defilements’ transgression is shown by virtue; prevention of obsession is shown by concentration; prevention of inherent tendencies is shown by understanding.
And purification from the defilement of misconduct is shown by virtue; purification from the defilement of craving, by concentration; and purification from the defilement of views, by understanding.
Likewise the reason for the states of stream-entry and once-return is shown by virtue; that for the state of non-return, by concentration; that for Arahantship by understanding.
For the stream-enterer is called “perfected in the kinds of virtue”; and likewise the once-returner.
But the non-returner is called “perfected in concentration.”
So thus far these nine and other like triads of special qualities have been shown, that is, the three trainings, the dispensation that is good in three ways, the necessary condition for the threefold clear-vision, the avoidance of the two extremes and the cultivation of the middle way, the means for surmounting the states of loss, etc., the abandoning of defilements in three aspects, prevention of transgression, etc., purification from the three kinds of defilements, and the reason for the states of stream-entry, and so on.
so I ask of Gotama this question, that is why I ask this.
of the sure straight way Comprising virtue and the other two, that leads to purity
it is the means of approach that is called the path.
according as it is said:
according as it is said:
and similarly in the case of the right efforts, and so on.
Ardent : possessing energy.
Just as a man standing on the ground and taking up a well-sharpened knife might disentangle a great tangle of bamboos, so too, he——standing on the ground of virtue and taking up with the hand of protective-understanding exerted by the power of energy the knife of insight-understanding well-sharpened on the stone of concentration, might disentangle, cut away and demolish all the tangle of craving that had overgrown his own life’s continuity.
at the moment of fruition he has disentangled the tangle and is worthy of the highest offerings in the world with its deities.
for that has been established in him simply by the influence of previous kamma.
And the Arahant is called “perfected in understanding” .
From a visible datum sometimes as far down as a mental datum, or vice versa,
following the order of the six kinds of objects of consciousness as given in the teaching.
The words ‘insight alone’ are meant to exclude but serenity , This is for emphasis.
And again, insight should be understood as the three contemplations of impermanence, pain, and not-self; not contemplation of impermanence alone.
for no insight comes about without momentary concentration.
for concentration is classed as both access and absorption . Taking this stanza as the teaching for one whose vehicle is insight does not imply that there is no concentration;
But the word ‘alone’ actually excludes only that concentration with distinction of jhāna;
not virtue, etc., which is the opposite number in the pair, serenity and insight.
However, even when this path of purification is shown in this way under the headings of virtue, concentration and understanding, each comprising various special qualities, it is still only shown extremely briefly.
And so since that is insufficient to help all, there is, in order to show it in detail, the following set of questions dealing in the first place with virtue:
 What is virtue? In what sense is it virtue? What are its characteristic, function, manifestation, and proximate cause? What are the benefits of virtue? How many kinds of virtue are there? What is the defiling of it? What is the cleansing of it?
Here are the answers:
 WHAT IS VIRTUE? It is the states beginning with volition present in one who abstains from killing living things, etc., or in one who fulfils the practice of the duties.
For this is said in the Paṭisambhidā: “What is virtue? There is virtue as volition, virtue as consciousness-concomitant,7 virtue as restraint, virtue as non- transgression” .
Herein, virtue as volition is the volition present in one who abstains from killing living things, etc., or in one who fulfils the practice of the duties.
Virtue as consciousness- concomitant is the abstinence in one who abstains from killing living things, and so on.
Furthermore, virtue as volition is the seven volitions that accompany the first seven of the ten courses of action in one who abandons the killing of living things, and so on.
Virtue as consciousness-concomitant is the three remaining states consisting of non-covetousness, non-ill will, and right view, stated in the way beginning, “Abandoning covetousness, he dwells with a mind free from covetousness” .
Virtue as restraint should be understood here as restraint in five ways: restraint by the rules of the community , restraint by mindfulness, restraint by knowledge, restraint by patience, and restraint by energy.
Herein, “restraint by the Pātimokkha” is this: “He is furnished, fully furnished, with this Pātimokkha restraint.”
“Restraint by mindfulness” is this: “He guards the eye faculty, enters upon restraint of the eye faculty” .
and use of requisites is here combined with this.
But what is called “restraint by patience” is that given in the way beginning, “He is one who bears cold and heat” .
And what is called “restraint by energy” is that given in the way beginning, “He does not endure a thought of sense desires when it arises” ;
So this fivefold restraint, and the abstinence, in clansmen who dread evil, from any chance of transgression met with, should all be understood to be “virtue as restraint.”
Virtue as non-transgression is the non-transgression, by body or speech, of precepts of virtue that have been undertaken.
This, in the first place, is the answer to the question, “What is virtue?
” Now, as to the rest— 19. IN WHAT SENSE IS IT VIRTUE? It is virtue in the sense of composing .8
What is this composing?
It is either a coordinating , meaning non- inconsistency of bodily action, etc., due to virtuousness;
For those who understand etymology admit only these two meanings.
Others, however, comment on the meaning here in the way beginning, “The meaning of virtue is the meaning of head , the meaning of virtue is the meaning of cool .”
 Now, WHAT ARE ITS CHARACTERISTIC, FUNCTION, MANIFESTATION, AND PROXIMATE CAUSE? Here:
The characteristic of it is composing Even when analyzed in various ways,
As visibility is of visible data Even when analyzed in various ways.
Just as visibleness is the characteristic of the visible-data base even when analyzed into the various categories of blue, yellow, etc., because even when analyzed into these categories it does not exceed visible-ness,
so also this same composing, described above as the coordinating of bodily action, etc., and as the foundation of profitable states, is the characteristic of virtue even when analyzed into the various categories of volition, etc., because even when analyzed into these categories it does not exceed the state of coordination and foundation.
While such is its characteristic:
Action to stop misconduct, then Of blamelessness in virtuous men.
Achievement as the quality Its function has a double sense.
So what is called virtue should be understood to have the function of stopping misconduct as its function in the sense of action, and a blameless function as its function in the sense of achievement.
For under these headings of characteristic, etc., it is action or it is achievement that is called “function” .
Now, virtue, so say those who know, Itself as purity will show;
And for its proximate cause they tell The pair, conscience and shame, as well.
This virtue is manifested as the kinds of purity stated thus: “Bodily purity, verbal purity, mental purity” ; it is manifested, comes to be apprehended, as a pure state.
But conscience and shame are said by those who know to be its proximate cause; its near reason, is the meaning.
For when conscience and shame are in existence, virtue arises and persists;
and when they are not, it neither arises nor persists.
This is how virtue’s characteristic, function, manifestation, and proximate cause, should be understood.
“Restraint by knowledge” is this .
“The currents in the world that flow, Ajita,” said the Blessed One,
“Are stemmed by means of mindfulness;
Restraint of currents I proclaim, By understanding they are dammed” ;
purification of livelihood is here combined with this.
or it is an upholding ,8 meaning a state of basis owing to its serving as foundation for profitable states.
 WHAT ARE THE BENEFITS OF VIRTUE? Its benefits are the acquisition of the several special qualities beginning with non-remorse.
For this is said: “Ānanda, profitable habits have non-remorse as their aim and non-remorse as their benefit” .
Also it is said further: “Householder, there are these five benefits for the virtuous in the perfecting of virtue.
What five?
Here, householder, one who is virtuous, possessed of virtue, obtains a large fortune as a consequence of diligence; this is the first benefit for the virtuous in the perfecting of virtue.
Again, of one who is virtuous, possessed of virtue, a fair name is spread abroad; this is the second benefit for the virtuous in the perfecting of virtue.
Again, whenever one who is virtuous, possessed of virtue, enters an assembly, whether of khattiyas or brahmans or householders or ascetics, he does so without fear or hesitation; this is the third benefit for the virtuous in the perfecting of virtue.
Again, one who is virtuous, possessed of virtue, dies unconfused; this is the fourth benefit for the virtuous in the perfecting of virtue.
Again, one who is virtuous, possessed of virtue, on the breakup of the body, after death, reappears in a happy destiny, in the heavenly world; this is the fifth benefit for the virtuous in the perfecting of virtue” .
There are also the many benefits of virtue beginning with being dear and loved and ending with destruction of cankers described in the passage beginning, “If a bhikkhu should wish, ‘May I be dear to my fellows in the life of purity and loved by them, held in respect and honoured by them,’ let him perfect the virtues” .
This is how virtue has as its benefits the several special qualities beginning with non-remorse.
Furthermore:
Without which virtue clansmen find No footing in the dispensation?
Dare anyone a limit place On benefits that virtue brings,
No Ganges, and no Yamunā No Sarabhū, Sarassathī,
Or flowing Aciravatī, Or noble River of Mahī,
Is able to wash out the stain In things that breathe here in the world;
For only virtue’s water can Wash out the stain in living things.
No breezes that come bringing rain, No balm of yellow sandalwood,
No necklaces beside, or gems Or soft effulgence of moonbeams,
Can here avail to calm and soothe Men’s fevers in this world; whereas
This noble, this supremely cool, Well-guarded virtue quells the flame.
Where is there to be found the scent That can with virtue’s scent compare,
And that is borne against the wind As easily as with it?
Where Can such another stair be found That climbs, as virtue does, to heaven?
Or yet another door that gives Onto the City of Nibbāna?
Shine as they may, there are no kings Adorned with jewellery and pearls
That shine as does a man restrained Adorned with virtue’s ornament.
Virtue entirely does away With dread of self-blame and the like;
Their virtue to the virtuous Gives gladness always by its fame.
This root of all good qualities Robs of its power every fault.
From this brief sketch it may be known How virtue brings reward, and how
 Now, here is the answer to the question, HOW MANY KINDS OF VIRTUE ARE THERE?
Firstly all this virtue is of one kind by reason of its own characteristic of composing.
It is of two kinds as keeping and avoiding.
Likewise as that of good behaviour and that of the beginning of the life of purity, 4.As abstinence and non-abstinence, 5.As dependent and independent, 6.As temporary and lifelong, 7.As limited and unlimited, 8.As mundane and supramundane.
It is of three kinds as inferior, medium, and superior.
Likewise as giving precedence to self, giving precedence to the world, and giving precedence to the Dhamma, 11.As adhered to, not adhered to, and tranquillized. 12.As purified, unpurified, and dubious. 13.As that of the trainer, that of the non-trainer, and that of the neither-trainer- nor-non-trainer.
It is of five kinds as virtue consisting in limited purification, etc.;
Likewise as abandoning, refraining, volition, restraint, and non-transgression.
Herein, in the section dealing with that of one kind, the meaning should be understood as already stated.
In the section dealing with that of two kinds: fulfilling a training precept announced by the Blessed One thus: “This should be done” is keeping;
Herein, the word- meaning is this:
Herein, keeping is accomplished by faith and energy; avoiding, by faith and mindfulness.
This is how it is of two kinds as keeping and avoiding.
In the second dyad good behaviour is the best kind of behaviour.
Good behaviour itself is that of good behaviour;
This is a term for virtue other than that which has livelihood as eighth.9 It is the initial stage of the life of purity consisting in the path, thus it is that of the beginning of the life of purity. This is a term for the virtue that has livelihood as eighth.
It is the initial stage of the path because it has actually to be purified in the prior stage too.
Hence it is said: “But his bodily action, his verbal action, and his livelihood have already been purified earlier” .
Or the training precepts called “lesser and minor” are that of good behaviour;
Or what is included in the Double Code is that of the beginning of the life of purity;
Through its perfection that of the beginning of the life of purity comes to be perfected.
Hence it is said also “that this bhikkhu shall fulfil the state consisting in the beginning of the life of purity without having fulfilled the state consisting in good behaviour—that is not possible” .
So it is of two kinds as that of good behaviour and that of the beginning of the life of purity.
4.In the third dyad virtue as abstinence is simply abstention from killing living things, etc.;
the other kinds consisting in volition, etc., are virtue as non-abstinence. So it is of two kinds as abstinence and non-abstinence.
5.In the fourth dyad there are two kinds of dependence: dependence through craving and dependence through false views.
Herein, that produced by one who wishes for a fortunate kind of becoming thus, “Through this virtuous conduct rite I shall become a great deity or some minor deity” , is dependent through craving.
That produced through such false view about purification as “Purification is through virtuous conduct” is dependent through false view.
But the supramundane, and the mundane that is the prerequisite for the aforesaid supramundane, are independent. So it is of two kinds as dependent and independent.
In the fifth dyad temporary virtue is that undertaken after deciding on a time limit.
Lifelong virtue is that practiced in the same way but undertaking it for as long as life lasts. So it is of two kinds as temporary and lifelong.
7.In the sixth dyad the limited is that seen to be limited by gain, fame, relatives, limbs, or life.
The opposite is unlimited.
And this is said in the Paṭisambhidā: “What is the virtue that has a limit?
There is virtue that has gain as its limit, there is virtue that has fame as its limit, there is virtue that has relatives as its limit, there is virtue that has limbs as its limit, there is virtue that has life as its limit.
What is virtue that has gain as its limit?
Here someone with gain as cause, with gain as condition, with gain as reason, transgresses a training precept as undertaken: that virtue has gain as its limit” ,
Also in the answer dealing with the unlimited it is said: “What is virtue that does not have gain as its limit?
Here someone does not, with gain as cause, with gain as condition, with gain as reason, even arouse the thought of transgressing a training precept as undertaken, how then shall he actually transgress it? That virtue does not have gain as its limit” ,
and the rest should be elaborated in the same way.
So it is of two kinds as limited and unlimited.
8.In the seventh dyad all virtue subject to cankers is mundane;
Herein, the mundane brings about improvement in future becoming and is a prerequisite for the escape from becoming,
The supramundane brings about the escape from becoming and is the plane of reviewing knowledge. So it is of two kinds as mundane and supramundane.
In the first of the triads the inferior is produced by inferior zeal, purity of consciousness, energy, or inquiry;
That undertaken out of desire for fame is inferior;
Or again, that defiled by self-praise and disparagement of others, etc., thus, “I am possessed of virtue, but these other bhikkhus are ill-conducted and evil-natured” , is inferior;
that practiced for the purpose of one’s own deliverance is medium;
the virtue of the perfections practiced for the deliverance of all beings is superior. So it is of three kinds as inferior, medium, and superior.
In the second triad that practiced out of self-regard by one who regards self and desires to abandon what is unbecoming to self is virtue giving precedence to self.
That practiced out of regard for the world and out of desire to ward off the censure of the world is virtue giving precedence to the world.
That practiced out of regard for the Dhamma and out of desire to honour the majesty of the Dhamma is virtue giving precedence to the Dhamma. So it is of three kinds as giving precedence to self, and so on.
In the third triad the virtue that in the dyads was called dependent is adhered-to because it is adhered-to through craving and false view.
That practiced by the magnanimous ordinary man as the prerequisite of the path, and that associated with the path in trainers, are not-adhered-to.
That associated with trainers’ and non-trainers’ fruition is tranquillized. So it is of three kinds as adhered-to, and so on.
In the fourth triad that fulfilled by one who has committed no offence or has made amends after committing one is pure.
So long as he has not made amends after committing an offence it is impure.
Virtue in one who is dubious about whether a thing constitutes an offence or about what grade of offence has been committed or about whether he has committed an offence is dubious.
Herein, the meditator should purify impure virtue. If dubious, he should avoid cases about which he is doubtful and should get his doubts cleared up. In this way his mind will be kept at rest. So it is of three kinds as pure, and so on.
In the fifth triad the virtue associated with the four paths and with the first three fruitions is that of the trainer.
That associated with the fruition of Arahantship is that of the non-trainer.
The remaining kinds are that of the neither- trainer-nor-non-trainer. So it is of three kinds as that of the trainer, and so on.
But in the world the nature of such and such beings is called their “habit” of which they say: “This one is of happy habit , this one is of unhappy habit, this one is of quarrelsome habit, this one is of dandified habit.” Because of that it is said in the Paṭisambhidā figuratively: “Three kinds of virtue : profitable virtue, unprofitable virtue, indeterminate virtue” .
So it is also called of three kinds as profitable, and so on.
Of these, the unprofitable is not included here since it has nothing whatever to do with the headings beginning with the characteristic, which define virtue in the sense intended in this chapter. So the threefoldness should be understood only in the way already stated.
In the first of the tetrads:
The unvirtuous he cultivates, He visits not the virtuous,
And in his ignorance he sees No fault in a transgression here,
With wrong thoughts often in his mind His faculties he will not guard—
Virtue in such a constitution Comes to partake of diminution.
But he whose mind is satisfied. With virtue that has been achieved,
Who never thinks to stir himself And take a meditation subject up,
Contented with mere virtuousness, Nor striving for a higher state—
His virtue bears the appellation Of that partaking of stagnation.
But who, possessed of virtue, strives With concentration for his aim—
That bhikkhu’s virtue in its function Is called partaking of distinction.
Who finds mere virtue not enough But has dispassion for his goal—
His virtue through such aspiration Comes to partake of penetration.
So it is of four kinds as partaking of diminution, and so on.
In the second tetrad there are training precepts announced for bhikkhus to keep irrespective of what is announced for bhikkhunīs. This is the virtue of bhikkhus.
There are training precepts announced for bhikkhunīs to keep irrespective of what is announced for bhikkhus. This is the virtue of bhikkhunīs.
The ten precepts of virtue for male and female novices are the virtue of the not fully admitted.
The five training precepts—ten when possible—as a permanent undertaking and eight as the factors of the Uposatha Day,10 for male and female lay followers are the virtue of the laity. So it is of four kinds as the virtue of bhikkhus, and so on.
In the third tetrad the non-transgression on the part of Uttarakuru human beings is natural virtue.
Each clan’s or locality’s or sect’s own rules of conduct are customary virtue.
The virtue of the Bodhisatta’s mother described thus: “It is the necessary rule, Ānanda, that when the Bodhisatta has descended into his mother’s womb, no thought of men that is connected with the cords of sense desire comes to her” , is necessary virtue.
But the virtue of such pure beings as Mahā Kassapa, etc., and of the Bodhisatta in his various births is virtue due to previous causes. So it is of four kinds as natural virtue, and so on.
In the fourth tetrad: The virtue described by the Blessed One thus: “Here a bhikkhu dwells restrained with the Pātimokkha restraint, possessed of the proper conduct and resort, and seeing fear in the slightest fault, he trains himself by undertaking the precepts of training, ” is virtue of Pātimokkha restraint.
 That described thus: “On seeing a visible object with the eye, he apprehends neither the signs nor the particulars through which, if he left the eye faculty unguarded, evil and unprofitable states of covetousness and grief might invade him; he enters upon the way of its restraint, he guards the eye faculty, undertakes the restraint of the eye faculty.
On hearing a sound with the ear … On smelling an odour with the nose … On tasting a flavour with the tongue … On touching a tangible object with the body … On cognizing a mental object with the mind, he apprehends neither the signs nor the particulars through which, if he left the mind faculty unguarded, evil and unprofitable states of covetousness and grief might invade him; he enters upon the way of its restraint, he guards the mind faculty, undertakes the restraint of the mind faculty , is virtue of restraint of the sense faculties.
 Abstinence from such wrong livelihood as entails transgression of the six training precepts announced with respect to livelihood and entails the evil states beginning with “Scheming, talking, hinting, belittling, pursuing gain with gain” is virtue of livelihood purification.
 Use of the four requisites that is purified by the reflection stated in the way beginning, “Reflecting wisely, he uses the robe only for protection from cold” is called virtue concerning requisites.
It is of four kinds as partaking of diminution, of stagnation, of distinction, of penetration.
Likewise as that of bhikkhus, of bhikkhunīs, of the not-fully-admitted, of the laity, 16.As natural, customary, necessary, due to previous causes, 17.As virtue of Pātimokkha restraint, of restraint of sense faculties, of purification of livelihood, and that concerning requisites.
for this is said in the Paṭisambhidā: “Five kinds of virtue: virtue consisting in limited purification, virtue consisting in unlimited purification, virtue consisting in fulfilled purification, virtue consisting in unadhered-to purification, virtue consisting in tranquillized purification” .
not doing what is prohibited by him thus: “This should not be done” is avoiding.
they keep within that, they proceed as people who fulfil the virtues, thus it is keeping ;
they preserve, they protect, they avoid, thus it is avoiding.
or what is announced for the sake of good behaviour is that of good behaviour.
the rest are that of the beginning of the life of purity.
and that included in the duties set out in the Khandhakas of Vinaya is that of good behaviour.
and the rest should be elaborated in the same way.
that not subject to cankers is supramundane.
according as it is said: “Discipline is for the purpose of restraint, restraint is for the purpose of non- remorse, non-remorse is for the purpose of gladdening, gladdening is for the purpose of happiness, happiness is for the purpose of tranquillity, tranquillity is for the purpose of bliss, bliss is for the purpose of concentration, concentration is for the purpose of correct knowledge and vision, correct knowledge and vision is for the purpose of dispassion, dispassion is for the purpose of fading away of greed, fading away is for the purpose of deliverance, deliverance is for the purpose of knowledge and vision of deliverance, knowledge and vision of deliverance is for the purpose of complete extinction of craving, etc. through not clinging. Talk has that purpose, counsel has that purpose, support has that purpose, giving ear has that purpose, that is to say, the liberation of the mind through not clinging” .
the medium is produced by medium zeal, etc.;
the superior, by superior .
that undertaken out of desire for the fruits of merit is medium;
that undertaken for the sake of the noble state thus, “This has to be done” is superior.
undefiled mundane virtue is medium;
supramundane is superior.
Or again, that motivated by craving, the purpose of which is to enjoy continued existence, is inferior;
Here is an explanatory exposition together with a word commentary starting from the beginning.
 Here: in this dispensation.
A bhikkhu: a clansman who has gone forth out of faith and is so styled because he sees fear in the round of rebirths or because he wears cloth garments that are torn and pieced together, and so on.
Restrained with the Pātimokkha restraint: here “Pātimokkha” 11 is the virtue of the training precepts;
“Restraint” is restraining; this is a term for bodily and verbal non-transgression.
The Pātimokkha itself as restraint is “Pātimokkha restraint.”
“Restrained with the Pātimokkha restraint” is restrained by means of the restraint consisting in that Pātimokkha; he has it, possesses it, is the meaning.
Dwells: bears himself in one of the postures.
The meaning of possessed of the proper conduct and resort, etc., should be understood in the way in which it is given in the text.
For this is said:
Herein, what is improper conduct?
Bodily transgression, verbal transgression, bodily and verbal transgression—this is called improper conduct.
Also all unvirtuousness is improper conduct.
Here someone makes a livelihood by gifts of bamboos, or by gifts of leaves, or by gifts of flowers, fruits, bathing powder, and tooth sticks, or by flattery, or by bean-soupery, or by fondling, or by going on errands on foot, or by one or other of the sorts of wrong livelihood condemned by the Buddhas—this is called improper conduct.
Herein, what is proper conduct?
Bodily non-transgression, verbal non-transgression, bodily and verbal non-transgression— this is called proper conduct.
Also all restraint through virtue is proper conduct.
Here someone “does not make a livelihood by gifts of bamboos, or by gifts of leaves, or by gifts of flowers, fruits, bathing powder, and tooth sticks, or by flattery, or by bean-soupery, or by fondling, or by going on errands on foot, or by one or other of the sorts of wrong livelihood condemned by the Buddhas—this is called proper conduct.”
“Proper resort: there is proper resort and improper resort.
Herein, what is improper resort?
Here someone has prostitutes as resort, or he has widows, old maids, eunuchs, bhikkhunīs, or taverns as resort; or he dwells associated with kings, kings’ ministers, sectarians, sectarians’ disciples, in unbecoming association with laymen; or he cultivates, frequents, honours, such families as are faithless, untrusting, abusive and rude, who wish harm, wish ill, wish woe, wish no surcease of bondage, for bhikkhus and bhikkhunīs, for male and female devotees —this is called improper resort.
Herein, what is proper resort?
Here someone does not have prostitutes as resort … or taverns as resort; he does not dwell associated with kings … sectarians’ disciples, in unbecoming association with laymen; he cultivates, frequents, honours, such families as are faithful and trusting, who are a solace, where the yellow cloth glows, where the breeze of sages blows, who wish good, wish well, wish joy, wish surcease of bondage, for bhikkhus and bhikkhunīs, for male and female devotees—this is called proper resort.
Thus he is furnished with, fully furnished with, provided with, fully provided with, supplied with, possessed of, endowed with, this proper conduct and this proper resort. Hence it is said, ’Possessed of the proper conduct and resort’” .
Furthermore, proper conduct and resort should also be understood here in the following way;
Herein, what is bodily improper conduct?
“Here someone acts disrespectfully before the Community, and he stands jostling elder bhikkhus, sits jostling them, stands in front of them, sits in front of them, sits on a high seat, sits with his head covered, talks standing up, talks waving his arms … walks with sandals while elder bhikkhus walk without sandals, walks on a high walk while they walk on a low walk, walks on a walk while they walk on the ground … stands pushing elder bhikkhus, sits pushing them, prevents new bhikkhus from getting a seat … and in the bath house … without asking elder bhikkhus he puts wood on the stove … bolts the door … and at the bathing place he enters the water jostling elder bhikkhus, enters it in front of them, bathes jostling them, bathes in front of them, comes out jostling them, comes out in front of them … and entering inside a house he goes jostling elder bhikkhus, goes in front of them, pushing forward he goes in front of them … and where families have inner private screened rooms in which the women of the family … the girls of the family, sit, there he enters abruptly, and he strokes a child’s head” . This is called bodily improper conduct.
Herein, what is verbal improper conduct?
“Here someone acts disrespectfully before the Community. Without asking elder bhikkhus he talks on the Dhamma,
answers questions, recites the Pātimokkha, talks standing up, talks waving his arms … having entered inside a house, he speaks to a woman or a girl thus: ‘You, so- and-so of such-and-such a clan, what is there? Is there rice gruel? Is there cooked rice? Is there any hard food to eat? What shall we drink? What hard food shall we eat? What soft food shall we eat?
Or what will you give me?’ —he chatters like this” . This is called verbal improper conduct.
Proper conduct should be understood in the opposite sense to that.
Furthermore, a bhikkhu is respectful, deferential, possessed of conscience and shame, wears his inner robe properly, wears his upper robe properly, his manner inspires confidence whether in moving forwards or backwards, looking ahead or aside, bending or stretching, his eyes are downcast, he has deportment, he guards the doors of his sense faculties, knows the right measure in eating, is devoted to wakefulness, possesses mindfulness and full awareness, wants little, is contented, is strenuous, is a careful observer of good behaviour, and treats the teachers with great respect. This is called conduct.
This firstly is how conduct should be understood.
for it frees him who protects it, guards it, it sets him free from the pains of the states of loss, etc., that is why it is called Pātimokkha.
“Possessed of the proper conduct and resort: there is proper conduct and improper conduct.
for improper conduct is twofold as bodily and verbal.
 resort is of three kinds: resort as support, resort as guarding, and resort as anchoring.
Herein, what is resort as support?
A good friend who exhibits the instances of talk,12 in whose presence one hears what has not been heard, corrects what has been heard, gets rid of doubt, rectifies one’s view, and gains confidence;
or by training under whom one grows in faith, virtue, learning, generosity and understanding—this is called resort as support.
What is resort as guarding?
Here “A bhikkhu, having entered inside a house, having gone into a street, goes with downcast eyes, seeing the length of a plough yoke, restrained, not looking at an elephant, not looking at a horse, a carriage, a pedestrian, a woman, a man, not looking up, not looking down, not staring this way and that” . This is called resort as guarding.
What is resort as anchoring?
It is the four foundations of mindfulness on which the mind is anchored;
for this is said by the Blessed One: “Bhikkhus, what is a bhikkhu’s resort, his own native place?
It is these four foundations of mindfulness” . This is called resort as anchoring.
Being thus furnished with … endowed with, this conduct and this resort,
he is also on that account called “one possessed of conduct and resort.”
Seeing fear in the slightest fault : one who has the habit of seeing fear in faults of the minutest measure, of such kinds as unintentional contravening of a minor training rule of the Pātimokkha, or the arising of unprofitable thoughts.
He trains himself by undertaking the precepts of training: whatever there is among the precepts of training to be trained in, in all that he trains by taking it up rightly .
And here, as far as the words, “one restrained by the Pātimokkha restraint,” virtue of Pātimokkha restraint is shown by discourse in terms of persons.13
But all that beginning with the words, “possessed of proper conduct and resort” should be understood as said in order to show the way of practice that perfects that virtue in him who so practices it.
 Now, as regards the virtue of livelihood purification mentioned above next to the virtue of restraint of the faculties , the words of the six precepts announced on account of livelihood mean, of the following six training precepts announced thus: “With livelihood as cause, with livelihood as reason, one of evil wishes, a prey to wishes, lays claim to a higher than human state that is non-existent, not a fact,” the contravention of which is defeat ;
“with livelihood as cause, with livelihood as reason, one who is not sick eats curry or boiled rice that he has ordered for his own use,” the contravention of which is an offence of wrongdoing . Of these six precepts.17
As regards scheming, etc. , this is the text: “Herein, what is scheming?
It is the grimacing, grimacery, scheming, schemery, schemedness,18 by what is called rejection of requisites or by indirect talk, or it is the disposing, posing, composing, of the deportment on the part of one bent on gain, honour and renown, of one of evil wishes, a prey to wishes—this is called scheming.
”Herein, what is talking?
Talking at others, talking, talking round, talking up, continual talking up, persuading, continual persuading, suggesting, continual suggesting, ingratiating chatter, flattery, bean-soupery, fondling, on the part of one bent on gain, honour and renown, of one of evil wishes, a prey to wishes—this is called talking.
”Herein, what is hinting?
A sign to others, giving a sign, indication, giving indication, indirect talk, roundabout talk, on the part of one bent on gain, honour and renown, of one of evil wishes, a prey to wishes—this is called hinting.
”Herein, what is belittling?
Abusing of others, disparaging, reproaching, snubbing, continual snubbing, ridicule, continual ridicule, denigration, continual denigration, tale-bearing, backbiting, on the part of one bent on gain, honour and renown, of one of evil wishes, a prey to wishes—this is called belittling.
”Herein, what is pursuing gain with gain?
Seeking, seeking for, seeking out, going in search of, searching for, searching out material goods by means of material goods, such as carrying there goods that have been got from here,
The meaning of this text should be understood as follows:
Of one of evil wishes: of one who wants to show qualities that he has not got.
A prey to wishes:20 the meaning is, of one who is attacked by them.
And after this the passage beginning or by what is called rejection of requisites is given in order to show the three instances of scheming given in the Mahāniddesa as rejection of requisites, indirect talk, and that based on deportment.
Herein, a bhikkhu is invited to accept robes, etc., and, precisely because he wants them, he refuses them out of evil wishes. And then, since he knows that those householders believe in him implicitly when they think, “Oh, how few are our lord’s wishes! He will not accept a thing! ” and they put fine robes, etc., before him by various means, he then accepts, making a show that he wants to be compassionate towards them—it is this hypocrisy of his, which becomes the cause of their subsequently bringing them even by cartloads, that should be understood as the instance of scheming called rejection of requisites.
For this is said in the Mahāniddesa:
“What is the instance of scheming called rejection of requisites?
Here householders invite bhikkhus to accept robes, alms food, resting place, and the requisite of medicine as cure for the sick.
One who is of evil wishes, a prey to wishes, wanting robes … alms food … resting place … the requisite of medicine as cure for the sick, refuses robes …
He says: ‘What has an ascetic to do with expensive robes? It is proper for an ascetic to gather rags from a charnel ground or from a rubbish heap or from a shop and make them into a patchwork cloak to wear.
What has an ascetic to do with expensive alms food? It is proper for an ascetic to get his living by the dropping of lumps of food into his bowl while he wanders for gleanings.
What has an ascetic to do with an expensive resting place? It is proper for an ascetic to be a tree-root-dweller or an open-air-dweller.
What has an ascetic to do with an expensive requisite of medicine as cure for the sick? It is proper for an ascetic to cure himself with putrid urine21 and broken gallnuts.’
Accordingly he wears a coarse robe, eats coarse alms food, uses a coarse resting place, uses a coarse requisite of medicine as cure for the sick. Then householders think, ‘This ascetic has few wishes, is content, is secluded, keeps aloof from company, is strenuous, is a preacher of asceticism,’
and they invite him more and more to accept robes, alms food, resting places, and the requisite of medicine as cure for the sick.
He says: ‘With three things present a faithful clansman produces much merit:
You have faith; the goods to be given are here; and I am here to accept. If I do not accept, then you will be deprived of the merit. That is no good to me.
Rather will I accept out of compassion for you.”
Accordingly he accepts many robes,
Such grimacing, grimacery, scheming, schemery, schemedness, is known as the instance of scheming called rejection of requisites’ .
It is hypocrisy on the part of one of evil wishes, who gives it to be understood verbally in some way or other that he has attained a higher than human state, that should be understood as the instance of scheming called indirect talk,
Here someone of evil wishes, a prey to wishes, eager to be admired, thinking ‘Thus people will admire me’ speaks words about the noble state. He says, ‘He who wears such a robe is a very important ascetic.’
He says, ‘He who carries such a bowl,
metal cup, water filler, water strainer, key, wears such a waist band, sandals, is a very important ascetic.’
He says, ‘He who has such a preceptor … teacher … who has the same preceptor, who has the same teacher, who has such a friend, associate, intimate, companion;
Or alternatively, all-gushing, all-grimacing, all-scheming, all-talkative, with an expression of admiration, he utters such deep, mysterious, cunning, obscure, supramundane talk suggestive of voidness as ‘This ascetic is an obtainer of peaceful abidings and attainments such as these.’
Such grimacing, grimacery, scheming, schemery, schemedness, is known as the instance of scheming called indirect talk” .
It is hypocrisy on the part of one of evil wishes, which takes the form of deportment influenced by eagerness to be admired, that should be understood as the instance of scheming dependent on deportment,
according as it is said: “What is the instance of scheming called deportment?
Here someone of evil wishes, a prey to wishes, eager to be admired, thinking ‘Thus people will admire me,’ composes his way of walking, composes his way of lying down; he walks studiedly, stands studiedly, sits studiedly, lies down studiedly; he walks as though concentrated, stands, sits, lies down as though concentrated; and he is one who meditates in public. Such disposing, posing, composing, of deportment, grimacing, grimacery, scheming, schemery, schemedness, is known as the instance of scheming called deportment” .
Herein, the words by what is called rejection of requisites mean: by what is called thus “rejection of requisites”; or they mean: by means of the rejection of requisites that is so called.
By indirect talk means: by talking near to the subject.
Of deportment means: of the four modes of deportment .
Disposing is initial posing, or careful posing.
Posing is the manner of posing.
Composing is prearranging; assuming a trust-inspiring attitude, is what is meant.
Grimacing is making grimaces by showing great intenseness; facial contraction is what is meant.
One who has the habit of making grimaces is a grimacer.
The grimacer’s state is grimacery.
Scheming is hypocrisy.
The way of a schemer is schemery .
The state of what is schemed is schemedness.
In the description of talking: talking at is talking thus on seeing people coming to the monastery, “What have you come for, good people? What, to invite bhikkhus? If it is that, then go along and I shall come later with my bowl,” etc.;
or alternatively, talking at is talking by advertising oneself thus, “I am Tissa, the king trusts me, such and such king’s ministers trust me.”
Talking round is roundly talking by one who is afraid of householders’ displeasure because he has given occasion for it.
Talking up is talking by extolling people thus, “He is a great land-owner, a great ship-owner, a great lord of giving.”
Persuading is progressively involving23 people thus, “Lay followers, formerly you used to give first-fruit alms at such a time; why do you not do so now? ” until they say, “We shall give, venerable sir, we have had no opportunity,” etc.; entangling, is what is meant.
Or alternatively, seeing someone with sugarcane in his hand, he asks, “Where are you coming from, lay follower?”
—”From the sugarcane field, venerable sir”
—”One can find out by eating, venerable sir”
” Such entangling talk from such an entangler is persuading.
Persuading again and again in all ways is continual persuading.
Suggesting is insinuating by specifying thus, “That family alone understands me;
And here the story of the oil-seller should be told.24
Ingratiating chatter is endearing chatter repeated again and again without regard to whether it is in conformity with truth and Dhamma.
Flattery is speaking humbly, always maintaining an attitude of inferiority.
Bean-soupery is resemblance to bean soup;
Fondling is the state of the act of fondling.
For when a man fondles children on his lap or on his shoulder like a nurse—he nurses, is the meaning—
The state of the act of fondling is fondling.
In the description of hinting : a sign is any bodily or verbal act that gets others to give requisites.
Giving a sign is making a sign such as “What have you got to eat? ”, etc., on seeing people going along with food.
Indication is talk that alludes to requisites.
Giving indication: on seeing cowboys, he asks, “Are these milk cows’ calves or buttermilk cows’ calves? ” and when it is said, “They are milk cows’ calves, venerable sir,” he remarks “They are not milk cows’ calves. If they were milk cows’ calves the bhikkhus would be getting milk,” etc.; and his getting it to the knowledge of the boys’ parents in this way, and so making them give milk, is giving indication.
Indirect talk is talk that keeps near to the subject.
And here there should be told the story of the bhikkhu supported by a family.
A bhikkhu, it seems, who was supported by a family went into the house wanting to eat and sat down.
The mistress of the house was unwilling to give. On seeing him she said, “There is no rice,” and she went to a neighbour’s house as though to get rice.
The bhikkhu went into the storeroom. Looking round, he saw sugarcane in the corner behind the door, sugar in a bowl, a string of salt fish in a basket, rice in a jar, and ghee in a pot. He came out and sat down.
When the housewife came back, she said, “I did not get any rice.”
— ”I saw a snake that was like sugarcane put in the corner behind the door; looking for something to hit it with, I saw a stone like a lump of sugar in a bowl. When the snake had been hit with the clod, it spread out a hood like a string of salt fish in a basket, and its teeth as it tried to bite the clod were like rice grains in a jar. Then the saliva mixed with poison that came out to its mouth in its fury was like ghee put in a pot.”
She thought, “There is no hoodwinking the shaveling,” so she gave him the sugarcane and she cooked the rice and gave it all to him with the ghee, the sugar and the fish.
Such talk that keeps near to the subject should be understood as indirect talk.
Roundabout talk is talking round and round the subject as much as is allowed.
In the description of belittling: abusing is abusing by means of the ten instances of abuse.25
Reproaching is enumeration of faults such as “He is faithless, he is an unbeliever.”
Snubbing is taking up verbally thus, “Don’t say that here.”
Or alternatively, when someone does not give, taking him up thus, “Oh, the prince of givers!” is snubbing;
and the thorough snubbing thus, “A mighty prince of givers! ” is continual snubbing.
Ridicule is making fun of someone thus, “What sort of a life has this man who eats up his seed grain?”
Continual ridicule is making fun of him more thoroughly thus, “What, you say this man is not a giver who always gives the words ‘There is nothing’ to everyone? ”
Denigration26 is denigrating someone by saying that he is not a giver, or by censuring him.
All-round denigration is continual denigration.
Tale-bearing is bearing tales from house to house, from village to village, from district to district, thinking “So they will give to me out of fear of my bearing tales.”
This is called belittling because it scrapes off , wipes off, the virtuous qualities of others as a bamboo scraper does unguent, or because it is a pursuit of gain by grinding and pulverizing others’ virtuous qualities, like the pursuit of perfume by grinding perfumed substances; that is why it is called belittling.
`In the description of pursuing gain with gain: pursuing is hunting after.
Got from here is got from this house.
There is into that house.
Seeking is wanting.
Seeking for is hunting after.
Seeking out is hunting after again and again.
The story of the bhikkhu who went round giving away the alms he had got at first to children of families here and there and in the end got milk and gruel should be told here.
Searching, etc., are synonyms for “seeking,” etc., going in search of is seeking;
This is the meaning of scheming, and so on.
Now, as regards the words The evil states beginning with : here the words beginning with should be understood to include the many evil states given in the Brahmajāla Sutta in the way beginning, “Or just as some worthy ascetics, while eating the food given by the faithful, make a living by wrong livelihood, by such low arts as these,
So this wrong livelihood entails the transgression of these six training precepts announced on account of livelihood, and it entails the evil states beginning with “Scheming, talking, hinting, belittling, pursuing gain with gain.” And so it is the abstinence from all sorts of wrong livelihood that is virtue of livelihood purification,
What is that? It is the effort consisting in the search for requisites.
“Purification” is purifiedness.
“Livelihood purification” is purification of livelihood.
“with livelihood as cause, with livelihood as reason, he acts as go-between,” the contravention of which is an offence entailing a meeting of the Order;
“with livelihood as cause, with livelihood as reason, he says, ‘A bhikkhu who lives in your monastery is an Arahant,’” the contravention of which is a serious offence in one who is aware of it;
“with livelihood as cause, with livelihood as reason, a bhikkhu who is not sick eats superior food that he has ordered for his own use,” the contravention of which is an offence requiring expiation:
“With livelihood as cause, with livelihood as reason, a bhikkhunī who is not sick eats superior food that she has ordered for her own use,” the contravention of which is an offence requiring confession;
or carrying here goods that have been got from there, by one bent on gain, honour and renown, by one of evil wishes, a prey to wishes—this is called pursuing gain with gain.”19 
Firstly, as regards description of scheming: on the part of one bent on gain, honour and renown is on the part of one who is bent on gain, on honour, and on reputation; on the part of one who longs for them, is the meaning.
alms food … resting place …
the requisite of medicine as cure for the sick, because he wants more.
with faith present a faithful clansman produces much merit,
with goods to be given present a faithful clansman produces much merit, with those worthy to receive present a faithful clansman produces much merit.
he accepts much alms food, he accepts many resting places, he accepts many requisites of medicine as cure for the sick.
according as it is said:
“What is the instance of scheming called indirect talk?
he who lives in such a monastery, lean-to, mansion, villa,22 cave, grotto, hut, pavilion, watch tower, hall, barn, meeting hall, room, at such a tree root, is a very important ascetic.’
Talking is the same kind of talking on being asked a question.
Continual talking up is talking by extolling people in all ways.
—”Is the sugarcane sweet there?”
—”It is not allowed, lay follower, for bhikkhus to say ‘Give me some sugarcane.’
if there is anything to be given there, they give it to me only”; pointing to, is what is meant.
Suggesting in all ways again and again is continual suggesting.
for just as when beans are being cooked only a few do not get cooked, the rest get cooked, so too the person in whose speech only a little is true, the rest being false, is called a “bean soup”;
his state is bean-soupery.
that fondler’s act is the act of fondling.
The bhikkhu said, “Lay follower, I saw a sign just now that alms will not be easy to get today.”
—“What, venerable sir?”
Disparaging is contemptuous talk.
Snubbing in all ways, giving grounds and reasons, is continual snubbing.
Backbiting is speaking censoriously behind another’s back after speaking kindly to his face;
for this is like biting the flesh of another’s back, when he is not looking, on the part of one who is unable to look him in the face; therefore it is called backbiting.
searching for is seeking for; searching out is seeking out.
and so the construction here should be understood thus .
that is to say, by palmistry, by fortune-telling, by divining omens, by interpreting dreams, marks on the body, holes gnawed by mice; by fire sacrifice, by spoon oblation …” .
the word-meaning of which is this:
on account of it they live, thus it is livelihood.
‘Putrid urine’ is the name for all kinds of cow’s urine whether old or not
 So, in this fourfold virtue, Pātimokkha restraint has to be undertaken by means of faith.
For that is accomplished by faith, since the announcing of training precepts is outside the disciples’ province;
Having therefore undertaken through faith the training precepts without exception as announced, one should completely perfect them without regard for life.
For this is said:
“As a hen guards her eggs, Or as a yak her tail,
Or like a darling child, Or like an only eye—
So you who are engaged Your virtue to protect,
Be prudent at all times And ever scrupulous.” 
Also it is said further: “So too, sire, when a training precept for disciples is announced by me, my disciples do not transgress it even for the sake of life” .
And the story of the elders bound by robbers in the forest should be understood in this sense.
It seems that robbers in the Mahāvaṭṭanī Forest bound an elder with black creepers and made him lie down.
While he lay there for seven days he augmented his insight, and after reaching the fruition of non-return, he died there and was reborn in the Brahmā-world.
Also they bound another elder in Tambapaṇṇi Island with string creepers and made him lie down.
When a forest fire came and the creepers were not cut, he established insight and attained Nibbāna simultaneously with his death.
When the Elder Abhaya, a preacher of the Dīgha Nikāya, passed by with five hundred bhikkhus, he saw what had happened and he had the elder’s body cremated and a shrine built.
Therefore let other clansmen also:
Maintain the rules of conduct pure, Renouncing life if there be need,
Rather than break virtue’s restraint By the World’s Saviour decreed.
 And as Pātimokkha restraint is undertaken out of faith, so restraint of the sense faculties should be undertaken with mindfulness.
For that is accomplished by mindfulness, because when the sense faculties’ functions are founded on mindfulness, there is no liability to invasion by covetousness and the rest.
So, recollecting the Fire Discourse, which begins thus, “Better, bhikkhus, the extirpation of the eye faculty by a red-hot burning blazing glowing iron spike than the apprehension of signs in the particulars of visible objects cognizable by the eye” , this restraint should be properly undertaken by preventing with unremitting mindfulness any apprehension, in the objective fields consisting of visible data, etc., of any signs, etc., likely to encourage covetousness, etc., to invade consciousness occurring in connection with the eye door, and so on.
When not undertaken thus, virtue of Pātimokkha restraint is unenduring: it does not last, like a crop not fenced in with branches.
And it is raided by the robber defilements as a village with open gates is by thieves.
And lust leaks into his mind as rain does into a badly-roofed house.
For this is said:
“Among the visible objects, sounds, and smells,
And tastes, and tangibles, guard the faculties;
For when these doors are open and unguarded,
Then thieves will come and raid as ’twere a village .
And just as with an ill-roofed house The rain comes leaking in, so too
Will lust come leaking in for sure Upon an undeveloped mind” .
When it is undertaken thus, virtue of Pātimokkha restraint is enduring: it lasts, like a crop well fenced in with branches.
And it is not raided by the robber defilements, as a village with well-guarded gates is not by thieves.
And lust does not leak into his mind, as rain does not into a well-roofed house.
For this is said:
“Among the visible objects, sounds and smells,
And tastes and tangibles, guard the faculties;
For when these doors are closed and truly guarded,
Thieves will not come and raid as ’twere a village .
“And just as with a well-roofed house No rain comes leaking in, so too
No lust comes leaking in for sure Upon a well-developed mind” .
This, however, is the teaching at its very highest.
This mind is called “quickly transformed” , so restraint of the faculties should be undertaken by removing arisen lust with the contemplation of foulness, as was done by the Elder Vaṅgīsa soon after he had gone forth.
As the elder was wandering for alms, it seems, soon after going forth, lust arose in him on seeing a woman.
Thereupon he said to the venerable Ānanda:
“I am afire with sensual lust. And burning flames consume my mind;
In pity tell me, Gotama, How to extinguish it for good” .
The elder said:
“You do perceive mistakenly, That burning flames consume your mind.
Look for no sign of beauty there, For that it is which leads to lust.
See foulness there and keep your mind Harmoniously concentrated;
Formations see as alien, As ill, not self, so this great lust
May be extinguished, and no more Take fire thus ever and again” .
The elder expelled his lust and then went on with his alms round.
Moreover, a bhikkhu who is fulfilling restraint of the faculties should be like the Elder Cittagutta resident in the Great Cave at Kuraṇḍaka, and like the Elder Mahā Mitta resident at the Great Monastery of Coraka.
In the Great Cave of Kuraṇḍaka, it seems, there was a lovely painting of the Renunciation of the Seven Buddhas. A number of bhikkhus wandering about among the dwellings saw the painting and said, “What a lovely painting, venerable sir!
” The elder said: “For more than sixty years, friends, I have lived in the cave, and I did not know whether there was any painting there or not.
Now, today, I know it through those who have eyes.” The elder, it seems, though he had lived there for so long, had never raised his eyes and looked up at the cave.
And at the door of his cave there was a great ironwood tree.
And the elder had never looked up at that either.
He knew it was in flower when he saw its petals on the ground each year.
The king heard of the elder’s great virtues, and he sent for him three times, desiring to pay homage to him. When the elder did not go, he had the breasts of all the women with infants in the town bound and sealed off, saying “As long as the elder does not come let the children go without milk,”
Out of compassion for the children the elder went to Mahāgāma.
When the king heard that he had come, he said “Go and bring the elder in. I shall take the precepts.” Having had him brought up into the inner palace, he paid homage to him and provided him with a meal. Then, saying, “Today, venerable sir, there is no opportunity. I shall take the precepts tomorrow,” he took the elder’s bowl. After following him for a little, he paid homage with the queen and turned back.
whether it was the king who paid homage or whether it was the queen, the elder said, “May the king be happy.”
Bhikkhus asked: “Why is it, venerable sir, that whether it is the king who pays the homage or the queen you say ‘May the king be happy’?
” The elder replied: “Friends, I do not notice whether it is the king or the queen.” At the end of seven days when it was found that the elder was not happy living there, he was dismissed by the king. He went back to the Great Cave at Kuraṇḍaka. When it was night he went out onto his walk.
A deity who dwelt in the ironwood tree stood by with a torch of sticks.
Then his meditation subject became quite clear and plain.
The elder, thinking “How clear my meditation subject is today! ” was glad, and immediately after the middle watch he reached Arahantship, making the whole rock resound.30
So when another clansman seeks his own good:
Let him not be hungry-eyed, Like a monkey in the groves,
Like a wild deer in the woods, Like a nervous little child.
Let him go with eyes downcast Seeing a plough yoke’s length before,
That he fall not in the power Of the forest-monkey mind.
The Elder Mahā Mitta’s mother was sick with a poisoned tumour. She told her daughter, who as a bhikkhunī had also gone forth
, “Lady, go to your brother. Tell him my trouble and bring back some medicine.”
She went and told him.
The elder said: “I do not know how to gather root medicines and such things and concoct a medicine from them. But rather I will tell you a medicine: since I went forth I have not broken my virtue of restraint of the sense faculties by looking at the bodily form of the opposite sex with a lustful mind. By this declaration of truth may my mother get well. Go and tell the lay devotee and rub her body.”
She went and told her what had happened and then did as she had been instructed.
At that very moment the lay devotee’s tumour vanished, shrinking away like a lump of froth. She got up and uttered a cry of joy: “If the Fully Enlightened One were still alive, why should he not stroke with his netadorned hand the head of a bhikkhu like my son?”
So:
Let another noble clansman Gone forth in the Dispensation
Keep, as did the Elder Mitta, Perfect faculty restraint.
 As restraint of the faculties is to be undertaken by means of mindfulness, so livelihood purification is to be undertaken by means of energy.
For that is accomplished by energy, because the abandoning of wrong livelihood is effected in one who has rightly applied energy.
Abandoning, therefore, unbefitting wrong search, this should be undertaken with energy by means of the right kind of search consisting in going on alms round, etc., avoiding what is of impure origin as though it were a poisonous snake, and using only requisites of pure origin.
Herein, for one who has not taken up the ascetic practices, any requisites obtained from the Community, from a group of bhikkhus, or from laymen who have confidence in his special qualities of teaching the Dhamma, etc., are called “of pure origin.”
But those obtained on alms round, etc., are of extremely pure origin.
For one who has taken up the ascetic practices, those obtained on alms round, etc., and—as long as this is in accordance with the rules of the ascetic practices—from people who have confidence in his special qualities of asceticism, are called “of pure origin.”
As to the robe and the other requisites, no hint, indication, roundabout talk, or intimation about robes and alms food is allowable for a bhikkhu who is purifying his livelihood.
But a hint, indication, or roundabout talk about a resting place is allowable for one who has not taken up the ascetic practices.
Herein, a “hint” is when one who is getting the preparing of the ground, etc., done for the purpose of making a resting place is asked, “What is being done, venerable sir? Who is having it done? ” and he replies, “No one”; or any other such giving of hints.
An “indication” is saying, “Lay follower, where do you live?”
—”In a mansion, venerable sir”
“Roundabout talk” is saying, “The resting place for the Community of Bhikkhus is crowded”; or any other such oblique talk.
All, however, is allowed in the case of medicine.
But when the disease is cured, is it or is it not allowed to use the medicine obtained in this way?
Herein, the Vinaya specialists say that the opening has been given by the Blessed One, therefore it is allowable.
But the Suttanta specialists say that though there is no offence, nevertheless the livelihood is sullied, therefore it is not allowable.
But one who does not use hints, indications, roundabout talk, or intimation, though these are permitted by the Blessed One, and who depends only on the special qualities of fewness of wishes, etc., and makes use only of requisites obtained otherwise than by indication, etc., even when he thus risks his life, is called supreme in living in effacement, like the venerable Sāriputta.
It seems that the venerable one was cultivating seclusion at one time, living in a certain forest with the Elder Mahā Moggallāna. One day an affliction of colic arose in him, causing him great pain.
In the evening the Elder Mahā Moggallāna went to attend upon him. Seeing him lying down, he asked what the reason was. And then he asked, “What used to make you better formerly, friend?”
The elder said, “When I was a layman, friend, my mother used to mix ghee, honey, sugar and so on, and give me rice gruel with pure milk. That used to make me better.”
Then the other said, “So be it, friend. If either you or I have merit, perhaps tomorrow we shall get some.”
Now, a deity who dwelt in a tree at the end of the walk overheard their conversation. Thinking “I will find rice gruel for the lord tomorrow,” he went meanwhile to the family who was supporting the elder and entered into the body of the eldest son, causing him discomfort.
Then he told the assembled relatives the price of the cure: “If you prepare rice gruel of such a kind tomorrow for the elder, I will set this one free.”
The Elder Mahā Moggallāna came in the morning and said, “Stay here, friend, till I come back from the alms round.” Then he went into the village.
Those people met him. They took his bowl, filled it with the stipulated kind of rice gruel, and gave it back to him.
The elder made as though to go,
The elder left. Bringing the alms food to the venerable Sāriputta, he said, “Here, friend Sāriputta, eat.”
When the elder saw it, he thought, “The gruel is very nice. How was it got? ” and seeing how it had been obtained, he said, “Friend, the alms food cannot be used.”
Instead of thinking, “He does not eat alms food brought by the likes of me,” the other at once took the bowl by the rim and turned it over on one side.
As the rice gruel fell on the ground the elder’s affliction vanished. From then on it did not appear again during forty-five years.
Then he said to the venerable Mahā Moggallāna, “Friend, even if one’s bowels come out and trail on the ground, it is not fitting to eat gruel got by verbal intimation,”
The honey and the gruel obtained By influence of verbal hints
If I were to consent to eat My livelihood might well be blamed.
And even if my bowels obtrude And trail outside, and even though
My life is to be jeopardized, I will not blot my livelihood .
For I will satisfy my heart By shunning all wrong kinds of search;
And never will I undertake The search the Buddhas have condemned.
And here too should be told the story of the Elder Mahā Tissa the Mango- eater who lived at Cīragumba32 .
So in all respects:
And, seeing clearly, give no thought To any search that is not good
A man who has gone forth in faith Should purify his livelihood.
 And as livelihood purification is to be undertaken by means of energy, so virtue dependent on requisites is to be undertaken by means of understanding.
For that is accomplished by understanding, because one who possesses understanding is able to see the advantages and the dangers in requisites.
So one should abandon greed for requisites and undertake that virtue by using requisites obtained lawfully and properly, after reviewing them with understanding in the way aforesaid.
Herein, reviewing is of two kinds: at the time of receiving requisites and at the time of using them.
For use is blameless in one who at the time of receiving robes, etc., reviews them either as mere elements or as repulsive,33 and puts them aside for later use, and in one who reviews them thus at the time of using them.
Here is an explanation to settle the matter.
There are four kinds of use: use as theft,34 use as a debt? , use as an inheritance, use as a master.
Herein, use by one who is unvirtuous and makes use of requisites, even sitting in the midst of the Community, is called “use as theft.”
therefore the robe should be reviewed every time it is used, and the alms food lump by lump. One who cannot do this should review it before the meal, after the meal, in the first watch, in the middle watch, and in the last watch.
If dawn breaks on him without his having reviewed it, he finds himself in the position of one who has used it as a debt.
Also the resting place should be reviewed each time it is used.
Recourse to mindfulness both in the accepting and the use of medicine is proper;
Purification is of four kinds: purification by the Teaching, purification by restraint, purification by search, and purification by reviewing.
Herein, virtue of the Pātimokkha restraint is called “purification by the Teaching”;
for that is so called because it purifies by means of teaching.
Virtue of restraint of faculties is called “purification by restraint”;
Virtue dependent on requisites is called “purification by reviewing”;
Hence it was said above : “There is no offence for one who is mindful in using after accepting without mindfulness.”
Use of the requisites by the seven kinds of trainers is called “use as an inheritance”;
But how then, is it the Blessed One’s requisites or the laity’s requisites that are used?
Although given by the laity, they actually belong to the Blessed One, because it is by the Blessed One that they are permitted. That is why it should be understood that the Blessed One’s requisites are used.
The confirmation here is in the Dhammadāyāda Sutta .
Use by those whose cankers are destroyed is called “use as a master”;
for they make use of them as masters because they have escaped the slavery of craving.
As regards these kinds of use, use as a master and use as an inheritance are allowable for all.
Use as a debt is not allowable,
But this use of what is reviewed by one who is virtuous is use freed from debt because it is the opposite of use as a debt or is included in use as an inheritance too.
For one possessed of virtue is called a trainer too because of possessing this training.
As regards these three kinds of use, since use as a master is best, when a bhikkhu undertakes virtue dependent on requisites, he should aspire to that and use them after reviewing them in the way described.
And this is said:
Of alms food, and of dwelling, And of a resting place,
And also of the water For washing dirt from robes”
Who listens to the Dhamma As taught by the Sublime One
The truly wise disciple Makes use, after reviewing .
By alms food, and by dwelling, And by a resting place,
And also by the water For washing dirt from robes”
unsullied By any of these matters,
A bhikkhu is like a drop of water Lying on leaves of lotus,.
“Since aid it is and timely Procured from another
In chewing and in eating, In tasting food besides:
The right amount he reckons, Mindful without remitting
He treats it as an ointment Applied upon a wound.” 
“So like the child’s flesh in the desert Like the greasing for the axle,
He should eat without delusion Nutriment to keep alive.” 
And in connection with the fulfilling of this virtue dependent on requisites there should be told the story of the novice Saṅgharakkhita the Nephew.
For he made use of requisites after reviewing,
“Seeing me eat a dish of rice Quite cold, my preceptor observed:
‘Novice, if you are not restrained, Be careful not to burn your tongue.’
On hearing my Preceptor’s words, I then and there felt urged to act
And, sitting in a single session, I reached the goal of Arahantship.
Since I am now waxed full in thought Like the full moon of the fifteenth ,
And all my cankers are destroyed, There is no more becoming now.”
And so should any other man Aspiring to end suffering
Make use of all the requisites Wisely after reviewing them.
So virtue is of four kinds as “virtue of Pātimokkha restraint,” and so on.
and the evidence here is the refusal of the request to allow disciples to announce training precepts .
As seven days went by thus .
And if he has got putrid urine with mixed gall nuts and “four-sweets”31 for the purpose of curing a certain affliction, and he eats only the broken gall nuts, thinking, “Other companions in the life of purity will eat the ‘four-sweets’,” his undertaking of the ascetic practices is befitting,
for he is then called a bhikkhu who is supreme in the Noble Ones’ heritages .
—”But, lay follower, a mansion is not allowed for bhikkhus.” Or any other such giving of indication.
They said: “Even without being told by you we regularly supply the elder’s needs,” and on the following day they prepared rice gruel of the kind needed.
but they said, “Eat, venerable sir, we shall give you more.” When the elder had eaten, they gave him another bowlful.
and he uttered this exclamation:
Use without reviewing by one who is virtuous is “use as a debt”;
but while this is so, though there is an offence for one who uses it without mindfulness after mindful acceptance, there is no offence for one who is mindful in using after accepting without mindfulness.
for that is so called because it purifies by means of the restraint in the mental resolution, “I shall not do so again.”
Virtue of livelihood purification is called “purification by search”;
for that is so called because search is purified in one who abandons wrong search and gets requisites lawfully and properly.
for that is so called because it purifies by the reviewing of the kind already described.
for they are the Buddha’s sons, therefore they make use of the requisites as the heirs of requisites belonging to their father.
to say nothing of use as theft.
according as it is said:
‘Making the whole rock resound’: ‘making the whole rock reverberate as one doing so by means of an earth tremor. But some say that is was owing to the cheering of the deities who lived there
The Elder Mahā Tissa, it seems, was going on a journey during a famine, and being tired in body and weak through lack of food and travel weariness, he lay down at the root of a mango tree covered with fruit. There were many fallen mangoes here and there.
Then a lay devotee, who was older than he, went to the elder, and learning of his exhaustion, gave him mango juice to drink. Then he mounted him on his back and took him to his home.
‘Nor your mother nor your father,’ etc. .
Meanwhile the elder admonished himself as follows . And beginning the comprehension of formations, and augmenting insight, he realized Arahantship after the other paths in due succession while he was still mounted on his back.
Through ownerless mangoes were lying fallen on the ground near him, he would not eat them in the absence of someone to accept them from.
‘As repulsive’ in this way: Firstly perception of repulsiveness in nutriment in the case of alms food; then as bringing repulsiveness to mind thus: ‘But all these robes, etc., which are not in themselves disgusting, become utterly disgusting on reaching this filthy body’
‘As elements’ in this way: ‘This robe, etc., consists merely of the four elements and occurs when its conditions are present; and the person who uses it likewise.’
“‘Use as theft’: use by one who is unworthy.
And the requisites are allowed by the Blessed One to one in his own dispensation who is virtuous, not unvirtuous;
and the generosity of the givers is towards one who is virtuous, not towards one who is not,
since they expect great fruit from their actions.
In the first pentad in the fivefold section the meaning should be understood in accordance with the virtue of those not fully admitted to the Order, and so on.
For this is said in the Paṭisambhidā:
That of the training precepts for those not fully admitted to the Order: such is virtue consisting in limited purification.
 What is virtue consisting in unlimited purification?
That of the training precepts for those fully admitted to the Order: such is virtue consisting in unlimited purification.
 What is virtue consisting in fulfilled purification?
That of magnanimous ordinary men devoted to profitable things, who are perfecting the course that ends in trainership, regardless of the physical body and life, having given up attachment to life: such is virtue of fulfilled purification,
That of the seven kinds of trainer: such is virtue consisting in purification not adhered to.
 What is virtue consisting in tranquillized purification?
That of the Perfect One’s disciples with cankers destroyed, of the Paccekabuddhas, of the Perfect Ones, accomplished and fully enlightened: such is virtue consisting in tranquillized purification” .
 Herein, the virtue of those not fully admitted to the Order should be understood as virtue consisting in limited purification, because it is limited by the number of training precepts, that is, five or eight or ten.
 That of those fully admitted to the Order is describable thus:
Nine thousand millions, and a hundred And eighty millions then as well,
And fifty plus a hundred thousand, And thirty-six again to swell.
The total restraint disciplines: These rules the Enlightened One explains
Told under heads for filling out, Which the Discipline restraint contains.35
So although limited in number, it should yet be understood as virtue consisting in unlimited purification, since it is undertaken without reserve and has no obvious limit such as gain, fame, relatives, limbs or life. Like the virtue of the Elder Mahā Tissa the Mango-eater who lived at Cīragumba .
For that venerable one never abandoned the following good man’s recollection:
“Wealth for a sound limb’s sake should be renounced, And one who guards his life gives up his limbs;
And wealth and limbs and life, each one of these, A man gives up who practices the Dhamma.”
And he never transgressed a training precept even when his life was in the balance, and in this way he reached Arahantship with that same virtue of unlimited purification as his support while he was being carried on a lay devotee’s back.
According to as it is said:
“Nor your mother nor your father Nor your relatives and kin
Have done as much as this for you Because you are possessed of virtue.”
So, stirred with urgency, and wisely Comprehending36 with insight,
While carried on his helper’s back He reached the goal of Arahantship.
 The magnanimous ordinary man’s virtue, which from the time of admission to the Order is devoid even of the stain of a wrong thought because of its extreme purity, like a gem of purest water, like well-refined gold, becomes the proximate cause for Arahantship itself, which is why it is called consisting of fulfilled purification; like that of the lders Saṅgharakkhita the Great and Saṅgharakkhita the Nephew.
The Elder Saṅgharakkhita the Great , aged over sixty, was lying, it seems, on his deathbed. The Order of Bhikkhus questioned him about attainment of the supramundane state.
The elder said: “I have no supramundane state.”
— “Friend, thinking to see the Blessed One Metteyya, I did not try for insight.
He helped the elder to sit up and went out.
As he went out the elder reached Arahantship and he gave a sign by snapping his fingers.
The Order assembled and said to him: “Venerable sir, you have done a difficult thing in achieving the supramundane state in the hour of death.”
—“That was not difficult, friends. But rather I will tell you what is difficult. Friends, I see no action done by me without mindfulness and unknowingly since the time I went forth.”
His nephew also reached Arahantship in the same way at the age of fifty years.
“Now, if a man has little learning And he is careless of his virtue,
They censure him on both accounts For lack of virtue and of learning.
“But if he is of little learning Yet he is careful of his virtue,
They praise him for his virtue, so It is as though he too had learning.
“And if he is of ample learning Yet he is careless of his virtue,
They blame him for his virtue, so It is as though he had no learning.
“But if he is of ample learning And he is careful of his virtue,
They give him praise on both accounts For virtue and as well for learning.
“The Buddha’s pupil of much learning Who keeps the Law with understanding—
A jewel of Jambu River gold37 Who is here fit to censure him?
Deities praise him constantly, By Brahmā also is he praised .
 What should be understood as virtue consisting in purification not adhered to is trainers’ virtue, because it is not adhered to by false view, and ordinary men’s virtue when not adhered to by greed. Like the virtue of the Elder Tissa the Landowner’s Son .
Wanting to become established in Arahantship in dependence on such virtue, this venerable one told his enemies:
I broke the bones of both my legs To give the pledge you asked from me.
I am revolted and ashamed At death accompanied by greed.
“And after I had thought on this, And wisely then applied insight,
When the sun rose and shone on me, I had become an Arahant” .
Also there was a certain senior elder who was very ill and unable to eat with his own hand. He was writhing smeared with his own urine and excrement. Seeing him, a certain young bhikkhu said, “Oh, what a painful process life is!”
The senior elder told him: “If I were to die now, friend, I should obtain the bliss of heaven; I have no doubt of that. But the bliss obtained by breaking this virtue would be like the lay state obtained by disavowing the training,” and he added: “I shall die together with my virtue.” As he lay there, he comprehended that same illness with insight, and he reached Arahantship. Having done so, he pronounced these verses to the Order of Bhikkhus:
“I am victim of a sickening disease
That racks me with its burden of cruel pain;
So this my corpse will soon have withered up
As flowers in the dust burnt by the sun.
“Unbeautiful called beautiful, Unclean while reckoned as if clean,
Though full of ordure seeming fair To him that cannot see it clear.
“So out upon this ailing rotting body, Fetid and filthy, punished with affliction,
Doting on which this silly generation Has lost the way to be reborn in heaven! ” 
 It is the virtue of the Arahants, etc., that should be understood as tranquillized purification, because of tranquillization of all disturbance and because of purifiedness.
So it is of five kinds as “consisting in limited purification,” and so on.
“ What is virtue consisting in limited purification?
 What is virtue consisting in purification not adhered to?
Then the young bhikkhu who was attending on him said: “Venerable sir, people have come as much as twelve leagues, thinking that you have reached Nibbāna. It will be a disappointment for many if you die as an ordinary man.”
So help me to sit up and give me the chance.”
He exercised insight by discerning the feeling in the illness under the heading of the feeling aggregate and the remaining material dhammas as materiality
In the second pentad the meaning should be understood as the abandoning, etc., of killing living things, etc.;
“Five kinds of virtue: In the case of killing living things, abandoning is virtue, abstention is virtue, volition is virtue, restraint is virtue, non- transgression is virtue.
In the case of taking what is not given … In the case of sexual misconduct … In the case of false speech … In the case of malicious speech … In the case of harsh speech … In the case of gossip … In the case of covetousness … In the case of ill will … In the case of wrong view … “Through renunciation in the case of lust, abandoning is virtue … Through non-ill-will in the case of ill-will … Through perception of light in the case of stiffness-and-torpor … Through non-distraction … agitation … Through definition of states … uncertainty … Through knowledge … ignorance … Through gladdening in the case of boredom … “Through the first jhāna in the case of the hindrances, abandoning is virtue … Through the second jhāna … applied and sustained thought … Through the third jhāna … happiness … Through the fourth jhāna in the case of pleasure and pain, abandoning is virtue … Through the attainment of the base consisting of boundless space in the case of perceptions of matter, perceptions of resistance, and perceptions of variety, abandoning is virtue … Through the attainment of the base consisting of boundless consciousness in the case of the perception of the base consisting of boundless space … Through the attainment of the base consisting of nothingness in the case of the perception of the base consisting of boundless consciousness … Through the attainment of the base consisting of neither perception nor non-perception in the case of the perception of the base consisting of nothingness … “Through the contemplation of impermanence in the case of the perception of permanence, abandoning is virtue … Through the contemplation of pain in the case of the perception of pleasure … Through the contemplation of not-self in the case of the perception of self … Through the contemplation of dispassion in the case of the perception of delighting … Through the contemplation of fading away in the case of greed … Through the contemplation of cessation in the case of originating … Through the contemplation of relinquishment in the case of grasping … “Through the contemplation of destruction in the case of the perception of compactness, abandoning is virtue … Through the contemplation of fall of formations in the case of accumulating kamma … Through the contemplation of change in the case of the perception of lastingness … Through the contemplation of the signless in the case of a sign … Through the contemplation of the desireless in the case of desire … Through the contemplation of voidness in the case of misinterpreting … Through insight into states that is higher understanding in the case of misinterpreting due to grasping … Through correct knowledge and vision in the case of misinterpreting due to confusion … Through the contemplation of danger in the case of misinterpreting due to reliance on formations … Through reflection in the case of non-reflection … Through the contemplation of turning away in the case of misinterpreting due to bondage …
“Through the path of stream-entry in the case of defilements coefficient with false view, abandoning is virtue … Through the path of once-return in the case of gross defilements … Through the path of non-return in the case of residual defilements … Through the path of Arahantship in the case of all defilements, abandoning is virtue, abstention is virtue, volition is virtue, restraint is virtue, non-transgression is virtue. “Such virtues lead to non-remorse in the mind, to gladdening, to happiness, to tranquillity, to joy, to repetition, to development, to cultivation, to embellishment, to the requisite for concentration, to the equipment of concentration, to fulfilment, to complete dispassion, to fading away, to cessation, to peace, to direct-knowledge, to enlightenment, to Nibbāna.”38 
And here there is no state called abandoning other than the mere non-arising of the killing of living things, etc., as stated.
But the abandoning of a given unprofitable state upholds a given profitable state in the sense of providing a foundation for it, and concentrates it by preventing wavering,
The other four things mentioned refer to the presence39 of occurrence of will as abstention from such and such, as restraint of such and such, as the volition associated with both of these, and as non-transgression in one who does not transgress such and such.
But their meaning of virtue has been explained already.
So it is of five kinds as “virtue consisting in abandoning” and so on.
At this point “What is virtue?
In what sense is it virtue?
What are its characteristic, function, manifestation, and proximate cause?
What are the benefits of virtue?
How many kinds of virtue are there?”
the answers to the questions are complete.
for this is said in the Paṭisambhidā:
so it is called “virtue” in the sense of composing , reckoned as upholding and concentrating as stated earlier .
However, it was also asked WHAT IS THE DEFILING OF IT? and WHAT IS THE CLEANSING OF IT?
We answer that virtue’s tornness, etc., is its defiling, and that its untornness, etc., is its cleansing.
Now, that tornness, etc., are comprised under the breach that has gain, fame, etc., as its cause, and under the seven bonds of sexuality.
When a man has broken the training course at the beginning or at the end in any instance of the seven classes of offences,40 his virtue is called torn, like a cloth that is cut at the edge.
But when he has broken it in the middle, it is called rent, like a cloth that is rent in the middle.
When he has broken it twice or thrice in succession, it is called blotched, like a cow whose body is some such colour as black or red with a discrepant colour appearing on the back or the belly.
When he has broken it all over at intervals, it is called mottled, like a cow speckled all over with discrepant- coloured spots at intervals.
This in the first place, is how there comes to be tornness with the breach that has gain, etc., as its cause.
And likewise with the seven bonds of sexuality;
“Here, brahman, some ascetic or brahman claims to lead the life of purity rightly; for he does not enter into actual sexual intercourse with women. Yet he agrees to massage, manipulation, bathing and rubbing down by women. He enjoys it, desires it and takes satisfaction in it. This is what is torn, rent, blotched and mottled in one who leads the life of purity.
This man is said to lead a life of purity that is unclean. As one who is bound by the bond of sexuality, he will not be released from birth,
yet he jokes, plays and amuses himself with women …
“Furthermore, brahman, … while he does not agree to these things,
“Furthermore, brahman, … while he does not agree to these things,
“Furthermore, brahman, … while he does not agree to these things, yet he
recalls laughs and talks and games that he formerly had with women …
“Furthermore, brahman, … while he does not agree to these things,
yet he leads the life of purity aspiring to some order of deities, thinking ‘Through this rite or this ritual or this asceticism I shall become a great deity or some lesser deity.’
He enjoys it, desires it, and takes satisfaction in it.
This, brahman, is what is torn, rent, blotched and mottled in one who leads the life of purity. This man … will not be released from suffering, I say” .
This is how tornness, etc., should be understood as included under the breach that has gain, etc., as its cause and under the seven bonds of sexuality.
Untornness, however, is accomplished by the complete non-breaking of the training precepts, by making amends for those broken for which amends should be made, by the absence of the seven bonds of sexuality, and, as well, by the non- arising of such evil things as anger, enmity, contempt, domineering, envy, avarice, deceit, fraud, obduracy, presumption, pride , haughtiness, conceit , and negligence , and by the arising of such qualities as fewness of wishes, contentment, and effacement .
Virtues not broken for the purpose of gain, etc., and rectified by making amends after being broken by the faults of negligence, etc., and not damaged by the bonds of sexuality and by such evil things as anger and enmity, are called entirely untorn, unrent, unblotched, and unmottled.
And those same virtues are liberating since they bring about the state of a freeman, and praised by the wise since it is by the wise that they are praised, and unadhered-to since they are not adhered to by means of craving and views, and conducive to concentration since they conduce to access concentration or to absorption concentration.
That is why their untornness, etc., should be understood as “cleansing” .
This cleansing comes about in two ways: through seeing the danger of failure in virtue, and through seeing the benefit of perfected virtue.
Herein, the danger of failure in virtue can be seen in accordance with such suttas as that beginning, “Bhikkhus, there are these five dangers for the unvirtuous in the failure of virtue” .
Furthermore, on account of his unvirtuousness an unvirtuous person is displeasing to deities and human beings, is uninstructable by his fellows in the life of purity, suffers when unvirtuousness is censured, and is remorseful when the virtuous are praised. Owing to that unvirtuousness he is as ugly as hemp cloth.
Contact with him is painful because those who fall in with his views are brought to long-lasting suffering in the states of loss.
He is worthless because he causes no great fruit to accrue to those who give him gifts.
He is as hard to purify as a cesspit many years old.
He is like a log from a pyre ; for he is outside both recluseship and the lay state.
Though claiming the bhikkhu state he is no bhikkhu, so he is like a donkey following a herd of cattle.
He is always nervous, like a man who is everyone’s enemy.
He is as unfit to live with as a dead carcase.
Though he may have the qualities of learning, etc., he is as unfit for the homage of his fellows in the life of purity as a charnel-ground fire is for that of brahmans.
He is as incapable of reaching the distinction of attainment as a blind man is of seeing a visible object.
He is as careless of the Good Law as a guttersnipe is of a kingdom.
Though he fancies he is happy, yet he suffers because he reaps suffering as told in the Discourse on the Mass of Fire .
Now, the Blessed One has shown that when the unvirtuous have their minds captured by pleasure and satisfaction in the indulgence of the five cords of sense desires, in receiving salutation, in being honoured, etc., the result of that kamma, directly visible in all ways, is very violent pain, with that kamma as its condition, capable of producing a gush of hot blood by causing agony of heart with the mere recollection of it.
Here is the text: “Bhikkhus, do you see that great mass of fire burning, blazing and glowing?
— Yes, venerable sir.
—It would be better, venerable sir, that he should sit down or lie down embracing a warrior-noble maiden …
It would be painful, venerable sir, if he sat down or lay down embracing that great mass of fire burning, blazing and glowing.
“I say to you, bhikkhus, I declare to you, bhikkhus, that it would be better for one gone forth who is unvirtuous, who is evil-natured, of unclean and suspect habits, secretive of his acts, who is not an ascetic and claims to be one, who does not lead the life of purity and claims to do so, who is rotten within, lecherous, and full of corruption, to sit down or lie down embracing that great mass of fire burning, blazing and glowing.
Why is that?
By his doing so, bhikkhus, he might come to death or deadly suffering, yet he would not on that account, on the breakup of the body, after death, reappear in states of loss, in an unhappy destiny, in perdition, in hell. But if one who is unvirtuous, evil-natured … and full of corruption, should sit down or lie down embracing a warrior-noble maiden … that would be long for his harm and suffering: on the break-up of the body, after death, he would reappear in states of loss, in an unhappy destiny, in perdition, in hell” .
Having thus shown by means of the analogy of the mass of fire the suffering that is bound up with women and has as its condition the indulgence of the five cords of sense desires by the unvirtuous,
“What do you think, bhikkhus, which is better, that one should have a strong horse- hair rope twisted round both legs by a strong man and tightened so that it cut through the outer skin, and having cut through the outer skin it cut through the inner skin, and having cut through the inner skin it cut through the flesh, and having cut through the flesh it cut through the sinews, and having cut through the sinews it cut through the bones, and having cut through the bones it remained crushing the bone marrow—or that he should consent to the homage of great warrior-nobles, great brahmans, great householders? ” .
And: “What do you think, bhikkhus, which is better, that one should have a strong man wound one’s breast with a sharp spear tempered in oil—or that he should consent to the reverential salutation of great warrior-nobles, great brahmans, great householders? ” .
And: “What do you think, bhikkhus, which is better, that one’s body should be wrapped by a strong man in a red-hot iron sheet burning, blazing and glowing— or that he should use robes given out of faith by great warrior-nobles, great brahmans, great householders? ” .
And: “What do you think, bhikkhus, which is better, that one’s mouth should be prised open by a strong man with red-hot iron tongs burning, blazing and glowing, and that into his mouth should be put a red-hot iron ball burning, blazing and glowing, which burns his lips and burns his mouth and tongue and throat and belly and passes out below carrying with it his bowels and entrails—or that he should use alms food given out of faith by great warrior-nobles …? ” .
And: “What do you think, bhikkhus, which is better, that one should have a strong man seize him by the head or seize him by the shoulders and seat him or lay him on a red-hot iron bed or iron chair, burning, blazing and glowing—or that he should use a bed or chair given out of faith by great warrior-nobles …? ” .
And: “What do you think, bhikkhus, which is better, that one should have a strong man take him feet up and head down and plunge him into a red-hot metal cauldron burning, blazing and glowing, to be boiled there in a swirl of froth, and as he boils in the swirl of froth to be swept now up, now down, and now across—or that he should use a dwelling given out of faith by great warrior-nobles …? ” .
What pleasure has a man of broken virtue Forsaking not sense pleasures, which bear fruit
What pleasure has he in accepting homage Who, having failed in virtue, must partake
Of pain that will excel in agony The crushing of his legs with horse-hair ropes?
What pleasure has a man devoid of virtue Accepting salutations of the faithful,
Which is the cause of pain acuter still Than pain produced by stabbing with a spear?
What is the pleasure in the use of garments For one without restraint, whereby in hell
He will for long be forced to undergo The contact of the blazing iron sheet?
Although to him his alms food may seem tasty, Who has no virtue, it is direst poison,
Because of which he surely will be made For long to swallow burning iron balls.
And when the virtueless make use of couches And chairs, though reckoned pleasing, it is pain
Because they will be tortured long indeed On red-hot blazing iron beds and chairs.
Then what delight is there for one unvirtuous Inhabiting a dwelling given in faith,
Since for that reason he will have to dwell Shut up inside a blazing iron pan?
Described him in these terms: “Of suspect habits, Full of corruption, lecherous as well, By nature evil,
rotten too within.” The Teacher of the world, in him condemning .
So out upon the life of him abiding Without restraint, of him that wears the guise
Of the ascetic that he will not be, And damages and undermines himself!
Avoids it here, as those that would look well Keep far away from dung or from a corpse?
What is the life he leads, since any person, No matter who, with virtue to his credit
He is not free from any sort of terror, Though free enough from pleasure of attainment;
While heaven’s door is bolted fast against him, He is well set upon the road to hell.
Who else if not one destitute of virtue More fit to be the object of compassion?
Many indeed and grave are the defects That brand a man neglectful of his virtue.
Seeing danger in the failure of virtue should be understood as reviewing in such ways as these. And seeing benefits in perfected virtue should be understood in the opposite sense.
Furthermore:
His virtue is immaculate, His wearing of the bowl and robes
Gives pleasure and inspires trust, His going forth will bear its fruit.
A bhikkhu in his virtue pure Has never fear that self-reproach
Will enter in his heart: indeed There is no darkness in the sun.
A bhikkhu in his virtue bright Shines forth in the Ascetics’ Wood41
As by the brightness of his beams The moon lights up the firmament.
Now, if the bodily perfume Of virtuous bhikkhus can succeed
In pleasing even deities, What of the perfume of his virtue?
It is more perfect far than all The other perfumes in the world,
Because the perfume virtue gives Is borne unchecked in all directions.
The deeds done for a virtuous man, Though they be few, will bear much fruit,
And so the virtuous man becomes A vessel of honour and renown.
There are no cankers here and now To plague the virtuous man at all;
The virtuous man digs out the root Of suffering in lives to come.
Perfection among human kind And even among deities.
If wished for, is not hard to gain For him whose virtue is perfected;
Than the perfection of Nibbāna, The state where utter peace prevails
But once his virtue is perfected, His mind then seeks no other kind.
So let a wise man know it well This root of all perfection’s branches.
Such is the blessed fruit of virtue, Showing full many a varied form,
The mind of one who understands thus, shudders at failure in virtue and reaches out towards the perfecting of virtue.
So virtue should be cleansed with all care, seeing this danger of failure in virtue and this benefit of the perfection of virtue in the way stated.
And at this point in the Path of Purification, which is shown under the headings of virtue, concentration and understanding by the stanza, “When a wise man, established well in virtue” , virtue, firstly, has been fully illustrated.
in the Path of Purification composed for the purpose of gladdening good people.
for this is said by the Blessed One:
ageing and death … he will not be released from suffering, I say.
“Furthermore, brahman, … while he does not agree to these things,
yet he gazes and stares at women eye to eye …
yet he listens to the sound of women through a wall or through a fence as they laugh or talk or sing or weep …
yet he sees a householder or a householder’s son possessed of, endowed with, and indulging in, the five cords of sense desire …
“Furthermore, brahman, while he does not agree to these things,
—What do you think, bhikkhus, which is better, that one gone forth should sit down or lie down embracing that mass of fire burning, blazing and glowing, or that he should sit down or lie down embracing a warrior-noble maiden or a brahman maiden or a maiden of householder family, with soft, delicate hands and feet?
to the same intent he showed, by the following similes of the horse-hair rope, the sharp spear, the iron sheet, the iron ball, the iron bed, the iron chair, and the iron cauldron, the pain that has as its condition acceptance of homage and reverential salutation, and the use of robes, alms food, bed and chair, and dwelling by unvirtuous bhikkhus .
Of pain more violent even than the pain In the embracing of a mass of fire?
The first chapter called “The Description of Virtue”
Now, while a meditator is engaged in the pursuit of virtue, he should set about undertaking the ascetic practices in order to perfect those special qualities of fewness of wishes, contentment, etc., by which the virtue of the kind already described, is cleansed.
For when his virtue is thus washed clean of stains by the waters of such special qualities as fewness of wishes, contentment, effacement, seclusion, dispersal, energy, and modest needs, it will become quite purified; and his vows will succeed as well.
And– so, when his whole behaviour has been purified by the special quality of blameless virtue and vows and he has become established in the first three of the ancient Noble Ones’ heritages, he may become worthy to attain to the fourth called “delight in development” .
We shall therefore begin the explanation of the ascetic practices.
Thirteen kinds of ascetic practices have been allowed by the Blessed One to clansmen who have given up the things of the flesh and, regardless of body and life, are desirous of undertaking a practice in conformity with their aim.
They are: i. the refuse-rag-wearer’s practice, ii. the triple-robe-wearer’s practice, iii. the alms-food-eater’s practice, iv. the house-to-house-seeker’s practice, v. the one-sessioner’s practice, vi. the bowl-food-eater’s practice, vii. the later-food-refuser’s practice, viii. the forest-dweller’s practice, ix. the tree-root-dweller’s practice, x. the open-air-dweller’s practice, xi. the charnel-ground-dweller’s practice, xii. the any-bed-user’s practice, xiii. the sitter’s practice.
Herein:
As to meaning, characteristic, et cetera, The undertaking and directions,
And then the grade, and breach as well, And benefits of each besides,
As to the profitable triad, “Ascetic” and so on distinguished,
And as to groups, and also singly, The exposition should be known.
1. Herein, as to meaning, in the first place. i. It is “refuse” since, owing to its being found on refuse in any such place as a street, a charnel ground, or a midden, it belongs, as it were, to the refuse in the sense of being dumped in anyone of these places. Or alternatively: like refuse it gets to a vile state , thus it is “refuse” ; it goes to a vile state, is what is meant.
The wearing of a refuse-rag, which has acquired its derivative name1 in this way, is “refuse-rag- wearing” . That is his habit, thus he is a “refuse-rag-wear-er” .
His practice is called the “triple- robe-wearer’s practice.”
ii. In the same way, he has the habit of wearing the triple robe —in other words, the cloak of patches, the upper garment, and the inner clothing— thus he is a “triple-robe-wear-er” .
Therefore it should be understood as a term for that by undertaking which one becomes a refuse-rag-wear-er.
It is the action that is called the “practice.”
The practice of the refuse-rag-wear-er is the “refuse-rag- wear-er’s practice” .
iii. The dropping of the lumps of material sustenance called alms is “alms food” ; the falling into the bowl of lumps given by others, is what is meant.
He gleans that alms food , he seeks it by approaching such and such a family, thus he is called an “alms-food eat-er” .
Or his vow is to gather 2 the lump , thus he is a “lump-gatherer” . To “gather” is to wander for. A “lump-gatherer” is the same as an “alms-food-eater” .
The practice of the alms-food-eater is the “alms-food-eater’s practice.”
iv. It is a hiatus that is called a “gap” .3 It is removed from a gap, thus it is called “gapless” ; the meaning is, it is without hiatus.
It is together with what is gapless , thus it is “with the gapless” ; devoid of hiatus—from house to house—is what is meant.
His habit is to wander on what-is-with-the-gapless, thus he is a “gapless wanderer” . A gapless wanderer is the same as a “house-to-house-seeker” .
His practice is the “house-to-house-seeker’s practice.”
v. Eating in one session is “one-session.” He has that habit, thus he is a “one- sessioner.”
His practice is the “one-sessioner’s practice.”
vi. Alms in one bowl only because of refusing a second vessel, is “bowl-alms” .
Now, making “bowl alms” the name for the taking of alms food in the bowl: bowl-alms-food is his habit, thus he is a “bowl- food-eater” .
His practice is the “bowl-food-eater’s practice.”
viii. His habit is dwelling in the forest, thus he is a “forest-dweller.”
His practice is the “later-food-refuser’s practice.”
This bhikkhu is like that.” Thus he is “a later-food-refuser” .
When it has taken a fruit into its beak and that drops, it does not eat any more.
But it is said in the commentary4 “Khalu is a certain kind of bird.
This is the name for one who as an undertaking refuses extra food.
Not a later-food-eater is a “no-later-food-eat-er” , that is, a “later-food-refuser”.
Food obtained later by one who has shown that he is satisfied is called “later-food” . The eating of that later food is “later-food-eating.” Making “later-food” the name for that later-food-eating: later-food is his habit, thus he is a “later- food-eat-er” .
vii. “No” is a particle in the sense of refusing.
His practice is the “forest-dweller’s practice.”
ix. Dwelling at the root of a tree is “tree-root-dwelling.” He has that habit, thus he is a “tree-root-dweller.”
The practice of the tree-root-dweller is the “tree-root- dweller’s practice.”
x., xi. Likewise with the open-air-dweller and the charnel-ground-dweller.
This, firstly, is how the exposition should be known here as to meaning.
Or alternatively, they are ascetic because they shake off opposition, and they are practices because they are a way .
All these, however, are the practices of a bhikkhu who is ascetic because he has shaken off defilement by undertaking one or other of them. Or the knowledge that has got the name “ascetic” because it shakes off defilement is a practice belonging to these, thus they are “ascetic practices” .
His practice is the “sitter’s practice.”
xiii. He has the habit of keeping to the sitting posture when resting, refusing to lie down, thus he is a “sitter.”
His practice is the “any-bed-user’s practice.”
He has the habit of dwelling in that as distributed, thus he is an “as- distributed-user” , that is, an “any-bed-user”.
xii. Only what has been distributed is “as distributed” . This is a term for the resting place first allotted thus “This one falls to you.”
2.All of them have as their characteristic the volition of undertaking.
For this is said in the commentary: “He who does the undertaking is a person.
That whereby he does the undertaking is states of consciousness and consciousness- concomitants.
The volition of the act of undertaking is the ascetic practice.
What it rejects is the instance.”
All have the function of eliminating cupidity, and they manifest themselves with the production of non-cupidity. For their proximate cause they have the noble states consisting of fewness of wishes, and so on.
This is how the exposition should be known as to characteristic, etc., here.
As regards the five beginning with the undertaking and directions: during the Blessed One’s lifetime all ascetic practices should be undertaken in the Blessed One’s presence.
After his attainment of Nibbāna this should be done in the presence of a principal disciple.
When he is not available it should be done in the presence of one whose cankers are destroyed, of a non-returner, of a once-returner, of a stream-enterer, of one who knows the three Piṭakas, of one who knows two of the Piṭakas, of one who knows one of the Piṭakas, of one who knows one Collection,5 of a teacher of the Commentaries.
When he is not available it should be done in the presence of an observer of an ascetic practice. When he is not available, then after one has swept out the shrine terrace they can be undertaken seated in a reverential posture as though pronouncing them in the Fully Enlightened One’s presence. Also it is permitted to undertake them by oneself.
And here should be told the story of the senior of the two brothers who were elders at Cetiyapabbata and their fewness of wishes with respect to the ascetic practices6 .
This, firstly, is what applies to all the practices.
‘Ekasaṅgītika’: one who knows one of the five collections beginning with the Collection of Long Discourses .
Out of fewness of wishes that his ascetic practice should get known, the elder lay down. Afterwards he undertook the practice anew. So the story has come down.
Then one night the other saw him by the light of a flash of lightning sitting up on his bed. He asked, ‘Are you a sitter, venerable sir?’
That elder, it seems, was a sitter, but no one knew it.
Now, we shall proceed to comment on the undertaking, directions, grade, breach and benefits, of each one separately.
i. First, the refuse-rag-wearer’s practice is undertaken with one of these two statements: “I refuse robes given by householders” or “I undertake the refuse-rag- wearer’s practice.”
One who has done this should get a robe of one of the following kinds: one from a charnel ground, one from a shop, a cloth from a street, a cloth from a midden, one from a childbed, an ablution cloth, a cloth from a washing place, one worn going to and returning from the charnel ground, one scorched by fire, one gnawed by cattle, one gnawed by ants, one gnawed by rats, one cut at the end, one cut at the edge, one carried as a flag, a robe from a shrine, an ascetic’s robe, one from a consecration, one produced by supernormal power, one from a highway, one borne by the wind, one presented by deities, one from the sea. Taking one of these robe cloths, he should tear off and throw away the weak parts, and then wash the sound parts and make up a robe. He can use it after getting rid of his old robe given by householders.
Herein, “one from a charnel ground” is one dropped on a charnel ground.
“One from a shop” is one dropped at the door of a shop.
“A cloth from a street” is a cloth thrown into a street from inside a window by those who seek merit.
“A cloth from a midden” is a cloth thrown onto a place for rubbish.
“One from a childbed” is a cloth thrown away after wiping up the stains of childbirth with it.
The mother of Tissa the Minister, it seems, had the stains of childbirth wiped up with a cloth worth a hundred pieces, and thinking, “The refuse-rag wearers will take it,” she had it thrown onto the Tālaveli Road.7
“An ablution cloth” is one that people who are made by devil doctors to bathe themselves, including their heads, are accustomed to throw away as a “cloth of ill luck.”
“A cloth from washing place” is rags thrown away at a washing place where bathing is done.
“One worn going to and coming from” is one that people throw away after they have gone to a charnel ground and returned and bathed.
“One scorched by fire” is one partly scorched by fire;
“One gnawed by cattle,” etc., are obvious;
“One carried as a flag”: Those who board a ship do so after hoisting a flag.
It is allowable to take this when they have gone out of sight.
Also it is allowable, when the two armies have gone away, to take a flag that has been hoisted on a battlefield.
“A robe from a shrine” is an offering made by draping a termite-mound in cloth.
“An ascetic’s robe” is one belonging to a bhikkhu.
“One from a consecration” is one thrown away at the king’s consecration place.
“One produced by supernormal power” is a “come-bhikkhu” robe.8
But one dropped by the owner’s negligence should be taken only after waiting a while.
“One borne by the wind” is one that falls a long way off, having been carried by the wind. It is allowable to take it if the owners are not in sight.
“One presented by deities” is one given by deities like that given to the Elder Anuruddha .
“One from the sea” is one washed up on dry land by the sea waves.
One given thus “We give it to the Order” or got by those who go out for alms- cloth is not a refuse-rag.
And in the case of one presented by a bhikkhu, one given after it has been got at a presentation of robes by householders at the end of the Rains, or a “resting-place robe” that is, one automatically supplied by a householder to the occupant of a certain resting place is not a refuse-rag.
It is a refuse-rag only when given after not having been so obtained.
And herein, that placed by the donors at a bhikkhu’s feet but given by that bhikkhu to the refuse-rag wearer by placing it in his hand is called pure in one way.
That given to a bhikkhu by placing it in his hand but placed by him at the refuse-rag wearer’s feet is also pure in one way.
That which is both placed at a bhikkhu’s feet and then given by him in the same way is pure in both ways.
One obtained by being placed in the hand and given by being placed in the hand too is not a strict man’s robe.
So a refuse-rag wearer should use the robe after getting to know about the kinds of refuse-rags. These are the directions for it in this instance.
The grades are these. There are three kinds of refuse-rag wearers: the strict, the medium, and the mild.
Herein, one who takes it only from a charnel ground is strict.
One who takes one left by someone, thinking “One gone forth will take it” is medium.
One who takes one given by being placed at his feet by a bhikkhu is mild.
The moment anyone of these of his own choice or inclination agrees to accept a robe given by a householder, his ascetic practice is broken.
This is the breach in this instance.
The benefits are these. He actually practices in conformity with the dependence, because of the words “The going forth by depending on the refuse-rag robe” ; he is established in the first of the Noble Ones’ heritages ; there is no suffering due to protecting; he exists independent of others; there is no fear of robbers; there is no craving connected with use of robes; it is a requisite suitable for an ascetic; it is a requisite recommended by the Blessed One thus “valueless, easy to get, and blameless” ; it inspires confidence; it produces the fruits of fewness of wishes, etc.; the right way is cultivated; a good example is set9 to later generations.
While striving for Death’s army’s rout The ascetic clad in rag-robe clout
Got from a rubbish heap, shines bright As mail-clad warrior in the fight.
Leaving rare Kāsi cloth and more; This robe wore,
the world’s great teacher. Of rags from off a rubbish heap Who would not have a robe to keep?
Minding the words he did profess When he went into homelessness,
Let him to wear such rags delight As one in seemly garb bedight.
This, firstly, is the commentary on the undertaking, directions, grades, breach, and benefits, in the case of the refuse-rag-wearer’s practice.
This, firstly, is the undertaking.
Bhikkhus took it for the purpose of mending worn places.
for people throw away such as these too.
for people throw that away.
“One from a highway” is one dropped in the middle of a road.
The name of a street in Mahāgāma .
Also in Anurādhapura, they say.
ii. Next there is the triple-robe-wearer’s practice. This is undertaken with one of the following statements: “I refuse a fourth robe” or “I undertake the triple- robe-wearer’s practice.”
When a triple-robe wearer has got cloth for a robe, he can put it by for as long as, owing to ill-health, he is unable to make it up, or for as long as he does not find a helper, or lacks a needle, etc.,
and there is no fault in his putting it by.
But it is not allowed to put it by once it has been dyed. That is called cheating the ascetic practice.
These are the directions for it.
This too has three grades.
Herein, one who is strict should, at the time of dyeing, first dye either the inner cloth or the upper garment, and having dyed it, he should wear that round the waist and dye the other.
Then he can put that on over the shoulder and dye the cloak of patches.
But he is not allowed to wear the cloak of patches round the waist.
This is the duty when in an abode inside a village.
But it is allowable for him in the forest to wash and dye two together.
However, he should sit in a place near to the robes so that, if he sees anyone, he can pull a yellow cloth over himself.
But for the medium one there is a yellow cloth in the dyeing room for use while dyeing, and it is allowable for him to wear that as an inner cloth or to put it on as an upper garment in order to do the work of dyeing.
For the mild one it is allowable to wear, or put on, the robes of bhikkhus who are in communion in order to do the work of dyeing.
A bedspread that remains where it is10 is also allowable for him,
And it is allowed for him to use from time to time the robes of bhikkhus who are in communion.
It is allowed to one who wears the triple robe as an ascetic practice to have a yellow shoulder-cloth too as a fourth;
The moment anyone of these three agrees to accept a fourth robe, his ascetic practice is broken.
This is the breach in this instance.
The benefits are these. The bhikkhu who is a triple-robe wearer is content with the robe as a protection for the body.
Hence he goes taking it with him as a bird does its wings ; and such special qualities as having few undertakings, avoidance of storage of cloth, a frugal existence, the abandoning of greed for many robes, living in effacement by observing moderation even in what is permitted, production of the fruits of fewness of wishes, etc., are perfected.
No risk of hoarding haunts the man of wit Who wants no extra cloth for requisite;
Using the triple robe where’er he goes The pleasant relish of content he knows.
So, would the adept wander undeterred With naught else but his robes, as flies the bird
With its own wings, then let him too rejoice That frugalness in garments be his choice.
This is the commentary on the undertaking, directions, grades, breach, and benefits, in the case of the triple-robe-wearer’s practice.
but he must not take it about him.
but it must be only a span wide and three hands long.
Tatraṭṭhaka-paccattharaṇa—”a bedspread that remains there”; “A name for what has been determined upon as a bedspread in one’s own resting place or in someone else’s.
They say accordingly that there is no breach of the ascetic practice even when these two, that is, the bedspread and the undyed cloth, are kept as extra robes.
iii. The alms-food-eater’s practice is undertaken with one of the following statements: “I refuse a supplementary food supply” or “I undertake the alms- food-eater’s practice.”
Now, this alms-food eater should not accept the following fourteen kinds of meal: a meal offered to the Order, a meal offered to specified bhikkhus, an invitation, a meal given by a ticket, one each half-moon day, one each Uposatha day, one each first of the half-moon, a meal given for visitors, a meal for travellers, a meal for the sick, a meal for sick-nurses, a meal supplied to a particular residence, a meal given in a principal house,11 a meal given in turn.
If, instead of saying “Take a meal given to the Order”, meals are given saying “The Order is taking alms in our house; you may take alms too”, it is allowable to consent.
Tickets from the Order that are not for actual food,12 and also a meal cooked in a monastery, are allowable as well. These are the directions for it.
This too has three grades.
Herein, one who is strict takes alms brought both from before and from behind, and he gives the bowl to those who take it while he stands outside a door. He also takes alms brought to the refectory and given there. But he does not take alms by sitting and waiting for it to be brought later that day.
The medium one takes it as well by sitting and waiting for it to be brought later that day; but he does not consent to its being brought the next day.
The mild one consents to alms being brought on the next day and on the day after.
Both these last miss the joy of an independent life.
There is, perhaps, a preaching on the Noble Ones’ heritages in some village. The strict one says to the others “Let us go, friends, and listen to the Dhamma.”
One of them says, “I have been made to sit and wait by a man, venerable sir,”
The other wanders for alms in the morning and then he goes and savours the taste of the Dhamma.
The moment anyone of these three agrees to the extra gain consisting of a meal given to the Order, etc., his ascetic practice is broken.
This is the breach in this instance.
The benefits are these. He actually practices in conformity with the dependence because of the words “The going forth by depending on the eating of lumps of alms food” ; he is established in the second of the Noble Ones’ heritages; his existence is independent of others; it is a requisite recommended by the Blessed One thus “Valueless, easy to get, blameless” ; idleness is eliminated; livelihood is purified; the practice of the minor training rule of the Pātimokkha is fulfilled; he is not maintained by another; he helps others; pride is abandoned; craving for tastes is checked; the training precepts about eating as a group, substituting one meal invitation for another , and good behaviour, are not contravened; his life conforms to the principles of fewness of wishes; he cultivates the right way; he has compassion for later generations.
The monk content with alms for food Has independent livelihood,
And greed in him no footing finds; He is as free as the four winds.
He never need be indolent, His livelihood is innocent,
So let a wise man not disdain Alms-gathering for his domain.
Since it is said:
“If a bhikkhu can support himself on alms
And live without another’s maintenance,
The very gods indeed might envy him
And pay no heed as well to gain and fame,” .
This is the commentary on the undertaking, directions, grades, breach and benefits, in the case of the alms-food-eater’s practice.
and the other, “I have consented to receive alms tomorrow, venerable sir.”
So they are both losers.
A meal to be given by setting it out in a principal house only.
Tickets that are not for actual food, but deal with medicine, etc.
iv. The house-to-house seeker’s practice is undertaken with one of the following statements “I refuse a greedy alms round” or “I undertake the house-to-house seeker’s practice.”
Now, the house-to-house seeker should stop at the village gate and make sure that there is no danger.
If there is danger in any street or village, it is allowable to leave it out and wander for alms elsewhere.
When there is a house door or a street or a village where he regularly gets nothing at all, he can go past it not counting it as a village.
But wherever he gets anything at all it is not allowed subsequently to go past there and leave it out.
This bhikkhu should enter the village early so that he will be able to leave out any inconvenient place and go elsewhere.
But if people who are giving a gift of a meal in a monastery or who are coming along the road take his bowl and give alms food, it is allowable.
And as this bhikkhu is going along the road, he should, when it is the time, wander for alms in any village he comes to and not pass it by.
If he gets nothing there or only a little, he should wander for alms in the next village in order.
These are the directions for it. 32.This too has three grades.
Herein, one who is strict does not take alms brought from before or brought from behind or brought to the refectory and given there. He hands over his bowl at a door, however;
for in this ascetic practice there is none equal to the Elder Mahā Kassapa,
The medium one takes what is brought from before and from behind and what is brought to the refectory, and he hands over his bowl at a door. But he does not sit waiting for alms.
Thus he conforms to the rule of the strict alms-food eater.
The mild one sits waiting for alms to be brought that day.
The ascetic practice of these three is broken as soon as the greedy alms round starts by going only to the houses where good alms food is given.
This is the breach in this instance.
The benefits are these. He is always a stranger among families and is like the moon ; he abandons avarice about families; he is compassionate impartially; he avoids the dangers in being supported by a family; he does not delight in invitations; he does not hope for meals to be brought; his life conforms to the principles of fewness of wishes, and so on.
Is moonlike, ever new to families,
Nor does he grudge to help all equally,
Free from the risks of house-dependency.
Who would the self-indulgent round forsake
His downcast eyes range a yoke-length before,
And roam the world at will, the while to make
Then let him wisely seek from door to door.
This is the commentary on the undertaking, directions, grades, breach, and benefits, in the case of the house-to-house-seeker’s practice.
yet an instance in which even he handed over his bowl is mentioned .
The monk who at each house his begging plies.
v. The one-sessioner’s practice is undertaken with one of the following statements: “I refuse eating in several sessions” or “I undertake the one-sessioner’s practice.”
When the one-sessioner sits down in the sitting hall, instead of sitting on an elder’s seat, he should notice which seat is likely to fall to him and sit down on that.
If his teacher or preceptor arrives while the meal is still unfinished, it is allowable for him to get up and do the duties.
But the Elder Tipiṭaka Cūla-Abhaya said: “He should either keep his seat and finish his meal or if he gets up he should leave the rest of his meal in order not to break the ascetic practice. And this is one whose meal is still unfinished; therefore let him do the duties, but in that case let him not eat the rest of the meal.”
These are the directions.
This too has three grades.
Herein, one who is strict may not take anything more than the food that he has laid his hand on whether it is little or much.
And if people bring him ghee, etc., thinking “The elder has eaten nothing,” while these are allowable for the purpose of medicine, they are not so for the purpose of food.
The medium one may take more as long as the meal in the bowl is not exhausted;
He is either “one who stops with the water” because he eats until he takes water for washing the bowl, or “one who stops with the session” because he eats until he gets up.
The ascetic practice of these three is broken at the moment when food has been eaten at more than one session.
This is the breach in this instance.
The benefits are these. He has little affliction and little sickness; he has lightness, strength, and a happy life; there is no contravening rules about food that is not what is left over from a meal; craving for tastes is eliminated; his life conforms to the principles of fewness of wishes, and so on.
Who gladly in one session takes his meal;
No longing to indulge his sense of taste
Tempts him to leave his work to go to waste.
His own true happiness a monk may find
In eating in one session, pure in mind.
Purity and effacement wait on this;
For it gives reason to abide in bliss.
This is the commentary on the undertaking, directions, grades, breach, and benefits, in the case of the one-sessioner’s practice.
The mild one may eat as long as he does not get up from his seat.
for he is called “one who stops when the food is finished.”
No illness due to eating shall he feel
vi. The bowl-food-eater’s practice is undertaken with one of the following statements: “I refuse a second vessel” or “I undertake the bowl-food-eater’s practice.”
When at the time of drinking rice gruel, the bowl-food eater gets curry that is put in a dish; he can first either eat the curry or drink the rice gruel.
If he puts it in the rice gruel, the rice gruel becomes repulsive when a curry made with cured fish, etc., is put into it. So it is allowable to do this only in order to use it without making it repulsive.
Consequently this is said with reference to such curry as that.
But what is unrepulsive, such as honey, sugar,13 etc., should be put into it.
And in taking it he should take the right amount.
It is allowable to take green vegetables with the hand and eat them.
But unless he does that they should be put into the bowl.
Because a second vessel has been refused it is not allowable to use anything else, not even the leaf of a tree. These are its directions.
This too has three grades.
Herein, for one who is strict, except at the time of eating sugarcane, it is not allowed while eating to throw rubbish away,
The medium one is allowed to break them up with one hand while eating; and he is called a “hand ascetic.”
The moment anyone of these three agrees to a second vessel his ascetic practice is broken.
This is the breach in this instance.
The benefits are these. Craving for variety of tastes is eliminated;
He baffles doubts that might arise With extra dishes; downcast eyes
The true devotedness imply14 Of one uprooting gluttony.
Wearing content as if ‘twere part Of his own nature, glad at heart;
None but a bowl-food eater may Consume his food in such a way.
This is the commentary on the undertaking, directions, grades, breach, and benefits, in the case of the bowl-food-eater’s practice.
and it is not allowed while eating to break up rice-lumps, fish, meat and cakes. The rubbish should be thrown away and the rice-lumps, etc., broken up before starting to eat.
The mild one is called a “bowl ascetic”; anything that can be put into his bowl he is allowed, while eating, to break up, that is, rice lumps, etc., with his hand or such things as palm sugar, ginger, etc., with his teeth.
excessiveness of wishes is abandoned; he sees the purpose and the right amount in nutriment; he is not bothered with carrying saucers, etc., about; his life conforms to the principles of fewness of wishes and so on.
vii. The later-food-refuser’s practice is undertaken with one of the following statements: “I refuse additional food” or “I undertake the later-food-refuser’s practice.”
Now, when that later-food refuser has shown that he is satisfied, he should not again have the food made allowable by having it put into his hands according to the rule for bhikkhus and eat it.
These are the directions for it.
This too has three grades.
Herein, there is no showing that he has had enough with respect to the first lump, but there is when he refuses more while that is being swallowed. So when one who is strict has thus shown that he has had enough with respect to the second lump, he does not eat the second lump after swallowing the first.
The medium one eats also that food with respect to which he has shown that he has had enough.
But the mild one goes on eating until he gets up from his seat.
The moment any one of these three has eaten what has been made allowable again after he has shown that he has had enough, his ascetic practice is broken.
This is the breach in this instance.
The benefits are these. One is far from committing an offence concerned with extra food; there is no overloading of the stomach; there is no keeping food back; there is no renewed search for food; he lives in conformity with the principles of fewness of wishes, and so on.
He needs no extra search in weary mood, Nor stores up food till later in the day,
Nor overloads his stomach in this way. When a wise man refuses later food.
So, would the adept from such faults abstain, Let him assume this practice for his gain,
This is the commentary on the undertaking, directions, grades, breach, and benefits, in the case of the later-food-refuser’s practice.
Praised by the Blessed One, which will augment The special qualities such as content.
viii. The forest-dweller’s practice is undertaken with one of the following statements: “I refuse an abode in a village” or “I undertake the forest-dweller’s practice.”
Now, that forest dweller must leave an abode in a village in order to meet the dawn in the forest.
Herein, a village abode is the village itself with its precincts.
A “village” may consist of one cottage or several cottages, it may be enclosed by a wall or not, have human inhabitants or not, and it can also be a caravan that is inhabited for more than four months.
The “village precincts” cover the range of a stone thrown by a man of medium stature standing between the gate-posts of a walled village, if there are two gate-posts, as at Anurādhapura .
The Vinaya experts say that this stone’s throw is characterized as up to the place where a thrown stone falls, as, for instance, when young men exercise their arms and throw stones in order to show off their strength.
But the Suttanta experts say that it is up to where one thrown to scare crows normally falls.
In the case of an unwalled village, the house precinct is where the water falls when a woman standing in the door of the outermost house of all throws water from a basin.
Within a stone’s throw of the kind already described from that point is the village. Within a second stone’s throw is the village precinct.
“Forest,” according to the Vinaya method firstly, is described thus: “Except the village and its precincts, all is forest” .
According to the Abhidhamma method it is described thus: “Having gone out beyond the boundary post, all that is forest” .
But according to the Suttanta method its characteristic is this: “A forest abode is five hundred bow-lengths distant” .
That should be defined by measuring it with a strung instructor’s bow from the gate-post of a walled village, or from the range of the first stone’s throw from an unwalled one, up to the monastery wall.
But if the monastery is not walled, it is said in the Vinaya commentaries, it should be measured by making the first dwelling of all the limit, or else the refectory or regular meeting place or Bodhi Tree or shrine, even if that is far from a dwelling belonging to the monastery.
But in the Majjhima commentary it is said that, omitting the precincts of the monastery and the village, the distance to be measured is that between where the two stones fall.
This is the measure here.
Even if the village is close by and the sounds of men are audible to people in the monastery, still if it is not possible to go straight to it because of rocks, rivers, etc.,
But anyone who blocks the path to the village here and there for the purpose of lengthening it so as to be able to say that he is taking up the practice is cheating the ascetic practice.
If a forest-dwelling bhikkhu’s preceptor or teacher is ill and does not get what he needs in the forest, he should take him to a village abode and attend him there.
But he should leave in time to meet the dawn in a place proper for the practice.
If the affliction increases towards the time of dawn, he must attend him
and not bother about the purity of his ascetic practice. These are the directions.
This too has three grades.
Herein, one who is strict must always meet the dawn in the forest.
The medium one is allowed to live in a village for the four months of the Rains.
And the mild one, for the winter months too.
If in the period defined any one of these three goes from the forest and hears the Dhamma in a village abode, his ascetic practice is not broken if he meets the dawn there,
But if, when the preacher has got up, he thinks “We shall go after lying down awhile” and he meets the dawn while asleep or if of his own choice he meets the dawn while in a village abode, then his ascetic practice is broken. This is the breach in this instance.
The benefits are these. A forest-dwelling bhikkhu who has given attention to the perception of forest can obtain hitherto unobtained concentration, or preserve that already obtained. And the Master is pleased with him,
according as it is said: “So, Nāgita, I am pleased with that bhikkhu’s dwelling in the forest” .
And when he lives in a remote abode his mind is not distracted by unsuitable visible objects, and so on. He is free from anxiety; he abandons attachment to life; he enjoys the taste of the bliss of seclusion, and the state of the refuse-rag wearer, etc., becomes him.
He lives secluded and apart, Remote abodes delight his heart;
The Saviour of the world, besides, He gladdens that in groves abides.
The hermit that in woods can dwell Alone, may gain the bliss as well
Whose savour is beyond the price Of royal bliss in paradise.
Wearing the robe of rags he may Go forth into the forest fray;
Such is his mail, for weapons too The other practices will do.
One so equipped can be assured Of routing Māra and his horde.
So let the forest glades delight A wise man for his dwelling’s site.
This is the commentary on the undertaking, directions, grades, breach, and benefits, in the case of the forest-dweller’s practice.
in between, the five hundred bow-lengths can be reckoned by that road even if one has to go by boat.
nor is it broken if he meets it as he is on his way back after hearing the Dhamma.
ix. The tree-root-dweller’s practice is undertaken with one of the following statements: “I refuse a roof” or “I undertake the tree-root-dweller’s practice.”
The tree-root dweller should avoid such trees as a tree near a frontier, a shrine tree, a gum tree, a fruit tree, a bats’ tree, a hollow tree, or a tree standing in the middle of a monastery. He can choose a tree standing on the outskirts of a monastery. These are the directions.
This has three grades too.
Herein, one who is strict is not allowed to have a tree that he has chosen tidied up.
He can move the fallen leaves with his foot while dwelling there.
The medium one is allowed to get it tidied up by those who happen to come along.
The mild one can take up residence there after summoning monastery attendants and novices and getting them to clear it up, level it, strew sand and make a fence round with a gate fixed in it.
On a special day, a tree-root dweller should sit in some concealed place elsewhere rather than there.
The moment any one of these three makes his abode under a roof, his ascetic practice is broken.
The reciters of the Aṅguttara say that it is broken as soon as he knowingly meets the dawn under a roof.
This is the breach in this instance.
The benefits are these. He practices in conformity with the dependence, because of the words “The going forth by depending on the root of a tree as an abode” ; it is a requisite recommended by the Blessed One thus “Valueless, easy to get, and blameless” ; perception of impermanence is aroused through seeing the continual alteration of young leaves; avarice about abodes and love of building work are absent; he dwells in the company of deities; he lives in conformity with the principles of fewness of wishes, and so on.
The Blessed One praised roots of trees As one of the dependencies ;
Can he that loves secludedness Find such another dwelling place?
Secluded at the roots of trees And guarded well by deities
He lives in true devotedness Nor covets any dwelling place.
And when the tender leaves are seen Bright red at first, then turning green,
And then to yellow as they fall, He sheds belief once and for all In permanence.
No wise man will disdain at all For contemplating rise and fall.
Tree roots have been Bequeathed by him; secluded scene
This is the commentary on the undertaking, directions, grades, breach, and benefits, in the case of the tree-root-dweller’s practice.
x. The open-air-dweller’s practice is undertaken with one of the following statements: “I refuse a roof and a tree root” or “I undertake the open-air-dweller’s practice.”
An open-air dweller is allowed to enter the Uposatha-house for the purpose of hearing the Dhamma or for the purpose of the Uposatha.
If it rains while he is inside, he can go out when the rain is over instead of going out while it is still raining.
He is allowed to enter the eating hall or the fire room in order to do the duties, or to go under a roof in order to ask elder bhikkhus in the eating hall about a meal, or when teaching and taking lessons, or to take beds, chairs, etc., inside that have been wrongly left outside.
If he is going along a road with a requisite belonging to a senior and it rains, he is allowed to go into a wayside rest house.
If he has nothing with him, he is not allowed to hurry in order to get to a rest house;
but he can go at his normal pace and enter it and stay there as long as it rains. These are the directions for it.
And the same rule applies to the tree-root dweller too.
This has three grades too.
Herein, one who is strict is not allowed to live near a tree or a rock or a house.
He should make a robe-tent right out in the open and live in that.
The medium one is allowed to live near a tree or a rock or a house so long as he is not covered by them.
The mild one is allowed these: a rock overhang without a drip-ledge cut in it,15 a hut of branches, cloth stiffened with paste, and a tent treated as a fixture, that has been left by field watchers, and so on.
The moment any one of these three goes under a roof or to a tree root to dwell there, his ascetic practice is broken.
The reciters of the Aṅguttara say that it is broken as soon as he knowingly meets the dawn there.
This is the breach in this case.
The benefits are these: the impediment of dwellings is severed; stiffness and torpor are expelled; his conduct deserves the praise “Like deer the bhikkhus live unattached and homeless” ; he is detached; he is free to go in any direction; he lives in conformity with the principles of fewness of wishes, and so on.
That aids the homeless bhikkhu’s strife, Easy to get,
The moon and sun furnish his light, Under the star-bejewelled vault
The open air provides a life and leaves his mind Alert as a deer, so he shall find
Stiffness and torpor brought to halt. And concentration his delight.
The joy seclusion’s savour gives He shall discover soon who lives
In open air; and that is why The wise prefer the open sky.
This is the commentary on the undertaking, directions, grades, breach, and benefits, in the case of the open-air-dweller’s practice.
xi. The charnel-ground-dweller’s practice is undertaken with one of the following statements: “I refuse what is not a charnel ground” or “I undertake the charnel- ground-dweller’s practice.”
Without a drip-ledge cut ’ means without a drip-ledge made above, which might come under the heading of a drip-ledge made to prevent rain water from coming in.
But if the rain water comes under the overhang and is allowed to go in under it, then this comes under the heading of the open air 
Now, the charnel-ground dweller should not live in some place just because the people who built the village have called it “the charnel ground”
for it is not a charnel ground unless a dead body has been burnt on it. But as soon as one has been burnt on it, it becomes a charnel ground. And even if it has been neglected for a dozen years, it is so still.
One who dwells there should not be the sort of person who gets walks, pavilions, etc., built, has beds and chairs set out and drinking and washing water kept ready, and preaches Dhamma;
for this ascetic practice is a momentous thing. Whoever goes to live there should be diligent. And he should first inform the senior elder of the Order or the king’s local representative in order to prevent trouble.
When he walks up and down, he should do so looking at the pyre with half an eye.
On his way to the charnel ground he should avoid the main roads and take a by-path.
He should define all the objects there while it is day,
so that they will not assume frightening shapes for him at night. Even if non-human beings wander about screeching, he must not hit them with anything.
It is not allowed to miss going to the charnel ground even for a single day.
The reciters of the Aṅguttara say that after spending the middle watch in the charnel ground he is allowed to leave in the last watch.
He should not take such foods as sesame flour, pease pudding, fish, meat, milk, oil, sugar, etc., which are liked by non-human beings.
He should not enter the homes of families.16 These are the directions for it.
This has three grades too.
Herein, one who is strict should live where there are always burnings and corpses and mourning.
The medium one is allowed to live where there is one of these three.
The mild one is allowed to live in a place that possesses the bare characteristics of a charnel ground already stated.
When any one of these three makes his abode in some place not a charnel ground, his ascetic practice is broken.
It is on the day on which he does not go to the charnel ground, the Aṅguttara reciters say.
This is the breach in this case.
The benefits are these. He acquires mindfulness of death; he lives diligently; the sign of foulness is available ; greed for sense desires is removed; he constantly sees the body’s true nature; he has a great sense of urgency; he abandons vanity of health, etc.; he vanquishes fear and dread ; non-human beings respect and honour him; he lives in conformity with the principles of fewness of wishes, and so on.
with many corpses present to his gaze.
Rightly he strives because he gains a sense of urgency,
While in his search for final peace he curbs all vanity.
Let him that feels a leaning to Nibbāna in his heart
This is the commentary on the undertaking, directions, grades, breach, and benefits, in the case of the charnel-ground dweller’s practice.
the dweller in a charnel ground for death is ever present to his thought;
Even in sleep shows naught Of negligence,
He may be sure there is no lust after sense pleasure preys Upon his mind,
Embrace this practice for it has rare virtues to impart.
He should not go into families’ houses because he smells of the dead and is followed by pisāca goblins.
xii. The any-bed-user’s practice is undertaken with one of the following statements: “I refuse greed for resting places” or “I undertake the any-bed-user’s practice.”
The any-bed user should be content with whatever resting place he gets thus: “This falls to your lot.” He must not make anyone else shift from his bed.
These are the directions.
This has three grades too.
Herein, one who is strict is not allowed to ask about the resting place that has fallen to his lot: “Is it far? ” or “Is it too near? ” or “Is it infested by non-human beings, snakes, and so on? ” or “Is it hot? ” or “Is it cold? ”.
The medium one is allowed to ask,
The mild one is allowed to inspect it and, if he does not like it, to choose another.
As soon as greed for resting places arises in any one of these three, his ascetic practice is broken. This is the breach in this instance.
The benefits are these. The advice “He should be content with what he gets” is carried out; he regards the welfare of his fellows in the life of purity; he gives up caring about inferiority and superiority; approval and disapproval are abandoned; the door is closed against excessive wishes; he lives in conformity with the principles of fewness of wishes, and so on.
One vowed to any bed will be Content with what he gets, and he
Can sleep in bliss without dismay On nothing but a spread of hay.
He is not eager for the best, No lowly couch does he detest,
He aids his young companions too That to the monk’s good life are new.
So for a wise man to delight In any kind of bed is right;
A Noble One this custom loves As one the sages’ Lord approves.
This is the commentary on the undertaking, directions, grades, breach, and benefits, in the case of the any-bed-user’s practice.
but not to go and inspect it.
xiii. The sitter’s practice is undertaken with one of the following statements: “I refuse lying down” or “I undertake the sitter’s practice.”
The sitter can get up in any one of three watches of the night and walk up and down:
These are the directions.
This has three grades too.
Herein, one who is strict is not allowed a back-rest or cloth band or binding-strap to prevent falling while asleep.17
The medium one is allowed any one of these three.
The mild one is allowed a back-rest, a cloth band, a binding-strap, a cushion, a “five-limb” and a “seven-limb.”
A “seven-limb” is one made with four legs, a support for the back and an arm support on each side.
They made that, it seems, for the Elder Pīṭhābhaya .
The elder became a non-returner, and then attained Nibbāna.
As soon as any one of these three lies down, his ascetic practice is broken.
This is the breach in this instance.
The benefits are these. The mental shackle described thus, “He dwells indulging in the pleasure of lying prone, the pleasure of lolling, the pleasure of torpor” , is severed; his state is suitable for devotion to any meditation subject; his deportment inspires confidence; his state favours the application of energy; he develops the right practice.
The adept that can place crosswise His feet to rest upon his thighs
And sit with back erect shall make Foul Māra’s evil heart to quake.
No more in supine joys to plump And wallow in lethargic dump;
Who sits for rest and finds it good Shines forth in the Ascetics’ Wood.
The happiness and bliss it brings Has naught to do with worldly things;
So must the sitter’s vow befit The manners of a man of wit.
This is the commentary on the undertaking, directions, grades, breach, and benefits, in the case of the sitter’s practice.
for lying down is the only posture not allowed.
A “five-limb” is a chair made with four legs and a support for the back.
As to the profitable triad, “Ascetic” and so on distinguished,
As to groups, and also singly, The exposition should be known .
Now, there is the commentary according to the stanza .
Herein, as to the profitable triad: all the ascetic practices, that is to say, those of trainers, ordinary men, and men whose cankers have been destroyed, may be either profitable or in the Arahant’s case indeterminate. No ascetic practice is unprofitable.
But if someone should say: There is also an unprofitable ascetic practice because of the words “One of evil wishes, a prey to wishes, becomes a forest dweller” , etc.,
Whoever has his dwelling in the forest is a forest dweller;
But, as it was said above , they “are the practices of a bhikkhu who is ascetic because he has shaken off defilement by undertaking one or other of them. Or the knowledge that has got the name “ascetic” because it shakes off defilement is a practice belonging to these, thus they are “ascetic practices” .
Or alternatively, they are ascetic because they shake off opposition, and they are practices because they are a way .”
Consequently it was rightly said that no ascetic practice is unprofitable.
And those who hold that an ascetic practice is outside the profitable triad18 have no ascetic practice as regards meaning.
Owing to the shaking off of what is non-existent could it be called an ascetic practice?
Also there are the words “Proceeded to undertake the ascetic qualities” , and it follows19 that those words are contradicted. So that should not be accepted. This, in the first place, is the commentary on the profitable triad.
As to “ascetic and so on distinguished,” the following things should be understood, that is to say, ascetic,
Herein, ascetic means either a person whose defilements are shaken off, or a state that entails shaking off defilements.
A preacher of asceticism: one is ascetic but not a preacher of asceticism, another is not ascetic but a preacher of asceticism, another is neither ascetic nor a preacher of asceticism, and another is both ascetic and a preacher of asceticism.
Herein, one who has shaken off his defilements with an ascetic practice but does not advise and instruct another in an ascetic practice, like the Elder Bakkula, is “ascetic but not a preacher of asceticism,”
One who has not shaken off his own defilements but only advises and instructs another in an ascetic practice, like the Elder Upananda, is “not ascetic but a preacher of asceticism,”
One who has failed in both, like Lāḷudāyin, is “neither ascetic nor a preacher of asceticism,”
One who has succeeded in both, like the General of the Dhamma, is “both ascetic and a preacher of asceticism,”
Ascetic states: the five states that go with the volition of an ascetic practice, that is to say, fewness of wishes, contentment, effacement, seclusion, and that specific quality20 are called “ascetic states’ because of the words “Depending on fewness of wishes” , and so on. 84. Herein, fewness of wishes and contentment are non-greed.
Effacement and seclusion belong to the two states, non-greed and non-delusion.
That specific quality is knowledge.
Herein, by means of non-greed a man shakes off greed for things that are forbidden. By means of non-delusion he shakes off the delusion that hides the dangers in those same things.
And by means of non-greed he shakes off indulgence in pleasure due to sense desires that occurs under the heading of using what is allowed. And by means of non-delusion he shakes off indulgence in self- mortification that occurs under the heading of excessive effacement in the ascetic practices.
That is why these states should be understood as “ascetic states.”
Ascetic practices: these should be understood as the thirteen, that is to say, the refuse-rag-wearer’s practice … the sitter’s practice,
For whom the cultivation of ascetic practices is suitable: they are suitable for one of greedy temperament and for one of deluded temperament.
Why?
Because the cultivation of ascetic practices is both a difficult progress21 and an abiding in effacement;
Or the cultivation of the forest-dweller’s practice and the tree-root-dweller’s practice here are suitable for one of hating temperament;
for hate too subsides in one who dwells there without coming into conflict. This is the commentary “as to ‘ascetic’ and so on distinguished.”
6. and 7. As to groups and also singly. Now, 6. as to groups: these ascetic practices are in fact only eight, that is to say, three principal and five individual practices.
Herein, the three, namely, the house-to-house-seeker’s practice, the one-sessioner’s practice, and the open-air-dweller’s practice, are principal practices.
For one who keeps the house-to-house-seeker’s practice will keep the alms-food-eater’s practice;
And what need has one who keeps the open-air-dweller’s practice to keep the tree-root-dweller’s practice or the any-bed-user’s practice?
So there are these three principal practices that, together with the five individual practices, that is to say, the forest-dweller’s practice, the refuse-rag-wearer’s practice, the triple-robe-wearer’s practice, the sitter’s practice, and the charnel-ground-dweller’s practice, come to eight only.
Again they come to four, that is to say, two connected with robes, five connected with alms food, five connected with the resting place, and one connected with energy.
Herein, it is the sitter’s practice that is connected with energy;
Again they all amount to two only, since twelve are dependent on requisites and one on energy.
Also they are two according to what is and what is not to be cultivated.
For when one cultivating an ascetic practice finds that his meditation subject improves, he should cultivate it;
But when he finds that, whether he cultivates one or not, his meditation subject only improves and does not deteriorate, he should cultivate them out of compassion for later generations.
And when he finds that, whether he cultivates them or not, his meditation subject does not improve, he should still cultivate them for the sake of acquiring the habit for the future.
So they are of two kinds as what is and what is not to be cultivated. 89.And all are of one kind as volition.
For there is only one ascetic practice, namely, that consisting in the volition of undertaking.
Also it is said in the Commentary: “It is the volition that is the ascetic practice, they say.”
7. Singly: with thirteen for bhikkhus, eight for bhikkhunīs, twelve for novices, seven for female probationers and female novices, and two for male and female lay followers, there are thus forty-two.
If there is a charnel ground in the open that complies with the forest-dweller’s practice, one bhikkhu is able to put all the ascetic practices into effect simultaneously.
But the two, namely, the forest-dweller’s practice and the later-food-refuser’s practice, are forbidden to bhikkhunīs by training precept. And it is hard for them to observe the three, namely, the open-air-dweller’s practice, the tree-root- dweller’s practice, and the charnel-ground-dweller’s practice,
because a bhikkhunī is not allowed to live without a companion,
This being so, the purpose of cultivating the ascetic practice would scarcely be served.
It is because they are reduced by five owing to this inability to make use of certain of them that they are to be understood as eight only for bhikkhunīs.
Except for the triple-robe-wearer’s practice all the other twelve as stated should be understood to be for novices, and all the other seven for female probationers and female novices.
The two, namely, the one-sessioner’s practice and the bowl-food-eater’s practice, are proper for male and female lay followers to employ. In this way there are two ascetic practices. This is the commentary “as to groups and also singly.”
And this is the end of the treatise on the ascetic practices to be undertaken for the purpose of perfecting those special qualities of fewness of wishes, contentment, etc., by means of which there comes about the cleansing of virtue as described in the Path of Purification, which is shown under the three headings of virtue, concentration, and understanding, contained in the stanza, “When a wise man, established well in virtue” .
in the Path of Purification composed for the purpose of gladdening good people.
he should be told: We have not said that he does not live in the forest with unprofitable consciousness.
and he may be one of evil wishes or of few wishes.
Now, no one called “ascetic” on account of what is unprofitable could have these as his practices; nor does what is unprofitable shake off anything so that those things to which it belonged as a practice could be called “ascetic practices.”
And what is unprofitable does not both shake off cupidity for robes, etc., and become the practice of the way.
a preacher of asceticism,
ascetic states,
ascetic practices,
and for whom the cultivation of ascetic practices is suitable.
according as it is said: “Now, the venerable Bakkula was ascetic but not a preacher of asceticism.”
according as it is said: “Now, the venerable Upananda son of the Sakyans was not ascetic but a preacher of asceticism.”
according as it is said: “Now, the venerable Lāḷudāyin was neither ascetic nor a preacher of asceticism.”
according as it is said: “Now, the venerable Sāriputta was ascetic and a preacher of asceticism.”
which have already been described as to meaning and as to characteristic, and so forth.
and greed subsides with the difficult progress,
while delusion is got rid of in those diligent by effacement.
and the bowl-food-eater’s practice and the later-food-refuser’s practice will be well kept by one who keeps the one-sessioner’s practice.
the rest are obvious.
but when he is cultivating one and finds that his meditation subject deteriorates, he should not cultivate it.
and even if available, she would not escape having to live in company.
and it is hard to find a female companion with like desire for such a place,
The second chapter called “The Description of the Ascetic Practices”
‘Those who hold’: a reference to the inhabitants of the Abhayagiri Monastery at Anurādhapura.
That being so, they could have no meaning of shaking off defilements, or possibility of being undertaken, because in the ultimate sense they would be non- existent concepts having no existence.
For they say that ascetic practice is a concept consisting in a name .
Idamatthitā—”that specific quality”: “Owing to these profitable states it exists, . The knowledge by means of which one who has gone forth should be established in the refuse-rag-wearer’s practice, etc., and by means of which, on being so instructed one undertakes and persists in the ascetic qualities—that knowledge is idamatthitā
that a woman could occupy the position of Sakka that a woman could occupy the position of Mara that a woman could occupy the position of Brahma — there is no such possibility.’ And he understands: ‘It is possible that a man might be a Wheel-turning Monarch…that a man might occupy the position of Sakka…that a man might occupy the position of Mara…that a man might occupy the position of Brahma - there is such a possibility.’
from good verbal conduct…from good mental conduct - there is no such possibility.’ And he understands: ‘It is possible that a wished for, desired, agreeable result might be produced from good bodily conduct…from good verbal conduct…from good mental conduct - there is such a possibility.’
engaging in verbal misconduct, engaging in mental misconduct could on that account, for that reason, on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappear in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world - there is no such possibility.’1091
engaging in good verbal conduct… engaging in good mental conduct might on that account, for that reason, on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappear in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world.’
Now, concentration is described under the heading of “consciousness” in the phrase “develops consciousness and understanding” . It should be developed by one who has taken his stand on virtue that has been purified by means of the special qualities of fewness of wishes, etc., and perfected by observance of the ascetic practices.
But that concentration has been shown only very briefly and so it is not even easy to understand, much less to develop. There is therefore the following set of questions, the purpose of which is to show the method of its development in detail:
 What is concentration?
 In what sense is it concentration?
 What are its characteristic, function, manifestation, and proximate cause?
 How many kinds of concentration are there?
 What is its defilement?
 What is its cleansing?
 How should it be developed?
 What are the benefits of the development of concentration?1
Here are the answers:
 WHAT IS CONCENTRATION? Concentration is of many sorts and has various aspects.
An answer that attempted to cover it all would accomplish neither its intention nor its purpose and would, besides, lead to distraction; so we shall confine ourselves to the kind intended here, calling concentration profitable unification of mind.2
 IN WHAT SENSE IS IT CONCENTRATION? It is concentration in the sense of concentrating .
What is this concentrating?
It is the centring of consciousness and consciousness-concomitants evenly and rightly on a single object; placing, is what is meant.
So it is the state in virtue of which consciousness and its concomitants remain evenly and rightly on a single object, undistracted and unscattered, that should be understood as concentrating.
 WHAT ARE ITS CHARACTERISTIC, FUNCTION, MANIFESTATION, AND PROXIMATE CAUSE? Concentration has non-distraction as its characteristic.3 Its function is to eliminate distraction. It is manifested as non-wavering.
Because of the words, “Being blissful, his mind becomes concentrated” , its proximate cause is bliss.
 HOW MANY KINDS OF CONCENTRATION ARE THERE? First of all it is of one kind with the characteristic of non-distraction.
Then it is of two kinds as access and absorption;4 likewise as mundane and supramundane,5 as with happiness and without happiness, and as accompanied by bliss and accompanied by equanimity.6
It is of three kinds as inferior, medium and superior; likewise as with applied thought and sustained thought, etc., as accompanied by happiness, etc., and as limited, exalted, and measureless.
It is of four kinds as of difficult progress and sluggish direct-knowledge, etc.; likewise as limited with limited object, etc., according to the factors of the four jhānas, as partaking of diminution, etc., as of the sense sphere, etc., and as predominance, and so on.
It is of five kinds according to the factors of the five jhānas reckoned by the fivefold method.
1.Herein, the section dealing with that of one kind is evident in meaning.
In the section dealing with that of two kinds, access concentration is the unification of mind obtained by the following, that is to say, the six recollections, mindfulness of death, the recollection of peace, the perception of repulsiveness in nutriment, and the defining of the four elements, and it is the unification that precedes absorption concentration.
Absorption concentration is the unification that follows immediately upon the preliminary-work because of the words, “The first-jhāna preliminary-work is a condition, as proximity condition, for the first jhāna” . So it is of two kinds as access and absorption.
3.In the second dyad mundane concentration is profitable unification of mind in the three planes.
Supramundane concentration is the unification associated with the noble paths. So it is of two kinds as mundane and supramundane.
4.In the third dyad concentration with happiness is the unification of mind in two jhānas in the fourfold reckoning and in three jhānas in the fivefold reckoning.
Concentration without happiness is the unification in the remaining two jhānas.
But access concentration may be with happiness or without happiness. So it is of two kinds as with happiness and without happiness.
5.In the fourth dyad concentration accompanied by bliss is the unification in three jhānas in the fourfold and four in the fivefold reckoning.
That accompanied by equanimity is that in the remaining jhāna.
Access concentration may be accompanied by bliss or accompanied by equanimity. So it is of two kinds as accompanied by bliss and accompanied by equanimity.
In the first of the triads what has only just been acquired is inferior. What is not very well developed is medium. What is well developed and has reached mastery is superior. So it is of three kinds as inferior, medium, and superior.
7.In the second triad that with applied thought and sustained thought is the concentration of the first jhāna together with access concentration.
That without applied thought, with sustained thought only, is the concentration of the second jhāna in the fivefold reckoning.
For when a man sees danger only in applied thought and not in sustained thought, he aspires only to abandon applied thought when he passes beyond the first jhāna, and so he obtains concentration without applied thought and with sustained thought only.
This is said with reference to him.
Concentration without applied thought and sustained thought is the unification in the three jhānas beginning with the second in the fourfold reckoning and with the third in the fivefold reckoning . So it is of three kinds as with applied thought and sustained thought, and so on.
In the third triad concentration accompanied by happiness is the unification in the two first jhānas in the fourfold reckoning and in the three first jhānas in the fivefold reckoning.
Concentration accompanied by bliss is the unification in those same jhānas and in the third and the fourth respectively in the two reckonings.
That accompanied by equanimity is that in the remaining jhāna.
Access concentration may be accompanied by bliss and happiness or accompanied by equanimity. So it is of three kinds as accompanied by happiness, and so on.
9.In the fourth triad limited concentration is unification on the plane of access.
Exalted concentration is unification in profitable consciousness, etc., of the fine- material sphere and immaterial sphere.
Measureless concentration is unification associated with the noble paths. So it is of three kinds as limited, exalted, and measureless.
In the first of the tetrads there is concentration of difficult progress and sluggish direct-knowledge. There is that of difficult progress and swift direct- knowledge. There is that of easy progress and sluggish direct-knowledge. And there is that of easy progress and swift direct-knowledge.
Herein, the development of concentration that occurs from the time of the first conscious reaction up to the arising of the access of a given jhāna is called progress.
And the understanding that occurs from the time of access until absorption is called direct-knowledge.
That progress is difficult for some, being troublesome owing to the tenacious resistance of the inimical states beginning with the hindrances. The meaning is that it is cultivated without ease.
It is easy for others because of the absence of those difficulties.
Also the direct-knowledge is sluggish in some and occurs slowly, not quickly.
In others it is swift and occurs rapidly, not slowly.
Herein, we shall comment below upon the suitable and unsuitable , the preparatory tasks consisting in the severing of impediments , etc., and skill in absorption . When a man cultivates what is unsuitable, his progress is difficult and his direct-knowledge sluggish.
When he cultivates what is suitable, his progress is easy and his direct-knowledge swift.
But if he cultivates the unsuitable in the earlier stage and the suitable in the later stage, or if he cultivates the suitable in the earlier stage and the unsuitable in the later stage, then it should be understood as mixed in his case.
Likewise if he devotes himself to development without carrying out the preparatory tasks of severing impediments, etc., his progress is difficult.
It is easy in the opposite case.
And if he is not accomplished in skill in absorption, his direct- knowledge is sluggish.
It is swift if he is so accomplished.
Besides, they should be understood as classed according to craving and ignorance, and according to whether one has had practice in serenity and insight.7
If not, it is easy.
And if he is overwhelmed by ignorance, his direct-knowledge is sluggish.
If not, it is swift.
And if he has had no practice in serenity, his progress is difficult.
If he has, it is easy.
And if he has had no practice in insight, his direct-knowledge is sluggish. If he has, it is swift.
Also they should be understood as classed according to defilements and faculties.
For if a man’s defilements are sharp and his faculties dull, then his progress is difficult and his direct-knowledge sluggish; but if his faculties are keen, his direct-knowledge is swift.
And if his defilements are blunt and his faculties dull, then his progress is easy and his direct-knowledge sluggish;
So as regards this progress and this direct-knowledge, when a person reaches concentration with difficult progress and sluggish direct-knowledge, his concentration is called concentration of difficult progress and sluggish direct-knowledge;
similarly in the cases of the remaining three. So it is of four kinds as of difficult progress and sluggish direct-knowledge, and so on.
In the second tetrad there is limited concentration with a limited object, there is limited concentration with a measureless object, there is measureless concentration with a limited object, and there is measureless concentration with a measureless object.
Herein, concentration that is unfamiliar and incapable of being a condition for a higher jhāna is limited.
When it occurs with an unextended object , it is with a limited object.
When it is familiar, well developed, and capable of being a condition for a higher jhāna, it is measureless.
And when it occurs with an extended object, it is with a measureless object.
The mixed method can be understood as the mixture of the characteristics already stated.
So it is of four kinds as limited with limited object, and so on.
In the third tetrad the first jhāna has five factors, that is to say, applied thought, sustained thought, happiness, bliss, and concentration, following suppression of the hindrances. The second has the three factors remaining after the elimination of applied and sustained thought. The third has two factors with the fading away of happiness. The fourth, where bliss is abandoned, has two factors with concentration and the equanimous feeling that accompanies it.
Thus there are four kinds of concentration according to the factors of these four jhānas.
So it is of four kinds according to the factors of the four jhānas.
In the fourth tetrad there is concentration partaking of diminution, there is concentration partaking of stagnation, there is concentration partaking of distinction, and there is concentration partaking of penetration.
Herein, it should be understood that the state of partaking of diminution is accessibility to opposition, the state of partaking of stagnation is stationariness of the mindfulness that is in conformity with that concentration, the state of partaking of distinction is the attaining of higher distinction, and the state of partaking of penetration is accessibility to perception and attention accompanied by dispassion,
When his mindfulness that is in conformity with that stagnates, then his understanding partakes of stagnation.
When he is accessible to perception and attention unaccompanied by applied thought, then his understanding partakes of distinction.
When he is accessible to perception and attention accompanied by dispassion and directed to fading away, then his understanding partakes of penetration” .
The kinds of concentration associated with that fourfold understanding are also four in number.
So it is of four kinds as partaking of diminution, and so on.
In the fifth tetrad there are the following four kinds of concentration, that is to say, sense-sphere concentration, fine-material-sphere concentration, immaterial- sphere concentration, and unincluded that is, path concentration.
Herein, sense- sphere concentration is all kinds of access unification.
Likewise the other three are respectively profitable unification of mind associated with fine-material, immaterial, and path, jhāna. So it is of four kinds as of the sense-sphere, and so on.
In the sixth tetrad: “If a bhikkhu obtains concentration, obtains unification of mind, by making zeal predominant, this is called concentration due to zeal. If … by making energy predominant … If … by making natural purity of consciousness predominant… If … by making inquiry predominant, this is called concentration due to inquiry” . So it is of four kinds as predominance.
In the pentad there are five jhānas by dividing in two what is called the second jhāna in the fourfold reckoning , taking the second jhāna to be due to the surmounting of only applied thought and the third jhāna to be due to the surmounting of both applied and sustained thought. There are five kinds of concentration according to the factors of these five jhānas.
So its fivefoldness should be understood according to the five sets of jhāna factors.
 What is its defilement? What is its cleansing?
Here the answer is given in the Vibhaṅga: “Defilement is the state partaking of diminution,
Herein, the state partaking of diminution should be understood in this way: “When a man has attained the first jhāna and he is accessible to perception and attention accompanied by sense desire, then his understanding partakes of diminution” .
And the state partaking of distinction should be understood in this way: “When he is accessible to perception and attention unaccompanied by applied thought, then his understanding partakes of distinction” .
For if a man is overwhelmed by craving, his progress is difficult.
but if his faculties are keen, his direct-knowledge is swift.
according as it is said: “When a man has attained the first jhāna and he is accessible to perception and attention accompanied by sense desire, then his understanding partakes of diminution.
cleansing is the state partaking of distinction” .
 How should it be developed? The method of developing the kind of concentration associated with the noble paths mentioned under that “of two kinds as mundane and supramundane,” etc., is included in the method of developing understanding; 
So we shall say nothing separately here about how that is to be developed.
But mundane concentration should be developed by one who has taken his stand on virtue that is quite purified in the way already stated. He should sever any of the ten impediments that he may have. He should then approach the good friend, the giver of a meditation subject, and he should apprehend from among the forty meditation subjects one that suits his own temperament. After that he should avoid a monastery unfavourable to the development of concentration and
The detail is this: Firstly it was said above, he should sever any of the ten impediments that he may have.
A dwelling, family, and gain, A class, and building too as fifth,
And travel, kin, affliction, books, And supernormal powers: ten.
Herein, the dwelling itself is the “impediment due to the dwelling.”
So too with the family and so on.
Herein, a single inner room or a single hut or a whole monastery for the Community is called a dwelling.
This is not an impediment for everyone.
It is an impediment only for anyone whose mind is exercised about the building, etc., that goes on there, or who has many belongings stored there, or whose mind is caught up by some business connected with it. For any other it is not an impediment.
Here is a relevant story. Two clansmen left Anurādhapura, it seems, and eventually went forth at the Thūpārāma.8
One of them made himself familiar with the Two Codes,9 and when he had acquired five years’ seniority, he took part in the Pavāraṇā10 and then left for the place called Pācīnakhaṇḍarājī.11
Now, when the one who had gone to Pācīnakhaṇḍarājī had lived there a long time and had become an elder,12 he thought, “This place is good for retreat; suppose I told my friend about it?”
So he set out, and in due course he entered the Thūpārāma.
As he entered, the elder of the same seniority saw him, went to meet him, took his bowl and robe and did the duties.
The visiting elder went into his lodging. He thought, “Now my friend will be sending me ghee or molasses or a drink;
He got nothing that night, and in the morning he thought, “Now he will be sending me rice gruel and solid food sent by his supporters.”
When he saw none, he thought, “There is no one to bring it. No doubt they will give it when we go into the town.” Early in the morning they went into the town together.
When they had wandered through one street and had got only a ladleful of gruel, they sat down in a sitting hall to drink it.13
Then the visitor thought, “Perhaps there is no individual giving of gruel. But as soon as it is the time for the meal people will give special food.” But when it was time for the meal, they ate what they had got by wandering for alms. Then the visitor said, “Venerable sir, how is this? Do you live in this way all the time?
”— “Yes, friend.”
—”Venerable sir, Pācīnakhaṇḍarājī is comfortable; let us go there.”
The visitor asked, “But, venerable sir, why do you take this road?
”—”Did you not recommend Pācīnakhaṇḍarājī, friend?
”—”But how is this, venerable sir, have you no extra belongings in the place you have lived in for so long?
”—”That is so, friend. The bed and chair belong to the Community, and they are put away as usual. There is nothing else.”
—”But, venerable sir, I have left my staff and my oil tube and my sandal bag there.”
”—“Yes, venerable sir.”
He was glad in his heart, and he paid homage to the elder: “For those like you, venerable sir, everywhere is a forest dwelling.
The Thūpārāma is a place where the relics of four Buddhas are deposited; there is suitable hearing of the Dhamma in the Brazen Palace; there is the Great Shrine to be seen; and one can visit elders. It is like the time of the Buddha.
It is here that you should live.” On the following day he took his bowl and outer robe and went away by himself.
It is no impediment for one like that.
2 Family means a family consisting of relatives or of supporters.
For even a family consisting of supporters is an impediment for someone who lives in close association with it in the way beginning, “He is pleased when they are pleased” , and who does not even go to a neighbouring monastery to hear the Dhamma without members of the family.
But even mother and father are not an impediment for another, as in the case of the young bhikkhu, the nephew of the elder who lived at the Koraṇḍaka Monastery.
He went to Rohaṇa for instruction, it seems.
One day the elder set out for Rohaṇa to fetch him back.
The young bhikkhu too thought, “I have lived here for a long time. Now I might go and visit my preceptor and find out how the lay devotee is,” and he left Rohaṇa.
The two met on the banks of the Mahaveli River.
He did the duties to the elder at the foot of a tree. When asked, “Where are you going? ” he told him his purpose.
The elder said: “You have done well. The lay devotee is always asking after you. That was why I came. You may go, but I shall stay here for the Rains,” and he dismissed him.
He arrived at the monastery on the actual day for taking up residence for the Rains.
The lodging allotted to him happened to be the one for which his father had undertaken responsibility.
His father came on the following day and asked, “To whom was our lodging allotted, venerable sirs? ” When he heard that it had fallen to a young visitor, he went to him. After paying homage to him, he said, “Venerable sir, there is an obligation for him who has taken up residence for the Rains in our lodging.”
— ”What is it, lay follower?
”—”It is to take alms food only in our house for the three months, and to let us know the time of departure after the Pavāraṇā ceremony.”
The lay devotee went home and told his wife. “There is a visiting lord who has taken up residence for the Rains in our lodging. He must be carefully looked after,”
and she agreed. She prepared good food of various kinds for him.14
When he had eaten alms food there during the three months and had completed the residence for the Rains, he announced his departure.
Then his relatives said, “Let it be tomorrow, venerable sir,” and on the following day, when they had fed him in their house and filled his oil tube and given him a lump of sugar and a nine-cubit length of cloth, they said, “Now you are leaving, venerable sir.”
His preceptor had completed the Pavāraṇā ceremony and was on his way back. They met at the same place as before.
He did the duties to the elder at the foot of a tree.
The elder asked him, “How was it, my dear, did you see the good woman lay devotee?
” He replied, “Yes, venerable sir,” and he told him all that had happened. He then anointed the elder’s feet with the oil, made him a drink with the sugar, and presented him with the length of cloth. He then, after paying homage to the elder, told him, “Venerable sir, only Rohaṇa suits me,” and he departed.
The elder too arrived back at his monastery, and next day he went into the village of Koraṇḍaka.
The lay devotee, his sister, had always kept looking down the road, thinking, “My brother is now coming with my son.”
Suspecting that it must have been out of fewness of wishes that the youth had gone away without announcing himself, the elder comforted her and told her all that had happened, and he took the length of cloth out of his bag and showed it to her.
She was appeased. She prostrated herself in the direction taken by her son, and she said: “Surely the Blessed One taught the way of the Rathavinīta, the way of the Nālaka, the way of the Tuvaṭaka, and the way of the great Noble Ones’ heritages15 showing contentment with the four requisites and delight in development, making a bhikkhu such as my son a body-witness.
So, although for three months he ate in the house of the mother who bore him, yet he never said ‘I am your son, you are my mother!’ Oh, admirable man!
” Even mother and father are no impediment for one such as him, so how much less any other family that supports him.
Gain is the four requisites.
How are they an impediment?
Wherever a meritorious bhikkhu goes, people give him a large supply of requisites.
With giving blessings to them and teaching them the Dhamma he gets no chance to do the ascetic’s duties.
From sunrise till the first watch of the night he never breaks his association with people.
Again, even at dawn, alms-food eaters fond of opulence come and say, “Venerable sir, such and such a man lay follower, woman lay follower, friend, friend’s daughter, wants to see you,” and being ready to go, he replies, “Take the bowl and robe, friend.” So he is always on the alert. Thus these requisites are an impediment for him.
He should leave his group and wander by himself where he is not known.
This is the way his impediment is severed.
4 Class is a class of students of suttas or students of Abhidhamma. If with the group’s instruction and questioning he gets no opportunity for the ascetic’s duties, then that group is an impediment for him. He should sever that impediment in this way:
if those bhikkhus have already acquired the main part and little still remains, he should finish that off and then go to the forest.
If they have only acquired little and much still remains, he should, without travelling more than a league, approach another instructor of a class within the radius of a league and say, “Help those venerable ones with instruction, etc.”
If he does not find anyone in this way, he should take leave of the class, saying. “I have a task to see to, friends; go where it suits you,” and he should do his own work.
5. Building is new building work .
Since one engaged in this must know about what material has and has not been got by carpenters, etc., and must see about what has and has not been done, it is always an impediment.
It should be severed in this way. If little remains it should be completed.
If much remains, it should be handed over to the Community or to bhikkhus who are entrusted with the Community’s affairs, if it is a new building for the Community;
6. Travel is going on a journey.
If someone is expected to give the going forth somewhere else, or if some requisite is obtainable there
7 Kin in the case of the monastery means teacher, preceptor, co-resident, pupil, those with the same preceptor as oneself, and those with the same teacher as oneself; and in the case of the house it means mother, father, brother, and so on.
When they are sick they are an impediment for him. Therefore that impediment should be severed by curing them with nursing.
Herein, when the preceptor is sick he must be cared for as long as life lasts if the sickness does not soon depart.
Likewise the teacher at the going forth, the teacher at the admission, the co-resident, the pupils to whom one has given the admission and the going forth, and those who have the same preceptor.
But the teacher from whom one takes the dependence, the teacher who gives one instruction, the pupil to whom one has given the dependence, the pupil to whom one is giving instruction, and those who have that same teacher as oneself, should be looked after as long as the dependence or the instruction has not been terminated.
If one is able to do so, one should look after them even beyond that period.
Mother and father should be treated like the preceptor;
If he has none, he should go in search of it as alms and give that.
But in the case of brothers or sisters, one should only give them what is theirs.
If they have none, then one should give one’s own temporarily and later get it back,
It is not allowed either to make medicine for or to give it to a sister’s husband who is not related by blood;
But it is allowed to make it for their children since they are blood relatives.
8. Affliction is any kind of illness.
It is an impediment when it is actually afflicting; therefore it should be severed by treatment with medicine.
But if it is not cured after taking medicine for a few days, then the ascetic’s duties should be done after apostrophizing one’s person in this way: “I am not your slave, or your hireling. I have come to suffering through maintaining you through the beginningless round of rebirths.”
Books means responsibility for the scriptures.
That is an impediment only for one who is constantly busy with recitations, etc., but not for others.
Here are relevant stories.
The Elder Revata, it seems, the Majjhima reciter, went to the Elder Revata, the dweller in Malaya , and asked him for a meditation subject.
The elder asked him, “How are you in the scriptures, friend?
”—”I am studying the Majjhima Nikāya, venerable sir.”
—”The Majjhima is a hard responsibility, friend. When a man is still learning the First Fifty by heart, he is faced with the Middle Fifty; and when he is still learning that by heart, he is faced with the Last Fifty.
How can you take up a meditation subject?”
—”Venerable sir, when I have taken a meditation subject from you, I shall not look at the scriptures again.” He took the meditation subject, and doing no recitation for nineteen years, he reached Arahantship in the twentieth year. He told bhikkhus who came for recitation: “I have not looked at the scriptures for twenty years, friends, yet I am familiar with them. You may begin.” And from beginning to end he had no hesitation even over a single syllable.
The Elder Mahā-Nāga, too, who lived at Karuliyagiri put aside the scriptures for eighteen years, and then he recited the Dhātukathā to the bhikkhus.
When they checked this with the town-dwelling elders of Anurādha- pura, not a single question was found out of its order.
In the Great Monastery too the Elder Tipiṭaka-Cūḷa-Abhaya had the golden drum struck, saying: “I shall expound the three Piṭakas in the circle of experts in the Five Collections of discourses,” and this was before he had learnt the commentaries.
The Community of Bhikkhus said, “‘Which teachers’ teaching is it? Unless you give only the teaching of our own teachers we shall not let you speak.”
Also his preceptor asked him when he went to wait on him, “Did you have the drum beaten, friend?
”—”Yes, venerable sir.”
”—”I shall expound the scriptures, venerable sir.”
”—”They explain it in this way, venerable sir.”
Go and learn it from our own teachers.”
—”Where shall I go, venerable sir?
”—”There is an elder named Mahā Dhammarakkhita living in the Tulādhārapabbata Monastery in the Rohaṇa country beyond the Mahaveli River. He knows all the scriptures. Go to him.”
Saying, “Good, venerable sir,” he paid homage to the elder. He went with five hundred bhikkhus to the Elder Mahā-Dhammarakkhita, and when he had paid homage to him, he sat down.
The elder asked, “Why have you come?
”—”To hear the Dhamma, venerable sir.”
Still you may repeat them in my presence by night,
The inhabitants of the village had a large pavilion built at the door of his dwelling, and they came daily to hear the Dhamma.
explaining by day ,the Elder Dhammarakkhita eventually completed the instruction. Then he sat down on a mat on the ground before the Elder Abhaya and said, “Friend, explain a meditation subject to me.”
—”What are you saying, venerable sir, have I not heard it all from you?
What can I explain to you that you do not already know?
” The senior elder said, “This path is different for one who has actually travelled by.”
The Elder Abhaya was then, it seems, a stream-enterer.
When the Elder Abhaya had given his teacher a meditation subject, he returned to Anurādhapura. Later, while he was expounding the Dhamma in the Brazen Palace, he heard that the elder had attained Nibbāna.
On hearing this, he said, “Bring me my robe, friends.” Then he put on the robe and said, “The Arahant path befits our teacher, friends.
Our teacher was a true thoroughbred.
He sat down on a mat before his own Dhamma pupil and said, ‘Explain a meditation subject to me.’
The Arahant path befits our teacher, friends.”
For such as these, books are no impediment.
Supernormal powers are the supernormal powers of the ordinary man.
They are hard to maintain, like a prone infant or like young corn,
But they are an impediment for insight, not for concentration, since they are obtainable through concentration.
So the supernormal powers are an impediment that should be severed by one who seeks insight; the others are impediments to be severed by one who seeks concentration. This, in the first place, is the detailed explanation of the impediments.
for in developing path understanding that is developed too.
Now, the “ten impediments” are .
The other stayed on where he was.
for he has lived long in this city.”
Now, as the elder came out from the city by the southern gate he took the Kumbhakāragāma road which leads to Pācīnakhaṇḍarājī.
—”Have you already collected so much, friend, living there for just one day?
The elder’s sister, who was a lay devotee, was always asking the elder how her son was getting on.
He consented in silence.
Though the youth went to his relatives’ home at the time of the meal,
no one recognized him.
He gave his blessing and set out for Rohaṇa.
When she saw him coming alone, she thought, “My son must be dead; that is why the elder is coming alone,” and she fell at the elder’s feet, lamenting and weeping.
or if it is for himself, it should be handed over to those whom he entrusts with his own affairs,
but if these are not available, he should relinquish it to the Community and depart.
and he cannot rest content without getting it that will be an impediment; for even if he goes into the forest to do the ascetic’s duties, he will find it hard to get rid of thoughts about the journey. So one in this position should apply himself to the ascetic’s duties after he has done the journey and transacted the business.
if they live within the kingdom and look to their son for help, it should be given.
Also if they have no medicine, he should give them his own.
but one should not complain if one does not get it back.
The same applies to one’s brother’s wife.
but one can give it to one’s sister saying, “Give it to your husband.”
—”For what reason?
—”Friend Abhaya, how do the teachers explain this passage?
The elder dissented, saying “Hum.”
Again three times, each time in a different way, he said, “They explain it in this way, venerable sir.”
The elder always dissented, saying, “Hum.” Then he said, “Friend, your first explanation was the way of the teachers. But it is because you have not actually learnt it from the teachers’ lips that you are unable to maintain that the teachers say such and such.
—”Friend Abhaya, they ask me about the Dīgha and the Majjhima from time to time,
but I have not looked at the others for thirty years.
and I shall explain them to you by day.”
He said, “Good, venerable sir,” and he acted accordingly.
what had been repeated by night
and the slightest thing breaks them.
Approach the good friend, the giver of a meditation subject : meditation subjects are of two kinds, that is, generally useful meditation subjects and special meditation subjects.
Herein, loving-kindness towards the Community of Bhikkhus, etc., and also mindfulness of death are what are called generally useful meditation subjects.
Some say perception of foulness, too.
When a bhikkhu takes up a meditation subject, he should first develop loving-kindness towards the Community of Bhikkhus within the boundary,16 limiting it at first to “all bhikkhus in this monastery”, in this way: “May they be happy and free from affliction.”
Then towards all the principal people in the village that is his alms resort;
With loving-kindness towards the Community of Bhikkhus he produces kindliness in his co-residents;
With loving-kindness towards the deities within the boundary he is protected by kindly deities with lawful protection.
With loving- kindness towards the principal people in the village that is his alms resort his requisites are protected by well-disposed principal people with lawful protection.
With loving-kindness to all human beings there he goes about without incurring their dislike since they trust him.
With loving-kindness to all living beings he can wander unhindered everywhere.
With mindfulness of death, thinking, “I have got to die,” he gives up improper search , and with a growing sense of urgency he comes to live without attachment.
When his mind is familiar with the perception of foulness, then even divine objects do not tempt his mind to greed.
So these are called “generally useful” and they are “called meditation subjects” since they are needed17 generally and desirable owing to their great helpfulness and since they are subjects for the meditation work intended.
What is called a “special meditation subject” is that one from among the forty meditation subjects that is suitable to a man’s own temperament. It is “special” because he must carry it constantly about with him, and because it is the proximate cause for each higher stage of development.
So it is the one who gives this twofold meditation subject that is called the giver of a meditation subject.
The good friend
He is revered and dearly loved, And one who speaks and suffers speech;
The speech he utters is profound, He does not urge without a reason and so on.
 is one who possesses such special qualities as these . He is wholly solicitous of welfare and partial to progress.
Because of the words beginning, “Ānanda, it is owing to my being a good friend to them that living beings subject to birth are freed from birth” , it is only the Fully Enlightened One who possesses all the aspects of the good friend.
Since that is so, while he is available only a meditation subject taken in the Blessed One’s presence is well taken.
But after his final attainment of Nibbāna, it is proper to take it from anyone of the eighty great disciples still living.
When they are no more available, one who wants to take a particular meditation subject should take it from someone with cankers destroyed, who has, by means of that particular meditation subject, produced the fourfold and fivefold jhāna, and has reached the destruction of cankers by augmenting insight that had that jhāna as its proximate cause.
But how then, does someone with cankers destroyed declare himself thus: “I am one whose cankers are destroyed?”
Why not? He declares himself when he knows that his instructions will be carried out.
Did not the Elder Assagutta spread out his leather mat in the air and sitting cross-legged on it explain a meditation subject to a bhikkhu who was starting his meditation subject, because he knew that that bhikkhu was one who would carry out his instructions for the meditation subject?
So if someone with cankers destroyed is available, that is good. If not, then one should take it from a non-returner, a once-returner, a stream-enterer, an ordinary man who has obtained jhāna, one who knows three Piṭakas, one who knows two Piṭakas, one who knows one Piṭaka, in descending order according as available.
If not even one who knows one Piṭaka is available, then it should be taken from one who is familiar with one Collection together with its commentary and one who is himself conscientious.
For a teacher such as this, who knows the texts, guards the heritage, and protects the tradition, will follow the teachers’ opinion rather than his own.
Hence the Ancient Elders said three times, “One who is conscientious will guard it.”
Now, those beginning with one whose cankers are destroyed, mentioned above, will describe only the path they have themselves reached.
But with a learned man, his instructions and his answers to questions are purified by his having approached such and such teachers, and so he will explain a meditation subject showing a broad track, like a big elephant going through a stretch of jungle, and he will select suttas and reasons from here and there, adding explanations of what is suitable and unsuitable.
So a meditation subject should be taken by approaching the good friend such as this, the giver of a meditation subject, and by doing all the duties to him.
If he is available in the same monastery, it is good. If not, one should go to where he lives.
When a bhikkhu goes to him, he should not do so with feet washed and anointed, wearing sandals, with an umbrella, surrounded by pupils, and bringing oil tube, honey, molasses, etc.;
When entering that monastery, he should do so expecting nothing, and even provided with a tooth-stick that he has had made allowable on the way according to the rules. And he should not enter some other room, thinking, “I shall go to the teacher after resting awhile and after washing and anointing my feet, and so on.”
Why?
If there are bhikkhus there who are hostile to the teacher, they might ask him the reason for his coming and speak dispraise of the teacher, saying, “You are done for if you go to him”; they might make him regret his coming and turn him back. So he should ask for the teacher’s dwelling and go straight there.
If the teacher is junior, he should not consent to the teacher’s receiving his bowl and robe, and so on.
If the teacher is senior, then he should go and pay homage to him and remain standing.
When told, “Put down the bowl and robe, friend,” he may put them down.
When told, “Have some water to drink,” he can drink if he wants to.
When told, “You may wash your feet,” he should not do so at once,
But when told “Wash, friend, it was not brought by me, it was brought by others,” then he can wash his feet, sitting in a screened place out of sight of the teacher, or in the open to one side of the dwelling.
If the teacher brings an oil tube, he should get up and take it carefully with both hands.
If he did not take it, it might make the teacher wonder, “Does this bhikkhu resent sharing so soon?
” but having taken it, he should not anoint his feet at once.
For if it were oil for anointing the teacher’s limbs, it would not be proper.
So he should first anoint his head, then his shoulders, etc.;
He should not say, “Explain a meditation subject to me, venerable sir” on the very day he arrives.
But starting from the next day, he can, if the teacher has a habitual attendant, ask his permission to do the duties.
If he does not allow it when asked, they can be done when the opportunity offers.
When he does them, three tooth-sticks should be brought, a small, a medium and a big one,
Whichever of these the teacher uses for three days should then be brought regularly.
If the teacher uses either kind indiscriminately, he can bring whatever is available.
Why so many words?
as by the Blessed One : “Bhikkhus, a pupil should perform the duties to the teacher rightly.
Herein, this is the right performance of duties. He should rise early; removing his sandals and arranging his robe on one shoulder, he should give the tooth-sticks and the mouth-washing water, and he should prepare the seat.
If there is rice gruel, he should wash the dish and bring the rice gruel” . All should be done as prescribed in the Khandhakas as the right duties in the passage beginning .
To please the teacher by perfection in the duties he should pay homage in the evening, and he should leave when dismissed with the words, “You may go.” When the teacher asks him, “Why have you come?” he can explain the reason for his coming.
or he should go at an unaccustomed time, and when asked, “What have you come for? ” he can announce it.
If the teacher says, “Come in the morning,” he should do so.
But if his stomach burns with a bile affliction at that hour, or if his food does not get digested owing to sluggish digestive heat, or if some other ailment afflicts him, he should let it be known, and proposing a time that suits himself, he should come at that time.
For if a meditation subject is expounded at an inconvenient time, one cannot give attention.
This is the detailed explanation of the words “approach the good friend, the giver of a meditation subject.”
Then he should develop it towards all deities within the boundary.
then to all human beings there and to all living beings dependent on the human beings.
then they are easy for him to live with.
he should do so fulfilling the duties of a bhikkhu setting out on a journey, carrying his bowl and robes himself, doing all the duties in each monastery on the way, with few belongings, and living in the greatest effacement.
for if the water has been brought by the teacher himself, it would be improper.
but when told, “This is meant for all the limbs, friend, anoint your feet,” he should put a little on his head and then anoint his feet. Then he should give it back, saying when the teacher takes it, “May I return this oil tube, venerable sir? ”
and two kinds of mouth-washing water and bathing water, that is, hot and cold, should be set out.
If he does not ask but agrees to the duties being done, then after ten days or a fortnight have gone by he should make an opportunity by staying back one day at the time of his dismissal, and announcing the reason for his coming;
They say it is the Dakkhiṇagiri in the Magadha country
A ‘water port of entry’ is a port of entry on the sea or on an estuary.
A ‘land port of entry’ is one on the edge of a forest and acts as the gateway on the road of approach to great cities
‘In earth’: in an earth disk of the kind about to be described.
‘Bounded’: only in one that has bounds.
‘Not made up’: in a disk of earth consisting of an ordinary threshing-floor disk, and so on.
‘Made up’: prepared in the manner about to be described.
‘Apprehends the sign’: he apprehends in that, with knowledge connected with meditative development, the sign of earth of the kind about to be described, as one does with the eye the sign of the face in a looking-glass.
‘One who is learning the earth kasiṇa’: one who is apprehending, grasping, an earth kasiṇa as a ‘learning sign’. The meaning is, one who is producing an earth kasiṇa that has become the sign of learning;
Said in the Old Commentary.
and here ‘arousing’ should be regarded as the establishing of the sign in that way.
As regard the words ‘the size of a bushel’, etc., it would be desirable that a bushel and a saucer were of equal size,
but some say that ‘the size of a saucer’ is a span and four fingers, and the ‘the size of a bushel’ is larger than that.
‘He sees to it that that sign is well apprehended’: that meditator makes that disk of earth a well-apprehended sign.
‘He anchors his mind’: by bringing his own mind to access jhāna he anchors it, keeps it from other objects.
‘To that object’: to that object called earth kasiṇa, which has appeared rightly owing to its having been well apprehended.
When it is well attended to thus by adverting and attending again and again by producing much repetition and development instigated by that, he sees that it is ‘well defined’.
Having thoroughly established his mindfulness there, observing it again and again with his mind not straying outside, he sees that it is ‘well attended to’.
When, after apprehending the sign in it by opening the eyes, and looking and then closing them again, it appears to him as he adverts to it just as it did at the moment of looking with open eyes, then he has made it well apprehended.
However, in the Island of Sri Lanka there is a river, it seems, called the Rāvanagaṅgā. The clay in the places where the banks are cut away by its stream is the colour of dawn.
Apprehend the sign’: apprehend with the mind the sign apprehended by the eye in the earth kasiṇa.
‘And develop it’: the apprehending of the sign as it occurs should be continued intensively and constantly practiced.
Just as one who sees his reflection on the surface of a looking-glass does not open his eyes too widely or too little , nor does he review the colour of the looking-glass or give attention to its characteristic,
but rather looks with moderately opened eyes and sees only the sign of his face, so too this meditator looks with moderately opened eyes at the earth kasiṇa and is occupied only with the sign
The dawn colour that is there in the kasiṇa should not be thought about,
though it cannot be denied that it is apprehended by eye-consciousness.
That is why, instead of saying here, ‘should not be looked at,’ he says that it should not be apprehended by reviewing.
Also the earth element’s characteristic of hardness, which is there, should not be given attention because the apprehension has to be done through the channel of seeing.
And after saying, ‘while not ignoring the colour’ he said, ‘relegating the colour to the position of a property of the physical support,’ showing that here the concern is not with the colour, which is the channel, but rather that this colour should be treated as an accessory of the physical support;
‘On the concept as the mental datum since that is what is outstanding’: the term of ordinary usage ‘earth’ as applied to earth with its accessories, since the prominence of its individual effect is due to outstandingness of the earth element: ‘setting the mind’ on that mental datum consisting of a name- concept , the kasiṇa should be given attention as ‘earth, earth.’
—If the mind is to be set on a mere concept by means of a term of common usage, ought earth to be given attention by means of different names?—It can be. What is wrong? It is to show that that is done he said, ‘Mahī, medinī,’ and so on.
the meaning is that the kasiṇa should be given attention with awareness of both the accompanying earth- aspect and its ancillary colour-aspect, but taking the earth-aspect with its ancillary concomitant colour as both supported equally by that physical support the disk.
‘Comes into focus’: becomes the resort of mind-door impulsion.
Why should he not?
If, after the learning sign was produced, he went on developing it by looking at the disk of the earth, there would be no arising of the counterpart sign.
Stamped with the three characteristics of the formed beginning with rise , or marked with the three characteristics beginning with impermanence.
If ‘it is not like that’—is not possessed of colour, etc.—then how is it the object of jhāna? It is in order to answer that question that the sentence beginning, ‘For it is …’ is given.
Since there is no arising from anywhere of what has no individual
essence, he therefore said, ‘Being the mere mode of appearance’
‘Born of the perception’: produced by the perception during development, simply born from the perception during development.
one and a half kosa = 3,000 bows
One who is occupied with exercising and caring for the body
It guards the line , thus it is lineage . When it occurs limitedly, it guards the naming and the recognition of the naming as restricted to a definite scope .
The exalted lineage is explainable in the same way.
But the limited should be regarded as the materiality peculiar to sense- sphere states, which are the resort of craving for sense desires, and destitute of the exalted or the unsurpassed .
So it is said to protect and keep these.
For just as recognition does not take place without a meaning for its objective support , so naming does not take place without what is named .
The intention is that it is as if the sixth and seventh impulsions had lapsed since impulsion beyond the fifth is exhausted. The elder’s opinion was that just as the first impulsion, which lacks the quality of repetition, does not arouse change-of-lineage because of its weakness, while the second or the third, which have the quality of repetition, can do so because they are strong on that account, so too the sixth and seventh fix in absorption owing to their strength due to their quality of repetition.
for the first volition, which is not a repetition, has result experienceable here and now, while the second to the sixth, which are repetitions, have result experienceable in future becomings.
And the text quoted is not a reason because strength due to the quality of repetition is not a principle without exceptions ;
But it is unsupported by a sutta or by any teacher’s statement in conformity with a sutta.
‘Either in the fourth or the fifth,’ etc., is said for the purpose of concluding the discussion with a paragraph showing the correctness of the meaning already stated.
— Herein, if the sixth and seventh impulsions are said to have lapsed because impulsion is exhausted, how does seventh-impulsion volition come to have result experienceable in the next rebirth and to be of immediate effect on rebirth?
—This is not owing to strength got through a repetition condition.
—What then?— It is owing to the difference in the function’s position .
Herein, experienceability of result in the next rebirth and immediateness of effect on rebirth are due to the last volition’s final position, not to its strength …
For the function of impulsion has three positions, that is, initial, medial and final.
So the fact that the sixth and seventh lapse because impulsion is used up cannot be objected to.
‘The normal extent does not apply’ here ‘in the seven instances’ because of the immeasurability of the conscious moment in some, and the extreme brevity of the moment in others;
for ‘extent’ is inapplicable here in the sense of complete cognitive series,
which is why ‘in fruition next to the path,’ etc., is said
The inmates of the Abhayagiri Monastery in Anurādhapura
‘At that moment’: at the moment of dissolution; for when the moment of arising is past, repetition occurs starting with the moment of presence
‘Its’: of that jhāna consciousness.
They say that with the words, ‘There could be the arising of the pain faculty,’ it is shown that since grief arises even in obtainers of jhāna,
it is demonstrated thereby that hate can exist without being a hindrance just as greed can;
for grief does not arise without hate.
Nor, they say, is there any conflict with the Paṭṭhāna text to be fancied here,
since what is shown there is only grief that occurs making lost jhāna its object because the grief that occurs making its object a jhāna that has not been lost is not relevant there.
And they say that it cannot be maintained that grief does not arise at all in those who have obtained jhāna since it did arise in Asita who had the eight attainments , and he was not one who had lost jhāna. So they say.
That is wrong because there is no hate without the nature of a hindrance.
The way to regard that is that when the jhāna is lost for some trivial reason such men reinstate it without difficulty.
And it is no reason to argue, ‘it is because it arose in Asita,’ since there is falling away from jhāna with the arising of grief.
If there were, it would arise in fine- material and immaterial beings, and it does not.
Accordingly when in such passages as, ‘In the immaterial state, due to the hindrance of lust there is the hindrance of stiffness and torpor … the hindrance of agitation, the hindrance of ignorance’ , ill will and worry are not mentioned as hindrances,
that does not imply that they are not hindrances even by supposing that it was because lust, etc., were not actually hindrances and were called hindrances there figuratively because of resemblance to hindrances.
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at SavatthI in Jeta’s Grove, Anathapindika’s Park.
There he addressed the bhikkhus thus: “Bhikkhus.”
- “Venerable sir,” they replied.
The Blessed One said this: 2. “Bhikkhus, I shall teach you a discourse on what should be cultivated and what should not be cultivated.
Listen and attend closely to what I shall say.”
- “Yes, venerable sir,” the bhikkhus replied.
The Blessed One said this:
Verbal conduct is of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated. And verbal conduct is either the one or the other.
Mental conduct is of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated. And mental conduct is either the one or the other.
Inclination of mind is of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated. And inclination’ of mind is either the one or the other.
The acquisition of perception is of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated. And the acquisition of perception is either the one or the other.
The acquisition of view is of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated. And the acquisition of view is either the one or the other.
The acquisition of individuality is of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated. And the acquisition of individuality is either the one or the other.”
When this was said, the venerable Sariputta said to the Blessed One: “Venerable sir, I understand the detailed meaning of the Blessed One’s utterance, which he has spoken in brief without expounding the detailed meaning, to be thus:
‘“Bhikkhus, bodily conduct is of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated. And bodily conduct is either the one or the other.’ So it was said by the Blessed One.
And with reference to what was this said?
“Venerable sir, such bodily conduct as causes unwholesome states to increase and wholesome states to diminish in one who cultivates it should not be cultivated. But such bodily conduct as causes unwholesome states to diminish and wholesome states to increase in one who cultivates it should be cultivated.
“And what kind of bodily conduct causes unwholesome states to increase and wholesome states to diminish in one who cultivates it?
Here someone kills living beings; he is murderous, bloody-handed, given to blows and violence, merciless to living beings. He takes what is not given; he takes by way of theft the wealth and property of others in the village or in the forest. He misconducts himself in sensual pleasures; he has intercourse with such women as are protected by their mother, father, mother and father, brother, sister, or relatives, who have a husband, who are protected by law, and even with those who are garlanded in token of betrothal. Such bodily conduct causes unwholesome states to increase and wholesome states to diminish in one who cultivates it.
“And what kind of bodily conduct causes unwholesome states to diminish and wholesome states to increase in one who cultivates it?
Here someone, abandoning the killing of living beings, abstains from killing living beings; with rod and weapon laid aside, gently and kindly, he abides compassionate to all living beings. Abandoning the taking of what is not given, he abstains from taking what is not given; he does not take by way of theft the wealth and property of others in the village or in the forest. Abandoning misconduct in sensual pleasures, he abstains from misconduct in sensual pleasures; he does not have intercourse with such women as are protected by their mother, father, mother and father, brother, sister, or relatives, who have a husband, who are protected by law, or with those who are garlanded in token of betrothal. Such bodily conduct causes unwholesome states to diminish and wholesome states to increase in one who cultivates it.
“So it was with reference to this that it was said by the Blessed One: ‘Bhikkhus, bodily conduct is of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated. And bodily conduct is either the one or the other.’
‘“Bhikkhus, verbal conduct is of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated. And verbal conduct is either the one or the other.’ So it was said by the Blessed One.
And with reference to what was this said?
“Venerable sir, such verbal conduct as causes unwholesome states to increase and wholesome states to diminish in one who cultivates it should not be cultivated. But such verbal conduct as causes unwholesome states to diminish and wholesome states to increase in one who cultivates it should be cultivated.
“And what kind of verbal conduct causes unwholesome states to increase and wholesome states to diminish in one who cultivates it?
Here someone speaks falsehood; when summoned to a court, or to a meeting, or to his relatives’ presence, or to his guild, or to the royal family’s presence, and questioned as a witness thus: ‘So, good man, tell what you know,’ not knowing, he says, ‘I know,’ or knowing, he says, ‘I do not know’; not seeing, he says, ‘I see,’ or seeing, he says, ‘I do not see’; in full awareness he speaks falsehood for his own ends, or for another’s ends, or for some trifling worldly end. He speaks maliciously; he repeats elsewhere what he has heard here in order to divide those people from these, or he repeats to these people what he has heard elsewhere in order to divide these people from those; thus he is one who divides those who are united, a creator of divisions, who enjoys discord, rejoices in discord, delights in discord, a speaker of words that create discord. He speaks harshly; he utters such words as are rough, hard, hurtful to others, offensive to others, bordering on anger, unconducive to concentration. He is a gossip; he speaks at the wrong time, speaks what is not fact, speaks what is useless, speaks contrary to the Dhamma and the Discipline; at the wrong time he speaks such words as are worthless, unreasonable, immoderate, and unbeneficial. Such verbal conduct causes unwholesome states to increase and wholesome states to diminish in one who cultivates it.
“And what kind of verbal conduct causes unwholesome states to diminish and wholesome states to increase in one who cultivates it?
Here someone, abandoning false speech, abstains from false speech; when summoned to a court, or to a meeting, or to his relatives’ presence, or to his guild, or to the royal family’s presence, and questioned as a witness thus: ‘So, good man, tell what you know’ not knowing, he says, ‘I do not know,’ or knowing, he says, ‘I know’; not seeing, he says, ‘I do not see,’ or seeing, he says, ‘I see’; he does not in full awareness speak falsehood for his own ends, or for another’s ends, or for some trifling worldly end. Abandoning malicious speech, he abstains from malicious speech; he does not repeat elsewhere what he has heard here in order to divide those people from these, nor does he repeat to these people what he has heard elsewhere in order to divide these people from those; thus he is one who reunites those who are divided, a promoter of friendships, who enjoys concord, rejoices in concord, delights in concord, a speaker of words that promote concord. Abandoning harsh speech, he abstains from harsh speech; he speaks such words as are gentle, pleasing to the ear, and loveable, as go to the heart, are courteous, desired by many, and agreeable to many. Abandoning gossip, he abstains from gossip; he speaks at the right time, speaks what is fact, speaks on what is good, speaks on the Dhamma and the Discipline; at the right time he speaks such words as are worth recording, reasonable, moderate, and beneficial. Such verbal conduct causes unwholesome states to diminish and wholesome states to increase in one who cultivates it.
“So it was with reference to this that it was said by the Blessed One: ‘Bhikkhus, verbal conduct is of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated. And verbal conduct is either the one or the other.’
‘“Mental conduct is of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated. And mental conduct is either the one or the other.’
So it was said by the Blessed One, And with reference to what was this said?
“Venerable sir, such mental conduct as causes unwholesome states to increase and wholesome states to diminish in one who cultivates it should not be cultivated. But such mental conduct as causes unwholesome states to diminish and wholesome states to increase in one who cultivates it should be cultivated.
“And what kind of mental conduct causes unwholesome states to increase and wholesome states to diminish in one who cultivates it?
Here someone is covetous; he covets the wealth and property of others thus: ‘Oh, may what belongs to another be mine! ‘ Or he has a mind of ill will and intentions of hate thus: ‘May these beings be slain and slaughtered, may they be cut off, perish, or be annihilated! ‘ Such mental conduct causes unwholesome states to increase and wholesome states to diminish in one who cultivates it.
“And what kind of mental conduct causes unwholesome states to diminish and wholesome states to increase in one who cultivates it?
Here someone is not covetous; he does not covet the wealth and property of others thus: ‘Oh, may what belongs to another be mine! ‘ His mind is without ill will and he has intentions free from hate thus: ‘May these beings be free from enmity, affliction, and anxiety! May they live happily! ‘ Such mental conduct causes unwholesome states to diminish and wholesome states to increase in one who cultivates it.
“So it was with reference to this that it was said by the Blessed One: ‘Bhikkhus, mental conduct is of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated. And mental conduct is either the one or the other.’1071
‘“Inclination of mind is of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated. And inclination of mind is either the one or the other.’ So it was said by the Blessed One.
And with reference to what was this said?
“Venerable sir, such inclination of mind as causes unwholesome states to increase and wholesome states to diminish in one who cultivates it should not be cultivated. But such inclination of mind as causes unwholesome states to diminish and wholesome states to increase in one who cultivates it should be cultivated.
“And what kind of inclination of mind causes unwholesome states to increase and wholesome states to diminish in one who cultivates it?
Here someone is covetous and abides with his mind imbued with covetousness; he has ill will and abides with his mind imbued with ill will; he is cruel and abides with his mind imbued with cruelty.1072 Such inclination of mind causes unwholesome states to increase and wholesome states to diminish in one who cultivates it.
“And what kind of inclination of mind causes unwholesome states to diminish and wholesome states to increase in one who cultivates it?
Here someone is uncovetous and abides with his mind detached from covetousness; he is without ill will and abides with his mind detached from ill will; he is uncruel and abides with his mind detached from cruelty. Such inclination of mind causes unwholesome states to diminish and wholesome states to increase in one who cultivates it.
“So it was with reference to this that it was said by the Blessed One: ‘Bhikkhus, inclination of mind is of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated. And inclination of mind is either the one or the other.’
‘“The acquisition of perception is of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated. And the acquisition of perception is either the one or the other.’ So it was said by the Blessed One.
And with reference to what was this said?
“Venerable sir, such acquisition of perception as causes unwholesome states to increase and wholesome states to diminish in one who cultivates it should not be cultivated. But such acquisition of perception as causes unwholesome states to diminish and wholesome states to increase in one who cultivates it should be cultivated.
“And what kind of acquisition of perception causes unwholesome states to increase and wholesome states to diminish in one who cultivates it?
Here someone is covetous and abides with his perception imbued with covetousness; he has ill will and abides with his perception imbued with ill will; he is cruel and abides with his perception imbued with cruelty. Such acquisition of perception causes unwholesome states to increase and wholesome states to diminish in one who cultivates it.
“And what kind of acquisition of perception causes unwholesome states to diminish and wholesome states to increase in one who cultivates it?
Here someone is uncovetous and abides with his perception detached from covetousness; he is without ill will and abides with his perception detached from ill will; he is uncruel and abides with his perception detached from cruelty. Such acquisition of perception causes unwholesome states to diminish and wholesome states to increase in one who cultivates it.
“So it was with reference to this that it was said by the Blessed One: ‘Bhikkhus, the acquisition of perception is of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated. And the acquisition of perception is either the one or the other.’
‘“The acquisition of view is of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated. And the acquisition of view is either the one or the other. So it was said by the Blessed One.
And with reference to what was this said?
“Venerable sir, such acquisition of view as causes unwholesome states to increase and wholesome states to diminish in one who cultivates it should not be cultivated. But such acquisition of view as causes unwholesome states to diminish and wholesome states to increase in one who cultivates it should be cultivated.
“And what kind of acquisition of view causes unwholesome states to increase and wholesome states to diminish in one who cultivates it?
Here someone holds such a view as this: “There is nothing given, nothing offered, nothing sacrificed; no fruit or result of good and bad actions; no this world, no other world; no mother, no father; no beings who are reborn spontaneously; no good and virtuous recluses and brahmins in the world who have realised for themselves by direct knowledge and declare this world and the other world.’ Such acquisition of view causes unwholesome states to increase and wholesome states to diminish in one who cultivates it.
“And what kind of acquisition of view causes unwholesome states to diminish and wholesome states to increase in one who cultivates it?
Here someone holds such a view as this: “There is what is given and what is offered and what is sacrificed; there is fruit and result of good and bad actions; there is this world and the other world; there is mother and father; there are beings who are reborn spontaneously; there are good and virtuous recluses and brahmins in the world who have realised for themselves by direct knowledge and declare this world and the other world.’ Such acquisition of view causes unwholesome states to diminish and wholesome states to increase in one who cultivates it.
“So it was with reference to this that it was said by the Blessed One: ‘Bhikkhus, the acquisition of view is of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated. And the acquisition of view is either the one or the other.’
‘“The acquisition of individuality is of two kinds, I say : 1073 to be cultivated and not to be cultivated. And the acquisition of individuality is either the one or the other.’ So it was said by the Blessed One.
And with reference to what was this said?
“Venerable sir, such acquisition of individuality as causes unwholesome states to increase and wholesome states to diminish in one who cultivates it should not be cultivated. But such acquisition of individuality as causes unwholesome states to diminish and wholesome states to increase in one who cultivates it should be cultivated.
“And what kind of acquisition of individuality causes unwholesome states to increase and wholesome states to diminish in one who cultivates it?
When a person generates an acquisition of individuality that is subject to affliction, unwholesome states increase and wholesome states diminish in him, preventing him from putting an end to being.1074 “And what kind of acquisition of individuality causes unwholesome states to diminish and wholesome states to increase in one who cultivates it? When a person generates an acquisition of individuality that is free from affliction, unwholesome states diminish and wholesome states increase in him, enabling him to put an end to being.
“So it was with reference to this that it was said by the Blessed One: ‘Bhikkhus, the acquisition of individuality is of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated. And the acquisition of individuality is either the one or the other.’
“Venerable sir, I understand the detailed meaning of the Blessed One’s utterance, which he has spoken in brief without expounding the detailed meaning, to be thus.”.
“Good, good, Sariputta!
It is good that you understand the detailed meaning of my utterance, which I spoke in brief without expounding the detailed meaning, to be thus.
{In these paragraphs the Buddha repeats verbatim §§5-11, with the substitution of “Sariputta” for “venerable sir” and of” by me” for “by the Blessed One.“)
“Sariputta, the detailed meaning of my utterance, which I spoke in brief, should be regarded thus.
“Sariputta, forms cognizable by the eye are of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated.1075 Sounds cognizable by the ear are of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated. Odours cognizable by the nose are of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated. Flavours cognizable by the tongue are of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated. Tangibles cognizable by the body are of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated. Mind-objects cognizable by the mind are of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated.”
When this was said, the venerable Sariputta said to the Blessed One: “Venerable sir, I understand the detailed meaning of the Blessed One’s utterance, which he has spoken in brief without expounding the detailed meaning, to be thus:
‘“Sariputta, forms cognizable by the eye are of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated.’ So it was said by the Blessed One.
And with reference to what was this said?
“Venerable sir, such forms cognizable by the eye as cause unwholesome states to increase and wholesome states to diminish in one who cultivates them should not be cultivated. But such forms cognizable by the eye as cause unwholesome states to diminish and wholesome states to increase in one who cultivates them should be cultivated.
“So it was with reference to this that it was said by the Blessed One: ‘Sariputta, forms cognizable by the eye are of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated.’
‘“Sounds cognizable by the ear are of two kinds, I say’… 26. ‘“Odours cognizable by the nose are of two kinds, I say’… 27. ‘“Flavours cognizable by the tongue are of two kinds, I say’… 28. ‘“Tangibles cognizable by the body are of two kinds, I say’…
“‘Mind-objects cognizable by the mind are of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated.’ So it was said by the Blessed One.
And with reference to what was this said?
“Venerable sir, such mind-objects cognizable by the mind as cause unwholesome states to increase and wholesome states to diminish in one who cultivates them should not be cultivated. But such mind-objects cognizable by the mind as cause unwholesome states to diminish and wholesome states to increase in one who cultivates them should be cultivated.
“So it was with reference to this that it was said by the Blessed One: ‘Mind-objects cognizable by the mind are of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated.’
“Venerable sir, I understand the detailed meaning of the Blessed One’s utterance, which he has spoken in brief without expounding the detailed meaning, to be thus.”
“Good, good, Sariputta!
It is good that you understand the detailed meaning of my utterance, which I spoke in brief without expounding the detailed meaning, to be thus.
“Sariputta, robes are of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated. Almsfood is of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated. Resting places are of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated. Villages are of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated. Towns are of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated. Cities are of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated. Districts are of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated. Persons are of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated.”
When this was said, the venerable Sariputta said to the Blessed One: “Venerable sir, I understand the detailed meaning of the Blessed One’s utterance, which he has spoken in brief without expounding the detailed meaning, to be thus:
‘“Sariputta, robes are of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated.’ So it was said by the Blessed One.
And with reference to what was this said?
“Venerable sir, such robes as cause unwholesome states to increase and wholesome states to diminish in one who cultivates them should not be cultivated. But such robes as cause unwholesome states to diminish and wholesome states to increase in one who cultivates them should be cultivated.
“So it was with reference to this that it was said by the Blessed One: ‘Sariputta, robes are of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated.’
‘“Almsfood is of two kinds, I say’… 43. ‘“Resting places are of two kinds, I say’… 44. ‘“Villages are of two kinds, I say’… 45. ‘“Towns are of two kinds, I say’… 46. ‘“Cities are of two kinds, I say’… 47. ‘“Districts are of two kinds, I say’…
And with reference to what was this said?
“Venerable sir, association with such persons as causes unwholesome states to increase and wholesome states to diminish in one who cultivates it should not be cultivated. But association with such persons as causes unwholesome states to diminish and wholesome states to increase in one who cultivates it should be cultivated.
“So it was with reference to this that it was said by the Blessed One: ‘Persons are of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated.’
“Venerable sir, I understand the detailed meaning of the Blessed One’s utterance, which he has spoken in brief without expounding the detailed meaning, to be thus.”
“Good, good, Sariputta!
It is good that you understand the detailed meaning of my utterance, which I spoke in brief without expounding the detailed meaning, to be thus.
“Sariputta, if all nobles understood thus the detailed meaning of my utterance, which I spoke in brief, it would lead to their welfare and happiness for a long time.
If all brahmins… all merchants…all workers understood thus the meaning of my utterance, which I spoke in brief, it would lead to their welfare and happiness for a long time.
If the world with its gods, its Maras, and its Brahmas, this generation with its recluses and brahmins, its princes and its people, understood thus the detailed meaning of my utterance, which I spoke in brief, it would lead to the welfare and happiness of the world for a long time.”
That is what the Blessed One said.
The venerable Sariputta was satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
“Bhikkhus,1069 bodily conduct is of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated. And bodily conduct is either the one or the other.1070
Now, the water kasiṇa comes next after the earth kasiṇa .
Here is the detailed explanation. One who wants to develop the water kasiṇa should, as in the case of the earth kasiṇa, seat himself comfortably and apprehend the sign in water that “is either made up or not made up,” etc.; and so all the rest should be repeated in detail .
And as in this case, so with all those that follow in this chapter.
We shall in fact not repeat even this much and shall only point out what is different.
Here too, when someone has had practice in previous lives, the sign arises for him in water that is not made up, such as a pool, a lake, a lagoon, or the ocean as in the case of the Elder Cūḷa-Sīva.
The venerable one, it seems, thought to abandon gain and honour and live a secluded life. He boarded a ship at Mahātittha and sailed to Jambudīpa . As he gazed at the ocean meanwhile, the kasiṇa sign, the counterpart of that ocean, arose in him.
Someone with no such previous practice should guard against the four faults of a kasiṇa and not apprehend the water as one of the colours, blue, yellow, red or white. He should fill a bowl or a four-footed water pot1 to the brim with water uncontaminated by soil, taken in the open through a clean cloth strainer, or with any other clear unturbid water. He should put it in a screened place on the outskirts of the monastery as already described and seat himself comfortably. He should neither review its colour
nor bring its characteristic to mind.
Apprehending the colour as belonging to its physical support, he should set his mind on the name concept as the most outstanding mental datum, and using any among the various names for water such as “rain” , “liquid” , “dew” , “fluid” ,2 he should develop the kasiṇa by using preferably the obvious “water, water.”
As he develops it in this way, the two signs eventually arise in him in the way already described.
Here, however, the learning sign has the appearance of moving. If the water has bubbles of froth mixed with it, the learning sign has the same appearance, and it is evident as a fault in the kasiṇa.
But the counterpart sign appears inactive, like a crystal fan set in space, like the disk of a looking- glass made of crystal.
With the appearance of that sign he reaches access jhāna and the jhāna tetrad and pentad in the way already described.
Anyone who wants to develop the fire kasiṇa should apprehend the sign in fire.
Herein, when someone with merit, having had previous practice, is apprehending the sign, it arises in him in any sort of fire, not made up, as he looks at the fiery combustion in a lamp’s flame or in a furnace or in a place for baking bowls or in a forest conflagration, as in the Elder Cittagutta’s case.
The sign arose in that elder as he was looking at a lamp’s flame while he was in the Uposatha house on the day of preaching the Dhamma.
Anyone else should make one up.
Here are the directions for making it. He should split up some damp heartwood, dry it, and break it up into short lengths. He should go to a suitable tree root or to a shed and there make a pile in the way done for baking bowls, and have it lit. He should make a hole a span and four fingers wide in a rush mat or a piece of leather or a cloth,
and after hanging it in front of the fire, he should sit down in the way already described. Instead of giving attention to the grass and sticks below or the smoke above, he should apprehend the sign in the dense combustion in the middle. 7.He should not review the colour as blue or yellow, etc., or give attention to its characteristic as heat, etc.,
but taking the colour as belonging to its physical support, and setting his mind on the name concept as the most outstanding mental datum, and using any among the names for fire such as “the Bright One” , “the Leaver of the Black Trail” , “the Knower of Creatures” , “the Altar of Sacrifice” , etc., he should develop the kasiṇa by using preferably the obvious “fire, fire.”
As he develops it in this way the two signs eventually arise in him as already described.
Herein, the learning sign appears like the fire to keep sinking down as the flame keeps detaching itself.
But when someone apprehends it in a kasiṇa that is not made up, any fault in the kasiṇa is evident in the learning sign, and any firebrand, or pile of embers or ashes, or smoke appears in it.
The counterpart sign appears motionless like a piece of red cloth set in space, like a gold fan, like a gold column.
With its appearance he reaches access jhāna and the jhāna tetrad and pentad in the way already described.
Anyone who wants to develop the air kasiṇa should apprehend the sign in air.
And that is done either by sight or by touch.
For this is said in the Commentaries: “One who is learning the air kasiṇa apprehends the sign in air. He notices the tops of growing sugarcane moving to and fro; or he notices the tops of bamboos, or the tops of trees, or the ends of the hair, moving to and fro; or he notices the touch of it on the body.”
So when he sees sugarcanes with dense foliage standing with tops level or bamboos or trees, or else hair four fingers long on a man’s head, being struck by the wind, he should establish mindfulness in this way: “This wind is striking on this place.” Or he can establish mindfulness where the wind strikes a part of his body after entering by a window opening or by a crack in a wall, and using any among the names for wind beginning with “wind” , “breeze” , “blowing” , he should develop the kasiṇa by using preferably the obvious “air, air.”
Here the learning sign appears to move like the swirl of hot steam on rice gruel just withdrawn from an oven.
The rest should be understood in the way already described.
The counterpart sign is quiet and motionless.
Next it is said in the Commentaries: “One who is learning the blue kasiṇa apprehends the sign in blue, whether in a flower or in a cloth or in a colour element.”3 Firstly, when someone has merit, having had previous practice, the sign arises in him when he sees a bush with blue flowers, or such flowers spread out on a place of offering, or any blue cloth or gem.
But anyone else should take flowers such as blue lotuses, girikaṇṇikā flowers, etc., and spread them out to fill a tray or a flat basket completely so that no stamen or stalk shows or with only their petals. Or he can fill it with blue cloth bunched up together;
or he can fasten the cloth over the rim of the tray
Or he can make a kasiṇa disk, either portable as described under the earth kasiṇa or on a wall, with one of the colour elements such as bronze-green, leaf-green, añjana-ointment black, surrounding it with a different colour.
After that, he should bring it to mind as “blue, blue” in the way already described under the earth kasiṇa.
And here too any fault in the kasiṇa is evident in the learning sign; the stamens and stalks and the gaps between the petals, etc., are apparent.
The counterpart sign appears like a crystal fan in space, free from the kasiṇa disk.
The rest should be understood as already described.
or basket like the covering of a drum.
Likewise with the yellow kasiṇa;
That venerable one, it seems, saw an offering being made on the flower altar, with pattaṅga flowers4 at Cittalapabbata, and as soon as he saw it the sign arose in him the size of the flower altar.
Anyone else should make a kasiṇa, in the way described for the blue kasiṇa, with kaṇikāra flowers, etc., or with yellow cloth or with a colour element. He should bring it to mind as “yellow, yellow.”
The rest is as before.
for this is said: “One who is learning the yellow kasiṇa apprehends the sign in yellow, either in a flower or in a cloth or in a colour element.”
Therefore here too, when someone has merit, having had previous practice, the sign arises in him when he sees a flowering bush or flowers spread out, or yellow cloth or colour element, as in the case of the Elder Cittagutta.
Likewise with the red kasiṇa;
But anyone else should make a kasiṇa, in the way already described for the blue kasiṇa, with jayasumana flowers or bandhujīvaka or red koraṇḍaka flowers, etc., or with red cloth or with a colour element.
He should bring it to mind as “red, red.” The rest is as before.
for this is said: “One who is learning the red kasiṇa apprehends the sign in red, either in a flower or in a cloth or in a colour element.”
Therefore here too, when someone has merit, having had previous practice, the sign arises in him when he sees a bandhujīvaka bush, etc., in flower, or such flowers spread out, or a red cloth or gem or colour element.
Of the white kasiṇa it is said: “One who is learning the white kasiṇa apprehends the sign in white, either in a flower or in a cloth or in a colour element.” So firstly, when someone has merit, having had previous practice, the sign arises in him when he sees a flowering bush of such a kind or vassikasumana flowers, etc., spread out, or a heap of white lotuses or lilies, white cloth or colour element; and it also arises in a tin disk, a silver disk, and the moon’s disk.
Anyone else should make a kasiṇa, in the way already described for the blue kasiṇa, with the white flowers already mentioned, or with cloth or colour element. He should bring it to mind as “white, white.”
The rest is as before.
Of the light kasiṇa it is said: “One who is learning the light kasiṇa apprehends the sign in light in a hole in a wall, or in a keyhole, or in a window opening.” So firstly, when someone has merit, having had previous practice, the sign arises in him when he sees the circle thrown on a wall or a floor by sunlight or moonlight entering through a hole in a wall, etc., or when he sees a circle thrown on the ground by sunlight or moonlight coming through a gap in the branches of a dense-leaved tree or through a gap in a hut made of closely packed branches.
Anyone else should use that same kind of circle of luminosity just described, developing it as “luminosity, luminosity” or “light, light.”
If he cannot do so, he can light a lamp inside a pot, close the pot’s mouth, make a hole in it and place it with the hole facing a wall.
The lamplight coming out of the hole throws a circle on the wall. He should develop that as “light, light.”
Here the learning sign is like the circle thrown on the wall or the ground.
The counterpart sign is like a compact bright cluster of lights.
The rest is as before.
This lasts longer than the other kinds.
Of the limited-space kasiṇa it is said: “One who is learning the space kasiṇa apprehends the sign in a hole in a wall, or in a keyhole, or in a window opening.” So firstly, when someone has merit, having had previous practice, the sign arises in him when he sees any such gap as a hole in a wall.
Anyone else should make a hole a span and four fingers broad in a well- thatched hut, or in a piece of leather, or in a rush mat, and so on. He should develop one of these, or a hole such as a hole in a wall, as “space, space.”
Here the learning sign resembles the hole together with the wall, etc., that surrounds it. Attempts to extend it fail.
The counterpart sign appears only as a circle of space. Attempts to extend it succeed.
The rest should be understood as described under the earth kasiṇa.5
He with Ten Powers, ten kasiṇas,
Tells. who all things did see, each of which can be
The cause of fourfold and of fivefold jhāna, The fine-material sphere’s own master key.
To tackle each and
how they are developed, Now, knowing their descriptions and the way
with its special part to play.
Study, each. There are some further points that will repay
Of these, the earth kasiṇa is the basis for such powers as the state described as “Having been one, he becomes many” , etc., and stepping or standing or sitting on space or on water by creating earth, and the acquisition of the bases of mastery by the limited and measureless method.
The water kasiṇa is the basis for such powers as diving in and out of the earth , causing rain, storms, creating rivers and seas, making the earth and rocks and palaces quake .
The fire kasiṇa is the basis for such powers as smoking, flaming, causing showers of sparks, countering fire with fire, ability to burn only what one wants to burn , causing light for the purpose of seeing visible objects with the divine eye, burning up the body by means of the fire element at the time of attaining Nibbāna .
The air kasiṇa is the basis for such powers as going with the speed of the wind, causing wind storms.
The blue kasiṇa is the basis for such powers as creating black forms, causing darkness, acquisition of the bases of mastery by the method of fairness and ugliness, and attainment of the liberation by the beautiful 
The yellow kasiṇa is the basis for such powers as creating yellow forms, resolving that something shall be gold , acquisition of the bases of mastery in the way stated, and attainment of the liberation by the beautiful.
The red kasiṇa is the basis for such powers as creating red forms, acquisition of the bases of mastery in the way stated, and attainment of the liberation by the beautiful.
The white kasiṇa is the basis for such powers as creating white forms, banishing stiffness and torpor, dispelling darkness, causing light for the purpose of seeing visible objects with the divine eye.
The light kasiṇa is the basis for such powers as creating luminous forms, banishing stiffness and torpor, dispelling darkness, causing light for the purpose of seeing visible objects with the divine eye.
The space kasiṇa is the basis for such powers as revealing the hidden, maintaining postures inside the earth and rocks by creating space inside them, travelling unobstructed through walls, and so on.
The classification “above, below, around, exclusive, measureless” applies to all kasiṇas;
Herein, above is upwards towards the sky’s level.
Below is downwards towards the earth’s level.
Around is marked off all around like the perimeter of a field.
For one extends a kasiṇa upwards only, another downwards, another all round;
Hence “above, below, around” is said.
The word exclusive, however, shows that anyone such state has nothing to do with any other.
Just as there is water and nothing else in all directions for one who is actually in water, so too, the earth kasiṇa is the earth kasiṇa only; it has nothing in common with any other kasiṇa.
Similarly in each instance.
Measureless means measureless intentness.
He is intent upon the entirety with his mind,
No kasiṇa can be developed by any living being described as follows: “Beings hindered by kamma, by defilement or by kamma-result, who lack faith, zeal and understanding, will be incapable of entering into the certainty of rightness in profitable states” .
Herein, the words hindered by kamma refer to those who possess bad kamma entailing immediate effect on rebirth.6
By kamma-result: who have had a rebirth- linking with no profitable root-cause or with only two profitable root-causes.
Lack faith: are destitute of faith in the Buddha, Dhamma and Sangha.
Zeal: are destitute of zeal for the unopposed way.
Understanding: are destitute of mundane and supramundane right view.
Will be incapable of entering into the certainty of rightness in profitable states means that they are incapable of entering into the noble path called “certainty” and “rightness in profitable states.”
And this does not apply only to kasiṇas; for none of them will succeed in developing any meditation subject at all.
So the task of devotion to a meditation subject must be undertaken by a clansman who has no hindrance by kamma- result, who shuns hindrance by kamma and by defilement, and who fosters faith, zeal and understanding by listening to the Dhamma, frequenting good men, and so on.
in the Path of Purification composed for the purpose of gladdening good people.
in the Treatise on the Development of Concentration
for this is said: “He perceives the earth kasiṇa
or for some reason another projects it thus
above, below, around, exclusive, measureless” , and so on.
as one who wants to see visible objects with the divine eye projects light.
taking no measurements in this way: “This is its beginning, this is its middle.”
By defilement: who have fixed wrong view7 or are hermaphrodites or eunuchs.
The fifth chapter
called “The Description of the Remaining Kasiṇas”
The attainment of the immaterial states is not produced by means of the space kasiṇa, and with the words ‘ending with the white kasiṇa’ the light kasiṇa is included in the white kasiṇa.
Now, ten kinds of foulness, as corpses without consciousness, were listed next after the kasiṇas thus: the bloated, the livid, the festering, the cut up, the gnawed, the scattered, the hacked and scattered, the bleeding, the worm infested, a skeleton . The bloated: it is bloated because bloated by gradual dilation and swelling after the close of life, as a bellows is with wind. What is bloated is the same as “the bloated” .
Or alternatively, what is bloated is vile because of repulsiveness, thus it is “the bloated” .
This is a term for a corpse in that particular state.
The livid: what has patchy discolouration is called livid . What is livid is the same as “the livid” .
Or alternatively, what is livid is vile because of repulsiveness, thus it is “the livid” .1
The festering: what is trickling with pus in broken places is festering . What is festering is the same as “the festering” .
Or alternatively, what is festering is vile because of repulsiveness, thus it is “the festering” .
This is a term for a corpse in that particular state.
The cut up: what has been opened up2 by cutting it in two is called cut up . What is cut up is the same as “the cut up” .
Or alternatively, what is cut up is vile because of repulsiveness, thus it is “the cut up” .
This is a term for a corpse cut in the middle.
The gnawed: what has been chewed here and there in various ways by dogs, jackals, etc., is what is gnawed . What is gnawed is the same as “the gnawed” .
Or alternatively, what is gnawed is vile because of repulsiveness, thus it is “the gnawed” .
This is a term for a corpse in that particular state.
The scattered: what is strewed about is scattered . What is scattered is the same as “the scattered” .
Or alternatively, what is scattered is vile because of repulsiveness, thus it is “the scattered” .
This is a term for a corpse that is strewed here and there in this way: “Here a hand, there a foot, there the head” .
The hacked and scattered: it is hacked, and it is scattered in the way just described, thus it is “hacked and scattered” .
This is a term for a corpse scattered in the way just described after it has been hacked with a knife in a crow’s-foot pattern on every limb.
The bleeding: it sprinkles , scatters, blood , and it trickles here and there, thus it is “the bleeding” .
This is a term for a corpse smeared with trickling blood.
The worm-infested: it is maggots that are called worms ; it sprinkles worms , thus it is worm-infested .
This is a term for a corpse full of maggots.
A skeleton: bone is the same as skeleton .
Or alternatively, bone is vile because of repulsiveness, thus it is a skeleton .
This is a term both for a single bone and for a framework of bones.
These names are also used both for the signs that arise with the bloated, etc., as their support, and for the jhānas obtained in the signs.
This is a term for a corpse that is reddish-coloured in places where flesh is prominent, whitish-coloured in places where pus has collected, but mostly blue-black , as if draped with blue-black cloth in the blue-black places.
Herein, when a meditator wants to develop the jhāna called “of the bloated” by arousing the sign of the bloated on a bloated body, he should in the way already described approach a teacher of the kind mentioned under the earth kasiṇa and learn the meditation subject from him.
In explaining the meditation subject to him, the teacher should explain it all, that is, the directions for going with the aim of acquiring the sign of foulness, the characterizing of the surrounding signs, the eleven ways of apprehending the sign, the reviewing of the path gone by and come by, concluding with the directions for absorption.
And when the meditator has learnt it all well, he should go to an abode of the kind already described and live there while seeking the sign of the bloated.
Meanwhile, when he hears people saying that at some village gate or on some road or at some forest’s edge or at the base of some rock or at the root of some tree or on some charnel ground a bloated corpse is lying, he should not go there at once, like one who plunges into a river where there is no ford.
Why not?
Because this foulness is beset by wild beasts and non-human beings,
Or perhaps the way to it goes by a village gate or a bathing place or an irrigated field,
and there a visible object of the opposite sex might come into focus. Or perhaps the body is of the opposite sex;
But if he judges himself thus, “This is not difficult for one like me,” then he can go there.
And when he goes, he should do so only after he has spoken to the senior elder of the Community or to some well-known bhikkhu.
Why?
Because if all his limbs are seized with shuddering at the charnel ground, or if his gorge rises when he is confronted with disagreeable objects such as the visible forms and sounds of non-human beings, lions, tigers, etc., or something else afflicts him,
Besides, robbers may meet there thinking a charnel ground a safe place for them whether or not they have done anything wrong.
And when men chase them, they drop their goods near the bhikkhu and run away.
Perhaps the men seize the bhikkhu, saying “We have found the thief with the goods,” and bully him.
Then he whom he told will explain to the men “Do not bully him; he went to do this special work after telling me,” and he will rescue him.
This is the advantage of going only after informing someone.
Therefore he should inform a bhikkhu of the kind described and then set out eager to see the sign, and as happy and joyful as a warrior-noble on his way to the scene of anointing, as one going to offer libations at the hall of sacrifice, or as a pauper on his way to unearth a hidden treasure. And he should go there in the way advised by the Commentaries.
For this is said:
“One who is learning the bloated sign of foulness goes alone with no companion, with unremitting mindfulness established, with his sense faculties turned inwards, with his mind not turned outwards, reviewing the path gone by and come by.
In the place where the bloated sign of foulness has been left he notes any stone or termite-mound or tree or bush or creeper there each with its particular sign and in relation to the object.
When he has done this, he characterizes the bloated sign of foulness by the fact of its having attained that particular individual essence. by its colour, by its mark, by its shape, by its direction, by its location, by its delimitation, by its joints, by its openings, by its concavities, by its convexities, and all round.
“When he has properly apprehended the sign, properly remembered it, properly defined it, he goes alone with no companion, with unremitting mindfulness established, with his sense faculties turned inwards, with his mind not turned outwards, reviewing the path gone by and come by.
When he walks, he resolves that his walk is oriented towards it;
“What is the purpose, what is the advantage of characterizing the surrounding signs?
Characterizing the surrounding signs has non-delusion for its purpose, it has non-delusion for its advantage.
What is the purpose, what is the advantage of apprehending the sign in the other eleven ways?
Apprehending the sign in the other eleven ways has anchoring the mind for its purpose, it has anchoring the mind for its advantage.
What is the purpose, what is the advantage of reviewing the path gone by and come by?
Reviewing the path gone by and come by has keeping the mind on the track for its purpose, it has keeping the mind on the track for its advantage.
“When he has established reverence for it by seeing its advantages and by perceiving it as a treasure and so come to love it, he anchors his mind upon that object: ‘Surely in this way I shall be liberated from ageing and death.’
Quite secluded from sense desires, secluded from unprofitable things he enters upon and dwells in the first jhāna … seclusion.
He has arrived at the first jhāna of the fine-material sphere. His is a heavenly abiding and an instance of the meritorious action consisting in meditative development.” 
So if he goes to the charnel ground to test his control of mind, let him do so after striking the gong or summoning a chapter.
If he goes there mainly for developing that meditation subject, let him go alone with no companion, without renouncing his basic meditation subject and keeping it always in mind, taking a walking stick or a staff to keep off attacks by dogs, etc., ensuring unremitting mindfulness by establishing it well, with his mind not turned outwards because he has ensured that his faculties, of which his mind is the sixth, are turned inwards.
As he goes out of the monastery he should note the gate: “I have gone out in such a direction by such a gate.”
And he should not approach it upwind;
So instead of approaching it upwind, he should go downwind.
If he cannot go by a downwind path—if there is a mountain or a ravine or a rock or a fence or a patch of thorns or water or a bog in the way—then he should go stopping his nose with the corner of his robe.
These are the duties in going.
When he has gone there in this way, he should not at once look at the sign of foulness;
For perhaps if he stands in a certain direction, the object does not appear clearly to him and his mind is not wieldy.
So rather than there he should stand where the object appears clearly and his mind is wieldy.
And he should avoid standing to leeward or to windward of it.
For if he stands to leeward he is bothered by the corpse smell and his mind strays;
and if he stands to windward and non-human beings are dwelling there, they may get annoyed and do him a mischief.
So he should move round a little and not stand too much to windward.
Then he should stand not too far off or too near, or too much towards the feet or the head.
For if he stands too far off, the object is not clear to him,
If he stands too much towards the feet or the head, not all the foulness becomes manifest to him equally.
So he should stand not too far off or too near, opposite the middle of the body, in a place convenient for him to look at it.
Then he should characterize the surrounding signs in the way stated thus: “In the place where the bloated sign of foulness has been left he notes any stone … or creeper there with its sign” .
These are the directions for characterizing them. If there is a rock in the eye’s focus near the sign, he should define it in this way: “This rock is high or low, small or large, brown or black or white, long or round,”
If there is a termite-mound, he should define it in this way: “This is high or low, small or large, brown or black or white, long or round,”
If there is a tree, he should define it in this way: “This is a pipal fig tree or a banyan fig tree or a kacchaka fig tree or a kapittha fig tree; it is tall or short, small or large, black or white,”
If there is a bush, he should define it in this way: “This is a sindi bush or a karamanda bush or a kaṇavīra bush or a koraṇḍaka bush; it is tall or short, small or large,”
If there is a creeper, he should define it in this way: “This is a pumpkin creeper or a gourd creeper or a brown creeper or a black creeper or a stinking creeper,”
Also with its particular sign and in relation to the object was said ; but that is included by what has just been said;
Having done this, again he should bring to mind the fact that it has an individual essence, its own state of being bloated, which is not common to anything else, since it was said that he defines4 it by the fact of its having attained that particular individual essence.
The meaning is that it should be defined according to individual essence, according to its own nature, as “the inflated,5 the bloated.”
Having defined it in this way, he should apprehend the sign in the following six ways, that is to say, by its colour, by its mark, by its shape, by its direction, by its location, by its delimitation.
How?
The meditator should define it by its colour thus: “This is the body of one who is black or white or yellow-skinned.”
Instead of defining it by the female mark or the male mark, he should define it by its mark thus: “This is the body of one who was in the first phase of life, in the middle phase, in the last phase.”
By its shape: he should define it only by the shape of the bloated thus: “This is the shape of its head, this is the shape of its neck, this is the shape of its hand, this is the shape of its chest, this is the shape of its belly, this is the shape of its navel, this is the shape of its hips, this is the shape of its thigh, this is the shape of its calf, this is the shape of its foot.”
He should define it by its direction thus: “There are two directions in this body, that is, down from the navel as the lower direction, and up from it as the upper direction.”
He should define it by its location thus: “The hand is in this location, the foot in this, the head in this, the middle of the body in this.”
He should define it by its delimitation thus: “This body is delimited below by the soles of the feet, above by the tips of the hair, all round by the skin; the space so delimited is filled up with thirty-two pieces of corpse.”
However, a female body is not appropriate for a man or a male one for a woman;
To quote the Majjhima Commentary: “Even when decaying,7 a woman invades a man’s mind and stays there.”
But when a clansman has cultivated the meditation subject under former Enlightened Ones, kept the ascetic practices, threshed out the great primary elements, discerned formations, defined mentality-materiality, eliminated the perception of a being, done the ascetic’s duties, lived the moral life, and developed the development, when he contains the seed of turning away from formations, and has mature knowledge and little defilement, then the counterpart sign appears to him in the place while he keeps looking.
If it does not appear in that way, then it appears to him as he is apprehending the sign in the six ways.
But if it does not appear to him even then, he should apprehend the sign again in five more ways: by its joints, by its openings, by its concavities, by its convexities, and all round.
Herein, by its joints is properly by its hundred and eighty joints.
But how can he define the hundred and eighty joints in the bloated?
Consequently he can define it by its fourteen major joints thus: Three joints in the right arm, three in the left arm, three in the right leg, three in the left leg, one neck joint, one waist joint.
By its openings: an “opening” is the hollow between the arm and the side, the hollow between the legs, the hollow of the stomach, the hollow of the ear. He should define it by its openings in this way.
Or alternatively, the opened or closed state of the eyes and the opened or closed state of the mouth can be defined.
By its concavities: he should define any concave place on the body such as the eye sockets or the inside of the mouth or the base of the neck.
Or he can define it thus: “I am standing in a concave place, the body is in a convex place.”
By its convexities: he should define any raised place on the body such as the knee or the chest or the forehead.
Or he can define it thus: “I am standing in a convex place, the body is in a concave place.”
All round: the whole body should be defined all round.
After working over the whole body with knowledge, he should establish his mind thus, “The bloated, the bloated,” upon any part that appears clearly to him.
If it has not appeared even yet, and if there is special intensity of the bloatedness in the belly,8 he should establish his mind thus, “The bloated, the bloated,” on that.
Now, as to the words, he sees that the sign is properly apprehended, etc., the explanation is this.
The meditator should apprehend the sign thoroughly in that body in the way of apprehending the sign already described.
He should advert to it with well-established mindfulness.
He should see that it is properly remembered, properly defined, by doing that again and again.
Standing in a place not too far from and not too near to the body, he should open his eyes, look and apprehend the sign.
He should open his eyes and look a hundred times, a thousand times, thinking, “Repulsiveness of the bloated, repulsiveness of the bloated,” and he should close his eyes and advert to it.
As he does so again and again, the learning sign becomes properly apprehended by him.
When is it properly apprehended?
When it comes into focus alike whether he opens his eyes and looks or closes his eyes and adverts, then it is called properly apprehended.
When he has thus properly apprehended the sign, properly remembered it, and properly defined it, then if he is unable to conclude his development on the spot, he can go to his own lodging, alone, in the same way as described of his coming, with no companion, keeping that same meditation subject in mind, with mindfulness well established, and with his mind not turned outwards owing to his faculties being turned inwards.
As he leaves the charnel ground he should define the path he comes back by thus: “The path by which I have left goes in an easterly direction, westerly … northerly … southerly direction,” or “It goes in an intermediate direction”;
or “In this place it goes to the left, in this place to the right”; and “In this place there is a stone, in this a termite-mound, in this a tree, in this a bush, in this a creeper.” 54.When he has defined the path he has come back by and when, once back, he is walking up and down, he should see that his walk is oriented towards it too; the meaning is that he should walk up and down on a piece of ground that faces in the direction of the sign of foulness.
And when he sits, he should prepare a seat oriented towards it too.
But if there is a bog or a ravine or a tree or a fence or a swamp in that direction, if he cannot walk up and down on a piece of ground facing in that direction, if he cannot prepare his seat thus because there is no room for it,
Now, as to the questions beginning with what is the purpose … characterizing the surrounding signs?
The intention of the answer that begins with the words, has non-delusion for its purpose, is this: If someone goes at the wrong time to the place where the sign of the bloated is, and opens his eyes for the purpose of apprehending the sign by characterizing the surrounding signs, then as soon as he looks the dead body appears as if it were standing up and threatening9 and pursuing him, and when he sees the hideous and fearful object, his mind reels, he is like one demented, gripped by panic, fear and terror, and his hair stands on end.
For among the thirty-eight meditation subjects expounded in the texts no object is so frightening as this one.
There are some who lose jhāna in this meditation subject.
Why?
Because it is so frightening.
So the meditator must stand firm. Establishing his mindfulness well, he should remove his fears in this way: “No dead body gets up and pursues one.
If that stone or that creeper close to it were to come, the body might come too;
Its appearance to you in this way is born: of your perception, created by your perception. Today your meditation subject has appeared to you. Do not be afraid, bhikkhu.” He should laugh it off and direct his mind to the sign.
In that way he will arrive at distinction.
The words “Characterizing the surrounding signs has non-delusion for its purpose” are said on this account.
To succeed in apprehending the sign in the eleven ways is to anchor the meditation subject.
For the opening of his eyes and looking conditions the arising of the learning sign;
When he is sure of absorption, he works up insight and realizes Arahantship.
Hence it was said: apprehending the sign in the other eleven ways has anchoring the mind for its purpose.
The reviewing of the path gone by and come by has keeping the mind on the track for its purpose: the meaning is that the reviewing of the path gone by and of the path come back by mentioned is for the purpose of keeping properly to the track of the meditation subject.
For if this bhikkhu is going along with his meditation subject and people on the way ask him about the day, “What is today, venerable sir? ” or they ask him some question about Dhamma, or they welcome him, he ought not to go on in silence, thinking “I have a meditation subject.”
The day must be told, the question must be answered,
As he does so, the newly acquired sign vanishes.
But even if it does vanish, he should still tell the day when asked;
Also reception of visitors must be attended to on seeing a visiting bhikkhu,
And the newly acquired sign vanishes while he is carrying out these too. When he wants to go again, thinking “I shall go and take up the sign,” he finds he cannot go to the charnel ground because it has been invaded by non-human beings or by wild beasts, or the sign has disappeared.
For a bloated corpse only lasts one or two days and then turns into a livid corpse.
Of all the meditation subjects there is none so hard to come by as this.
So when the sign has vanished in this way, the bhikkhu should sit down in his night quarters or in his day quarters and first of all review the path gone by and come by up to the place where he is actually sitting cross-legged, doing it in this way: “I went out of the monastery by this gate, I took a path leading in such and such a direction, I turned left at such and such a place, I turned right at such and such a place,
in one part of it there was a stone, in another a termite-mound or a tree or a bush or a creeper;
As he reviews it in this way, the sign becomes evident and appears as if placed in front of him;
Hence it was said: the reviewing of the path gone by and come by has keeping the mind on the track for its purpose.
Now, as to the words, when he has established reverence for it by seeing its advantages and by perceiving it as a treasure and so come to love it, he anchors the mind on that object: here, having gained jhāna by exercising his mind on the repulsiveness in the bloated, he should increase insight with the jhāna as its proximate cause, and then he should see the advantages in this way: “Surely in this way I shall be liberated from ageing and death.”
Just as a pauper who acquired a treasure of gems would guard and love it with great affection, feeling reverence for it as one who appreciates the value of it, “I have got what is hard indeed to get! ” so too this bhikkhu “I have got this meditation subject, which is indeed as hard to get as a very valuable treasure is for a pauper to get.
For one whose meditation subject is the four elements discerns the four primary elements in himself, one whose meditation subject is breathing discerns the wind in his own nostrils, and one whose meditation subject is a kasiṇa makes a kasiṇa and develops it at his ease, so these other meditation subjects are easily got.
But this one lasts only one, or two days, after which it turns into a livid corpse. There is none harder to get than this one.” - should guard the sign, loving it and feeling reverence for it as one who appreciates the value of it.
In his night quarters and in his day quarters he should keep his mind anchored there thus, “Repulsiveness of the bloated, repulsiveness of the bloated.”
As he does so, the counterpart sign arises.
Here is the difference between the two signs. The learning sign appears as a hideous, dreadful and frightening sight;
but the counterpart sign appears like a man with big limbs lying down after eating his fill.
Simultaneously with his acquiring the counterpart sign, his lust is abandoned by suppression owing to his giving no attention externally to sense desires as object.
And owing to his abandoning of approval, ill will is abandoned too, as pus is with the abandoning of blood.
Likewise stiffness and torpor are abandoned through exertion of energy, agitation and worry are abandoned through devotion to peaceful things that cause no remorse; and uncertainty about the Master who teaches the way, about the way, and about the fruit of the way, is abandoned through the actual experience of the distinction attained. So the five hindrances are abandoned.
And there are present applied thought with the characteristic of directing the mind on to that same sign, and sustained thought accomplishing the function of pressing on the sign, and happiness due to the acquisition of distinction, and tranquillity due to the production of tranquillity in one whose mind is happy, and bliss with that tranquillity as its sign, and unification that has bliss as its sign due to the production of concentration in one whose mind is blissful. So the jhāna factors become manifest.
Thus access, which is the obverse of the first jhāna, is produced in him too at that same moment.
All after that up to absorption in the first jhāna and mastery in it should be understood as described under the earth kasiṇa.
and he might risk his life there.
for a female body is unsuitable for a man, and a male body for a woman. If only recently dead, it may even look beautiful; hence there might be danger to the life of purity.
then he whom he told will have his bowl and robe well looked after in the monastery,
or he will care for him by sending young bhikkhus or novices to him.
when he sits, he prepares a seat that is oriented towards it.
Then he sees that the sign is properly apprehended, that it is properly remembered, that it is properly defined .
After that he should define the path by which he goes: “This path goes in an easterly direction … westerly … northerly … southerly direction” or “It goes in an intermediate direction”;
and “In this place it goes to the left, in this place to the right”; and “In this place there is a stone, in this a termite- mound, in this a tree, in this a bush, in this a creeper.”
He should go to the place where the sign is, defining in this way the path by which he goes.
for if he did so and the smell of corpses assailed his nose, his brain3 might get upset, or he might throw up his food, or he might repent his coming, thinking “What a place of corpses I have come to!”
he should make sure of the direction.
and if he stands too near, he may get frightened.
after which he should observe the relative positions thus: “In this place, this is a rock, this is the sign of foulness; this is the sign of foulness, this is a rock.”
after which he should observe the relative positions thus: “In this place, this is a termite- mound, this is the sign of foulness.”
after which he should observe the relative positions thus: “In this place, this is a tree, this is the sign of foulness.”
after which he should observe the relative positions thus: “In this place, this is a bush, this is the sign of foulness.”
after which he should observe the relative positions thus: “In this place, this is a creeper, this is the sign of foulness; this is the sign of foulness, this is a creeper.”
for he “characterizes it with its particular sign” when he defines it again and again,
and he “characterizes it in relation to the object” when he defines it by combining it each time in pairs thus: “This is a rock, this is the sign of foulness; this is the sign of foulness, this is a rock.”
Or alternatively, he can define it thus: “I am standing in this direction; the sign of foulness is in that direction.”
Or alternatively, he can define it thus: “I am in this location; the sign of foulness is in that.”
Or alternatively, he can define it thus: “This is the delimitation of its hand, this is the delimitation of its foot, this is the delimitation of its head, this is the delimitation of the middle part of its body.”
Or alternatively, he can delimit as much of it as he has apprehended thus: “Just this much of the bloated is like this.”
for the object, namely, the repulsive aspect, does not make its appearance in a body of the opposite sex, which merely becomes a condition for the wrong kind of excitement.6
That is why the sign should be apprehended in the six ways only in a body of the same sex.
but he should turn his mind in that direction.
then he can both walk up and down and sit in a place where there is room, even though it does not face that way;
but since that stone or that creeper does not come, the body will not come either.
and as he exercises his mind on that the counterpart sign arises;
and as he exercises his mind on that he reaches absorption.
even by saying “I do not know” if he does not know,
a legitimate welcome must be responded to.
if he does not know the answer to the question, he should still say “I do not know,”
and if he does know it, he should explain it surely;10 and he must respond to a welcome.
and all the remaining duties in the Khandhakas must be carried out too, that is, the duties of the shrine terrace, the duties of the Bodhi-tree terrace, the duties of the Uposatha house, the duties of the refectory and the bath house, and those to the teacher, the preceptor, visitors, departing bhikkhus, and the rest.
having gone by that path, I saw the foulness in such and such a place,
I stood there facing in such and such a direction and observed such and such surrounding signs, I apprehended the sign of foulness in this way; I left the charnel ground in such and such a direction, I came back by such and such a path doing this and this, and I am now sitting here.”
the meditation subject rides in its track as it did before.
and strike at it with thought and applied thought over and over again.
And he should advert to the sign, bring it to mind
the meaning is, it becomes the sign for interference by defilement
As regards the livid and the rest: the characterizing already described, starting with the going in the way beginning “One who is learning the bloated sign of foulness goes alone with no companion, with unremitting mindfulness established” , should all be understood with its exposition and intention, substituting for the word “bloated” the appropriate word in each case thus: “One who is learning the livid sign of foulness …”, “One who is learning the festering sign of foulness …”
But the differences are as follows. 70. The livid should be brought to mind as “Repulsiveness of the livid, repulsiveness of the livid.”
The festering should be brought to mind as “Repulsiveness of the festering, repulsiveness of the festering.”
The cut up is found on a battlefield or in a robbers’ forest or on a charnel ground where kings have robbers cut up
So, if when he goes there, it comes into focus at one adverting although lying in different places, that is good.
If not, then he should not touch it with his own hand;
If he cannot find anyone to do it, he should put it together with a walking stick or a staff in such a way that there is only a finger’s breadth separating the parts.
Having put it together thus, he should bring it to mind as “Repulsiveness of the cut up, repulsiveness of the cut up.”
The gnawed should be brought to mind as “Repulsiveness of the gnawed, repulsiveness of the gnawed.”
After getting the scattered put together or putting it together in the way described under the cut up so that there is only a finger’s breadth, separating the pieces, it should be brought to mind as “Repulsiveness of the scattered, repulsiveness of the scattered.”
The hacked and scattered is found in the same places as those described under the cut up.
Therefore, after going there and getting it put together or putting it together in the way described under the cut up so that there is only a finger’s breadth separating the pieces, it should be brought to mind as “Repulsiveness of the hacked and scattered, repulsiveness of the hacked and scattered.”
The bleeding is found at the time when blood is trickling from the openings of wounds received on battlefields, etc., or from the openings of burst boils and abscesses when the hands and feet have been cut off.
So on seeing that, it should be brought to mind as “Repulsiveness of the bleeding, repulsiveness of the bleeding.”
There is a worm-infested corpse when at the end of two or three days a mass of maggots oozes out from the corpse’s nine orifices,
It can be brought to mind with respect to anyone of these as “Repulsiveness of the worm-infested, repulsiveness of the worm-infested.”
Here the learning sign appears as though moving;
A skeleton is described in various aspects in the way beginning “As though he were looking at a corpse thrown onto a charnel ground, a skeleton with flesh and blood, held together by sinews” .
So he should go in the way already described to where it has been put, and noticing any stones, etc., with their surrounding signs and in relation, to the object, he should characterize it by the fact of its having attained that particular individual essence thus, “This is a skeleton,” and he should apprehend the sign in the eleven ways by colour and the rest.
But if he looks at it, apprehending it only by its colour as white, it does not appear to him with its individual essence as repulsive, but only as a variant of the white kasiṇa.
Consequently he should only look at it as ‘a skeleton’ in the repulsive aspect.
“Mark” is a term for the hand, etc., here,
He should define it by its shape, however, according as it is long, short, square, round, small or large.
By its direction and by its location are as already described .
Having defined it by its delimitation according to the periphery of each bone, he should reach absorption by apprehending whichever appears most evident to him.
But it can also be defined by its concavities and by its convexities according to the concave and convex places in each bone.
And it can also be defined by position thus: “I am standing in a concave place, the skeleton is in a convex place; or I am standing in a convex place, the skeleton is in a concave place.”
It should be defined by its joints according as any two bones are joined together.
It should be defined all round by directing knowledge to it comprehensively thus: “In this place there is this skeleton.”
And in this case, just as in the case of those that precede it beginning with the worm-infested, the apprehending of the sign should be observed in this elevenfold manner as appropriate.
This meditation subject is successful with a whole skeleton frame and even with a single bone as well.
So having learnt the sign in anyone of these in the eleven ways, he should bring it to mind as “Repulsiveness of a skeleton, repulsiveness of a skeleton.”
Here the learning sign and the counterpart sign are alike, so it is said. That is correct for a single bone.
But when the learning sign becomes manifest in a skeleton frame, what is correct to say is that there are gaps in the learning sign
And the learning sign even in a single bone should be dreadful and terrifying
What is said in the Commentaries in this context allows that deduction.
For there, after saying this, “There is no counterpart sign in the four divine abidings and in the ten kinds of foulness;
The learning sign appears hideous, dreadful and terrifying,” and so on.
So what we said was well considered. And it is only this that is correct here.
Besides, the appearance of a woman’s whole body as a collection of bones to the Elder Mahā-Tissa through his merely looking at her teeth demonstrates this here .
The Divine Ruler with ten hundred eyes Did him , fair in fame, This foulness of ten species in such wise.
with the Ten Powers eulogize, Who made known as cause of jhāna
To tackle each and how they are developed, Now, knowing their description and the way
There are some further points that will repay Study, each with its special part to play.
Here the learning sign appears blotchy-coloured;
but the counterpart sign’s appearance has the colour which is most prevalent.
Here the learning sign appears as though trickling;
but the counterpart sign appears motionless and quiet.
or in the jungle in a place where men are torn up by lions and tigers.
for by doing so he would become familiar with it.11
He should get a monastery attendant or one studying to become an ascetic or someone else to put it together in one place.
Herein, the learning sign appears as though cut in the middle;
but the counterpart sign appears whole.
Here the learning sign appears as though gnawed here and there;
but the counterpart sign appears whole.
Here the learning sign appears with the gaps evident;
but the counterpart sign appears whole.
Here, when the learning sign becomes evident, it does so with the fissures of the wounds;
but the counterpart sign appears whole.
Here the learning sign appears to have the aspect of moving like a red banner struck by wind;
but the counterpart sign appears quiet.
and the mass lies there like a heap of paddy or boiled rice as big as the body, whether the body is that of a dog, a jackal, a human being,12 an ox, a buffalo, an elephant, a horse, a python, or what you will.
For the sign arose for the Elder Cūḷa-Piṇḍapātika-Tissa in the corpse of an elephant’s carcass in the Kāḷadīghavāpi reservoir.
but the counterpart sign appears quiet, like a ball of boiled rice.
so he should define it by its mark according to hand, foot, head, chest, arm, waist, thigh, and shin.
It should be defined by its openings according to the gaps separating the bones.
If the sign does not arise even in this way, then the mind should be established on the frontal bone.
while the counterpart sign appears whole.
but the counterpart sign produces happiness and joy because it brings access.
and in the case of the ten kinds of foulness the sign comes into being as soon as the repulsiveness is seen, without any thinking about it,” it is again said, immediately next: “Here the sign is twofold: the learning sign and the counterpart sign.
for in the case of the divine abidings the sign is the breaking down of boundaries itself,
He would come to handle it without disgust as a corpse-burner would
One who has reached jhāna in anyone of these goes free from cupidity; he resembles an Arahant without greed because his greed has been well suppressed.
At the same time, however, this classification of foulness should be understood as stated in accordance with the particular individual essences successively reached by the dead body and also in accordance with the particular subdivisions of the greedy temperament.
When a corpse has entered upon the repulsive state, it may have reached the individual essence of the bloated or anyone of the individual essences beginning with that of the livid.
So the sign should be apprehended as “Repulsiveness of the bloated,” “Repulsiveness of the livid,” according to whichever he has been able to find. This, it should be understood, is how the classification of foulness comes to be tenfold with the body’s arrival at each particular individual essence.
And individually the bloated suits one who is greedy about shape since it makes evident the disfigurement of the body’s shape.
The livid suits one who is greedy about the body’s colour since it makes evident the disfigurement of the skin’s colour.
The festering suits one who is greedy about the smell of the body aroused by scents, perfumes, etc., since it makes evident the evil smells connected with this sore, the body.
The cut up suits one who is greedy about compactness in the body since it makes evident the hollowness inside it.
The gnawed suits one who is greedy about accumulation of flesh in such parts of the body as the breasts since it makes it evident how a fine accumulation of flesh comes to nothing.
The scattered suits one who is greedy about the grace of the limbs since it makes it evident how limbs can be scattered.
The hacked and scattered suits one who is greedy about a fine body as a whole since it makes evident the disintegration and alteration of the body as a whole.
The bleeding suits one who is greedy about elegance produced by ornaments since it makes evident its repulsiveness when smeared with blood.
The worm-infested suits one who is greedy about ownership of the body since it makes it evident how the body is shared with many families of worms.
This, it should be understood, is how the classification of foulness comes to be tenfold according to the subdivisions of the greedy temperament. 86.But as regards the tenfold foulness, just as it is only by virtue of its rudder that a boat keeps steady in a river with turbulent13 waters and a rapid current, and it cannot be steadied without a rudder, so too here, owing to the weak hold on the object, consciousness when unified only keeps steady by virtue of applied thought, and it cannot be steadied without applied thought, which is why there is only the first jhāna here, not the second and the rest.
And repulsive as this object is, still it arouses joy and happiness in him by his seeing its advantages thus, “Surely in this way I shall be liberated from ageing and death,” and by his abandoning the hindrances’ oppression; just as a garbage heap does in a flower-scavenger by his seeing the advantages thus, “Now I shall get a high wage,” and as the workings of purges and emetics do in a man suffering the pains of sickness.
This foulness, while of ten kinds, has only one characteristic.
For though it is of ten kinds, nevertheless its characteristic is only its impure, stinking, disgusting and repulsive state .
And foulness appears with this characteristic not only in a dead body but also in a living one, as it did to the Elder Mahā-Tissa who lived at Cetiyapabbata , and to the novice attendant on the Elder Saṅgharakkhita while he was watching the king riding an elephant.
For a living body is just as foul as a dead one,
This is the body’s nature: it is a collection of over three hundred bones, jointed by one hundred and eighty joints, bound together by nine hundred sinews, plastered over with nine hundred pieces of flesh, enveloped in the moist inner skin, enclosed in the outer cuticle, with orifices here and there, constantly dribbling and trickling like a grease pot, inhabited by a community of worms, the home of disease, the basis of painful states, perpetually oozing from the nine orifices like a chronic open carbuncle,
which when untended with tooth sticks and mouth-washing and head-anointing and bathing and underclothing and dressing would, judged by the universal repulsiveness of the body, make even a king, if he wandered from village to village with his hair in its natural wild disorder, no different from a flower-scavenger or an outcaste or what you will. So there is no distinction between a king’s body and an outcaste’s in so far as its impure stinking nauseating repulsiveness is concerned.
But by rubbing out the stains on its teeth with tooth sticks and mouth- washing and all that, by concealing its private parts under several cloths, by daubing it with various scents and salves, by pranking it with nosegays and such things, it is worked up into a state that permits of its being taken as “I” and “mine.”
So men delight in women and women in men without perceiving the true nature of its characteristic foulness, now masked by this adventitious adornment.
But in the ultimate sense there is no place here even the size of an atom fit to lust after.
And then, when any such bits of it as head hairs, body hairs, nails, teeth, spittle, snot, excrement or urine have dropped off the body, beings will not touch them; they are ashamed, humiliated and disgusted.
But as long as anyone of these things remains in it, though it is just as repulsive, they take it as agreeable, desirable, permanent, pleasant, self, because they are wrapped in the murk of ignorance and dyed with affection and greed for self.
Taking it as they do, they resemble the old jackal who saw a flower not yet fallen from a kiṃsuka tree in a forest and yearned after it, thinking, “This is a piece of meat, it is a piece of meat.”
There was a jackal chanced to see A flowering kiṃsuka in a wood;
In haste he went to where it stood: “I have found a meat-bearing tree! ”
He chewed the blooms that fell, but could,
Of course, find nothing fit to eat; He took it thus: “Unlike the meat There on the tree, this is no good.”
A wise man will not think to treat As foul only the part that fell,
But treats as foul the part as well That in the body has its seat.
Fools cannot in their folly tell; Nor can escape its painful spell.
But since the wise have thus laid bare Be it alive or dead, they know
This filthy body’s nature, so, There is no beauty lurking there.
For this is said:
“This filthy body stinks outright Like ordure, like a privy’s site;
This body men that have insight Condemn, as object of a fool’s delight.
“A tumour where nine holes abide Wrapped in a coat of clammy hide
And trickling filth on every side, Polluting the air with stenches far and wide.
“If it perchance should come about That what is inside it came out,
Surely a man would need a knout With which to put the crows and dogs to rout.”
So a capable bhikkhu should apprehend the sign whether in a living body
in the Path of Purification composed for the purpose of gladdening good people.
in the Treatise on the Development of Concentration
A skeleton suits one who is greedy about fine teeth since it makes evident the repulsiveness of the bones in the body.
only the characteristic of foulness is not evident in a living body, being hidden by adventitious embellishments.
from both of whose eyes eye-filth trickles, from whose ears comes ear-filth, from whose nostrils snot, from whose mouth food and bile and phlegm and blood, from whose lower outlets excrement and urine, and from whose ninety-nine thousand pores the broth of stale sweat seeps,
with bluebottles and their like buzzing round it,
And soon get caught in Evil’s snare They take the body to be fair,
or in a dead one, wherever the aspect of foulness is manifest, and he should make the meditation subject reach absorption.
called “The Description of Foulness as a Meditation Subject”
The sixth chapter
One who wants to develop the recollection of virtue should go into solitary retreat and recollect his own different kinds of virtue in their special qualities of being untorn, etc., as follows: Indeed, my various kinds of virtue are “untorn, unrent, unblotched, unmottled, liberating, praised by the wise, not adhered to, and conducive to concentration” .
And a layman should recollect them in the form of laymen’s virtue while one gone forth into homelessness should recollect them in the form of the virtue of those gone forth.
Whether they are the virtues of laymen or of those gone forth, when no one of them is broken in the beginning or in the end, not being torn like a cloth ragged at the ends, then they are untorn.
When no one of them is broken in the middle, not being rent like a cloth that is punctured in the middle, then they are unrent.
When they are not broken twice or thrice in succession, not being blotched like a cow whose body is some such colour as black or red with discrepant-coloured oblong or round patch appearing on her back or belly, then they are unblotched.
When they are not broken all over at intervals, not being mottled like a cow speckled with discrepant-coloured spots, then they are unmottled.
Or in general they are untorn, unrent, unblotched, unmottled when they are undamaged by the seven bonds of sexuality and by anger and enmity and the other evil things .
Those same virtues are liberating since they liberate by freeing from the slavery of craving.
They are praised by the wise because they are praised by such wise men as Enlightened Ones.
They are not adhered to since they are not adhered to with craving and false view, or because of the impossibility of misapprehending that “There is this flaw in your virtues.”
As long as he recollects his own virtues in their special qualities of being untorn, etc., in this way, then: “On that occasion his mind is not obsessed by greed,
his mind has rectitude on that occasion, being inspired by virtue” . So when he has suppressed the hindrances in the way already described , the jhāna factors arise in a single conscious moment.
But owing to the profundity of the virtues’ special qualities, or owing to his being occupied in recollecting special qualities of many sorts, the jhāna is only access and does not reach absorption.
And that access jhāna itself is known as “recollection of virtue” too because it arises with the virtues’ special qualities as the means.
And when a bhikkhu is devoted to this recollection of virtue, he has respect for the training. He lives in communion with his fellows in the life of purity. He is sedulous in welcoming. He is devoid of the fear of self-reproach and so on. He sees fear in the slightest fault. He attains fullness of faith, and so on. He has much happiness and gladness.
And if he penetrates no higher, he is at least headed for a happy destiny.
Now, when a man is truly wise, His constant task will surely be
This recollection of his virtue Blessed with such mighty potency.
This is the section dealing with the recollection of virtue in the detailed explanation.
They are conducive to concentration since they conduce to access concentration and absorption concentration, or to path concentration and fruition concentration.
or obsessed by hate, or obsessed by delusion,
One who wants to develop the recollection of generosity should be naturally devoted to generosity and the constant practice of giving and sharing.
Or alternatively, if he is one who is starting the development of it, he should make the resolution: “From now on, when there is anyone present to receive, I shall not eat even a single mouthful without having given a gift.” And that very day he should give a gift by sharing according to his means and his ability with those who have distinguished qualities. When he has apprehended the sign in that, he should go into solitary retreat and recollect his own generosity in its special qualities of being free from the stain of avarice, etc., as follows: “It is gain for me, it is great gain for me, that in a generation obsessed by the stain of avarice I abide with my heart free from stain by avarice, and am freely generous and open-handed, that I delight in relinquishing, expect to be asked, and rejoice in giving and sharing” .
Herein, it is gain for me: it is my gain, advantage. The intention is: I surely partake of those kinds of gain for a giver that have been commended by the Blessed One as follows: “A man who gives life by giving food shall have life either divine or human” , and: “A giver is loved and frequented by many” , and: “One who gives is ever loved, according to the wise man’s law” , and so on.
It is great gain for me: it is great gain for me that this Dispensation, or the human state, has been gained by me.
Why?
Because of the fact that “I abide with my mind free from stain by avarice … and rejoice in giving and sharing.”
Herein, obsessed by the stain of avarice is overwhelmed by the stain of avarice.
Generation: beings, so called owing to the fact of their being generated.
So the meaning here is this: among beings who are overwhelmed by the stain of avarice, which is one of the dark states that corrupt the natural transparency of consciousness and which has the characteristic of inability to bear sharing one’s own good fortune with others.
Free from stain by avarice because of being both free from avarice and from the other stains, greed, hate, and the rest.
I abide with my heart: I abide with my consciousness of the kind already stated, is the meaning.
But in the sutta, “I live the home life with my heart free” , etc., is said because it was taught there as a mental abiding to depend on constantly to Mahānāma the Sakyan, who was a stream-enterer asking about an abiding to depend on.
There the meaning is “I live overcoming …”
Freely generous: liberally generous.
Open-handed: with hands that are purified.
What is meant is: with hands that are always washed in order to give gifts carefully with one’s own hands.
That I delight in relinquishing: the act of relinquishing is relinquishing ; the meaning is, giving up.
To delight in relinquishing is to delight in constant devotion to that relinquishing.
Expect to be asked : accustomed to being asked because of giving whatever others ask for, is the meaning.
Yājayoga is a reading,
in which case the meaning is: devoted to sacrifice , in other words, to sacrificing .
And rejoice in sharing:
the meaning is, he recollects thus: “I give gifts and I share out what is to be used by myself, and I rejoice in both.”
But owing to the profundity of the generosity’s special qualities, or owing to his being occupied in recollecting the generosity’s special qualities of many sorts, the jhāna is only access and does not reach absorption.
And that access jhāna is known as “recollection of generosity” too because it arises with the generosity’s special qualities as the means.
And when a bhikkhu is devoted to this recollection of generosity, he becomes ever more intent on generosity, his preference is for non-greed, he acts in conformity with loving-kindness, he is fearless. He has much happiness and gladness. And if he penetrates no higher, he is at least headed for a happy destiny.
Now, when a man is truly wise, His constant task will surely be
This recollection of his giving Blessed with such mighty potency.
This is the section dealing with the recollection of generosity in the detailed explanation.
his mind has rectitude on that occasion, being inspired by generosity” . So when he has suppressed the hindrances in the way already described , the jhāna factors arise in a single conscious moment.
As long as he recollects his own generosity in its special qualities of freedom from stain by avarice, etc., in this way, then: “On that occasion his mind is not obsessed by greed,
or obsessed by hate, or obsessed by delusion;
One who wants to develop the recollection of deities should possess the special qualities of faith, etc., evoked by means of the noble path, recollect his own special qualities of faith, etc., with deities standing as witnesses, as follows:
and he should go into solitary retreat and “There are deities of the Realm of the Four Kings , there are deities of the Realm of the Thirty-three , there are deities who are Gone to Divine Bliss … who are Contented … who Delight in Creating … who Wield Power Over Others’ Creations , there are deities of Brahmā’s Retinue , there are deities higher than that. And those deities were possessed of faith such that on dying here they were reborn there, and such faith is present in me too.
And those deities were possessed of virtue …
of learning …
In the sutta, however, it is said: “On the occasion, Mahānāma, on which a noble disciple recollects the faith, the virtue, the learning, the generosity, and the understanding that are both his own and of those deities,” on that occasion his mind is not obsessed by greed …” .
Although this is said, it should nevertheless be understood as said for the purpose of showing that the special qualities of faith, etc., in oneself are those in the deities, making the deities stand as witnesses.
For it is said definitely in the Commentary: “He recollects his own special qualities, making the deities stand as witnesses.”
As long as in the prior stage he recollects the deities’ special qualities of faith, etc., and in the later stage he recollects the special qualities of faith, etc., existing in himself, then: “On that occasion his mind is not obsessed by greed,
or obsessed by hate, or obsessed by delusion, his mind has rectitude on that occasion, being inspired by deities” . So when he has suppressed the hindrances in the way already stated , the jhāna factors arise in a single conscious moment.
But owing to the profundity of the special qualities of faith, etc., or owing to his being occupied in recollecting special qualities of many sorts, the jhāna is only access and does not reach absorption.
And that access jhāna itself is known as “recollection of deities” too because it arises with the deities special qualities as the means.
And when a bhikkhu is devoted to this recollection of deities, he becomes dearly loved by deities. He obtains even greater fullness of faith. He has much happiness and gladness.
And if he penetrates no higher, he is at least headed for a happy destiny.
Now, when a man is truly wise, His constant task will surely be
This recollection of deities Blessed with such mighty potency.
This is the section dealing with the recollection of deities in the detailed explanation.
of generosity …
of understanding such that when they died here they were reborn there, and such understanding is present in me too” .
Now, in setting forth the detail of these recollections, after the words, “His mind has rectitude on that occasion, being inspired by the Perfect One,” it is added: “When a noble disciple’s mind has rectitude, Mahānāma, the meaning inspires him, the law inspires him, and the application of the law makes him glad. When he is glad, happiness is born in him” . Herein, the meaning inspires him should be understood as said of contentment inspired by the meaning beginning, “This Blessed One is such since he is …” .
The law inspires him is said of contentment inspired by the text.
The application of the law makes him glad is said of both .
And when in the case of the recollection of deities inspired by deities is said, this should be understood as said either of the consciousness that occurs in the prior stage inspired by deities or of the consciousness that occurs in the later stage inspired by the special qualities that are similar to those of the deities and are productive of the deities’ state .
These six recollections succeed only in noble disciples.
For the special qualities of the Enlightened One, the Law, and the Community, are evident to them;
and they possess the virtue with the special qualities of untornness, etc., the generosity that is free from stain by avarice, and the special qualities of faith, etc., similar to those of deities.
And in the Mahānāma Sutta they are expounded in detail by the Blessed One in order to show a stream-winner an abiding to depend upon when he asked for one.
Also in the Gedha Sutta : “Here, bhikkhus, a noble disciple recollects the Perfect One in this way: That Blessed One is such since he is accomplished … His mind has rectitude on that occasion. He has renounced, got free from, emerged from cupidity.
Cupidity, bhikkhus, is a term for the five cords of sense desire.
Some beings gain purity here by making this recollection their prop” . they are expounded in order that a noble disciple should purify his consciousness by means of the recollections and so attain further purification in the ultimate sense thus .
And in the Sambādhokāsa Sutta taught by the venerable Mahā-Kaccāna they are expounded as the realization of the wide-open through the susceptibility of purification that exists in the ultimate sense only in a noble disciple thus: “It is wonderful, friends, it is marvellous how the realization of the wide-open in the crowded house life has been discovered by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened, for the purification of beings, for the surmounting of sorrow and lamentation, for the ending of pain and grief, for the attainment of the true way, for the realization of Nibbāna, that is to say, the six stations of recollection.
What six?
Here, friends, a noble disciple recollects the Perfect One … Some beings are susceptible to purification in this way” .
Also in the Uposatha Sutta: “And what is the Noble Ones’ Uposatha, Visākhā?
It is the gradual cleansing of the mind still sullied by imperfections.
And what is the gradual cleansing of the mind still sullied by imperfections?
Here, Visākhā, a noble disciple recollects the Perfect One …” . they are expounded in order to show the greatness of the fruit of the Uposatha, as a mind-purifying meditation subject for a noble disciple who is observing the Uposatha.
And in the Book of Elevens, : “One who has faith is successful, Mahānāma, not one who has no faith.
One who is energetic … One whose mindfulness is established … One who is concentrated … One who has understanding is successful, Mahānāma, not one who has no understanding.
Having established yourself in these five things, Mahānāma, you should develop six things.
Here, Mahānāma, you should recollect the Perfect One: That Blessed One is such since …” . when a noble disciple has asked, “Venerable sir, in what way should we abide who abide in various ways?” they are expounded to him in order to show the way of abiding in this way .
For when he is recollecting the special qualities of the Buddha, etc., even only according to hearsay, his consciousness settles down,
by virtue of which the hindrances are suppressed. In his supreme gladness he initiates insight, and he even attains to Arahantship, like the Elder Phussadeva who dwelt at Kaṭakandhakāra.
That venerable one, it seems, saw a figure of the Enlightened One created by Māra. He thought, “How good this appears despite its having greed, hate and delusion! What can the Blessed One’s goodness have been like? For he was quite without greed, hate and delusion! ” He acquired happiness with the Blessed One as object, and by augmenting his insight he reached Arahantship.
in the Path of Purification composed for the purpose of gladdening good people.
in the Treatise on the Development of Concentration
Still, though this is so, they can be brought to mind by an ordinary man too, if he possesses the special qualities of purified virtue, and the rest.
The seventh chapter
called “The Description of Six Recollections”
At Savatthi.
Then the Venerable Ananda approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to him:
‘Venerable sir, does the Blessed One recall ever having gone to the brahma world by spiritual power with a mind-made body? “274
I recall, Ananda, having gone to the brahma world by spiritual power with a mind-made body.”
“I recall, ananda, having gone to the brahma world by spiritual power with this body composed of the four great elements.”
“That the Blessed One is able276 to go to the brahma world by spiritual power with a mind-made body, and that he recalls having gone to the brahma world by spiritual power with this body composed of the four great elements: that is wonderful and amazing, venerable sir, on the part of the Blessed One.”
“The Tathagatas, Ananda, are wonderful and possess wonderful qualities; the Tathagatas are amazing and possess amazing qualities.
“When, Ananda, the Tathagata immerses the body in the mind and the mind in the body,277 and when he dwells having entered upon a blissful perception and a buoyant perception in regard to the body, on that occasion the body of the Tathagata becomes more buoyant, malleable, wieldy, and luminous.
“Just as an iron ball, Ananda, heated all day, becomes more buoyant, malleable, wieldy, and luminous, so too, when the Tathagata immerses the body in the mind and the mind in the body, and when he dwells having entered upon a blissful perception and a buoyant perception in regard to the body, on that occasion the body of the Tathiigata becomes more buoyant, malleable, wieldy, and luminous.
“When, Ananda, the Tathagata immerses the body in the mind and the mind in the body, and when he dwells having entered upon a blissful perception and a buoyant perception in regard to the body, on that occasion the body of the Tathfigata rises up without difficulty from the earth into the air. He wields the various kinds of spiritual power: having been one, he becomes many; having been many, he becomes one;… he exercises mastery with the body as far as the brahma world.
“Just as, Ananda, a tuft of cotton wool or kapok, being light, sustained by the wind, rises up without difficulty from the earth into the air, so too, when the Tathagata immerses the body in the mind and the mind in the body, and when he dwells having entered upon a blissful perception and a buoyant perception in regard to the body, on that occasion the body of the Tathsgata rises up without difficulty from the earth into the air. He wields the various kinds of spiritual power: having been one, he becomes many; having been many, he becomes one;… he exercises mastery with the body as far as the brahma world.”
“But, venerable sir, does the Blessed One recall ever having gone to the brahma world by spiritual power with this body of the four great elements? “275
 immerses the body in the mind: having taken the body, he mounts it on the mind; he makes it dependent on the mind; he sends it along the course of the mind.
for it is a blissful perception because it accom- panies the peaceful bliss , and a buoyant perception because there is no inhibition by the defilements.
A blissful perception, a buoyant perception : this is the perception associated with the mind of direct knowledge;
 immerses the mind in the body: having taken the mind, he mounts it on the body; he makes it dependent on the body; he sends it along the course of the body. The body is the coarse physical body. Movement along the course of the body is sluggish .
The mind is an exalted mind. Movement along the course of the mind is buoyant .
 This is a term of unique occurrence in the Word of the Buddha preserved in the Tipitaka.
Now comes the description of the development of the perception of repulsiveness in nutriment, which was listed as the “one perception”1 next to the immaterial states .
Herein, it nourishes , thus it is nutriment .
That is of four kinds as: physical nutriment, nutriment consisting of contact, nutriment consisting of mental volition, and nutriment consisting of consciousness.2
But what is it here that nourishes what?
Physical nutriment nourishes the materiality of the octad that has nutritive essence as eighth:3
And to show how they bring fear thus, physical nutriment should be illustrated by the simile of the child’s flesh ,
But of these four kinds of nutriment it is only physical nutriment, classed as what is eaten, drunk, chewed, and tasted, that is intended here as “nutriment” in this sense.
The perception arisen as the apprehension of the repulsive aspect in that nutriment is, “perception of repulsiveness in nutriment.”
One who wants to develop that perception of repulsiveness in nutriment should learn the meditation subject and see that he has no uncertainty about even a single word of what he has learnt. Then he should go into solitary retreat and review repulsiveness in ten aspects in the physical nutriment
classified as what is eaten, drunk, chewed, and tasted, that is to say, as to going, seeking, using, secretion, receptacle, what is uncooked , what is cooked , fruit, outflow, and smearing.
Herein, as to going: even when a man has gone forth in so mighty a dispensation, still after he has perhaps spent all night reciting the Enlightened One’s word or doing the ascetic’ s work, after he has risen early to do the duties connected with the shrine terrace and the Enlightenment-tree terrace, to set out the water for drinking and washing, to sweep the grounds and to see to the needs of the body, after he has sat down on his seat and given attention to his meditation subject twenty or thirty times5 and got up again, then he must take his bowl and outer robe, he must leave behind the ascetics’ woods that are not crowded with people, offer the bliss of seclusion, possess shade and water, and are clean, cool, delightful places, he must disregard the Noble Ones’ delight in seclusion, and he must set out for the village in order to get nutriment, as a jackal for the charnel ground.
And as he goes thus, from the time when he steps down from his bed or chair he has to tread on a carpet6 covered with the dust of his feet, geckos’ droppings, and so on.
Next he has to see the doorstep,7 which is more repulsive than the inside of the room since it is often fouled with the droppings of rats, bats,8 and so on.
Next the lower terrace, which is more repulsive than the terrace above since it is all smeared with the droppings of owls, pigeons,9 and so on.
Next the grounds,10 which are more repulsive than the lower floor since they are defiled by old grass and leaves blown about by the wind, by sick novices’ urine, excrement, spittle and snot, and in the rainy season by water, mud, and so on.
And he has to see the road to the monastery, which is more repulsive than the grounds.
In due course, after standing in the debating lodge11 when he has finished paying homage at the Enlightenment Tree and the shrine, he sets out thinking, “Instead of looking at the shrine that is like a cluster of pearls, and the Enlightenment Tree that is as lovely as a bouquet of peacock’s tail feathers, and the abode that is as fair as a god’s palace, I must now turn my back on such a charming place and go abroad for the sake of food;” and on the way to the village, the view of a road of stumps and thorns and an uneven road broken up by the force of water awaits him.
Next, after he has put on his waist cloth as one who hides an abscess, and tied his waist band as one who ties a bandage on a wound, and robed himself in his upper robes as one who hides a skeleton, and taken out his bowl as one who takes out a pan for medicine, when he reaches the vicinity of the village gate, perhaps the sight of an elephant’s carcass, a horse’s carcass, a buffalo’s carcass, a human carcass, a snake’s carcass, or a dog’s carcass awaits him,
Next, as he stands in the village gateway, he must scan the village streets in order to avoid danger from savage elephants, horses, and so on.
So this repulsive experience beginning with the carpet that has to be trodden on and ending with the various kinds of carcasses that have to be seen and smelled, has to be undergone for the sake of nutriment:
“Oh, nutriment is indeed a repulsive thing!” This is how repulsiveness should be reviewed as to going.
2. How as to seeking?
When he has endured the repulsiveness of going in this way, and has gone into the village, and is clothed in his cloak of patches, he has to wander in the village streets from house to house like a beggar with a dish in his hand.
And in the rainy season wherever he treads his feet sink into water and mire up to the flesh of the calves.12 He has to hold the bowl in one hand and his robe up with the other.
In the hot season he has to go about with his body covered with the dirt, grass, and dust blown about by the wind.
On reaching such and such a house door he has to see and even to tread in gutters and cesspools covered with blue-bottles and seething with all the species of worms, all mixed up with fish washings, meat washings, rice washings, spittle, snot, dogs’ and pigs’ excrement, and what not,
And when he enters a house, some give and some do not.
And when they give, some give yesterday’s cooked rice and stale cakes and rancid jelly, sauce and so on.13
Some, not giving, say, “Please pass on, venerable sir,” others keep silent as if they did not see him. Some avert their faces. Others treat him with harsh words such as: “Go away, you bald-head.”
“Oh, nutriment is indeed a repulsive thing!” This is how repulsiveness should be reviewed as to seeking.
How as to using?
After he has sought the nutriment in this way and is sitting at ease in a comfortable place outside the village, then so long as he has not dipped his hand into it he would be able to invite a respected bhikkhu or a decent person, if he saw one, to share it;
And when its good appearance has been spoilt by his squeezing it up, and it has been made into a ball and put into his mouth, then the lower teeth function as a mortar, the upper teeth as a pestle, and the tongue as a hand.
It gets pounded there with the pestle of the teeth like a dog’s dinner in a dog’s trough, while he turns it over and over with his tongue; then the thin spittle at the tip of the tongue smears it, and the thick spittle behind the middle of the tongue smears it, and the filth from the teeth in the parts where a tooth-stick cannot reach smears it.
When thus mashed up and besmeared, this peculiar compound now destitute of the original colour and smell is reduced to a condition as utterly nauseating as a dog’s vomit in a dog’s trough.
Yet, notwithstanding that it is like this, it can still be swallowed because it is no longer in range of the eye’s focus. This is how repulsiveness should be reviewed as to using.
4. How as to secretion?
Buddhas and Paccekabuddhas and Wheel-turning Monarchs have only one of the four secretions consisting of bile, phlegm, pus and blood,
So when the food has arrived at the stage of being eaten and it enters inside, then in one whose secretion of bile is in excess it becomes as utterly nauseating as if smeared with thick madhuka oil;
and in one whose secretion of blood is in excess it is as utterly nauseating as if smeared with dye. This is how repulsiveness should be reviewed as to secretion.
How as to receptacle?
When it has gone inside the belly and is smeared with one of these secretions, then the receptacle it goes into is no gold dish or crystal or silver dish and so on.
On the contrary, if it is swallowed by one ten years old, it finds itself in a place like a cesspit unwashed for ten years.
If it is swallowed by one twenty years old, thirty, forty, fifty, sixty, seventy, eighty, ninety ears old,
if it is swallowed by one a hundred years old, it finds itself in a place like a cesspit unwashed for a hundred years. This is how repulsiveness should be reviewed as to receptacle.
How as to what is uncooked ?
After this nutriment has arrived at such a place for its receptacle, then for as long as it remains uncooked it stays in that same place just described, which is shrouded in absolute darkness, pervaded by draughts,15 tainted by various smells of ordure and utterly fetid and loathsome. And just as when a cloud out of season has rained during a drought and bits of grass and leaves and rushes and the carcasses of snakes, dogs and human beings that have collected in a pit at the gate of an outcaste village remain there warmed by the sun’s heat until the pit becomes covered with froth and bubbles, so too, what has been swallowed that day and yesterday and the day before remains there together, and being smothered by the layer of phlegm and covered with froth and bubbles produced by digestion through being fermented by the heat of the bodily fires, it becomes quite loathsome. This is how repulsiveness should be reviewed as to what is uncooked.
How as to what is cooked?
When it has been completely cooked there by the bodily fires, it does not turn into gold, silver, etc., as the ores16 of gold, silver, etc., do through smelting.
Instead, giving off froth and bubbles, it turns into excrement and fills the receptacle for digested food, like brown clay squeezed with a smoothing trowel and packed into a tube, and it turns into urine and fills the bladder. This is how repulsiveness should be reviewed as to what is cooked.
How as to fruit?
When it has been rightly cooked, it produces the various kinds of ordure consisting of head hairs, body hairs, nails, teeth, and the rest. When wrongly cooked it produces the hundred diseases beginning with itch, ring-worm, smallpox, leprosy, plague, consumption, coughs, flux, and so on. Such is its fruit. This is how repulsiveness should be reviewed as to fruit.
9. How as to outflow?
On being swallowed, it enters by one door, after which it flows out by several doors in the way beginning, “Eye-dirt from the eye, ear- dirt from the ear” .
And on being swallowed it is swallowed even in the company of large gatherings.
But on flowing out, now converted into excrement, urine, etc., it is excreted only in solitude.
On the first day one is delighted to eat it, elated and full of happiness and joy.
On the second day one stops one’s nose to void it, with a wry face, disgusted and dismayed.
And on the first day one swallows it lustfully, greedily, gluttonously, infatuatedly. But on the second day, after a single night has passed, one excretes it with distaste, ashamed, humiliated and disgusted.
Hence the Ancients said:
The food and drink so greatly prized— The crisp to chew, the soft to suck—
Go in all by a single door, But by nine doors come oozing out.
The food and drink so greatly prized— The crisp to chew, the soft to suck—
Men like to eat in company, But to excrete in secrecy.
The food and drink so greatly prized— The crisp to chew, the soft to suck—
These a man eats with high delight, And then excretes with dumb disgust.
The food and drink so greatly prized— The crisp to chew, the soft to suck—
A single night will be enough To bring them to putridity.
This is how repulsiveness should be reviewed as to outflow.
How as to smearing?
At the time of using it he smears his hands, lips, tongue and palate,
and they become repulsive by being smeared with it. And even when washed, they have to be washed again and again in order to remove the smell.
And, just as, when rice is being boiled, the husks, the red powder covering the grain, etc., rise up and smear the mouth, rim and lid of the cauldron, so too, when eaten it rises up during its cooking and simmering by the bodily fire that pervades the whole body, it turns into tartar, which smears the teeth,
And when these doors are smeared by it, they never become either clean or pleasing even though washed every day.
And after one has washed a certain one of these, the hand has to be washed again.17
As he reviews repulsiveness in this way in ten aspects and strikes at it with thought and applied thought, physical nutriment becomes evident to him in its repulsive aspect.
He cultivates that sign18 again and again, develops and repeatedly practices it.
As he does so, the hindrances are suppressed,
But perception is evident here in the apprehension of the repulsive aspect,
When a bhikkhu devotes himself to this perception of repulsiveness in nutriment, his mind retreats, retracts and recoils from craving for flavours.
He nourishes himself with nutriment without vanity and only for the purpose of crossing over suffering, as one who seeks to cross over the desert eats his own dead child’s flesh .
Then his greed for the five cords of sense desire comes to be fully understood without difficulty by means of the full understanding of the physical nutriment.
He fully understands the materiality aggregate by means of the full-understanding of the five cords of sense desire.
Development of mindfulness occupied with the body comes to perfection in him through the repulsiveness of “what is uncooked” and the rest. He has entered upon a way that is in conformity with the perception of foulness.
And by keeping to this way, even if he does not experience the deathless goal in this life, he is at least bound for a happy destiny.
This is the detailed explanation of the development of the perception of repulsiveness in nutriment.
contact as nutriment nourishes the three kinds of feeling;
mental volition as nutriment nourishes rebirth- linking in the three kinds of becoming;
consciousness as nutriment nourishes mentality-materiality at the moment of rebirth-linking.
when there is nutriment as mental volition there is rebirth-linking, which brings peril.4
when there is nutriment as contact there is approaching, which brings peril;
Now, when there is physical nutriment there is attachment, which brings peril;
and consciousness as nutriment by the simile of the hundred spears .
mental volition as nutriment by the simile of the pit of live coals ,
contact as nutriment by the simile of the hideless cow ,
and not only that, but he has to suffer his nose to be assailed by the smell of them.
from which flies come up and settle on his outer cloak of patches and on his bowl and on his head.
When he has wandered for alms in the village in this way like a beggar, he has to depart from it.
So this experience beginning with the entry into the village and ending with the departure from it, which is repulsive owing to the water, mud, etc., that has to be trodden in and seen and endured, has to be undergone for the sake of nutriment:
but as soon as he has dipped his hand into it out of desire to eat he would be ashamed to say, “Take some.”
And when he has dipped his hand in and is squeezing it up, the sweat trickling down his five fingers wets any dry crisp food there may be and makes it sodden.
but those with weak merit have all four.
in one whose secretion of phlegm in excess it is as if smeared with the juice of nāgabalā leaves;14
in one whose secretion of pus is in excess it is as if smeared with rancid buttermilk;
and it turns into spittle, phlegm, etc., which respectively smear the tongue, palate, etc.; and it turns into eye-dirt, ear-dirt, snot, urine, excrement, etc., which respectively smear the eyes, ears, nose and nether passages.
And after one has washed a certain one of these, the repulsiveness does not depart from it even after two or three washings with cow dung and clay and scented powder. This is how repulsiveness should be reviewed as to smearing.
and his mind is concentrated in access concentration, but without reaching absorption because of the profundity of physical nutriment as a state with an individual essence.
which is why this meditation subject goes by the name of “perception of repulsiveness in nutriment.”
The word ‘perception’ is used for the dhamma with the characteristic of perceiving , as in the case of ‘perception of visible objects,’ ‘perception of sound,’ etc.; and it is used for insight, as in the case of ‘perception of impermanence,’ ‘perception of suffering,’ etc.; and it is used for serenity, as in the passage, ‘Perception of the bloated and perception of visible objects, have these one meaning or different meanings, Sopāka?’ , and so on.
for it is the apprehending of the repulsive aspect in nutriment, or the access jhāna produced by means of that, that is intended here by, ‘perception of repulsiveness in nutriment’
Here, however, it should be understood as the preliminary work for serenity;
‘It nourishes’ ”: the meaning is that it leads up, fetches, produces, its own fruit through its state as a condition for the fruit’s arising or presence, which state is called “nutriment condition.”
It is made into a mouthful , thus it is physical . In this way it gets its designation from the concrete object; but as to characteristic, it should be understood to have the characteristic of nutritive essence . It is physical and it is nutriment in the sense stated, thus it is physical nutriment; so with the rest.
It touches , thus it is contact ;
for although this is an immaterial state, it occurs also as the aspect of touching on an object ,
which is why it is said to have the characteristic of touching.
It wills , thus it is volition ; the meaning is that it arranges itself together with associated states upon the object. Mental volition is volition occupied with the mind.
It cognizes by conjecturing about rebirth , thus it is consciousness 
Then ‘twenty or thirty’ is taken as the number already observed by the time of setting out on the alms round. Or alternatively, from ‘going’ up to ‘smearing’ is one turn; then it is after giving attention to the meditation subject by twenty or thirty turns in this way
‘Twenty or thirty times’: here some say that the definition of the number of times is according to what is present-by-continuity . But others say that it is by way of “warming up the seat” ;
for development that has not reached suppression of hindrances does not remove the bodily discomfort in the act of sitting, because of the lack of pervading happiness. So there is inconstancy of posture too.
Paccattharaṇa - a spread consisting of a rug to be spread on the ground for protecting the skin
in a lodge for thinking in the way beginning ‘Where must I go for alms today?’
But those who are scrupulously clean by nature wash their hands again after washing the mouth, and so on
‘A certain one’ is said with reference to the anal orifice.
‘That sign’: that object as the sign for development, which sign is called physical nutriment and has appeared in the repulsive aspect to one who gives his attention to it repeatedly in the ways already described.
For it is owing to profundity that the first pair of truths is hard to see
And there, while development occurs through the repulsive aspect, it is only the dhammas on account of which there comes to be the concept of physical nutriment that are repulsive, not the concept. But it is because the occurrence of development is contingent only upon dhammas with an individual essence, and because the profundity is due to that actual individual essence of dhammas that have individual essences, that the jhāna cannot reach absorption in it through apprehension of the repulsive aspect.
‘By characterizing individual essences’: by making certain of the specific characteristics of hardness, and so on.
For this meditation subject does not consist in the observing of a mere concept, as in the case of the earth kasiṇa as a meditation subject, neither does it consist in the observing of the colour blue, etc., as in the case of the blue kasiṇa as a meditation subject, nor in the observing of the general characteristics of impermanence, etc., in formations, as in the case of insight as a meditation subject; but rather it consists in the observing of the individual essences of earth, and so on.
That is why ‘by characterizing individual essences’ is said, which means, ‘by making certain of the specific characteristics of hardness, and so on.
Herein, as regards ‘earth element,’ etc., the meaning of element is the meaning of individual essence, the meaning of individual essence is the meaning of voidness, the meaning of voidness is the meaning of not-a-living-being.
So it is just earth in the sense of individual essence, voidness and not-a-living-being that is the element; hence it is earth element;
so too in the case of the water element, and the rest.
The earth element is the element that is the foothold for the conascent material states. Likewise the water element is the element of their cohesion; the fire element is the element of their ripening; and the air element is the element of their conveyance and distension
What occurs in attendance upon self by its pertaining to the state that may be taken as self because it is included in one’s own continuity as internal 
In addition, attention should be given to the elements in the following ways: as to word meaning, by groups, by particles, by characteristic, etc., as to how originated, as to variety and unity, as to resolution and non-resolution , as to the similar and the dissimilar, as to distinction between internal and external, as to inclusion, as to condition, as to lack of conscious reaction, as to analysis of conditions. 87.
Herein, one who gives his attention to them as to word meaning should do so separately and generally thus: separately it is earth because it is spread out ;
it flows or it glides or it satisfies , thus it is water ;
it heats , thus it is fire ;
it blows , thus it is air .
But without differentiation they are elements because of bearing their own characteristics, because of grasping suffering, and because of sorting out suffering .29
This is how they should be given attention as to word meaning.
By groups: there is the earth element described under the twenty aspects beginning with head hairs, body hairs, and also the water element described under the twelve aspects beginning with bile, phlegm, etc. Now, as to these:
Colour, odour, taste, and nutritive Essence, and the four elements—
From combination of these eight There comes the common usage head hairs;
And separately from these eight30 There is no common usage head hairs.
Consequently, head hairs are only a mere group of eight states.
Likewise, body hairs, and the rest.
A component here that is kamma-originated is a group of ten states, that is to say, the former eight together with the life faculty and sex.
But it is on account of respective prominence of stiffenedness or cohesion that it comes to be styled “earth element” or “water element.”
This is how they should be given attention to “by groups.”
and that is held together32 by the water element measuring half as much. Being maintained33 by the fire element, and distended by the air element, it does not get scattered or dissipated. Instead of getting scattered or dissipated, it arrives at the alternative states of the female and male sex, etc., and manifests smallness, bigness, length, shortness, toughness, rigidity, and so on.
By particles: in this body the earth element taken as reduced to fine dust and powdered to the size of the smallest atom31 might amount to an average doṇa measure full;
The liquid water element that is the mode of cohesion, being founded on earth, maintained by fire, and distended by air, does not trickle or run away.34 Instead of trickling or running away it provides continued refreshments.35
And here the fire element that cooks what is eaten, drunk, etc., and is the mode of warming and has the characteristic of heat, being established on earth, held together by water, and distended by air, maintains this body and ensures its proper appearance.
And this body, being maintained by it, shows no putrefaction.
So this mechanism of elements carries on like a magic trick, deceiving foolish people with the male and female sex and so on. This is how they should be given attention by particles.
and being propelled36 by the other motile air, it shows intimation and it flexes and extends and it wriggles the hands and feet, doing so in the postures comprising of walking, standing, sitting and lying down.
And this body, being distended by the latter kind of air, does not collapse, but stands erect,
The air element that courses through all the limbs and has the characteristic of moving and distending, being founded upon earth, held together by water, and maintained by fire, distends this body.
This is how they should be given attention to by characteristic, and so on.
The air element has the characteristic of distending. Its function is to cause motion. It is manifested as conveying.37
The fire element has the characteristic of heat. Its function is to mature . It is manifested as a continued supply of softness.
The water element has the characteristic of trickling. Its function is to intensify. It is manifested as holding together.
As to characteristic, etc.: he should advert to the four elements in this way: “The earth element—what are its characteristic, function, manifestation?” defining them in this way: The earth element has the characteristic of hardness. Its function is to act as a foundation. It is manifested as receiving.
all the rest are of fourfold origination. This is how they should be given attention as to how originated.
in-breath and out-breath are consciousness-originated only;
The fire that cooks what is eaten, etc., is kamma- originated only;
the four consisting of tears, sweat, spittle, and snot are temperature-originated and consciousness-originated only.
the four consisting of gorge, dung, pus, and urine are temperature-originated only;
As to how originated: among the forty-two components beginning with head hairs shown in the detailed treatment of the earth element, etc.,
As to variety and unity: there is variety in the specific characteristics, etc., of all the elements;
for the characteristic, function, and manifestation of the earth element is one,
and those of the water element, etc., are different.
But there is unity in them as materiality, great primary, element, state , imperma- nence, etc., notwithstanding the fact that they are various according to specific characteristic, etc., and according to origination by kamma and so on.
“By reason of ‘great manifestation,’ and so on” means that these elements are called “great primaries” for the following reasons, namely: manifestation of greatness; likeness to great creatures; great maintenance; great alteration; and because they are great and because they are entities.
They are “great primaries” by reason of “great manifestation,” and so on.
All these elements are “instances of materiality” because they do not exceed the characteristic of “being molested” .
Herein, manifestation of greatness: they are manifested as great both in a continuity that is not clung to and in a continuity that is clung to.
For their manifestation of greatness in a continuity that is not clung to is given
Two times a hundred thousand leagues And then four nahutas as well:
This earth, this “bearer of all wealth,” Has that much thickness, as they tell .
in the description of the recollection of the Buddha in the way beginning .
And they are manifested on a great scale also in a continuity that is clung to, for instance, in the bodies of fishes, turtles, deities, Dānava demons, and so on.
For this is said: “Bhikkhus, there are individual creatures of a hundred leagues in the great ocean” , and so on.
 Likeness to great creatures: just as a magician turns water that is not crystal into crystal, and turns a clod that is not gold into gold, and shows them,
and being himself neither a spirit nor a bird, shows himself as a spirit or a bird, so too, being themselves not blue-black, they turn themselves into blue-black derived materiality, being themselves not yellow … not red … not white, they turn themselves into white derived materiality and show that. In this way they are “great primaries” in being like the great creatures of a magician.38
And just as, whomsoever the great creatures such as the spirits grasp hold of , they have no standing place either inside him or outside him and yet they have no standing independently of him, so too, these elements are not found to stand either inside or outside each other yet they have no standing independently of one another. Thus they are also great primaries in being equal to the great creatures such as the spirits because they have no thinkable standing place relative to each other.
And just as the great creatures known as female spirits conceal their own fearfulness with a pleasing colour, shape and gesture to deceive beings, so too, these elements conceal each their own characteristic and function classed as hardness, etc., by means of a pleasing skin colour of women’s and men’s bodies, etc., and pleasing shapes of limbs and pleasing gestures of fingers, toes and eyebrows, and they deceive simple people by concealing their own functions and characteristics beginning with hardness and do not allow their individual essences to be seen. Thus they are great primaries in being equal to the great creatures , the female spirits, since they are deceivers.
Or alternatively, they are great primaries since they are primaries whose maintenance is great.
 Great maintenance: this is because they have to be sustained by the great requisites.
For these elements are great primaries since they have become , have occurred, by means of the food, clothing, etc., which are great in importance because they have to be found every day.
 Great alteration: the unclung-to and the clung-to are the basis of great alterations.
Herein, the great alteration of the unclung-to evidences itself in the emergence of an aeon ,
and that of the clung-to in the disturbance of the elements in the body.
For accordingly:
Out of the ground and races higher And higher, right to the Brahmā heaven,
The conflagration’s flame bursts up When the world is burnt up by fire.
A whole world system measuring One hundred thousand millions wide
Subsides, as with its furious waters The flood dissolves the world beside.
One hundred thousand million leagues, A whole world system’s broad extent
Is rent and scattered, when the world Succumbs to the air element.
The bite of wooden-mouths can make The body stiff; to all intent,
When roused is its earth element, It might be gripped by such a snake.
The bite of rotten-mouths can make The body rot; to all intent,
When roused its water element, It might be gripped by such a snake.
The bite of fiery-mouths can make The body burn; to all intent,
When roused is its fire element, It might be gripped by such a snake.
The bite of dagger-mouths can make The body burst; to all intent,
When roused is its air element, It might be gripped by such a snake.
So they are great primaries because they have become the basis of great alteration.
 Because they are great and because they are entities: “great” because they need great effort to discern them, and “entities” because they are existent; thus they are great primaries because they are great and because they are entities .
This is how all these elements are “great primaries” by reason of “great manifestation,” and so on.
Again, they are elements because of bearing their own characteristics, because of grasping suffering, and because of sorting out suffering , and because none of them are exempt from the characteristic of being elements.
Thus there is unity of all since all are materiality, great primaries, elements, states, impermanent, and so on. This is how they should be given attention “as to variety and unity.”
they are not self in the sense of having no core of permanence, and so on.
they are painful in the sense of causing terror;
They are impermanent in the sense of liability to destruction;
They are states owing to bearing their own characteristics and owing to their so bearing for the length of the moment appropriate to them.39
As to resolution and non-resolution : they are positionally unresolvable since they always arise together in every single minimal material group consisting of the bare octad and the others;
but they are resolvable by characteristic. This is how they should be given attention “as to resolution and non-resolution .”
As to the similar and dissimilar: and although they are unresolved in this way, yet the first two similar in heaviness,
and so are the last two in lightness;
but for this reason the first two are dissimilar to the last two and the last two to the first two. This is how they should be given attention “as to the similar and dissimilar.”
As to distinction between internal and external: the internal elements are the material support for the physical bases of consciousness, for the kinds of intimation, and for the material faculties. They are associated with postures, and they are of fourfold origination.
The external elements are of the opposite kind. This is how they should be given attention “as to distinction between internal and external.”
As to inclusion: kamma-originated earth element is included together with the other kamma-originated elements because there is no difference in their origination.
Likewise the consciousness-originated is included together with other consciousness-originated elements. This is how they should be given attention “as to inclusion.”
The air element, which is founded on earth, held together by water, and maintained by fire, is a condition for the other three great primaries by acting as their distension. This is how they should be given attention “as to condition.”
The fire element, which is founded on earth, held together by water and distended by air, is a condition for the other three great primaries by acting as their maintaining.
The water element, which is founded on earth, maintained by fire and distended by air, is a condition for the other three great primaries by acting as their cohesion.
As to condition: the earth element, which is held together by water, maintained by fire and distended by air, is a condition for the other three great primaries by acting as their foundation.
And the other three do not know, “The earth element is a condition for us by acting as our foundation.”
And similarly in each instance. This is how they should be given attention “as to lack of conscious reaction.”
As to lack of conscious reaction: here too the earth element does not know, “I am the earth element” or “I am a condition by acting as a foundation for three great primaries.” And the other three do not know, “The earth element is a condition for us by acting as a foundation for three great primaries.”
As to analysis of conditions: there are four conditions for the elements, that is to say, kamma, consciousness, nutriment, and temperature.
Temperature is the productive condition for the temperature-originated elements; for the rest it is the presence condition and non-disappearance condition.
Nutriment is the producing condition for the nutriment-originated elements; for the rest it is the nutriment condition, presence condition and non-disappearance condition.
Consciousness is the producing condition for the consciousness-originated elements; for the rest it is the post-nascence condition, presence condition and non-disappearance condition.
Kamma is the producing condition40 for the kamma-originated elements; for the rest it is indirectly the decisive-supportive condition.41
Consciousness, etc., only are the conditions for the consciousness-originated elements; the others are not.
Herein, kamma only is the condition for the kamma-originated elements; consciousness , etc. i.e. nutriment and temperature are not.
Herein, the kamma-originated great primary is the condition for the kamma- originated great primaries, and also for the consciousness-originated great primaries.
The temperature-originated great primary is the condition for the temperature-originated great primaries, and also for the kamma-originated great primaries, and so on .
Likewise are the consciousness-originated great primary and the nutriment originated great primary.
Herein, the kamma-originated earth element is a condition for the other kamma-originated elements both as conascence, mutuality, support, presence, and non-disappearance conditions and as foundation, but not as producing condition.
And for the others in a triple continuity it is a condition as support, presence, and non-disappearance conditions too, but not as cohesion or producing condition.
And the fire element here is a condition for the other three elements both as conascence, etc., conditions and as maintaining but not as producing condition.
It is a condition for the other three great primaries in a triple continuity as support, presence and non-disappearance conditions, but not as foundation or producing condition.
And here the water element is a condition for the remaining three elements both as conascence, etc., conditions and as cohesion, but not as producing condition.
And for the others in a triple continuity it is a condition as support, presence, and non-disappearance conditions too, but not as maintaining or producing condition.
And the air element here is a condition for the other three elements both as conascence, etc., conditions and as distension, but not as producing condition.
And for the others in a triple continuity it is a condition as support, presence, and non- disappearance conditions too, but not as distension or producing condition.
The same method applies in the case of the consciousness-originated, the nutriment-originated, and the temperature-originated earth element, and the rest.
And when these elements have been made to occur through the influence of the conascence, etc., conditions:
With three in four ways to one due, And likewise with one due to three;
With two in six ways due to two— Thus their occurrence comes to be.
But with the last two dependent on the first two, with the first two dependent on the last two, with the second and fourth dependent on the first and third, with the first and third dependent on the second and fourth, with the second and third dependent on the first and fourth, and with the first and fourth dependent on the second and third, they occur in six ways with two elements due to two.
Likewise each one, beginning with earth, occurs in dependence on the other three, thus with one due to three their occurrence takes place in four ways.
Taking each one, beginning with earth, there are three others whose occurrence is due to that one, thus with three due to one their occurrence takes place in four ways.
At the time of moving forward and moving backward , the earth element among these is a condition for pressing.
That, seconded by the water element, is a condition for establishing on a foundation.
But the water element seconded by the earth element is a condition for lowering down.
The fire element seconded by the air element is a condition for lifting up.
The air element seconded by the fire element is a condition for shifting forwards and shifting sideways . This is how they should be given attention “as to analysis of conditions.”
As he gives his attention to them “as to word meaning,” etc., in this way, the elements become evident to him under each heading.
As he again and again adverts and gives attention to them access concentration arises in the way already described.
And this concentration too is called “definition of the four elements” because it arises in one who defines the four elements owing to the influence of his knowledge.
Since he does not entertain false notions about wild beasts, spirits, ogres, etc., because he has abolished the perception of living beings, he conquers fear and dread and conquers delight and aversion ; he is not exhilarated or depressed42 by agreeable and disagreeable things;
This bhikkhu who is devoted to the defining of the four elements immerses himself in voidness and eliminates the perception of living beings.
and as one of great understanding, he either ends in the deathless or he is bound for a happy destiny.
The noble meditator lion43 Will make this mighty theme his sport.
Defining the four elements Is ever the wise man’s resort;
This is the description of the development of the defining of the four elements.
This completes in all its aspects the commentary on the meaning of the clause, “How should it be developed?” in the set of questions beginning with “What is concentration?” which was formulated in order to show the method of development of concentration in detail .
And so it is developed in two forms with the development of these meditation subjects.
The unification of mind in the case of the remaining meditation subjects is absorption concentration.
Hence it was said above: “This completes in all its aspects the commentary on the meaning of the clause, ‘How should it be developed?’”
Herein, the unification of mind in the case of ten meditation subjects and in the consciousness preceding absorption in the case of the remaining meditation subjects44 is access concentration.
This concentration as intended here is twofold, that is to say, access concentration and absorption concentration.
‘Because of bearing their own characteristics’: these are not like the Primordial Essence and the self imagined by the theorists which are non-existent as to individual essence.
On the contrary, these do bear their own characteristics, which is why they are elements
‘From resolution of these eight’: the eight dhammas beginning with colour when resolved by means of understanding, are apprehendable in the ultimate sense through mutual negation ; but head hairs are not apprehendable in the ultimate sense through negation of colour and so on.
Consequently, the term of common usage ‘head hairs’ is applied to these dhammas in their co-arisen state; but if they are each taken separately, ‘There is no common-usage head hairs.’ The meaning is that it is a mere conventional term.
‘Only a mere group of eight states’ is said, taking the colour, etc., which are real , as a unity by means of the concept ‘a head hair,’ not only because they are merely the eight states.
Therefore … a paramaṇu as a particle of space is not the province of the physical eye, it is the province of the divine eye.
Held by conjoining through cohesion and prevented from being scattered
Kept guarded so that it may not lapse into a wet and slippery state through the water element, which has trickling as its essence
This is said with reference to the water element as a juice that helps growth
“‘It blows’ : it is stirred; the meaning is that the conglomeration of elements is made to move by its action as cause for successive arising at adjacent locations ,
‘Conveying’ is acting as cause for the successive arising at adjacent locations of the conglomeration of elements 
Propelling is the act of causing the successive arising at adjacent locations of material groups 
A great primary is a great wonder because it shows various unreal things , various wonders , and various marvels . Or alternatively: there are great wonders here, thus there are magicians.
And spirits, etc., are huge creatures owing to being born from them, thus they are great primaries. Or alternatively: this term ‘great primary’ can be regarded as a generic term for all of them.
But earth, etc., are great primaries because they deceive, and because, like the huge creatures, their standing place cannot be pointed to.
So although their standing place is undemonstrable, still each one assists the other by its particular function—the functions of establishing, etc., whereby each becomes a condition for the others as conascence condition and so on.
And if they were found outside each other, they would be already resolved , and that being so, any description of them as unresolved would be meaningless.
For if these elements were found inside each other, they would not each perform their particular functions, owing to mutual frustration.
Likewise their undemonstrability, since they are not found inside or outside each other though they rely upon each other for support.
The deception lies in causing the apparent individual essences of blue-black, etc., and it lies in causing the appearance of what has the aspect of woman and man, and so on.
The term ‘producing condition’ refers to causing origination, though as a condition it is actually kamma condition.
For this is said: ‘Profitable and unprofitable volition is a condition, as kamma condition, for resultant aggregates and for materiality due to kamma performed’ 
‘For the rest’: for consciousness-originated, and so on.
However, because of the words, ‘With a person as decisive support’ and ‘With a grove as decisive support’ in the Suttas, the decisive-support condition can be indirectly understood according to the Suttas in the sense of ‘absence without’
It is the indirectly decisive- support condition because in the Paṭṭhāna the decisive-support condition has only been given for immaterial dhammas, so there is, directly, no decisive-support condition in kamma for material dhammas.
- it is given in detail for one of not over- quick understanding whose meditation subject is elements—
and as here so also in the Rāhulovāda and Dhātuvibhaṅga Suttas.
The question, what are the benefits of the development of concentration? was also asked, however . Herein, the benefits of the development of concentration are fivefold, as a blissful abiding here and now, and so on.
For the development of absorption concentration provides the benefit of a blissful abiding here and now for the Arahants with cankers destroyed who develop concentration, thinking, “We shall attain and dwell with unified mind for a whole day.”
When ordinary people and trainers develop it, thinking, “After emerging, we shall exercise insight with concentrated consciousness,” the development of absorption concentration provides them with the benefit of insight by serving as the proximate cause for insight, and so too does access concentration as a method of arriving at wide open conditions in crowded circumstances.45
But when they have already produced the eight attainments and then, aspiring to the kinds of direct-knowledge described in the way beginning, “Having been one, he becomes many” , they produce them by entering upon jhāna as the basis for direct-knowledge and emerging from it, then the development of absorption concentration provides for them the benefit of the kinds of direct-knowledge, since it becomes the proximate cause for the kinds of direct-knowledge whenever there is an occasion.
Hence the Blessed One said: “He attains the ability to be a witness, through realization by direct-knowledge, of any state realizable by direct-knowledge to which his mind inclines, whenever there is an occasion” .
When ordinary people have not lost their jhāna, and they aspire to rebirth in the Brahmā-world thus, “Let us be reborn in the Brahmā-world,” or even though they do not make the actual aspiration, then the development of absorption concentration provides them with the benefits of an improved form of existence since it ensures that for them.
Hence the Blessed One said: “Where do they reappear after developing the first jhāna limitedly?
They reappear in the company of the deities of Brahmā’s Retinue” , and so on.
And even the development of access concentration ensures an improved form of existence in the happy destinies of the sensual sphere.
But when Noble Ones who have already produced the eight attainments develop concentration, thinking, “We shall enter upon the attainment of cessation, and by being without consciousness for seven days we shall abide in bliss here and now by reaching the cessation that is Nibbāna,” then the development of absorption concentration provides for them the benefit of cessation.
Hence it is said: “Understanding as mastery owing to … sixteen kinds of behaviour of knowledge, and to nine kinds of behaviour of concentration, is knowledge of the attainment of cessation” .
That is how this benefit of the development of concentration is fivefold as a blissful abiding here and now, and so on.
It cleans defiling stains’ pollution,46 And brings rewards past calculation.
So wise men fail not in devotion To the pursuit of concentration.
And at this point in the Path of Purification, which is taught under the headings of virtue, concentration and understanding in the stanza, “When a wise man, established well in virtue …,” concentration has been fully explained.
in the Path of Purification composed for the purpose of gladdening good people.
Hence the Blessed One said: “But, Cunda, it is not these that are called effacement in the Noble Ones’ discipline;
Hence the Blessed One said: “Bhikkhus, develop concentration;
a bhikkhu who is concentrated understands correctly” .
these are called blissful abidings in the Noble Ones’ discipline” .
concluding “The Description of Concentration”
The eleventh chapter
The process of existence in the round of rebirths, which is a very cramped place, is crowded by the defilements of craving and so on.
‘“Persons are of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated.’ So it was said by the Blessed One.
“Sariputta, the detailed meaning of my utterance, which I spoke in brief, should be regarded thus.
“Sariputta, the detailed meaning of my utterance, which I spoke in brief, should be regarded thus.
Now, concentration was described under the heading of consciousness in the stanza: When a wise man, established well in virtue, Develops consciousness and understanding . And that has been developed in all its aspects by the bhikkhu who is thus possessed of the more advanced development of concentration that has acquired with direct-knowledge the benefits described in Chs. XII and XIII.
But understanding comes next and that has still to be developed.
Now, that is not easy, firstly even to know about, let alone to develop, when it is taught very briefly.
In order, therefore, to deal with the detailed method of its development there is the following set of questions:
 What is understanding? In what sense is it understanding? What are its characteristic, function, manifestation, and proximate cause? How many kinds of understanding are there? How is it developed? What are the benefits of developing understanding?
Here are the answers: WHAT IS UNDERSTANDING? Understanding is of many sorts and has various aspects.
An answer that attempted to explain it all would accomplish neither its intention nor its purpose, and would, besides, lead to distraction; so we shall confine ourselves to the kind intended here, which is understanding consisting in insight knowledge associated with profitable consciousness.
 IN WHAT SENSE IS IT UNDERSTANDING?
It is understanding in the sense of act of understanding .1
What is this act of understanding?
It is knowing in a particular mode separate from the modes of perceiving and cognizing .
For though the state of knowing is equally present in perception , in consciousness , and in understanding , nevertheless perception is only the mere perceiving of an object as, say, blue or yellow;
Consciousness knows the objects as blue or yellow, and it brings about the penetration of its characteristics,
Understanding knows the object in the way already stated, it brings about the penetration of the characteristics, and it brings about, by endeavouring, the manifestation of the path.
Suppose there were three people, a child without discretion, a villager, and a money-changer, who saw a heap of coins lying on a money-changer’s counter. The child without discretion knows merely that the coins are figured and ornamented, long, square or round; he does not know that they are reckoned as valuable for human use and enjoyment.
And the villager knows that they are figured and ornamented, etc., and that they are reckoned as valuable for human use and enjoyment;
The money-changer knows all those kinds, and he does so by looking at the coin, and by listening to the sound of it when struck, and by smelling its smell, tasting its taste, and weighing it in his hand, and he knows that it was made in a certain village or town or city or on a certain mountain or by a certain master. And this may be understood as an illustration.
Perception is like the child without discretion seeing the coin, because it apprehends the mere mode of appearance of the object as blue and so on.
Consciousness is like the villager seeing the coin, because it apprehends the mode of the object as blue, etc., and because it extends further, reaching the penetration of its characteristics.
Understanding is like the money-changer seeing the coin, because, after apprehending the mode of the object as blue, etc., and extending to the penetration of the characteristics, it extends still further, reaching the manifestation of the path.
That is why “knowing in a particular mode separate from the modes of perceiving and cognizing.”
However, it is not always to be found where perception and consciousness are.2
But when it is, it is not disconnected from those states. And because it cannot be taken as disconnected thus: “This is perception, this is consciousness, this is understanding,” its difference is consequently subtle and hard to see.
Hence the venerable Nāgasena said: “A difficult thing, O King, has been done by the Blessed One.”
—“The difficult thing, O King, done by the Blessed One was the defining of the immaterial states of consciousness and its concomitants, which occur with a single object, and which he declared thus: ‘This is contact, this is feeling, this is perception, this is volition, this is consciousness’” .
 WHAT ARE ITS CHARACTERISTIC, FUNCTION, MANIFESTATION AND PROXIMATE CAUSE? Understanding has the characteristic of penetrating the individual essences of states.3 Its function is to abolish the darkness of delusion, which conceals the individual essences of states. It is manifested as non-delusion.
Because of the words, “One who is concentrated knows and sees correctly” , its proximate cause is concentration.
it cannot bring about the penetration of its characteristics as impermanent, painful, and not-self.
but it cannot bring about, by endeavouring, the manifestation of the supramundane path.
but he does not know such distinctions as, “This one is genuine, this is false, this is half-value.”
For that is what the words “it is understanding in the sense of act of understanding” refer to.
this act of understanding should be understood as .
—“What, venerable Nāgasena, is the difficult thing that has been done by the Blessed One?”
 HOW MANY KINDS OF UNDERSTANDING ARE THERE? 1. Firstly, as having the characteristic of penetrating the individual essences of states, it is of one kind.
As mundane and supramundane it is of two kinds.
Likewise as subject to cankers and free from cankers, and so on, 4. As the defining of mentality and of materiality, 5. As accompanied by joy or by equanimity, 6. As the planes of seeing and of development.
It is of three kinds as consisting in what is reasoned, consisting in what is learnt , and consisting in development.
Likewise as having a limited, exalted, or measureless object, 9. As skill in improvement, detriment, and means, 10. As interpreting the internal, and so on.
It is of four kinds as knowledge of the four truths, 12. And as the four discriminations.4
1. Herein, the singlefold section is obvious in meaning.
As regards the twofold section, the mundane is that associated with the mundane path
So it is of two kinds as mundane and supramundane. and the supramundane is that associated with the supramundane path.
In the second dyad, that subject to cankers is that which is the object of cankers.
That free from cankers is not their object.
This dyad is the same in meaning as the mundane and supramundane.
the dyads subject to cankers, associated with cankers
So it is of two kinds as subject to cankers and free from cankers, and so on.
In the third dyad, when a man wants to begin insight, his understanding of the defining of the four immaterial aggregates is understanding as defining of mentality,
and his understanding of the defining of the material aggregate is understanding as defining of materiality. So it is of two kinds as the defining of mentality and of materiality.
In the fourth dyad, understanding belonging to two of the kinds of sense-sphere profitable consciousness, and belonging to sixteen5 of the kinds of path consciousness with four of the jhānas in the fivefold method, is accompanied by joy.
Understanding belonging to two of the kinds of sense-sphere profitable consciousness, and belonging to four kinds of path consciousness with the fifth jhānas is accompanied by equanimity. So it is of two kinds as accompanied by joy or by equanimity.
In the fifth dyad, understanding belonging to the first path is the plane of seeing.
Understanding belonging to the remaining three paths is the plane of development . So it is of two kinds as the planes of seeing and of development.
As regards the triads, understanding acquired without hearing from another is that consisting in what is reasoned because it is produced by one’s own reasoning.
Understanding acquired by hearing from another is that consisting in what is heard, because it is produced by hearing.
Understanding that has reached absorption, having been somehow produced by development, is that consisting in development.
And this is said:
In the spheres of work invented by ingenuity, or in the spheres of craft invented by ingenuity, or in the sorts of science invented by ingenuity, any preference, view, choice, opinion, judgment, liking for pondering over things, that concerns ownership of deeds or is in conformity with truth or is of such kind as to conform with ‘Materiality is impermanent’ or ‘Feeling … perception … formations … consciousness is impermanent’ that one acquires without hearing it from another—that is called understanding consisting in what is reasoned. that one acquires by hearing it from another—that is called understanding consisting in what is learnt .
And all understanding in anyone who has attained is understanding consisting in development .
So it is of three kinds as consisting in what is thought out, in what is heard, and in development.
In the second triad, the understanding that occurs contingent upon sense-sphere states has a limited object.
That which occurs contingent upon fine-material-sphere states or immaterial-sphere states has an exalted object.
That is mundane insight.
That which occurs contingent upon Nibbāna has a measureless object.
That is supramundane insight. So it is of three kinds as having a limited, an exalted, or a measureless object.
In the third triad, it is increase that is called improvement. That is twofold as the elimination of harm and the arousing of good.
Skill in improvement is skill in these,
according as it is said:
When a man brings these things to mind both unarisen unprofitable things do not arise and arisen unprofitable things are abandoned in him; or when he brings these things to mind both unarisen profitable things arise
and arisen profitable things advance to growth, increase, development, and perfection in him. Whatever here is understanding, act of understanding for words elided see Dhs 16 non-delusion, investigation of states, right view, is called skill in improvement .
Non-increase is what is called detriment. That also is twofold as the diminution of good and the arousing of harm.
Skill in detriment is skill in these,
When a man brings these things to mind, both unarisen profitable things do not arise …” , and so on.
But in either of these cases any skill in means to cause the production of such and such things, which skill occurs at that moment and is aroused on that occasion, is what is called skill in means,
So it is of three kinds as skill in improvement, in detriment, and in means.
In the fourth triad, insight-understanding initiated by apprehending one’s own aggregates is interpreting the internal.6
That initiated by apprehending both is interpreting the internal and external. So it is of three kinds as interpreting the internal, and so on.
As regards the tetrads, in the first tetrad, knowledge that occurs contingent upon the truth of suffering is knowledge of suffering;
and knowledge that occurs contingent upon the way leading to the cessation of suffering is knowledge of the way leading to the cessation of suffering. So it is of four kinds as knowledge of the four truths.
In the second tetrad, the four kinds of knowledge classed as that concerned with meaning, etc., are called the four discriminations.
For this is said: “Knowledge about meaning is the discrimination of meaning .
Knowledge about law is the discrimination of law .
Knowledge about enunciation of language dealing with meaning and law is the discrimination of language .
Knowledge about kinds of knowledge is discrimination of perspicuity ” .
Herein, meaning is briefly a term for the fruit of a cause .
For in accordance with the cause it is served7 arrived at, reached, therefore it is called “meaning” .
But in particular the five things, namely, anything conditionally produced, Nibbāna, the meaning of what is spoken,  result, and functional , should be understood as meaning.
When anyone reviews that meaning, any knowledge of his, falling within the category concerned with meaning, is the discrimination of meaning.
Law is briefly a term for a condition .
For since a condition necessitates whatever it may be, makes it occur or allows it to happen, it is therefore called “law” .
But in particular the five things, namely, any cause that produces fruit, the noble path, what is spoken, what is profitable, and what is unprofitable, should be understood as law.
When anyone reviews that law, any knowledge of his, falling within the category concerned with law, is the discrimination of law.
This same meaning is shown in the Abhidhamma :
 “Knowledge about suffering is the discrimination of meaning.
Knowledge about the origin of suffering is the discrimination of law. Knowledge about the cessation of suffering is the discrimination of meaning. Knowledge about the way leading to the cessation of suffering is the discrimination of law …
 “Knowledge about cause is the discrimination of law.
Knowledge about the fruit of a cause is the discrimination of meaning …
 “whatever things are born, become, brought to birth, produced, completed, made manifest,
Knowledge about the things from which those things were born, became, were brought to birth, produced, completed, made manifest, is the discrimination of law …
 “Knowledge about ageing and death is the discrimination of meaning.
Knowledge about the origin of ageing and death is the discrimination of law. Knowledge about the cessation of ageing and death is the discrimination of meaning. Knowledge about the way leading to the cessation of ageing and death is the discrimination of law. Knowledge about birth … becoming … clinging … craving … feeling … contact … the sixfold base … mentality- materiality … consciousness … knowledge about formations is the discrimination of meaning. Knowledge about the origin of formations is the discrimination of law. Knowledge about the cessation of formations is the discrimination of meaning.
Knowledge about the way leading to the cessation of formations is the discrimination of law …
 “Here a bhikkhu knows the Dhamma —the Discourses, Songs, Expositions, Stanzas, Exclamations, Sayings, Birth Stories, Marvels, and Answers to Questions—
He knows the meaning of whatever is said thus: ‘This is the meaning of this that was said; this is the meaning of this that was said’—
 “What states are profitable?
On an occasion when profitable consciousness of the sense sphere has arisen that is accompanied by joy and associated with knowledge, having a visible datum as its object … or a mental datum as its object, or contingent upon whatever it may be, on that occasion there is contact … … there is non-wavering— these things are profitable.
Knowledge about these things is the discrimination of law.
Knowledge about their result is the discrimination of meaning” … .8 by the following analysis .
Knowledge about enunciation of language dealing with meaning and law : there is the language that is individual essence, the usage that has no exceptions,9 and deals with that meaning and that law.
Any knowledge falling within the category concerned with the enunciation of that, with the speaking, with the utterance of that, concerned with the root-speech of all beings, the Magadhan language that is individual essence, in other words, the language of law , any knowledge that as soon as it hears it spoken, pronounced, uttered, knows, “This is the individual-essence language; this is not the individual- essence language”—such knowledge is discrimination of language.10
One who has reached the discrimination of language knows, on hearing the words “phasso, vedanā,” etc., that that is the individual-essence language,
Knowledge about kinds of knowledge : when a man is reviewing and makes any of the foregoing kinds of knowledge the object of his knowledge, then any knowledge in him that has knowledge as its object is discrimination of perspicuity, and so is any knowledge about these aforesaid kinds of knowledge, which is concerned with details of their individual domains, functions, and so on.
And these four kinds of discrimination can be placed in two categories: the plane of the trainer and the plane of the non-trainer.
Herein, those of the chief disciples and great disciples come into the category of the non-trainer’s plane.
Those of the Elder Ānanda, the householder Citta, the layman Dhammika, the householder Upāli, the laywoman Khujjuttarā, etc., come into the category of the trainer’s plane.
And though they come into the categories of the two planes thus, they are nevertheless distinguishable in five aspects, that is to say, as achievement, mastery of scriptures, hearing, questioning, and prior effort.
Herein, achievement is the reaching of Arahantship.
Mastery of scriptures is mastery of the Buddha’s word.
Hearing is learning the Dhamma carefully and attentively.
Questioning is discussion of knotty passages and explanatory passages in the texts, commentaries, and so on. Prior effort is devotion to insight in the dispensation of former Buddhas, up to the vicinity of the stages of conformity and change-of- lineage by one who has practiced the duty of going with the meditation subject on alms round and coming back with it.11
Others have said:
A prior effort, and great knowledge, Knowledge of dialects, of scriptures,
And questioning, and then achievement, And likewise waiting on a teacher,
Success in friends—these are conditions Productive of discriminations.
Herein, prior effort is the same as that already stated.
Great learning is skill in some science or sphere of craft.
Dialects means skill in the hundred-and-one tongues,
Scriptures means mastery of the Buddha’s word, even if only of the Chapter of Similes.12
Achievement is stream-entry … or Arahantship.
Waiting on a teacher is living with very learned intelligent teachers.
Success in friends is acquisition of friends such as that.
Herein, Buddhas and Paccekabuddhas reach the discriminations through prior effort and through achievement.
Disciples do so through all these means.
And there is no special way of developing a meditation subject in order to attain discriminations.
But in trainers the attaining of the discriminations comes about next upon the liberation consisting in trainers’ fruition,
and in non-trainers it does so next upon the liberation consisting in non-trainers’ fruition.
For the discriminations come to success in Noble Ones only through the noble fruition as the ten powers do in Perfect Ones. So these were the discriminations referred to when it was said above: “It is of four kinds … as the four discriminations” .
and free from cankers, and dissociated from cankers , and so on. - The same method applies to .
Herein, what is understanding consisting in what is reasoned?
Herein, what is skill in improvement?
according as it is said: “Herein, what is skill in detriment?
according as it is said: “And all understanding of means thereto is skill in means” .
That initiated by apprehending another’s aggregates or external materiality not bound up with the faculties, that is, inanimate matter, is interpreting the external.
knowledge that occurs contingent upon the origin of suffering is knowledge of the origin of suffering;
knowledge that occurs contingent upon the cessation of suffering is knowledge of the cessation of suffering;
Knowledge about is the discrimination of meaning.
this is called the discrimination of law.
